<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20411 </DOCNO>
<HT>  "jpcar014___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<H2>   March Reports </H2>
<AU>  JPRS-CAR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  2 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Decision Process in Adopting Socialist Market </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0239A Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO in Chinese 13 Dec 93 pp 
1, 2 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0239A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> Article by XINHUA reporters Zou Aiguo (6760 1947 0948) and </F>
Zheng Qingdong (6774 1987 2639): "Magnificent Program of Action 
That Marches Toward the New Century -- Birth of `Decision of CPC 
Central Committee on Some Issues Concerning Establishment of a 
Socialist Market Economic Structure'"] 
  [Text] The 21st Century is approaching. The 3d Plenary 
Session of the 14th National CPC Congress was held in Beijing. 
An important document was adopted by the plenary session. That 
was the "Decision of the CPC Central Committee on Some Issues 
Concerning Establishment of a Socialist Market Economic 
Structure." 
  If it is said that the reform is aimed at building a grand 
mansion of socialist market economy, then we may definitely say 
that the "decision" is the magnificent blueprint in building 
this mansion. 
  For more than one month since the convocation of the 3d 
Plenary Session of the 14th National CPC Congress, many people 
at home and abroad are asking: How was such a magnificent 
blueprint and such a program of action born to help us forge 
ahead toward the new century? 
<H6>  I </H6>
  China spends a decade to relieve its 100-year distresses and 
worries. 
  The socialist market economy, something controversial which 
was tried out long time ago, was finally regarded as the correct 
orientation and written into the Party Constitution and the 
Constitution of the People's Republic of China after Comrade 
Deng Xiaoping gave his important talks during his South China 
tour last year and the convocation of the 14th National CPC 
Congress. To establish a socialist market economic structure has 
become a arduous task assigned to all CPC party members and all 
the people in China by the history and the times. 
  After the 14th National CPC Congress put forward the general 
task and principle in establishing the new system, people 
earnestly hope to have the following questions answered: What 
does the socialist market economic structure look like after 
all? How can we establish such a structure? What kind of 
magnificent scene will prevail in China after the establishment 
of the socialist market economy? 
  We should and must answer these questions. 
  This is the trend of the times... 
  People have heard a great deal about the saying that, "Cross 
the river by feeling the rocks." During the early stage of the 
reform, we were not even clear about the targets and focal 
points of the reform, the internal relations among all the 
sectors of the economic system, the complexity and the risks of 
the reform program and the difficult points in carrying out 
reform. We need to watch each step when we move forward. By 
relying on this kind of ideological guidance of boldly exploring 
things and carrying out practice, we have accumulated a great 
deal of experiences and learn many lessons after paying the 
necessary prices, and use them as our references in forging 
ahead. 
  Right now, the internal relations among various sectors of 
the system and the specific target and pattern in carrying out 
the reform have become clearer after 15 years of efforts and 
practice. The focal point has become obvious and the risks and 
the degree of complexity can be estimated. Under this situation, 
there are conditions in carrying out reform, and we should have 
more rational guidance in observing the times and sizing up the 
situation. 
  This is the voice of the people... 
  Let us look back at the history in carrying out reform. 
During the past few years, we promote this reform program 
spontaneously from the lower level to the higher level, and 
develop this program consciously from the higher level to the 
lower level by using the experience of the former to do work in 
the latter. Some of the reform measures are popularized in an 
overall manner after they have been spontaneously and 
successfully carried out by the masses and reaffirmed by the 
leadership departments such as the contract responsibility 
system which links remuneration with output in rural areas, the 
enterprise contract responsibility system and the share-holding 
system. 
  The people call for more rational guidance so that they can 
consciously follow such guidance. They hope that they may be 
able to make plans, forecast the future and pre-fulfill their 
targets in carrying out reform. 
  This is something inevitable in carrying out reform... 
  We have achieved a great deal after we worked hard to 
explore 
things for 15 years. On the one hand, the pattern with the 
publicly owned economic sector constituting the mainstay while 
various other economic sectors developing simultaneously has 
taken shape. and the role of the markets is rapidly expanding in 
the allocation of resources. A certain foundation has been laid 
for us so that we have the conditions to carry out the reform in 
an overall manner. On the other hand, progress has been 
insignificant in certain major realms in carrying out reform. 
This becomes a weak link in the entire chain of the economic 
structure, and affects the deepening of our reform program and 
the healthy development of our economy. We urgently need to 
carry out our reform and planning in an overall manner, paying 
attention to overall design, and to system and policy 
standardization. 
  Our unshirkable task is to keep pace with the development of 
the society and the times, meet the requirements of the people, 
and draw up a programmatic document which will specifically 
guide us to further deepen our reform, open up even wider to the 
outside world and establish a socialist market economic 
structure. 
  Just like what the report of the 14th National CPC Congress 
pointed out that, "To establish a socialist market economic 
structure involves China's economic foundation and many aspects 
of the superstructure. We need a series of relevant system 
reform and policy adjustments. We must pay full attention to 
working out an overall plan, and implement this plan in a 
planned manner and step by step." 
  It was precisely under this background that the "Decision" 
arose at the historic moment. 
<H6>  II </H6>
  The series of theses written by Comrade Deng Xiaoping on 
developing socialism with Chinese characteristics, particularly 
his real knowledge and deep insight reflected in his important 
talks which he gave during his south China tour in the spring 
last year, and the goal on building a socialist market economic 
structure explicitly put forward by the 14th National CPC 
Congress have pointed out the orientation in providing a solid 
theoretical foundation to draw up the "Decision." 
  In May of last year, the Political Bureau of the CPC Central 
Committee held a plenary session and decided to convene the 3d 
Plenary Session of the 14th National CPC Congress in Beijing 
during the second half of 1993. The main theme of the plenary 
session is to discuss issues on building a socialist market 
economic structure and work out some provisions for the 
development of such structure. 
  The team for drafting the "Decision" formed by personages of 
all spheres was established on 31 May. General Secretary Jiang 
Zemin delivered an important lengthy speech at the first meeting 
of the drafting team, putting forward a series of requirements 
concerning the framework, main contents and issues to be 
resolved. He emphatically pointed out that in drafting this 
"Decision," it is necessary to regard Comrade Deng Xiaoping's 
theory on building socialism with Chinese characteristics and 
the guideline laid down by the report of the 14th National CPC 
Congress as the guiding ideology and supply a programmatic 
document for the establishment of a socialist market economic 
structure. This "Decision" is of great significance in carrying 
out reform and opening up to the outside world and promoting the 
modernization program. It involves developments in China to the 
end of this century and even into the next century. We must 
fully demonstrate a high sense of responsibility and concentrate 
our efforts in drafting this document, said Jiang Zemin. 
  On the basis of General Secretary Jiang Zemin's views, the 
drafting team, first of all, prepared an outline of the document 
which contained 10 chapters and 53 articles. Soon after that the 
standing committee members of the Political Bureau of the CPC 
Central Committee listened to a briefing by the drafting team on 
the drafted "Decision," and agreed with the outline in 
principle. They asked the drafting team to begin drafting this 
document officially. 
  While the drafting team began to write the manuscript of the 
"Decision," the CPC Central Committee organized 16 special 
subject investigation and study groups composed of comrades of 
relevant departments in various localities to tour various 
localities to extensively investigate and study issues 
concerning the establishment of a socialist market economic 
structure, collecting data and laying a foundation to draft the 
document. 
  The drafting team and the various investigation and study 
groups maintained close contacts, and continuously exchanged 
views. They repeatedly carried out debates on each subject and 
gradually agreed with one another on some issues. 
  The first, second, third, and fourth manuscripts were 
completed one after another. Whenever a manuscript was 
completed, the drafting team invariably solicited opinions from 
all relevant departments for study, deliberation, and revision. 
  Comrade Jiang Zemin emphatically pointed out more than once 
that this document must go on advancing and developing. There 
must be a long-range target in carrying out reform, while we 
must achieve our goal in implementing this document. We must 
proceed from our actual situation at present and take into 
consideration China's reality, he said. 
  The standing committee members of the Political Bureau of 
the 
CPC Central Committee once again listened to a briefing made by 
the drafting team, and studied the fifth manuscript of the 
"Decision" at a meeting held on 9 September. General Secretary 
Jiang Zemin and various comrades of the standing committee 
expressed their views on firmly establishing a modern enterprise 
system, quickening the pace in reforming the financial system, 
the fiscal and taxation system, the investment system and the 
social security system and attaching importance to work in the 
fields of science and technology and education. Participants of 
the meeting endorsed the fifth manuscript of the "Decision" in 
principle and asked the drafting team to revise it and make 
further improvements. 
  A plenary meeting of the Political Bureau of the CPC Central 
Committee was held on 20 September at the Huairen Hall. 
Participants at the meeting discussed the revised sixth 
manuscript of the "Decision." They believed that this manuscript 
confirms with Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory on building 
socialism with Chinese characteristics and tallies with the 
guideline laid down by the 14th National CPC Congress, and that 
it had brought forth new ideas and made breakthroughs. They 
endorsed this manuscript in principle, and put forward their 
views to make further revisions. 
  The establishment of a socialist market economic structure 
is 
a pioneering undertaking unprecedented in history. In despite of 
the fact that there are experiences in developing market 
economy, on which we may draw on, there are still many aspects 
that we must develop by ourselves. There is no ready-made 
pattern that we may copy indiscriminately. Nor is there any 
shortcut that we may take. We can only find out a way suited to 
China's actual situation by conducting investigations and 
studies, drawing on collective wisdom and absorbing all useful 
ideas and keeping on improving. In the course of drafting the 
"decision," the party's general secretary, standing committee 
members and regular members of the Political Bureau of the CPC 
Central Committee and all staff members of the drafting team had 
earnestly and meticulously carried out their work with a high 
sense of responsibility to the party, the people and history. 
Jiang Zemin and other comrades presided over a total of four 
meetings and solicited views from various special subject 
investigation and study groups. The standing committee members 
of the Political Bureau of the CPC Central Committee also heard 
briefings made by various special subject investigation and 
study groups on financial affairs, taxation, pricing, marketing, 
and modern enterprise system. 
  The Central CPC Committee held a forum of nonparty 
personages on 15 October, soliciting views from the responsible 
persons of the All China Federation of Industry and Commerce and 
other nonparty public figures on the draft "decision." These 
personages who have cooperated and worked with the Communist 
Party of China for a long time offered many valuable suggestions 
on building a socialist market economic structure and revising 
the draft "decision." During that period, the comrades of the 
standing committee of the CPC Central Committee also held a 
symposium of senior party members and another forum of experts 
in the economic field to solicit their opinions and listen to 
their suggestions. 
  Moreover, the CPC Central Committee also printed and 
distributed copies of the sixth manuscript to various provinces, 
autonomous regions and municipalities directly under the central 
government and various departments and units under the central 
authorities and the State Council to solicit opinions. Members 
and alternate members of the party's 14th Central Committee, 
responsible cadres of the party, government and army at the 
central level and responsible comrades of the party committees 
in various provinces, autonomous regions and municipalities 
directly under the central government and various major military 
districts took part in debates and expressed their views on the 
"decision." While approving the draft "decision" in general, 
they made as many as 1,050 suggestions to make revisions. They 
suggested to make major revisions involving the structure and 
contents of the document as well as minor ones on wording and 
even punctuation. These suggestions fully reflect their serious 
attitude and lofty sense of responsibility. 
  On the basis of the suggestions from all sectors, the 
drafting team once again made 270 revisions on the manuscript 
for solicitation of opinions, forming the seventh manuscript. 
  The third meeting of the Political Bureau Standing Committee 
was held on 3 November to study the request for instructions 
submitted by the drafting team on several major issues 
concerning the revision of the draft "decision." The standing 
committee members earnestly carried out debates on these issues 
and made clear-cut decisions. 
  In accordance with the recommendation made by this Political 
Bureau Standing Committee meeting, the drafting team once again 
made some revisions on the draft "decision." 
  The Political Bureau of the CPC Central Committee held its 
second meeting on 6 November to study the revised "decision." 
The meeting endorsed this manuscript in principle and decided to 
refer some portions of the manuscript to the forthcoming Third 
Plenary Session of the 14th National CPC Congress for discussion. 
  After extensive discussions and repeated revisions, the 
17,000-odd word eighth manuscript of the "decision" was 
presented to the members and alternate members attending the 
Third Plenary Session held on 11 November. During the plenary 
session, the members and the alternate members once again 
earnestly studied and made discussions, and made nearly 100 
revisions. Only then, did the final version of the "decision" 
take shape. 
  For a period of five and half months, the work of drafting 
the "decision" was tense and arduous. The comrades of the 
drafting team had worked hard. Reviewing the process of drafting 
the "decision," we clearly see that this process is one of 
bringing democracy into full play and drawing on collective 
wisdom of the whole party. The work of drafting the "decision" 
was carried out under the direct collective leadership of the 
third generation with comrade Jiang Zemin as the core. The 
"decision" draws on the collective wisdom of the whole party and 
reflects the common will of the entire party and the people of 
all nationalities throughout the country. 
<H6>  III </H6>
  The 3d Plenary Session of the 14th National CPC Congress 
adopted the "Decision of the CPC Central Committee on Some 
Issues Concerning the Establishment of a Socialist Market 
Economic Structure" at the dignified Hall of the People on 14 
November. Just like a huge rock hitting the water, the 
"decision" has created a strong impact at home and abroad. 
  An influential foreign press commented: "The 3d Plenary 
Session of the 14th National CPC Congress which adopted the 
"decision" is of tremendous significance. Its significance is 
only next to the important talks given by Deng Xiaoping during 
his inspection tour in South China in spring last year and the 
party's 14th National Congress in the fall. If these three 
important stages are likened to a triple jump, then the Third 
Plenary Session is the last jump." 
  This document clearly portrays the basic framework of the 
socialist market economic structure. It is the overall plan and 
program of action in building our new system. It systematically 
works out the details of the reform targets for the development 
of a socialist market economic structure as put forward by the 
14th National CPC Congress. It not only fully reflects Comrade 
Deng Xiaoping's theory, thinking and viewpoints in building 
socialism with Chinese characteristics, but also makes new 
developments and breakthroughs on the basis of what was achieved 
at the 14th National CPC Congress. 
  The establishment of a socialist market economic structure 
is 
a pioneering undertaking and a kind of historic exploration. 
What helps us to decide on reform measures and judge their 
advantages or disadvantages are the "three conducive's" -- 
whether or not these measures are conducive to developing the 
productive forces in a socialist society, to enhancing the 
overall national strength of a socialist nation and to raising 
the people's living standard. All our reform measures are 
basically aimed at emancipating and developing the productive 
forces to the greatest extent. All the guidelines and policies 
laid down by the "decision" and its point of departure and final 
goal are also aimed at further emancipating and developing the 
productive forces. 
  It is precisely for this reason that we are able to 
explicitly put forward the need to "establish a modern 
enterprise system which meets the requirements of the market 
economy and in which the property rights as well as the rights 
and responsibilities of enterprises are clearly defined, 
government administration and enterprise management are 
separated and scientific management is established." 
  It is precisely for this reason that we are able to clearly 
put forward the need to "establish a nationwide integrated and 
open market system to closely combine the urban market with the 
rural market and link the domestic market with the international 
market, so as to optimize the allocation of resources." 
  It is precisely for this reason that we are able to boldly 
put forward the need to "transform the government functions in 
economic management and establish a sound macro-economic control 
system which chiefly relies on indirect means so as to ensure 
the healthy operation of the national economy." 
  It is precisely for this reason that we are able to 
repeatedly stress the need to "establish an income distribution 
system which takes the principle of `to each according to his 
work' as its mainstay, gives priority to efficiency while taking 
fairness into account so as to encourage some localities and 
people to become prosperous first and adhere to the road to 
common prosperity." 
  It is precisely for this reason that we are able to clearly 
point out the need to "establish a multi-layered social security 
system and provide both urban and rural people with a degree of 
security commensurate with China's reality so as to promote 
economic development and social stability." 
  The aforementioned five aspects particularly emphasized in 
the "decision" constitute the main contents in developing the 
socialist market economic structure. If we liken the socialist 
market economic structure to a mansion. The aforementioned five 
aspects are like the five major pillars of the mansion. The 
foundation of the mansion is the structure of the ownership 
system with the publicly owned economic sector constituting the 
mainstay and various other economic sectors developing 
simultaneously. The basic aim in building this mansion is to 
emancipate and develop the socialist productive forces to the 
greatest extent. 
  We have noted that in drawing the outline of the framework, 
the "decision," first of all, emphasized the principle of 
regarding the public-owned economic sector as the mainstay with 
various other economic sectors developing simultaneously. 
  The framework of the socialist market economic structure set 
by the "decision" represents the organic integration of the 
basic socialist system with the socialist market economic 
structure and it is imbued with the distinctive features of 
China's socialism at its preliminary stage. It constitutes a 
major breakthrough made by the 14th National CPC Congress and an 
important contribution to the theory of socialism. 
  Another breakthrough of the "decision" is to put forward the 
need to transform the government functions with the aim to 
establish a sound macroeconomic control system. 
  Right now, more and more people have realized that a sound 
macroeconomic control system is a general requirement in 
developing the market economic structure. It is an important 
component part of the socialist market economic structure. 
Showing great foresight, the "decision" put forward the need to 
establish a sound macroeconomic control system and emphatically 
pointed out the need to "rationally delineate the powers of the 
central and local authorities over economic administration and 
bring into full play the initiative of both the central and 
local authorities." It is precisely on this foundation that the 
"decision" explicitly put forward the major reform measures to 
be adopted in the near future. Either in promoting the reform of 
the monetary and taxation system, quickening the pace to reform 
the financial system or deepening and accelerating the reform of 
the investment and planning system, the "decision" invariably 
tried to make breakthroughs in establishing and improving the 
macroeconomic control. 
  The "decision" also rendered a brilliant exposition on 
developing the legal system. It pointed out that the socialist 
market economic structure internally includes the development of 
a legal system. Only in the legal form can comparatively 
matured and good systems be reaffirmed, and only by forming a 
system, can legal measures be consolidated. While trying to 
establish the market economic system by the end of the century, 
it is necessary to set up a legal system which meets the 
requirements in developing market economy. In carrying out all 
types of reform, the "decision" invariably placed emphasis on 
the development of the legal system. It explicitly pointed out 
that many reform measures must be carried out "according to law." 
  Some people say that the "decision" is an important document 
in Marxist political economy. It is vast in knowledge and rich 
in contents. It has made not only breakthroughs and developments 
in the aforementioned aspects, but also new proposals of great 
significance in theory and in practice on socialist economic 
theories and policies. 
  The "decision" put forward a new point of view that "with 
the fluidity and reshuffling of property rights, there are more 
and more economic entities with mixed ownership. This will bring 
forth a new structure of ownership." This point of view will 
become an important trend of development in China's economic 
realm in the future. 
  The "decision" put forward that, "The state should create 
conditions for economic sectors under different kinds of 
ownership to compete in the market on equal terms, and should 
deal with the various types of enterprises without 
discrimination." To create conditions for competition on equal 
terms is an important function of the government under the 
conditions of market economy. It is a requirement in ensuring 
the healthy development of market economy and promoting system 
and policy standardization. 
  With regard to the system of income distribution to 
individuals, the "decision" put forward the principle of giving 
priority to efficiency while taking fairness into account." It 
attached more importance to efficiency. It pointed out: "It is 
necessary to permit the distribution of earnings by capital and 
other production factors belonging to individuals." This is a 
requirement for all economic sectors and all forms of income 
distribution to develop simultaneously. With regard to the 
reform of the rural economic system, the "decision" put forward 
that the term for contracting cultivated land may be extended, 
the inheritance of contracts for the management of explorative 
undertakings and the compensated transfer of the land-use rights 
be allowed. The "decision" also made new breakthroughs in 
building small cities and townships and reforming the household 
registration system....[XINHUA ellipsis] 
  Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory in building socialism with 
Chinese characteristics has, for the first time, systematically 
answered the series of questions on how to build, consolidate 
and develop socialism in economically and culturally backward 
China. With a scientific approach of emancipating the mind and 
seeking truth from facts, the "decision" which was born under 
the guidance of this theory has scored new achievements in 
integrating Marxism with China's reality today, and once again 
demonstrated the courage and creativeness of the Chinese 
Communists in continuously opening up and keenly seeking 
advancement. It will definitely play a significant role in 
guiding and promoting the development of the reform and opening 
up program and the undertaking for socialist construction. 
  For the past 15 years, we have scored universally 
acknowledged glorious achievements. During the last seven years 
of this century, we will preliminarily establish the socialist 
market economic structure. 
  This constitutes a great pioneering undertaking 
unprecedented in the history of mankind, another trans-century 
achievement in carrying out China's reform and opening-up 
program and another major and profound change in the Chinese 
society. 
  "Solid ice has been broken, the navigation channel open to 
traffic, and the road clearly pointed out." We are filled with 
confidence in face of the new century! 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20412 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar014___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  2 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Chief Statistics Economist on Financial Regulation </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0023A Hong Kong CHING CHI TAO PAO [ECONOMIC REPORTER] in 
Chinese No 45, 15 Nov 93 pp 34-36 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0023A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong CHING CHI TAO PAO [ECONOMIC REPORTER] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Qiu Xiaohua (6726 2556 5478), Chief Economist, </F>
State Bureau of Statistics: "Fixed Capital Investment Under 
Macroeconomic Control"] 
  [Text] Since the advent of the 1990's, some new changes 
have occurred in the Chinese economy. On one hand, the basic 
needs of food and shelter for people living in towns and 
villages have been resolved, allowing them to progress toward a 
comparatively more well-off life. As a suitable balance between 
income and consumption levels has not been reached, a new state 
of heated consumption exists. Consequently, the people's overall 
consumption level is only in a temporary stage of stable growth, 
with part of the money transferred from the consumption base 
into the investment base. On the other hand, the people's 
economy is entering a new phase which is placing greater demands 
on the infrastructure. Add to this the need to revise the 
structure of enterprise and property, the opening up to the 
outside and the increasing use of foreign capital, all of which 
have sent the need for fixed asset investment into a relatively 
prosperous phase. This shows that growth in the national economy 
will increasingly depend on growth in capital investment to 
drive it. Such a leading investment model of economic activity 
has been maintained for three years. Since its beginning in 
1991, fixed asset investment in China has continued its rapid 
growth, with fixed asset investment for the whole society that 
year showing a 23.8 percent growth over the year before. Growth 
for 1992 was 42.6 percent over that for the year before, and 
growth for the first half of 1993 was 61 percent over that for 
the same period a year ago (growth in some units was 70.7 
percent). Historically, such rapid growth was seldom seen 
(except that during three years of the "Great Leap Forward"). 
Driven by this rapid growth in fixed asset investment, China's 
economic growth had also increased noticeably, so that the total 
value of the gross national product (GNP) in 1991 increased 8 
percent over that for the year before; that for 1992 increased 
13.2 percent; and that for the first half of 1993 increased 14.1 
percent. 
<H5>  Preliminary Results of Macroeconomic Control </H5>
  However, because overly rapid growth in fixed asset 
investment has exceeded the nation's present capacity to 
accommodate it, some outstanding problems accompanying this 
heated growth in the national economy have surfaced. Add to this 
the confusion in the financial order which has further 
precipitated a crisis in the supply of production materials 
because of this excessive investment growth. This was 
accompanied by serious inflation, import growth exceeding that 
of exports, a drop in foreign exchange and savings, market 
instability, and other such problems. As the result, beginning 
in June 1993, the Chinese government adopted measures to 
strengthen macroeconomic control, with hopes that by regulating 
the financial order and strengthening control over investment 
projects, it could control this overly rapid growth in fixed 
asset investment. During the last three months, exercise of 
related policies have seen some results, the chief of which are 
noted as follows: 
  -- A marked drop in fixed asset investment. In June, fixed 
asset investment in state units showed growth of 76.7 percent 
over that for the same period a year ago, but the increase in 
July showed a drop of 71.7 percent; for August, a drop of 58.1 
percent, and for September, 56.8 percent. For the third quarter, 
a total of 182.4 billion yuan (PRC currency) had been invested, 
a drop of nine percentage points from that for the first half of 
the year. Of this, investment in infrastructure increased 56.2 
percent, investment in replacement and remodelling, 57.3 
percent; and investment in commercial housing, 120.8 percent; 
each of which respectively fell back 11.7, 10.8, and 19 
percentage points. From the first quarter to the third quarter, 
completed cumulative investment totalled 401.5 billion yuan, a 
growth of 66.4 percent over that for the same period a year ago, 
but a drop of 4.3 percentage points over that for the first half 
of the year. 
  -- Slowdown in various types of privately raised capital 
and loans made domestically. In the third quarter, capital 
investment in infrastructure and replacements and improvements 
totalled 138.3 billion yuan, an increase of 48.9 percent over 
that for the same period a year ago, but a fall-back of 3.9 
percentage points over that for the first half of the year. Of 
this, 33.9 billion yuan were domestic loans, an increase of 18.6 
percent, but a fall-back of 5.4 percentage points. Various types 
of privately raised capital totalled 70.3 billion yuan, an 
increase of 75.8 percent, but a fall-back of 10 percentage 
points. 
  -- Noticeable reduction in new projects. In the third 
quarter, new infrastructure construction and improvements 
totalled more than 14,400 projects, a reduction of 3,400 over 
the figure for the same period a year ago, and a great 
turnaround from the huge increase for the first half of the 
year. In particular, control was effective with a number of 
large new local projects, and major national construction 
projects also experienced a correspondingly smaller reduction. 
  -- An investment slowdown in all regions. During the third 
quarter, completed fixed asset investment in the eastern region 
of the country totalled 101.4 billion yuan, an increase of 68.9 
percent over that for the same period a year ago, though the 
increase fall-back was 12.3 percentage points of that for the 
first half of the year. For the central region, completed fixed 
asset investment totalled 43.8 billion yuan, an increase of 48.5 
percent, with a fall-back of 4.6 percentage points. For the 
western region, such completed investment totalled 25.3 billion 
yuan, an increase of 48.6 percent, with a fall-back of 2.6 
percentage points. While the investment situation in the 
eastern, central, and western regions does not show any greatly 
noticeable changes as a whole, it is still the eastern region by 
itself that shows much more rapid investment growth than the 
other two areas, the proportion of its growth comprising more 
than 60 percent of the total figure. 
  -- Noticeable increase in availability of capital for 
major construction projects. During the first half of the year, 
because of the massive scope of investments and an excessive 
number of newly started projects, distribution of capital was 
scattered, so that major national construction projects 
experienced a capital shortage, with less than 20 percent of the 
total needed being available, and almost 20 percentage points 
lower than that usually available in other years. Since the 
third quarter, because of active regulatory measures taken by 
the state, this unfavorable picture has improved considerably. 
According to studies made, investment for major national 
construction projects had stepped up noticeably by September, 
and capital availability had risen to over 80 percent, of which 
96 percent of the capital needed for railroad construction was 
available. Capital availability for nine major industries such 
as railroads, electrical power, steel, chemicals, petroleum, 
petrochemistry, coal, communications, and construction materials 
averaged 82.8 percent, an increase of 16.2 percentage points 
over the figure for the same period a year ago. Judging from 
present developments, it can be predicted that new increased 
productivity resulting from the major construction projects 
planned by the state will come to pass, which is favorable to 
enhancing the after effects of economic development. 
  The changes described above show that the policy measures 
taken by the Chinese government to strengthen macroeconomic 
control of fixed asset investment are showing some preliminary 
results in the third quarter. There is no doubt that they will 
have an active effect in improving the macroeconomic environment. 
<H5>  Remaining Problems </H5>
  At the same time, it should be seen that because reforms 
in the investment system have yet to be attained, present 
investment activity is still driven chiefly by the government, 
and enterprises have yet to truly become the principal body for 
investment. As the result, investment activity lacks 
understanding of risk, and blind investing with no thought of 
benefits is more commonly seen. The task to control investment 
growth and improve the investment structure is still rather 
arduous. 
  Important problems remaining in the investment area are 
the following: 
  1. Increasing investment growth remains on the high side, 
and no noticeable change is seen in this picture. For the nine 
foregoing months, the rate of increasing investment growth 
remains over 60 percent. Preliminary figures for total 
investment by the society at large for the whole year may 
possibly exceed 1.1 trillion yuan, an increase of more than 360 
billion yuan over the figure for the year before, an increasing 
growth of more than 46 percent, and expected to exceed the plan 
by more than 40 percent. Whether the increasing investments are 
in volume or in the rate of growth, they are the most numerous 
and the highest since the 1980's. The root cause of overly rapid 
investment growth for the year is the overly large scope of 
infrastructure construction. During the foregoing three 
quarters, the number of ongoing investment projects totalled 
more than 90,000, of which new projects comprised 38.6 percent, 
the highest proportion for the same period during the last few 
years. Infrastructure construction was allotted more than 1.7 
trillion yuan, an increase of more than 500 billion yuan over 
last year, a growth of 40.2 percent. Because the scope is much 
too extensive, it will affect stable investment growth for some 
years to come. 
  2. The problem of investment structures not always being 
logical remains outstanding. Generally speaking, investment 
structures have undergone revision, with strengthening of some 
short-line assets, particularly transportation and 
telecommunications, which have shown noticeable growth. From the 
first quarter to the end of the third quarter, 71.5 billion yuan 
of investment capital were processed, a growth of 106.4 percent 
over that for the same period a year ago. The proportion of 
investment comprised rose to 20.5 percent from an earlier 15.8 
percent. The pace to invest in major engineering projects such 
as the Beijing-Kowloon Railway was noticeably speeded up. 
  But the problem of investment structures not being logical 
all the time remains, and this is manifested chiefly in three 
areas. First, investment growth in the third stage industries, 
with the exception of transportation and telecommunications, has 
been advancing too fast. In the foregoing nine months, completed 
investments in the third stage industries totalled 154.3 billion 
yuan, a growth of 95.7 percent over that for the same period a 
year ago, and 69.3 percentage points and 55.8 percentage points 
respectively, over that for investments in the first stage and 
second stage industries. The proportion of industrial investment 
rose from 36 percent to 44.1 percent. Except for the 82.7 
billion yuan invested in transportation and telecommunications, 
this increasing investment in the third stage industries grew 
87.3 percent, 27.7 percentage points higher than investment 
growth for the nation as a whole. The proportional investment 
was as high as 23.7 percent, a rise of 3.5 percentage points 
over that for the same period a year ago. 
  Second is the fact that the proportion of investment in 
the infrastructure continues to drop. For the past three 
quarters, investment in the first stage industries was 7.9 
billion yuan, a growth of 26.4 percent over that for the same 
period a year ago, the proportional investment dropping from 2.9 
percent to 2.3 percent. Among the second stage industries, 
investments in energy and raw materials totalled 113.7 billion 
yuan, a growth of 33.6 percent and a proportional investment of 
36.8 percent, a drop of 7.1 percentage points from the 43.9 
percent figure for the same period a year ago. 
  Third is inadequate emphasis on investments to be clear, 
and of good quality and high grade. From January to September, 
among investments made by state units, 135.9 billion yuan was 
invested on new construction projects, a growth of 86.5 percent 
over that for the same period a year ago, and 20 percentage 
points higher than the national average. The proportional 
investment rose from 33.3 percent to 38.8 percent. But 
investments used for remodeling and expansion totalled only 
187.4 billion yuan, an increase of 50.7 percent, but a fall-back 
from a proportional investment of 56.7 percent to 53.6 percent. 
This does not agree with the state's regulatory goals. 
  3. The heat on real estate is still on. The disjointed 
contradictions in property sales is comparatively obvious. 
During the foregoing nine months, investments in commercial 
housing nationwide totalled 51.9 billion yuan, an increase of 
134.2 percent over that for the same period a year ago, 
completing the state's 43 billion yuan plan ahead of time. For 
the year, this figure could possibly exceed 100 billion yuan, a 
one-fold increase over that a year ago. At the same time, the 
sale of commercial housing had been less than ideal, for total 
sales in the third quarter was only 14.4 billion yuan, a growth 
of only 35.6 percent over that for the same period a year ago. 
In comparison with growth in production, this was an almost 
one-fold slowdown. At present, commercial housing yet to be sold 
nationwide adds up to an area of more than 50 million square 
meters. This is due chiefly to overly rapid investment growth, 
illogical structure [poor design], oversupply of upscale 
buildings, and overly high prices which make such housing beyond 
the reach of average-salaried citizens. Of course the difficulty 
in selling commercial housing is also related to slow reforms in 
the low-rent system. Actually, there is not much construction of 
commercial housing on the Chinese mainland at present, for 
housing is far from adequate. 
  Besides this, the phenomenon of capital defaults in the 
construction field still exists; this affects the requirements 
for the construction industry to operate normally. 
<H5>  Important Countermeasures </H5>
  An extended look into the coming months sees growth in 
fixed asset investment continuing its steady decline, and the 
structure of fixed asset investment being further revised. 
However, for the state to achieve ideal macroeconomic control, 
further effort is still required. At present, it is most 
important to concentrate and improve on work in the following 
areas: 
  First is sufficient scientific grasp of investment control 
to the extent that such growth will adapt to the need for stable 
and healthy growth of the people's economy. I feel that to 
maintain China's economy at a growth rate of about 10 percent, 
we must have fixed asset investment growth at a rate higher than 
20 percent. An investment rate maintained around 35 percent 
actually nets investment growth around 10 percent. So it is not 
advisable to constrict investment too much. It is also important 
to avoid overly rapid investment growth, which may cause 
economic activity to lose control. This, in turn, will aggravate 
tension between various factors. 
  Second is attention to improving the investment structure, 
so investment in infrastructure, basic industries and facilities 
can develop at an even faster pace. We must concentrate the 
necessary financial resources to strengthen the buildup in 
agriculture, transportation, energy, and important raw 
materials. While this is the driving force that assures stable 
economic growth, it is also the condition necessary to support 
the next cycle of rapid economic development in a healthy 
direction. Because of this, we must step up the pace of reform 
in the finance and investment system, and establish banks to 
finance and develop basic industries, expand the issuance of 
special bonds, encourage development of shareholder enterprises, 
further correct the pricing system, and stimulate and promote 
funneling of social capital toward construction of 
infrastructure and basic facilities. As to investment in most 
processing industries, all effort must be made to utilize 
available local resources, and manage them according to market 
rules. We must suitably reduce active investment by the state 
into these areas, to support development of short-line 
industries, and really loosen "bottleneck" restricting 
contradictions. 
  Third is greater effort to improve investment efficiency, 
and cut down on loss and waste. Toward this end, we must step up 
legislative action pertaining to investment to improve the 
democratic and scientific aspects of investment policy, and 
systematically assure the efficiency of construction projects. 
At the same time, we must strengthen macroeconomic control of 
investment at the source, and exercise necessary management of 
capital flow, to guarantee the capital needs of the state's 
important construction projects. Furthermore, information on the 
state's property policies must be issued in a timely manner, to 
strengthen guidance, and to reduce blind investment by society. 
With respect to public investment and use of foreign capital, we 
must move gradually from ownership management to property policy 
management, and prepare corresponding policy measures to assure 
that the state's overall situation be scientific and logical. 
  Basically speaking, we must implement a body of investment 
gradually, for it to evolve from the government toward 
enterprises and individuals, thereby overcoming the abuses of 
"everyone eating from the same pot." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20413 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar014___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  2 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> PROVINCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Summary of 1993 Yunnan Economic Development </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0299A Kunming YUNNAN RIBAO in Chinese 1 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0299A </F>
<F P=104>  Kunming YUNNAN RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by reporter Luo Jie (5012 2638): "Deepening </F>
Reforms, Opening Wider, Accelerating Development -- Our 
Province's Economy Shows Sustained, Stable Growth"] 
  [Text] Today is the beginning of a new year. Reviewing the 
1993 economy of our province, we are happy to note that it 
continued to grew steadily on the basis of the relatively fast 
development achieved in the previous year. 
  According to the initial figures provided by the departments 
concerned, our province's total output value of goods and 
services for 1993 could reach 64.8 billion yuan, up 10 percent 
over the previous year. This double-digit growth, which we 
achieved despite numerous economic difficulties, was 
attributable to our efforts to deepen the reforms, open 
ourselves wider, adjust the economic structure, and raise our 
economic efficiency. Among the various components of the total 
output value, it is estimated that the tertiary industry 
increased 15 percent, topping the primary and secondary 
industries. 
  Last year our province's economic operations had the 
following main features: 
  A fairly high agricultural output. Despite the severe 
natural 
disasters--a drought followed by waterlogging and a cold 
spell--which hit a large part of our farmland, we still had a 
fairly good harvest, thanks to the strenuous efforts of the 
cadres at all levels and the masses in the province. Last year's 
total grain output is estimated at 10.85 million tons, or 1.4 
percent more than the previous year. A continued growth was 
achieved in the output of tobacco, tea, sericulture, and animal 
husbandry. Township enterprises developed at a quicker pace. 
Total agricultural revenue is estimated at 20 billion yuan, a 
53.2 percent increase over the previous year. 
  A stable industrial growth. Despite numerous difficulties, 
such as a shortage of electric power, insufficient revolving 
funds, seriously inadequate outbound freight facilities, and 
rising prices of raw materials and other supplies, it is 
estimated that the gross value of industrial production could 
still reach 53 billion yuan, 14 percent more than the previous 
year. Production and sales were well coordinated, and economic 
efficiency continued to improve. For the period from January to 
November, sales within the budgets of state-owned enterprises 
increased 36 percent, while their profits and taxes rose 84 
percent. Investment in fixed assets were focused on basic 
industries and infrastructure projects. The amount invested in 
production accounted for 67 percent of the total investment. 
More emphasis was laid on key construction projects. 
  Stable sales on the market. With the step-by-step 
implementation of macroregulatory and control measures, the 
retail market gradually became stable. Retail sales between 
January and November totaled 24.6 billion yuan, 23 percent more 
than the previous year's corresponding period. The upward trend 
of consumption by government institutions was put under control. 
In the capital goods market, the problem of unbalanced supply 
and demand was eased for rolled steel, cement, and other main 
products. 
  An improving financial situation. Through screening and 
rectification, we were able to effectively control such 
activities as illegal lending and borrowing as well as 
indiscriminate fund-raising. Residents' savings showed an 
upturn, and banks had a better paying capability. 
  Fairly good results in fulfilling the revenue and 
expenditure budget. With the rise in the economic returns of 
industrial and commercial enterprises and especially due to the 
further development of the two tobacco-related industries, there 
was an increase in the industrial and commercial tax receipts, 
leading to a relatively fast growth of government revenue. Last 
year's revenue was estimated at 14.5 billion yuan from local 
resources. 
  A continued rise in residents income. For urban people, the 
average per capita annual income used for living expenses is 
estimated at 2,430 yuan. In rural areas, the average net income 
of an individual is estimated at 670 yuan. Allowing for 
inflation, these are higher than the previous year by about 6 
and 2 percent respectively. 
  A further growth of imports and exports. According to 
estimates, last year's exports stood at $510 million, an 
increase of 12 percent over the previous year; imports $230 
million, an increase of 12.7 percent; and the amount of border 
trade, including imports and exports, 2.8 millon yuan, an 
increase of 25 percent. With the continued development of the 
tourist industry, it is estimated that 376,000 travelers came 
into our province for sightseeing, a 20 percent surge over the 
previous year. Total receipts from travelers' foreign exchange 
certificates amounted to 530 million yuan, surpassing the 
previous year by 43 percent. 
  An objective analysis shows that, despite our stable 
economic 
growth, some problems still exist in our economic activities. 
Chief among them are the difficulties encountered in developing 
agriculture caused by severe natural disasters and the hiking 
prices of means of production, the arduous task of curbing the 
sharp rise in commodity prices, the increased losses suffered by 
certain enterprises, and the relatively large amounts of unpaid 
taxes. All these problems have to be resolved through improving 
the reform drive. 
  Based on the three-step national economic development 
strategy, the provincial party committee and government have 
come up with the following basic proposal for Yunnan's economic 
development in the future: With respect to the total output 
value of goods and services, we should maintain an average 
annual growth rate of 9-10 percent during the 1990's and achieve 
the objective of quadrupling the 1980 figure by 1995; that is, 
earlier than specified in the national strategy. We should 
score a total output value of more than 100 billion yuan and try 
to make it as much as eight times the 1980 figure by the year 
2000. By that time, the rural people in our province should 
have a net per capita income of 1,200 yuan, the food and 
clothing problems in poverty-stricken areas should be resolved, 
and the people in most parts of the province should enjoy a 
comfortable life. The Yunnan people should work hard to achieve 
this goal. 
  The first priority task will be infrastructure construction. 
In agriculture, we will build 50 more large- and medium-sized 
water conservancy projects during the eighth and ninth five-year 
plan periods. Our goal is to raise the irrigated acreage from 
the present 35 percent to 50 percent of the total farmland in 
the province and build 25 million mu of high- and stable-yield 
fields of various categories to meet different requirements. 
With regard to the power industry, we will invest some 10 
billion yuan in building the 1.35-million-kw Dachaoshan Power 
Station and the 600,000-kw Qujing Power Plant, beginning this 
year. And we will continue to build a number of small- and 
medium-sized hydro power projects. Transportation construction 
will be focused on building four railways, renovating six 
highways, improving and constructing eight airports. As for 
communications, we will build a number of microwave, fiber 
optical, and second-grade satellite communications facilities to 
link Kunming with various prefectures and autonomous 
prefectures. With respect to mail and telecommunication 
services, we will see to it that automation is achieved in all 
counties and program-controlled equipment is installed in all 
major cities. 
  Commencing this year, development of promising industries 
will be one of the major economic tasks in our province. In 
addition to the tobacco, sugar, and tea industries, we will 
develop livestock production, food-processing, nonferrous metal, 
machinery, phosphatic chemical, iron and steel, and building 
materials projects so as to gradually turn them into new strong 
industries. 
  Another major task is to seize opportunities to create a new 
situation in opening our province to the outside world, 
Southeast Asia in particular. Now, our province has nearly 700 
foreign-funded enterprises, and the negotiated foreign 
investment has reached $1.46 billion, of which the amount 
actually received and put to use is $144 million. To bring our 
opening-up activities to a high level, expand their fields, and 
develop them in breadth and depth, our goal is to increase the 
number of our products capable of earning more than $100 million 
of foreign exchange from one to six and solicit more foreign 
investment, mainly in the exploitation of our strong resources, 
in infrastructure construction and basic industries, in 
exchange-earning agricultural projects, and in the development 
of tourism. We will try to bring the three kinds of 
foreign-funded enterprises to over 1,000 and sign a number of 
agreements on Sino-foreign cooperative projects during the 
Eighth Five-Year Plan period. Additionally, we will further 
develop border trade and economic cooperation with neighboring 
countries in an effort to maintain a 20 percent growth in border 
trade. 
  According to what we have learned, accelerating the 
development of township enterprises, export-oriented economic 
undertakings, and the tourist industry and further restructuring 
the economy are also major parts of Yunnan's economic work in 
the future. Meanwhile, Yunnan will always pay attention to 
correcting unbalanced development as a strategic task in 
economic construction. 
  At the beginning of the new year, people are expecting 
Yunnan 
to take new strides to deepen its reforms and further its 
openness to the outside world. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20414 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar014___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  2 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Special Economic Zones as Tax Reform `Laboratory' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0264A Beijing CAIMAO JINGJI [FINANCE AND TRADE 
ECONOMICS] in Chinese No 11, 11 Nov 93 p 23-26 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0264A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CAIMAO JINGJI [FINANCE AND TRADE 
ECONOMICS] </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Deng Ziji (6772 1311 1015) of Xiamen University, </F>
and responsible editor Chen Lingshu (7115 0109 3219): "Special 
Economic Zones as Laboratory of Tax Reform"] 
  [Text] The tax systems of China's special economic zones 
[SEZ's] took shape following the zones' establishment. During 
the last dozen years, the tax systems have undergone continuous 
reform and development and their record of successes has 
attracted much attention. They meet the requirements of the 
development of a SEZ market economy and have done much to boost 
the rapid growth of SEZ economies. By providing national tax 
development with valuable experiences, they have fulfilled their 
role as a laboratory. To further boost the development of the 
socialist market economy in the SEZ's, we must continue to 
deepen the reform of their existing tax systems. 
  I. Development Of Market Economy in SEZ Requires Deepening 
Of 
Tax Reform 
  SEZ market economies have the basic attributes of other 
market economies, of which I think the three most important ones 
are: 1) Competitiveness. Competition lies at the heart of the 
market mechanism, which essentially involves the use of the 
price lever to adapt to changes in supply-demand relations in 
accordance with the demand of the law of value in order to put 
pressure on and motivate the principal players in the economy. 
Survival of the fittest steers resources to those sectors of the 
economy where they can be utilized most efficiently; 2) Unity. A 
market economy implies a unified market where all capital goods 
can circulate freely, putting the competitive mechanism to work 
on a national scale and achieving the optimal allocation of 
resources; 3) Openness. This means more than dismantling the 
regional barriers and bringing about interregional openness 
within a country. Even more important, it requires a nation, 
proceeding from national interests, to admit foreign funds and 
open up its domestic market, on the one hand, and promote the 
entry of its products into overseas markets, on the other, thus 
taking part in competition on the international market and 
bettering the efficiency of resource allocation. The development 
of the SEZ market economy is premised on a unified and open 
market that encourages competition. This requires the SEZ to 
design a tax system, possibly a uniform one, in accordance with 
established international practices and create a tax environment 
that treats everybody equally in order to spur competition and 
enhance efficiency. Furthermore, since the development of a SEZ 
market economy entails improving economic regulation and 
control, we should make the most of taxation in a SEZ as a 
regulator and controller of the market economy while minimizing 
its distorting effects on the market mechanism. 
  In China, SEZ market economies have their uniqueness as well 
as the basic attributes of other market economies. Their 
uniqueness is that they draw upon the success stories of market 
economies around the world and carry out bold experiments to 
better serve as a model for the rest of China as it develops a 
socialist market economy. 
  Surveying existing SEZ tax systems, we can readily discover 
many problems. There is an urgent need for reform deepening in 
several areas, notably the following. 
  First, the existence of "two systems, internal and external" 
and "one tax, several systems" constitutes a major barrier to 
fair competition. In the early days of reform and openness, when 
SEZ's were first set up, we adopted two different tax systems, 
one for domestic enterprises, and one for foreign enterprises. 
Take the income tax payable by a SEZ enterprise, for instance. 
Although they all pay income taxes at the uniform rate of 15 
percent, there are actually different rules for calculating 
taxes. In effect, the "one tax, multiple systems" rule still 
obtains, depending on the economic nature of the enterprise in 
question. The existence of "two systems, internal and external" 
and "one tax, multiple systems" makes the tax system of a SEZ 
more complicated and harder to understand than it should be. The 
taxpayer has trouble figuring it out. Foreign businessmen, in 
particular, find the system unfamiliar. Moreover, when the 
distribution of the tax burden is highly inequitable, it 
strongly militates against the full utilization of the market 
mechanism in the SEZ and the promotion of fair competition on a 
level playing field. 
  Second, the existing SEZ circulation tax system is sharply 
at 
cross-purposes with the requirements of economic construction 
and development in the SEZ's. Both the combined industrial and 
commercial tax and the "three taxes," namely product tax, 
value-added tax [VAT], and sales tax, run counter to the drive 
to develop an export-oriented economy and a better market 
economy in SEZ's. To begin with, the raison d'etre of a SEZ is 
primarily to develop an export-oriented economy. Yet the current 
circulation taxes clearly fall short as a regulator of imports 
and exports. The combined industrial and commercial tax and the 
product tax neither accurately and thoroughly channel drawbacks 
back to exporters nor tax imports fully; as such they have not 
stimulated export growth as strongly as they should. They have 
also failed to play a strong part in regulating imports. Second, 
as a window for China's four modernizations, the SEZ is supposed 
to play a special role by importing foreign funds and technology 
and entering into economic cooperation with units in the 
interior. The current circulation tax system, however, hinders 
lateral economic cooperation and specialized production as a 
result of double taxation. Furthermore, under the existing 
circulation tax system in SEZ's, the tax is built into the price 
of a commodity. In a socialist market economy, commodity prices 
are mainly determined by the market. When the tax is a built-in 
component of a price, taxation becomes much less effective in 
regulating production and consumption. Sometimes the flawed tax 
system may even have adverse effects on market allocation. Also, 
when a tax is built into a price, there is often the false 
impression that enterprises are bearing the burden of the 
circulation taxes. In addition, enterprises are driven to pursue 
reduction in or exemptions from circulation tax, which works 
against enterprises carrying out production and other operations 
in accordance with the law of market competition. Finally there 
is the urban preservation and construction tax, actually a 
surtax on the "three taxes"-- product, VAT, and sales -- imposed 
to raise funds for urban preservation and construction. But not 
only is this tax inherently unscientific, it also dilutes the 
regulatory effects of the "three taxes," which does not bode 
well for development of a market economy in a SEZ. 
  Third, tax breaks in SEZ's have not been totally successful 
in putting into effect the industrial policies of the central 
government or the SEZ concerned or making full use of taxation 
as a regulator. Among the array of preferential tax breaks, a 
socialist market economy relies primarily on income tax breaks 
to realize its industrial policy. In China's SEZ's today, 
however, income tax breaks, particularly those offered to 
foreign enterprises, have not been as successful as expected in 
implementing the industrial policy and adjusting the industrial 
structure or product mix. For example, the SEZ offers 
preferential tax breaks to all foreign companies which invest in 
production industries, including industry, agriculture, 
transportation, and communications. This is the centerpiece of 
preferential tax treatment for foreign-owned enterprises, yet it 
does little to help steer foreign investment dollars into the 
right areas. This is particularly true at a time when an SEZ is 
trying to upgrade its industrial structure. To do that, a SEZ 
needs to develop new industries utilizing new and high 
technology and creating a critical mass of such industries as 
the engine of industrial development. Yet preferential tax 
breaks for high-tech industries remain very limited at the 
moment; not enough to meet the requirements of optimizing the 
industrial structure of the zone. 
  Fourth, tax construction and tax reform still fail to keep 
pace with the actual developments in an SEZ economy. The SEZ 
economy has been developing by leaps and bounds and new economic 
phenomena have been occurring continuously, such as land sales 
and appreciation in land value, the boom in real estate 
transactions, and the creation and maturation of a stock market. 
Besides tinkering with the system here and there, however, the 
SEZ has not deepened its tax system in line with the new set of 
realities. How do you properly tax the capital gains derived 
from the resale of land and other real estate transactions, and 
the trading of securities, for instance? That question has yet 
to be answered, which has prevented tax collection from 
regulating SEZ economic development effectively. As for the 
experiment in tax reform, we should go in for useful experiments 
in light of what is actually happening in the SEZ economy. For 
instance, as the economy grows, inheritances and gifts have been 
on the rise steadily and it is common for SEZ's to levy an 
inheritance tax or gift tax. Or take the issue of social 
insurance. Social insurance is a relatively simple thing in 
SEZ's, which should facilitate the experiment of levying a 
social insurance tax. Thus far, however, the Shenzhen SEZ has 
not departed from the nationwide tax system by embarking on bold 
experimentation in this area. 
  The gratifying thing is that the Shenzhen SEZ has gone one 
step ahead of others in solving these problems, achieving 
enormous successes and gaining useful experiences. Not only has 
it set uniform rates for calculating income taxes payable by SEZ 
enterprises and preferential tax breaks, but it has also 
basically standardized the circulation tax system and totally 
unified the local tax system. In so doing, it has greatly 
speeded up the development of a market economy, setting an 
important example for other SEZ's. At the same time, we should 
see that there are still problems in the Shenzhen SEZ's existing 
tax system, notably the following. Neither the circulation tax 
system at the import end nor the personal income tax system have 
been made uniform, the circulation tax system still seems to 
fall short on the whole, the corporate income tax system needs 
to be optimized, and more needs to be done to deepen tax 
construction and tax reform in light of the reality in the zone. 
More reform is needed in all those areas. 
  II. Deepen Tax Reform in SEZ's, Spur Development of Market 
Economy 
  A. To deepen tax reform in SEZ's, we must straighten out two 
sets of relationships. 
  In view of the fact that the tax system of a SEZ is an 
important part of the nation's tax system and that there are 
considerable objective differences between the tax systems of 
the various SEZ's at the moment, I believe deepening tax reform 
in SEZ's requires us to straighten out the relations between SEZ 
tax systems and the national tax system as well as relations 
among the tax systems of all the SEZ's. 
  1. How to straighten out relations between SEZ tax systems 
and the national tax system? 
  The tax systems of the SEZs should be relatively independent 
of the national tax system, a conclusion arrived at after 
considering a host of factors including the reality in SEZ's and 
the inherent requirements of tax construction. As far as the 
reality in the SEZ's is concerned, SEZ's make up the most unique 
economic belt in the whole nation with an objectively existent 
special economic foundation. As part of the superstructure, the 
tax system must be compatible with such an economic foundation. 
For this reason, the tax system of a SEZ must be independent of 
the national tax system. A SEZ calls for a special tax system, 
justified by the model of development for the economy of a SEZ, 
by the demands of developing an export-oriented economy, and by 
the intrinsic needs of the operating mechanism of the SEZ 
economy. Turning to the internal requirements of tax 
construction, the uniqueness of taxation determines that there 
be an essentially unified national tax system. The need for a 
uniform tax code and the centralization of taxing authority is 
even greater when we are trying to develop a socialist market 
economy. In tax construction in China, the central government 
will assume decision-making responsibilities at the highest 
level. So even if the SEZ's adopt a special tax policy different 
from those of other places, consideration must be given to 
striking a regional balance. It must be pointed out that today 
the open policy has created in China a situation in which 
technology and funds are diffused from one level to the next, 
starting with the SEZ's through opened coastal cities, economic 
and technical development zones, and economic open zones to the 
vast hinterland. In tax construction, therefore, one must make 
choices that are based on comprehensive considerations and in 
line with the idea of joint development across the nation. 
Accordingly, even though SEZ's take the lead in establishing a 
new tax system suited to their own objectives, they must see 
that their tax systems are consistent with the unified national 
tax system so that the tax systems of different regions are 
organically in harmony with one another within the framework of 
national legislation and that the basic uniformity of the 
national tax system is ensured. Furthermore, tax construction 
must abide by specific laws. Since the core of tax legislation 
in China is made by the central government, the SEZ's as class 
one local lawmaking bodies must obtain authorization from the 
highest lawmaking body of the land before they can make laws on 
taxation. Thus the independence of SEZ tax systems can only be 
relative; the fact that a SEZ has an independent tax system does 
not put it beyond the restraint of the nation's lawmaking 
system. In short, straightening out the relations between the 
SEZ tax systems and the national tax system should be guided by 
the notion of relative independence for the former. Overall, a 
SEZ tax system should organically dovetail with the national 
system. Take the exercise of tax collection jurisdiction, for 
instance. A SEZ tax system should exercise jurisdiction over 
place of origins, on the one hand, and jurisdiction over 
residents, on the other, based on the need to preserve national 
interests. Also, a SEZ tax system should be flexible in choosing 
from among an array of taxes, taking special care to fulfill its 
role as a tax reform laboratory. In the new era, the idea behind 
economic lawmaking is to try out local lawmaking in some places 
first before a law is adopted nationwide. In accordance with 
that idea, the supreme lawmaking body of the central government 
may authorize local lawmaking bodies in the various SEZ's to 
make laws on taxation so that local lawmaking bodies in the 
SEZ's can do a better job in tax lawmaking to provide a full 
legal guarantee for deepening tax reform in SEZ's. 
  2. How to reconcile the tax systems of different SEZ's? 
  Judging from the tax systems in the various SEZ's, that of 
the Shenzhen SEZ is more advanced while its counterparts 
elsewhere are more backward. This raises the issue: How to 
straighten out relations among the various tax systems? China's 
five SEZ's are components of an organic whole. While differing 
in the extent of development, a quantitative difference, they 
share qualitative similarities. For example, their economies are 
the same in nature and they all follow the same economic model. 
This determines that their tax systems be basically the same. 
Having said that, since the five special economic zones do have 
different development focuses, they should formulate their own 
appropriate tax systems based on their own characteristics and 
the development of their lead industries. For this reason, the 
SEZ's should be allowed to adopt disparate tax breaks freely to 
reflect their individual priorities. The Xiamen SEZ, for 
instance, may adopt some tax policies befitting a free port. 
Surveying the situation on the tax front in the various SEZ's 
objectively, we see that the Shenzhen SEZ has been most 
successful in tax construction, so the others should generally 
try to emulate it in tax reform. Specifically, the other SEZ's 
should seek to duplicate the Shenzhen tax system by achieving 
the following before proceeding to deepen tax reform by moving 
in tandem with Shenzhen: 1) Unify income tax breaks for 
enterprises and the standards for calculating taxes; 2) unify 
the SEZ circulation tax system; and 3) unify the SEZ local tax 
system. 
  B. Deepening tax reform in Shenzhen SEZ: Detailed Thinking 
  To deepen tax reform in the Shenzhen SEZ, we should zero in 
on the major problems in the existing tax system, at the same 
time considering how the tax system of Hong Kong would fit into 
it after Hong Kong is returned to the motherland. It would be 
advisable to deepen reform in the following areas: 
  1. Reform the circulation tax system in the SEZ in light of 
the actual needs of economic development in the zone. The first 
step in deepening the reform of the circulation tax system is to 
unify the circulation tax system at the import end and totally 
abolish the combined industrial and commercial tax. Secondly, 
adjust the existing "product, value-added, and sales" taxes by 
broadening the scope of the VAT to replace the product tax and 
in part the sales tax (in the area of commodity circulation) as 
well. With the VAT as the principal circulation tax, we will be 
better able to avoid double taxation and utilize circulation 
taxes as the regulator of exports and imports. At the same time, 
we should cut the VAT rates and establish a uniform system of 
three tax rates: standard rate, higher rate, and lower rate. 
Once that is accomplished, we should impose a separate 
consumption tax, the principal targets being certain consumer 
goods and consumption behavior. As for the sales tax, it should 
essentially be aimed at the tertiary sector (excluding commodity 
circulation). As the tertiary sector grows, we should extend the 
reach of the sales tax to include a number of up-and-coming 
trades. Sales tax rates too should be adjusted as appropriate by 
raising the rates for a number of highly profitable trades to 
make the tax a better regulator. Finally, create the conditions 
for replacing price inclusive taxes with extra-price taxes. When 
that comes to pass, circulation taxes can play a supplementary 
role in regulating production with consumption in a market 
economy while avoiding the negative effects of price-inclusive 
taxes. 
  2. Regularize the SEZ income tax system and adjust corporate 
income tax breaks. In the Shenzhen SEZ the deepening of the 
reform of the income tax system must begin by regularizing the 
tax system in accordance with established international 
practices. First of all, the SEZ must basically unify its 
personal income tax system. In the wake of rapid economic 
development in the SEZ, the gaps between Chinese citizens and 
foreign personnel in income and consumption have been narrowing 
by the day. Therefore, it should consider applying the personal 
income tax law to both Chinese and foreigners by lowering the 
exemptions enjoyed by the former appropriately. That would 
create a basically uniform personal income tax system in which 
the personal income tax and personal income regulating tax are 
merged into one. Secondly, be it the personal income tax system 
or corporate income tax system, a stringent body of tax laws 
should be developed to reduce and close loopholes. Also, China 
should formally promulgate the "Anti-Tax Avoidance Law" without 
delay to provide a legal basis for the SEZ's campaign against 
tax cheats. 
  Another aspect of income tax reform in the Shenzhen SEZ as 
the zone makes the transition from infancy to its formative 
stage is to replace its present practice of offering tax breaks 
uniformly "across the board" with new industry-specific tax 
breaks. The core of the new policy should be to adjust income 
tax breaks for enterprises in the zone. By industry-specific tax 
breaks, we mean using the industrial policies of the nation and 
the zone to determine the tax breaks to be offered to investors. 
In light of the demands of national economic development on the 
industrial structure in the future, the Shenzhen SEZ should 
concentrate on developing industries using new and high-tech to 
upgrade its industrial structure. Accordingly, the corporate 
income tax system should also shift to high-tech enterprises as 
the principal beneficiaries of tax breaks. Other recipients of 
corporate income tax breaks should include enterprises which 
invest in the infrastructure, which make large-scale 
investments, or which export their output to earn foreign 
exchange. The result is a system of industry-specific corporate 
income tax breaks dominated by tax breaks for high-tech 
industries and supplemented by other tax breaks. It needs to be 
emphasized here that industry-specific tax breaks are applicable 
to all enterprises regardless of their economic nature. Of 
course, other special tax breaks may be made available to 
foreign-funded enterprises and foreign enterprises, but only if 
they are justified by the characteristics of a particular 
investment and meet the criterion of attracting foreign 
investment. Also, the latter kind of tax breaks must remain a 
supplementary part of the system of tax breaks overall. For 
instance, corporate income tax breaks may be offered to a 
foreign investor who reinvests his after-tax profits. Only by 
doing so can the zone both achieve the goal of attracting 
foreign capital and effectively use taxation to steer foreign 
investment into particular industries. 
  3. Intensify local tax construction and deepen tax reform 
experimentation in the zone. As far as the Shenzhen SEZ is 
concerned, intensifying local tax construction mainly involves 
levying a number of new taxes in light of the economic reality 
in the zone and its objective requirements. A real-estate VAT, 
for instance, may be slapped on the enormous appreciation in 
land value realized from the sale and resale of land and other 
real estate transactions. A capital gains tax may be levied on 
the capital gain realized by an enterprise or individual by 
selling capital goods (stocks, real estate). An inheritance or 
gift tax may be imposed on the inheritances and gifts of 
enterprises or individuals. In addition, a social insurance tax 
may be imposed depending on the economic development needs of 
the SEZ. That way not only can we make better use of taxation to 
regulate the SEZ economy, but we also can experiment with 
certain types of tax in the zone to provide experience for 
nationwide tax reform. Furthermore, in view of the fact that the 
current urban protection and construction tax is not generating 
enough funds, it should be abolished and replaced by an 
independent new urban protection and construction tax. Other 
ways also exist to raise urban development funds, such as 
adjusting as appropriate the scope and rates of the stamp tax, 
property tax, vehicle and boat use tax, and land use tax. (It 
would be advisable for the Shenzhen SEZ to abolish land use fees 
in favor of a standardized land use tax.) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20415 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar014___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  2 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Rise of Domestic Futures Markets Described </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0263A Beijing JINRONG SHIBAO in Chinese 9 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0263A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINRONG SHIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yang Shuang (2799 3642): "Futures, the Most </F>
Attractive Investment Hot Point"] 
  [Text] On entering the futures exchange, one sees only a 
crowd of people moving about with various types of demeanor and 
a long smooth color display screen that keeps displaying 
information from the London and Chicago futures exchanges. 
Bustling brokers even more frequently shout at the telephone, 
"cocoa, buy three; coffee, trim!".... And in the hall, one tense 
heart after another repeatedly stews over the fact that whether 
the "10,000 dollar words `buy' and `sell'" make a profit or a 
loss all depends on making a prompt decision. In the blink of an 
eye, some people become suddenly wealthy or fall into poverty. 
This is the current futures exchange, full of challenge, 
stimulation, and risk. 
  So-called futures, are the opposite concept from spot 
transactions. In spot transactions, one side hands over money 
and the other side hands over merchandise with the object of 
acquiring the ownership or use of the commodity. Futures 
transactions are a type of business with advance payment and the 
transfer of merchandise after a certain period. In this, the 
commodities themselves by no means enter the futures market. 
What are exchanged are only what are commonly called futures 
long-term forward contracts. In futures exchanges the vast 
majority of investments are by no means for buying and selling 
commodities, but for transferring profits or shifting risks in 
price changes through agreements. So, futures exchanges have a 
strong speculative flavor. But this is legal speculation. Some 
experts have predicted that futures exchanges will become the 
most attractive current new investment hot point. 
  I. Unstoppable Tide 
  In a bumper harvest season more than 100 years ago, farm 
owners from the southern United States overjoyed drove wagons 
full of corn and wheat to Chicago prepared to sell it. But the 
city was full of sellers and supply far exceeded demand. They 
could only anxiously watch the prices of agricultural products 
fall sharply. But a few months later, by the spring and summer 
seasons of the following year, when there was a temporary 
shortage, grain prices again rebounded and skyrocketed. Watching 
the market changed by a strange combination of circumstances, 
these farm owners could only despair and sigh. But astute 
American businessmen took inspiration from this and in 1848 
proposed the formation of a brand new orderly managed 
market---the Chicago Board of Trade (CBOT). Here buyers and 
sellers traded fairly, and agreed on long-term forward 
contracts. Buyers and sellers agreed on the price at the time of 
the exchange and determined that after a year or several months 
at a designated point to buy up or sell off a specified amount 
of a certain type of agricultural product. The prices fluctuated 
up and down with changes in the seasons and the markets, and 
contracts could be transferred. That day they discovered the 
embryonic early stage of the futures exchange. Now it has become 
the world's largest futures exchange. People can see the top of 
the building like the Roman goddess Cereus soliciting grain and 
bumper harvests. 
  More than 100 years later, with the market's enormous 
strength and economic demand, more than 80 nations have now 
established futures markets linked to the United States. Futures 
exchanges are approaching 100 and more than 100 types of 
commodities are exchanged on the market. Among them are mainly 
agricultural products, grains, cotton, cocoa, and rubber, as 
well as metals. Since the 1970s, formerly popular material 
commodities such as grains and metals have gradually withdrawn 
to a secondary position and such financial products as gold, 
currency, and stocks and securities have extremely actively 
poured into the commodities futures exchanges. There are 
numerous types of financial futures, the same things in 
different guises. Receiving the market's favor, they become 
major futures commodities. 
  In the United States, futures exchanges are extremely 
mature. 
In 1993 when a Nobel prize-winning economist learned that the 
prize that he would be receiving in a few months would be in 
Swiss francs, his first reaction was that at that time the 
comparative value of the Swiss franc was constantly declining 
and the prize money that he would receive in three months would 
no longer be the present amount. So, he immediately instructed 
the futures market to sell off Swiss francs and buy up United 
States dollars, thereby compensating in futures for his cash 
losses. 
  II. Futures Fever Quietly "Lands" 
  Perhaps it is a historical coincidence that in 1848 when 
European communists were issuing their political manifesto, 
United States farm owners were organizing the world's first 
futures exchange---the Chicago Grain Futures Exchange. Today, 
after nearly 150 years of change, the communist struggle and 
market economy development are constantly blending, as reflected 
in China. Comrade Deng Xiaoping on his southern tour affirmed 
the socialist market economy and the unrelenting surge of the 
commercial tide, the frequent hot points, the tempestuous 
stocks, the unabated real estate investment fever, and the 
futures exchange quietly landed on the mainland. Its ardor 
overwhelms people far more than stock and real estate investment 
trends. 
  But futures exchanges appeared in Shanghai, China, as early 
as the 1930s and 1940s. But the planning system formulated for 
several decades caused the Chinese to have no reason for such 
things as futures and stocks for more than thirty years after 
New China was established. This must be said to be an historical 
pity. 
  By the 1980s, China's economy had grown by leaps and bounds, 
laying a firm foundation for "restoring the position of 
futures." Especially with reform and opening up, China clearly 
proposed the socialist market economy theory and the scope of 
market adjustment in the overall economic life expanded more and 
more. With the supply and demand of some commodities such as 
grain, live hogs, steel, and coal, sometimes tight and sometimes 
relaxed, and prices suddenly rising and suddenly falling, it 
brought extreme risk to the vast majority of farmers and 
business people. Rising and falling of the comparative values 
of foreign exchange brought even greater risks to Chinese 
enterprises. So, futures could effectively avoid or lessen these 
risks. For example, in 1985 U.S.$1 could be exchanged for 3.42 
German marks. In 1993 U.S.$1 could only be exchanged for 1.68 
German marks. If mainland enterprises exported to Germany at the 
quoted price of the U.S. dollar, it would mean that half the 
value would be lost to the 50 percent exchange advantage of 
German merchants. If at this time the mainland enterprises 
bought up mark futures at the same time as they made the 
exports, they could be used as a countermeasure to avoid the 
risk of devaluation of the U.S. dollar, compensating for the 
foreign exchange losses in the exports on the futures market. 
So, in 1987 Mr. Yang Ching-yu [2799 4552 5038] from Hong Kong, 
in accordance with the development and characteristics of the 
Chinese market, proposed "the development of a futures market" 
to relevant mainland leaders. At the beginning of 1988, the 
State Council Development Research Center established a Futures 
Market Policy Research Group. In October 1990, the first 
commodity exchange market in New China with futures 
characteristics, the Zhengzhou Wholesale Grain Market, opened. 
In March 1991, that market signed the first long-term forward 
contract for which it did not receive wheat, suddenly opening 
the curtain on Chinese futures exchanges. After that, futures 
companies sprang up all over like bamboo shoots after a spring 
rain. According to incomplete statistics, China presently has 
more than 360 futures companies and more than forty futures 
exchanges. In addition, there still are a considerable number of 
"underground futures brokers." 
  Unconsciously, a futures fever gradually rose in the 
economic 
life. Especially with the first wave, foreign exchange markets 
cooling, real estate sliding, and the fascination with the 
stockmarket lowered, the opening and development of the futures 
market seemed to find an avenue for the funds withdrawn from the 
stockmarket and the real estate and foreign exchange markets. 
Some people even chanted slogans like, "One hundred thousand 
yuan households set up individual enterprises, million yuan 
households open companies, 10 million yuan households speculate 
on stocks, and 1 trillion yuan households engage in futures." 
Although the saying is a little fantastic, the futures market 
has temporarily exploded. Especially after China enters the 
General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT), the market will 
open to the world and mainland enterprises will truly enter 
international circles. Opportunities for economic development 
will be numerous for persons in charge of the government economy 
and enterprises, but risk factors also will be great. So, 
whether from the perspective of developing the national economy 
or abiding by the laws of the market economy, cultivation and 
development of the futures market is an inevitable trend. 
<H5>  III. Playing Makes the Heart "Jump" </H5>
  Last year from 26 February to 5 April, the quotation for red 
bean [ormosia] futures quotation dropped abruptly 3,150 points 
on the Tokyo grain exhange. The information was that worldwide, 
during this period, people lost a total of more than U.S.$700 
million on this variety. A number of investors took deep losses. 
This is just one of the most recent examples among unpredictable 
futures market risks. 
  In doing business, there are profits and losses, and with 
futures exchanges, there is even more of this. Transferring 
risks and acquiring investment profits coexist. The money itself 
does not propagate. If there are profits, there must be losses. 
It is nothing more than bills changing pockets. If 
decisionmaking is accurate, someone can make a large profit. If 
decisionmaking is faulty, the risk naturally could fall on one's 
own head, and it is difficult to avoid losses. The futures 
market can be summarized as half profits and half losses. 
Strictly speaking, the losses are greater than the profits, 
because the brokers take some in commissions. Regarding U.S. 
futures exchanges, losses generally make up about 80 percent of 
the business. Only those large companies and people with ample 
experience can make money. China's futures business has just 
begun. The vast majority of brokers still cannot measure up to 
the masters on international futures markets in skill and 
experience. So, it could be inevitable that there be greater 
loss of money on the part of investors. Last April nearly 180 
customers played the Tokyo April red bean futures market through 
the Nanjing Jinzhongfu [6855 0022 1381] International Futures 
Corporation. As a result, 90 percent of the customers were 
trapped. After the recognized losses were trimmed, total 
customer losses were figured at about 35 million renminbi, 
causing more than 100 customers to be impacted by the 
"Jinzhongfu" incident and shocking the whole country. Although 
there are a great many reasons for this, one can clearly see the 
great risk of futures. 
  But as a mature investment tool, futures exchanges have the 
capability of "getting a thousand jin for four taels" [getting 
much for little]. Investors often need only pay 5 percent to 10 
percent cash deposit and they can transact business worth scores 
more than their money. Exchange regulations of the Shenzhen 
Nonferrous Metal Exchange (SME) even specify earnest money at 
only 3 percent of the value of the transaction. If traders are 
speculating on the rise and fall of prices, unlike people 
engaged in spot transactions, they need not even consider such 
diverse procedures as storage, transport, and settlement. 
  "Using a little to gain much" even more provides investors 
with the opportunity to acquire high profits. But high profits 
must have high risks. Small fluctuations in market prices are 
enough to cause investors' profit and loss rates to reach 
several tens percent or even several hundred percent. But for 
those who are bold enough to brave the risks, can endure 
enormous mental pressure, and attempt to get rich quickly, this 
is an enticing and challenging paradise. 
  Although futures have more or less been carried off to the 
dustbin of history, they have after all come to us and they will 
inevitably be looked upon favorably by more and more investors. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20416 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar014___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  2 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Export Tax Exemption Fraud `Rampant' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0276A Beijing JIDIAN RIBAO in Chinese 18 Jan 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0276A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JIDIAN RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Xi Ling (6007 0407): Export Tax Rebate -- How </F>
Much Fraud Perpetrated in the name of the Rebate"] 
  [Text] Tax Exemption Frauds Roll in Like Waves 
  Case One: Audacious Mayor Cheats on Taxes 
  A mayor represents the government and protects the interests 
of the nation. When a mayor cheats on taxes, not only are the 
nation's interests not protected, its very foundation is 
undermined. 
  On 16 November 1992, Jin Xin [6855 9515], director of the 
State Administration of Taxation, received an anonymous letter 
from Xianning City, Hubei Province, reporting that several 
enterprises and a number of tax revenue bureau individuals in 
Xianning, acting in collusion with a group of tax cheaters, had 
defrauded the government of large sums in export tax rebates. 
Responsible leading cadres in the State Council individually 
wrote comments and instructions onto the report, demanding that 
thorough and organized investigation be carried out as soon as 
possible. One leading cadre expressed his outrage by writing an 
eight-word phrase: "Under the nation's law, such audacity will 
not stand!" On the 24th, a joint investigation team organized by 
the State Administration of Taxation and the provincial tax 
bureau was quickly sent to Xianning City. 
  After more than three months of investigation, details of 
the 
case have gradually become clear. 
  On 10 August 1992, responsible personnel of four enterprises 
in Hubei Province's Xianning City -- including the Wujin 
Electric Wire Factory, Wenquan Electric Cable Factory and 
Shuangqi Township Electrical Machinery Factory -- in collusion 
with certain Municipal Tax Bureau offices and criminal elements 
who cheat on taxes, submitted bogus export goods invoices and 
fake certificates showing taxes had been paid, collecting from 
the government export tax rebates totalling 9.74 million yuan, 
from which amount they themselves made illegal gains of 695,000 
yuan. In November of the same year, seeing what could be gained 
by the above maneuver, a Xianning City factory specializing in 
sewing uniforms negotiated an agreement with the office Xianning 
City maintains in Shenzhen, and using the pretext of exporting 
the uniforms through Shenzhen, requested the Xianning Municipal 
Tax Bureau issue bogus export tax payment certificates with 
which to claim export tax rebates. Municipal Tax Bureau Chief 
Yin Chuansheng [1438 0278 0581], knowing full well that the 
State Administration of Taxation had explicitly forbidden local 
tax bureaus to issue export tax payment certificates, not only 
did not turn down the request, but instead submitted it to Mayor 
Chen Huiyou [7115 1863 0645]. Chen Huiyou, knowing the action to 
be illegal but wanting the local enterprises to benefit, 
actually insisted that the tax bureau "support" the request. 
Chen even used a sleight of hand by back-dating his instructions 
to the tax bureau to before the regulations were issued by the 
State Administration of Taxation, and this enabled the criminal 
elements cheating taxes to cheat the government of 2,248,900 
yuan in fraudulent export tax rebates, of which 335,000 yuan of 
illegal gains went to Xianning's Shenzhen office, the Xianning 
Tax Bureau and the Uniform Sewing Factory. 
  Case 2: Tax Revenue Bureau Director Personally 
Intervenes 
  On 27 April 1993, in Jiangxi Province, Ruichang City 
Municipal Tax Bureau Vice Director Xu Zengchan [1776 1073 3934], 
accompanied by deputy section chief Zhou Jiangfu [0719 3068 
4395] and others, traveling in a tax bureau inspection office 
vehicle, drove miles and miles to Shenzhen to "conduct business 
in the field" for the convenience of those elements cheating on 
taxes. 
  Since there were no export goods or invoices for inspection, 
Vice Director Xu performed on the spot a series of six 
procedural steps for the tax cheaters: even the dates, 
descriptions and values of the goods shown on the tax payment 
certificates and sales invoices were copied from drafts prepared 
ahead of time by the tax cheaters. To further ensure against 
detection, the officials followed the cheaters' request not only 
to certify the tax payment certificates as the original copies, 
but also to sign the letter requesting export tax rebate in the 
name of the Ruichang Municipal Tax Bureau; in addition to 
further authenticating tax payment certificates and invoices, 
the action served to witness successful tax cheating by illegal 
elements. The amounts cheated in the two categories amounted to 
1,028,700 million yuan and 2.09 million yuan. 
  According to information from the "Joint Office for 
Attacking 
Export Tax Rebate Fraud" organized by the Supreme People's 
Procuratorate and the State Administration of Taxation, a total 
of 151 enterprises were investigated in 1992 for cheating the 
government out of as much as 749 million yuan, and 204 million 
in tax rebates. In January-August 1993, investigations revealed 
that fraudulent use of fake invoices amounted to a total of 3.5 
billion yuan, and frauds involving export tax rebates totalled 
100 million yuan. The cases implicated some 150 export 
enterprises in all 20 provinces, autonomous regions and directly 
administered municipalities, over 50 factories and manufacturing 
concerns and over 40 tax revenue bureaus. 
<H5>  Cheating on Taxes, Cheating on Whom? </H5>
  The so-called export tax rebate refers to taxes already paid 
on products before they were exported from the country, and 
involves the Government Treasury refunding the amounts of 
product tax, value-added tax and special consumption tax paid 
back to the exporting enterprises. Because of the increasingly 
fierce international market competition, and the fact that such 
taxes increase the cost basis of export products, the Chinese 
Government has therefore instituted an export tax rebate system, 
a practice generally in keeping with international customs, 
which enables China's exports to gain entry in the world market 
at tax-free prices and which serves the basic objective of 
enhancing the competitiveness of China's exports. 
  Export tax rebate frauds involve using bogus invoices for 
export products, including fake tax payment certificates and 
customs declarations, to obtain rebates from the government. 
  This "malignant tumor" of tax cheating appears to be a twin 
of the export tax rebate policy; it was born at about the same 
time, and during the eight years when China had made 
considerable progress in opening up to the outside world, tax 
cheating also become increasingly widespread and audacious. 
  Cheating on taxes is in fact cheating on the country. 
  That being the case, people would ask, who benefits from tax 
cheating? What do these people do with the tax money they have 
cheated? 
  The Xianning tax cheating case, which created a furor, 
cheated the government of 11,988,900 yuan in export tax rebates, 
but the enterprises and tax bureau offices involved in the 
scheme got only 1,025,000 million yuan for themselves, the rest 
went to bosses in Hong Kong and illegal criminal elements in the 
society. 
  The Jiangxi Province Ruichang City tax cheating case 
resulted 
in an export tax rebate loss to the government of 3,118,700 
yuan, and the parties involved got only 280,700 yuan for 
themselves. 
  Behind tax cheating cases are massive corruptions involving 
the offering, seeking and demanding of bribes. Illegal elements 
in society utilize money to pave their way, and many party and 
government cadres and officials have fallen under "sugar coated 
bullets." 
  Wang Tianpeng [3769 1131 7720], vice director of the Gansu 
Provincial Tax Revenue Bureau, was arrested because he used his 
position to facilitate tax cheating; he accepted bribes from a 
certain export company in Gansu, and when caught accepting the 
tax rebate, he still approved that company's request for tax 
rebates amounting to more than 810,000 yuan. 
  As for Jiangxi's Ruichang Municipal Tax Bureau Vice Chief Xu 
Zhengchan and others, when they would sign off on a tax rebate 
application, criminal element Zhang Chaobin [1728 2600 1755] 
would call them in turn into a room and pay each 5, or 3, 
percent of service fees based on the size of his "contribution"; 
the several persons in the scheme illegally collected a total of 
139,00 yuan. 
  In the major "12.17" [17 December] tax cheating case, 13 
persons in Xianning City suspected to have received bribes were 
investigated by the Xianning Prefectural Inspectorate; they were 
found to have each received over 10,000 yuan. 
<H5>  Why Is Tax Cheating So Rampant? </H5>
  The fact that tax cheating crimes have spread quickly and 
become rampant shows there are causes not only in terms of 
ideology but also in terms of problems in the system and 
organization. 
  1. Tax cheaters use as an excuse that they do it for the 
local benefit. One important reason to cheat on taxes is to 
derive benefits for the local area and for local organizations. 
Since tax revenue collected is allocated among several entities 
who use the revenue for their purposes, some localities have no 
qualm about sacrificing the country's benefits to gain a little 
advantage for themselves; they know they are breaking the law 
but they do it willingly. 
  Xianning City Mayor Chen Huiyou put it plainly, we did this 
mainly to earn some money for our city and to develop our local 
economy. In Henan Province's Zhengyang County, the "four big 
leading cadre groups," after collective study, unanimously 
endorsed a move by the county tax bureau to make up bogus 
certificates for 883,000 yuan, arguing that this amount will be 
utilized for "local benefits." 
  2. There is the misunderstanding that "in a market economy, 
one is entitled to speculate." The road toward establishing a 
socialist market economy is one on which China must travel. 
There are however comrades who misinterpret the market economy 
and actually use the market economy theory as the basis for 
cheating on taxes. 
  On 17 April, 1993, Jiangxi Province's Ruichang City Mayor 
Chen Dingrong [7115 1353 2837] sponsored a government 
coordination meeting keyed to tax cheating. At the meeting he 
said: "To help factories and tax bureau offices deal with 
certain procedural tasks...in order to gain some income for 
Ruichang City, is a good thing. Now, we have a market economy, 
and we can speculate to make gains." 
  A former Yunnan Province Kaiyuan City Tax Bureau Chief 
actually and boastfully said: Are we not encouraging people to 
"jump into business" nowadays? The fact that we issued bogus tax 
payment certificates is proof that we are "doing business," and 
in order to serve economic construction, we have to dare to "run 
the red light." 
  Listen to high-minded rationales, and how good they sound! 
  3. When the system is not yet perfected, there is room for 
exploitation. In the early period when the export tax rebate 
system was first set up, the rebate was based on the export 
enterprise's budget and inventory projections. Beginning in 
1988, to generate enthusiasm in various regions to export to 
earn foreign exchange, and to reduce the regions' financial 
burdens, the handling of the entire export tax rebate system was 
turned over to the Central Government, but this step actually 
destroyed the unity of responsibility and authority for revenue 
collection and expenditure between the Central and regional 
governments, and gave illegal elements an opening to cheat on 
taxes. 
  When the tax revenue collection system is overly 
complicated, 
efficiency of the tax rebate system is low. The product tax and 
value-added tax constitute the two major tax categories in 
export tax rebate. Because product taxes are collected at 
different stages, calculation of the value-added tax is 
complicated and not uniform, the numbers of tax categories, 
taxable items and tax rates involved are excessive, plus there 
are tax preferential policies set up by the localities, all 
these result in quantitatively low and inefficient turnover 
between the export product tax collected and the export tax 
rebated, which provides more opportunities for tax cheating 
elements to cheat on taxes. 
  The collection of product tax and the rebate of taxes paid 
are not well coordinated. This can be seen in the inadequate 
feedback between relevant information concerning export product 
tax and tax rebate and the information need of export 
enterprises and enterprises which produce goods for export. 
Furthermore, between the processes of tax collection and tax 
rebate, the collection process still has numerous problems such 
as collecting taxes on export products for which local taxes 
have been reduced or waived, and on export products which 
undergo further processing before export; in processing rebate 
applications, therefore, the tax rebate offices have great 
difficulty dealing with them in a comprehensive or correct way, 
to say nothing of arriving at accurate results from the 
complicated calculations. In addition, in the tax collection 
cycle there are situations where the turnover tax collection is 
contracted out, and where such taxes are reduced or waived by 
persons in charge without the proper authority or who exceed 
their authority in doing so. Such situations lead to loopholes 
in management of tax collection and rebate and consequently 
create opportunities for tax cheating elements to commit fraud. 
<H5>  We Should Dare To Ask What the Future Course Will Be </H5>
  Export tax rebate fraud is a dangerous criminal activity 
with 
very bad consequences; the fact it is rampant does not mean 
there is no law to control it, but does indicate that serious 
attention has not been sufficiently aroused to deal with the 
problem. Ever since the occurrance of the major "12.17" tax 
cheating case, government authorities have launched a major 
anti-tax cheating drive within China's borders. The facts 
demonstrate that when jolted by the above incident, party 
members and cadres now have a full understanding of the 
seriousness of the tax cheating problem, and criminal elements 
in society have become more restrained, so notable results have 
been achieved. Therefore, in order to effectively control 
cheating on taxes, we must carry out a sustained counterattack. 
It is encouraging to note that the "Office To Attack Export Tax 
Rebate Frauds," jointly established by the State General 
Taxation Bureau and Supreme People's Procuratorate, was formally 
opened for business in Shenzhen on 12 July, 1993. 
  We have reasons to hope that with conscientious enforcement 
of law and regulations, it will be impossible for tax cheating 
schemes to succeed. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20417 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar014___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  2 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Machinery Industry 1994 Output, Sales Estimate </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0266A Beijing JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 3, 10 Jan 94 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0266A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article in two installments by reporter Wang Yuling (3769 </F>
3768 3781): "Output, Sales Forecasts for Machinery Industry in 
1994"] 
<H5>  [3 Jan p 7] </H5>
  [Text] At a recent information-announcement meeting, the 
Ministry of Machinery Industry made the following forecast: 
After scoring a high growth rate in 1993, the machinery industry 
will continue to develop at a fairly quick pace this year with 
an estimated 12-15 percent increase in its output value. 
  Following are the forecasts of the various sectors of this 
industry: 
  Farm machinery sector The general trend in the 
farm machinery market this year is that sales will be moderate 
or sluggish for most products, while only a few products are 
expected to sell briskly. The market for large and medium-sized 
tractors will remain approximately the same as last year. 
Medium-horsepower wheeled tractors will have only a moderate or 
even a sluggish sale due to the restriction on their use as a 
transport vehicle plus the fact that part of the market will be 
taken over by farm trucks. However, a good market is forecast 
for four-wheel-drive tractors. With regard to four-wheeled 
tractors and walking tractors, brisk sales are expected for some 
models and in some areas, but the general trend in the market 
will be downward. As for internal-combustion engines, some 
models will enjoy a good sale; others will not. Sales of 
single-cylinder diesel engines will fall. Multi-cylinder engines 
for motor vehicles, construction machinery, electric generator 
sets, and farm trucks will continue to sell well or moderately, 
but their sales volumes will not grow as fast as last year. The 
market will be stable for powered irrigation and drainage 
machinery and for pumps used on farms. Demands for tractor-drawn 
farm tools and combines will slide down from last year's level. 
The only exception will be small-sized combines drawn by small 
four-wheeled tractors, which will enjoy a brisk market because 
of their practicality, moderate price, and agility. 
Grain-processing and oil-pressing machines will continue to sell 
well, and for some models, supply will fall short of demand. 
Demands for rice and flour mills and oil presses will increase 
by a fairly big margin. Also, there will be a surging 
requirement for farm trucks. In particular, four-wheeled farm 
trucks with a capacity between 0.75 and 1 ton will be in great 
demand. Sales of parts for trucks and internal-combustion 
engines, because of their great demand, will maintain a steadily 
growing trend. The farm machinery sector will grow by 5 to 6 
percent this year. 
  Construction machinery sector Since the 
beginning of last year, the construction machinery sector had 
ranked first in production and sales until the third quarter 
when a drastic change in the market caused a big drop in the 
growth rates of its output and sales. Brand-name products once 
in short supply became amply available on the market. Some 
non-brand-name products began to be overstocked. In general, 
prices have dropped for all kinds of construction machinery. 
Nonetheless, as our country's investment policy will focus more 
on transportation, energy, and other basic industrial projects, 
the construction machinery sector, which serve as a support for 
these projects, will still maintain a certain level of growth 
this year. In particular, large-sized and brand-name earthmovers 
will have a brisk market. The growth rate of the construction 
machinery sector this year is estimated at more than 15 percent. 
  Meter and instrument sector This year a steady 
growth is forecast for the production and sales of meters, 
instruments, and control equipment required by the energy, 
communications, and transportation sectors. Among them, 
production and sales of electronic meters and instruments will 
show a strong tendency to grow. For those items that can be used 
as part of investment in construction projects, such as various 
testers and theodolites, the market will change from an active 
to a moderate state, and accordingly the growth of their output 
will slow down. On the other hand, items in the consumer-goods 
and office-equipment categories, such as air conditioners, 
copiers, and cameras, are expected to have a good market, and 
their production will increase to a relatively big extent. It is 
estimated that this sector will grow by more than 15 percent in 
1994. 
  Electric equipment and appliances sector This 
sector showed a steady growth in the first half of last year. 
Beginning the third quarter, a slight downslide has appeared in 
the growth rates of its production and sales. Nonetheless, with 
the support given by the state to basic industries and the 
implementation of various preferential policies in favor of 
these industries, including favorable financial arrangements, 
the external environment of basic industrial enterprises will be 
gradually improved, and their demand for power generating 
equipment is expected to hike. Growing demands are also 
foreseeable for power plants' supplementary equipment and for 
power transmission and distribution equipment, such as 
transformers, switchgear, wires, and cables. This will lead to 
an increase in the output of these products. A more than 12 
percent growth rate is forecast for the electric equipment and 
appliances sector this year. 
<H5>  [10 Jan p 7] </H5>
  [Text] In addition to the farm machinery, construction 
machinery, meters and instruments, and electric equipment and 
appliances, the following forecasts for 1994 were revealed at 
the information-announcement meeting by the Ministry of 
Machinery Industry: 
  Machine tool sector In the third quarter of last 
year, the once-hectic trend in the machine tool market obviously 
cooled down, under the influence of the nation's 
macro-regulation and control policy. As a result, stockpiles of 
unsold products increased sharply, and their prices kept 
declining, with the only exception of special-purpose heavy 
equipment, which still enjoyed a prosperous market. Production 
and sales of general machine tools and numerically-controlled 
lathes produced domestically were in a relatively gloomy 
situation. Since September, the machine tool market has 
improved, however. For example, at Shenyang No. 1 Machine Tool 
Plant's order-solicitation meeting in early September, the sales 
contracts signed for general machine tools were sufficient to 
take up the plant's production for the whole year of 1994. It is 
expected that the machine tool market for the first half of this 
year will be somewhat better than the second half of last year, 
and the market trend will be optimistic. The machine tool sector 
will have a growth rate of more than 10 percent this year. 
  Petrochemical and universal-purpose machinery 
sector Brand-name refrigerating equipment, air 
distributors, and printing machines will continue to enjoy a 
good sale this year. Increased demand for static dust removers 
will boost the manufacturers' production task. Requirements for 
machines, pumps, and valves used in power plants will be 
relatively great, and accordingly major manufacturers of these 
items will increase their output and sales. Market for 
universal-purpose machines, including refrigerators, machines, 
pumps, and valves, will remain the same as last year. Production 
and sales of oil-refining equipment and chemical plant machinery 
will continue to rise steadily, but no improvement is 
foreseeable in the market for oil-drilling equipment. This 
sector will have a more than 10 percent growth in 1994. 
  Heavy and mining machinery sector The nation's 
investment policy, which puts more emphasis on basic industries, 
has boosted the production tasks of manufacturers of 
metallurgical and mining machinery, large cast and forged parts, 
cranes and other material-handling equipment. Production and 
sales of these items will continue to grow this year. According 
to a survey by the Heavy Machinery Industry Association, the 
orders so far received by major and backbone heavy machinery 
enterprises for 1994 have met 60-100 percent of their annual 
target. Most other enterprises have received 40-70 percent of 
the orders they planned to obtain this year; only a few 
enterprises have met 10-20 percent of their order target. In 
terms of products, orders for small and medium-sized cranes 
account for a very small share, while most orders are for items 
required by the basic raw and semifinished materials industry, 
the transportation and communications sector, and the electric 
power industry. The growth rate of the heavy and mining 
machinery sector is estimated at 10-15 percent this year. 
  Auto sector Since late-June last year, the auto 
market has changed from an active to a moderate state because of 
the nation's policy to rein in the scale of capital construction 
and bank credit and its strict efforts to "control government 
office spending." In the third quarter of last year, production 
and sales of motor vehicles showed a remarkable decline, while 
their stockpiles went up. However, it is believes that the 
1.1-million-vehicle target set for last year was fulfilled, and 
that the stock was maintained at a level roughly equivalent to 
an average month's output. 
  In making this year's forecast, the following factors 
should be taken into consideration: 1) Railway transportation 
will remain in a strained condition. The strategy to use 
highways as well as railways to share the transportation burden 
will keep the demand for heavy- and medium-duty trucks at a 
certain level. 2) Development of township enterprises and 
tertiary industry will bring about a constant demand for small 
and mini-vehicles. 3) There were 8.1-8.2 million vehicles at the 
end of last year. About 1 million of them should be junked. 
According to this year's plan, an additional 250,000 old 
vehicles should be replaced by new ones. 4) Demand for 
domestically made sedans will go up in view of the development 
of the tourist industry and taxi business plus the needs arising 
from Sino-foreign joint ventures and special economic zones and 
the nation's determination to strike hard at car smuggling in 
coastal areas and to lift the "control on institutional purchase 
of vehicles." The production target for this year is 1.3 million 
vehicles, of which 350,000 are sedans. A 10 percent growth is 
forecasted for the auto sector this year. 
  Basic accessories and parts sector This sector 
serves as a basic support for the machinery industry; however, 
for years, it has experienced the following problems: It lacks a 
sound foundation and is unable to benefit from specialized and 
large-scale production. Its products are not satisfactory in 
terms of grade, quality, and reliability. For the above reasons, 
this sector has become a "bottleneck" in developing the 
machinery industry. For the period from January through October 
last year, its gross output value was 14.78 percent higher than 
the corresponding period of 1992, but this growth rate was still 
below the entire machinery industry's growth rate by nearly 12 
percentage points. This year, with the implementation of certain 
policies, there will be a decline in the imports of hydraulic 
and pneumatic tools, sealing devices, ball bearings, low-voltage 
electric equipment, instrument components, and some special 
materials. As a result, the basic accessories and parts sector 
is expected to grow by about 10 percent this year. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20418 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar014___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  2 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Output of Leading Steel Companies in January </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  HK2502112294 Beijing CEI Database in English 25 Feb 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK2502112294 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CEI Database </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Beijing (CEIS) -- Following is the monthly output 
of China's top 10 iron and steel companies in January 1994, 
released by the Ministry of Metallurgical Industry: 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                  |                  |                  |(Unit: Tons)      | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                  |1/94              |1/93              |Chg(PC)           | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Capital Iron and  |526,919           |407,510           |29.3              | 
|Steel Complex     |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Anshan Iron and S-|712,431           |717,778           |-0.7              | 
|teel Company      |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Baoshan Iron and  |606,372           |585,118           |3.6               | 
|Steel Complex     |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Shanghai Iron and |546,372           |526,093           |3.9               | 
|Steel Company     |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Baotou Iron and S-|268,759           |254,758           |5.5               | 
|teel Complex      |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Wuhan Iron and St-|490,314           |420,827           |16.5              | 
|eel Complex       |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Panzhihua Iron an-|217,560           |197,354           |10.2              | 
|d Steel Complex   |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Benxi Iron and St-|219,736           |217,501           |1.0               | 
|eel Complex       |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Maanshan Iron and |193,095           |166,776           |15.8              | 
|Steel Company     |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Taiyuan Iron and  |214,125           |155,143           |38.0              | 
|Steel Company     |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20419 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar014___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  2 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> SMALL-SCALE ENTERPRISES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Vice Minister on Shandong Rural Enterprise Reform </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0243A Beijing ZHONGGUO JINGJI TIZHI GAIGE [CHINA'S 
ECONOMIC STRUCTURE REFORM] in Chinese No 11, 23 Nov 93 pp 19-22 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0243A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO JINGJI TIZHI GAIGE [CHINA'S 
ECONOMIC STRUCTURE REFORM] </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vice Minister of Agriculture Wan Baorui (8001 </F>
1405 3843)] 
  [Text] Editor's note: Cooperative shareholding is the 
direction of rural enterprise reform and development, and suits 
the basic principles and needs of developing a socialist market 
economy. At present, it is being explored in the preliminary 
development stage. We should firmly uphold positive and reliable 
policies and the principle of supporting the wishes of the 
masses. To ensure the stable and healthy development of this new 
endeavor, we must not engage in rigid uniformity. We must better 
handle relationships among the state, collectives and 
individuals; among rights and interests and risk; and between 
agriculture and nonagricultural industries. Published in this 
issue is Comrade Wan Baorui's investigative report (draft) on 
the cooperative shareholding system in Shandong rural 
enterprises. We hope it will enlighten readers at large. [end 
editor's note] 
<H5>  Practice and Development </H5>
  Development of the cooperative shareholding system in 
Shandong's rural enterprises generally can be divided into three 
stages. First was the embryonic stage (1979-1983). The main form 
was joint household-run enterprises: Under the premise of 
voluntary participation, several families or households each 
invested certain funds, elected a leader, and cooperated in 
partnership to run an enterprise. They jointly engaged in 
production and operations, and split profits according to the 
ratio of invested funds. This organizational format contained 
the basic elements of the cooperative shareholding system even 
though it had neither perfectly scientific regulations nor 
normal management systems. It was the rudimentary form of 
cooperative shareholding. Second was the preliminary development 
stage (1984-1991). Shareholding cooperatives gradually expanded 
to village- and township-run enterprises, composed of multiple 
collective, mass organization and individual shareholding rights 
which not only commonly practiced the principles of "evenly 
divided shares, equal shareholder rights, profits divided 
according to shares, common stocks and interests, risk jointly 
borne, and benefits jointly enjoyed," but also established 
relatively standard enterprise regulations, organizational 
formats and management systems. Third was the tiered development 
stage (1992 and thereafter). After Comrade Deng Xiaoping's 
southern tour speech was published, various levels of the party 
and government put promotion of cooperative shareholding on the 
agenda. The ardor of rural enterprises and their workers to 
develop shareholding cooperatives increased. There was a 
relatively large leap in shareholding cooperatives, whether in 
terms of quantity, scale or normalization. Through April 1993, 
9,919 Shandong rural collective enterprises implemented such 
systems; this accounts for 6 percent of all rural collective 
enterprises in Shandong. Bought shares totalled approximately 
3.5 billion yuan. 
  According to organizational form, rural enterprise 
cooperative shareholding systems are divisible into five basic 
formats: 
  1) Agricultural household joint stock format. Generally, 
with 
a capable person as leader, all shareholders are peasant 
households. It is characterized by joint labor and capital among 
peasant households, a cooperative venture format, profits 
divided according to shares, and to each according to his labor. 
  2) Enterprise worker stock format. Enterprises of this 
format 
generally have tripartite stock: originally rural collective 
investments are taken as collective stock; the enterprise's 
accumulation is taken as enterprise stock; shares are issued to 
the enterprise's own workers, constituting individual worker 
stock. The relationship between an enterprise's operations and 
workers' personal interests are more closely tied in that the 
enterprise workers are given to each according to his labor with 
profits divided according to share. 
  3) Social participation shareholding system. This is 
characterized by shares held by enterprise workers along with 
legal persons outside the enterprise, and shares tendered to a 
certain extent to the masses in society to form a 
multi-constituent, multi-format, multi-channel shareholding 
company limited. At present there are relatively few of this 
rather normal form of shareholding enterprise. It requires state 
approval by relevant sectors. 
  4) Legal entity (social group) jointly run shareholding 
system. Composed of two, or more than two, enterprise legal 
entities (or social groups) which mutually invest in shares, and 
have joint management and operations. Profits are divided 
according to investment shares. This format is only restricted 
to mutual stock among legal persons. It does not involve the 
matter of individual workers as shareholders. 
  5) Foreign businessmen stock format. This format both 
tallies 
with the basic characteristic of joint ventures without 
excluding the coexistence of shareholding by rural collectives, 
workers themselves, or individuals in society. 
<H5>  Results and Issues </H5>
  Preliminary results have been obtained by nearly 10,000 
Shandong rural enterprises implementing shareholding cooperative 
systems. 
  One result is the establishment of the independent legal 
position of enterprises, realization of a division between 
government and enterprise and a reduction of administrative 
interference. Implementing shareholding cooperatives clarifies 
enterprise title relationships. Enterprises truly become 
independent legal bodies with greater potential for autonomous 
operations, responsibility for profit and loss, autonomous 
accumulation and autonomous development. The government changes 
from its former role with overall responsibility for everything 
into a common shareholder participating in enterprise management. 
  A second result is diversification of investors and superior 
allocation of funds. Implementing shareholding cooperatives on 
the one hand turns some indidvidual consumption funds into 
production funds, promoting higher productivity, and on the 
other hand spurring on circulation of the factors of production. 
This creates diversification of investors, realizing superior 
allocation of funds to a certain extent under the role of the 
principle of the greatest benefits. 
  A third result is an enhanced sense of worker as master and 
enterprise cohesion. Worker shareholders are both producers and 
owners, which clarifies the formerly murky awareness of worker 
as master and greatly strengthens cadre and worker 
responsibility and enterprise cohesion. The Nanguan Xinghua 
Clothing Factory in Gaomi County has had a trial shareholding 
system for more than four years. Workers on the average propose 
more than 100 rationalization suggestions per year, increasing 
benefits by nearly 100,000 yuan. Examples from two brick 
factories in the county illustrate the matter even better: 
workers in a village household cooperative factory braved a 
downpour to cover brick piles while workers from a collective 
factory ran inside to escape the rain. 
  A fourth result is stronger encouragement and restraint 
mechanisms and stronger enterprise reserve strength. In 
enterprises implementing shareholding cooperatives, stocks are 
like a link forging tighter the interests of investors, 
operators and laborers, forming an inherent encouragement 
mechanism. The board of directors, supervisory committee, and 
shareholding representatives undertake their own decisionmaking 
and supervisory functions according to regulations. Such unified 
internal-external management supervision clearly strengthens an 
enterprise's restraint mechanism. In this way they overcome 
short-term behavior, responsibility for profits but not losses 
and other abuses which are difficult to overcome in the 
contract responsibility system. According to the analysis of a 
continuous three-year monitoring report of the entire Zibo 
village area, the accumulation of shareholding cooperative 
enterprises was higher by 19 percentage points than that of 
average levels of the entire region, and every one was in the 
black. 
  Although Shandong rural enterprises have obtained notable 
results in implementing shareholding cooperatives, some problems 
still remain: one is ideological resistance. Summed up, there 
are three fears: Rural (township) leaders fear restraints, 
enterprise heads fear loss of authority and the masses fear 
risk, of which, the greatest resistance is by rural and 
village-level leadership. A second problem is the lack of 
complementary industrial and commercial management and taxation 
system reforms. In some areas, industrial and commercial 
administrative management sectors do not acknowledge civil 
elections, are not appointed to represent enterprise legal 
bodies or even do not issue operating permits. Taxation 
departments, based on the reasoning that an increase in value of 
stock assets will lead to an increase in depreciation which will 
influence income taxes, do not recognize the stock assets value 
increase portion of the tax estimate. A third problem is 
muddled collective stockholder title representation. Title to 
rural collective shares should be owned by the people of the 
entire village (town) but at present the government still is 
representive. This is the manifestation of incomplete 
reformation of shareholding cooperatives which should gradually 
become stocks of collective economic organizations. A fourth 
problem is that in dividing post-tax profits some enterprises 
have too low collective accumulation proportions. A fifth 
problem is the severe sluggishness of rural financial and bond 
market establishment, making it difficult to bring into full 
play the positive role of shareholding cooperatives. 
<H5>  Thoughts and Suggestions </H5>
  I have the following understanding of Shandong's 
shareholding 
cooperative issues based on this investigation: 
  The direction of rural enterprise reform and development is 
toward shareholding cooperatives. The shareholding cooperative 
system unites the shareholding system and cooperative system. It 
is another mighty creation following the broad masses of peasant 
households joined in the contract responsibility system. In 
terms of practical significance, the shareholding cooperative 
system is beneficial to delimiting and clarifying production 
relationships, promoting the separation of government and 
enterprises, implementing enterprise self-autonomy, and really 
turning enterprises into self-operating, self-restraining, 
self-developing production managers and main competitive 
entities in the market responsible for their own profits and 
losses. It is beneficial to enhancing the enterprise workers' 
consciousness of being masters and at the same time motivating 
the enthusiasm of producers, managers and owners in many 
respects. It is beneficial to fully utilizing idle social funds, 
attracting consumption funds to the production area and turning 
potential, scattered factors of production into real 
productivity. It is beneficial to breaking down barriers between 
higher and lower levels and between different departments and 
regions and to promoting the appropriate circulation and 
superior combination of funds, technology and talent resources. 
It is beneficial to attracting foreign investment, developing an 
externally oriented economy and approaching the international 
market. In sum, the shareholding cooperative system accords with 
the basic principles and needs of developing a socialist market 
economy. 
  We should firmly uphold positive and safe policies in 
developing the shareholding cooperative system. Considered from 
a nation al perspective, at present the shareholding cooperative 
system is under exploration at the preliminary development 
stage. Thus, we must firmly uphold both positive and safe 
policies. On the one hand, we must enhance leadership work over 
the system and motivate its continuous development via 
ideological arousal, policy guidance, information exchange, 
models and examples and consulting services. On the other hand, 
we must pay attention to avoid and overcome profiteering, blind 
pandering and lopsided searches for quantity. In particular, we 
must from first to last firmly uphold the principles of the 
wishes of the masses. To ensure the stable and healthy 
development of the shareholding cooperative system, we 
definitely must not ignore objective factors and the wishes of 
the masses, engaging in "rigid uniformity." 
  To develop the cooperative shareholding system we must 
handle 
well the three following relationships: 1) The relationship 
among the state, collectives, and individuals. In implementing 
the system, we must both guarantee the proper rights and 
interests of internal and external shareholders as well as 
prevent harming national and collective interests by giving 
"full dividends with nothing left." In practice, stressing the 
first and neglecting the second is relatively common. Therefore, 
regarding profit distribution, accumulation and retained ratios 
must be clarified. 2) The relationship between agriculture and 
nonagricultural industries. An especially noteworthy matter at 
present and in the future is to extend the cooperative 
shareholding system from industry toward the planting and 
growing and service industries according to funding priorities 
and market demands. We must guide shareholding cooperative 
enterprises toward developing synthesized agricultural, 
industrial, and commercial operations with unified production, 
supply and consumption to motivate coordinated development of 
various rural industries. 3) The relationship between rights, 
interests, and risk. Stocks unite rights, interests, and risk. 
Mutually enjoyed rights, interests, and risk commonly borne is a 
basic principle of the shareholding system. At the present 
stage, peasant awareness of risk is generally rather weak. In 
some places where peasants split profits and are allowed to 
rescind stock, this augments to a large degree their psychology 
of obtaining benefit without bearing risk. This is detrimental 
to developing the shareholding cooperative system. To resolve 
this issue, we must firmly uphold the nonreedemable nature of 
stock. The cash stocks that enterprises also issue cannot be 
rescinded. 
  Rural enterprises practicing a shareholding cooperative 
system require the support of society and complementary reforms. 
Implementing such a system is a major change in the title 
relationships, organizational structure and allocation system of 
rural enterprises. It involves many things, is of a strong 
policy nature and requires the support of the entire society 
with complementary reforms to improve the environment external 
to enterprises. At the present stage we must stress resolution 
of the following issues: One, further improve knowledge at each 
sector and level of leading comrades, especially rural (town) 
leadership, and remove ideologial and work obstacles. Two, 
accelerate the transformation of government functioning and the 
reform of related industrial, commercial, taxation, and fiscal 
systems. Three, emphasize formulation of laws, regulations and 
operating methods suited to the development needs of the 
shareholding cooperative system, putting the system's 
development onto the legal track. Four, accelerate 
establishment of bond markets and rural financial institution 
reform. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20420 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar014___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  2 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Government Report On Rural Households, Markets </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0269A Beijing JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0269A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article in three installments by the Central Policy </F>
Research Office and the Office of Rural Fixed Observation Sites 
of the Ministry of Agriculture: "Excerpts From a Special Survey 
Report: `Rural Households and the Market'"] 
<H5>  [4 Jan p 1] </H5>
  [Text] Editor's note: Beginning today, this paper 
will publish a three-part series consisting of excerpts from the 
special survey report of the Ministry of Agriculture's Rural 
Economic Research Center. This report summarizes a survey of 
more than 7,000 farm households nationwide by the Central Policy 
Research Center of the central government and the Ministry of 
Agriculture's Office of Rural Economy Fixed Observation Sites. 
It reflects the voice and desires of the peasantry from the 
first line of agricultural production, and as such is of great 
value to us in understanding and studying rural problems. 
  Rural fixed observation sites were established a decade ago, 
in 1984. To understand the developmental situation and problems 
of the rural market system, during the first half of last year 
they undertook by random sample this special survey of "rural 
households and the market," among 7,012 rural households. Survey 
questionnaires and forms sent out totalled 636, and the same 
number were returned, so the survey was totally effective. 
<H5>  Agricultural Production Is More Marketized </H5>
  Rural reform has pushed millions of peasants into the great 
tide of commercial economics, and many of these peasants have 
begun to operate in accordance with the market economy, 
regardless of pre-production decisions concerning what to 
produce or how much of it, as well as sales during and after 
sale. This is a sign of the further development of the 
agricultural production market. 
  First, there has been fundamental implementation of the 
rights of farm families, and the effect of prices on production 
is becoming daily more obvious. According to the survey, 57.53 
percent of the households surveyed thought that current 
production decisions were theirs to make (including what to 
produce, how much to produce, and how to produce); rural 
households have gradually adopted the principle of maximum 
benefit. 
  Second, under the function of the price factor, the 
commercial rate of agricultural products has improved, while the 
personal use rate has declined. The survey showed that the 
overall commercialization rate of agricultural products was 
54.49 percent. 
  Third, there has been a steady decrease in the variety and 
volume of state-purchased products among agricultural products, 
while the rate of products sold directly to markets has 
continually increased. In 1992, among households surveyed, there 
were only two products for which the State purchased more than 
half of the total: cotton (70.95 percent) and tobacco (66.29 
percent); grain occupied 48.45 percent, with the rest all sold 
in markets. 
  In 1992, among all agricultural products sold by households 
surveyed, 31.31 percent were sold to state-owned commercial 
departments, 64.58 percent were sold by private individuals 
directly or indirectly into the market, and other parts were 
sold in other forms. Of the agricultural products sold, the 
accounts of 76.5 percent were settled on time, which means that 
nearly one-fourth were not settled on time. 
  Fourth, rural households entering the market did not feel 
that connecting with the market was a comfortable experience. 
Their first problem was that, in a situation where the markets 
were opening up, they did not know what to produce, due to 
inconsistent information. This made it difficult to turn their 
produce into commodities. In 1992, among agricultural products 
of surveyed households, those products in which more than 10 
percent of output had been stored up and were ready for sale 
were medicinal materials (30.1 percent), oranges (36.2 percent), 
gunny (30.1 percent), wood (17.4 percent), vegetable oils (14.8 
percent), and corn (12.6 percent). This was caused by a supply 
and demand imbalance, so prices were too low. Second, 
administrative decrees under the planned economic system were 
still a constant occurrence, and the self operating rights of 
rural households have not really been implemented. There were 
42.47 percent of rural households reporting some sort of 
administrative interference with their production. In the 
pre-production decisions on 19 out of 20 varieties of 
agricultural products (medicinal materials excepted), the 
decisions were still made on the basis of accomplishing 
government assignments. Third, there is a very low degree of 
organization of farmers going into circulation. There were very 
few rural households, only 4.6 percent, which participated in 
the operation and sale of agricultural products, a total of only 
44 days engaging in transporting goods for sale. Therefore, 
although there was definite improvement in the degree of 
marketization degree of agricultural products, there was still a 
limited number of farmers engaged in operational activities, so 
an agricultural product price formulation system has not been 
genuinely established, and the market development of 
agricultural products needs to be perfected. 
<H5>  Agricultural Products Are Generally Supplied By the Market </H5>
  Studies show that the majority of agricultural production 
materials required by surveyed households were purchased in the 
market, a change from the former situation of relying chiefly on 
the state and collective allocations. This is a considerable 
improvement from the process of market reliance. 
  One, the majority of the supplies used in agricultural 
production are purchased in the market at a higher cost. In 
1992, every family surveyed spent 765.24 yuan for farming 
supplies, of which 677.84 yuan was spent in the market at a 
negotiated price, which was 89.64 percent of the total 
expenditure; 78.4 yuan was the parity price expenditure, which 
was 10.36 percent of the total. 
  Two, the farm supplies purchased at the parity price were 
insufficient, and quite often could not be supplied, so they 
played a lesser role in production as the conditions for 
completely relaxing the price grew more mature by the day. In 
1992, parity price chemical fertilizer received by farmers 
constituted only 63.9 percent of the total supply, while parity 
price diesel fuel could not be fully supplied either. 
  The survey showed that, at present, there are a growing 
number of departments which are involved in managing farm 
supplied, establishing a pattern of multi-channel circulation. 
In addition to supply and marketing cooperatives which both 
operate "connected" parity farm supplies and organize goods 
sources for sale at negotiated prices, departments which 
popularize agricultural technology manage farm supplies which 
are related to technology popularization and fee-based services. 
Community cooperatives and special cooperatives also organize 
goods sources to serve farm households, there are manufacturers 
which sell directly, private operators set up stalls to sell or 
deliver goods to the customer's door-step. 
  Three, farmers' greatest objections are that the price of 
farm supplies is rising too rapidly, and that the market is 
flooded with poor quality, copied, or bogus products. There is a 
sharp contradiction between the supply and demand for farm 
supplies, while slow market development combined with imperfect 
management makes pricing and quality into flash point issues 
bringing many farmer complaints. When the surveyed households 
responded to a question concerning the "least satisfying thing 
about purchasing farm supplies", the ranking in order of was: 
high prices number one, poor product quality was second, and too 
many copied, bogus, and poor quality products was third. Looked 
at by category of product, besides the pricing problem, 34.8 
percent of farming households mentioned bad quality seeds, 31.9 
percent noted the large amount of copied, bogus, and poor 
quality pesticides, while 43.5 percent of farming households 
mentioned the lack of funds for buying farming machinery. 
  Resolution of the agricultural materials supply problem 
demands supporting not only the development of the agricultural 
use industry, promoting a necessary balance between supply and 
sales of farm supplies, but also stressing price restructuring, 
further opening up of the market, encouraging multi-channel 
circulation under the conditions of strengthening macroscopic 
administration, and accelerating development of key elements of 
the market. 
<H5>  [5 Jan p 1] </H5>
  [Text] Capital Is Starting To Flow, as "Glue" for 
Allocating Resources 
  The survey of rural fixed observation spots shows that the 
single pattern of capital circulation has begun to change, with 
the objective of regulating surplus and resolving production 
capital. Multiple channels of capital circulation are emerging, 
but the capital market has not been established yet, and there 
are still contradictions between capital and supply, which 
restricts the development of production and economic growth. 
  First, as capital circulation channels become pluralized, 
banks and credit unions face a challenge to their position as 
the chief channel, with personal loans between individuals 
surpassing the old timers. Based on the survey, in 1992 the 
average farm household had 422.57 yuan in loans for production, 
which was 21.46 percent of the cash outlay for family 
operational costs. Of farm households' total loan burden, 185.04 
yuan of the debt came from banks and credit unions, or 43.79 
percent; 10.15 yuan of the debt came from cooperative fund 
committees, which was 2.4 percent; and there were 215.86 yuan in 
personal loans, 51.08 percent, surpassing banks and credit 
unions to take over first place. 
  Looking at different types of farm households, those totally 
engaged in farming had the smallest loan amount, only 16.16 
percent of their household operational expenditure for the 
entire year; households totally engaged in non-farming pursuits 
had the largest loan amount, which was 37.74 percent of their 
operational expenditure for the entire year, in addition to 
private interest-free loans. This kind of phenomena shows that 
it has been the rise of non-agricultural industry that has 
brought on capital circulation, and a situation whereby capital 
regulation and circulation are no longer small-scale and 
mutually assisting, initiating a "market" tendency. 
  Second, loan capital has been centered on the short term, 
with very little long-term lending, and most of the capital was 
put into non-agricultural industry. Looking at the investment 
direction of loan capital, most of it went into non-farming 
areas, and this constituted 63.5 percent of the total amount of 
farming households loan capital; 26.5 percent of the loans went 
into forestry, livestock, fishing, and commercial plants, with 
only 10.5 percent put into grain production. 
  Different capital resources have different interest rate 
standards. This reflects the fact that floating interest rates 
do indeed exist in the countryside. 
  Third, there is an outstanding contradiction between supply 
and demand, but as a practical matter the amount is not very 
big. The investigation showed that 64.1 percent of farming 
households felt the lack of capital for agricultural production, 
which makes it difficult for them to engage in expanded 
reproduction. Among farming households who lacked capital, 75.3 
percent of them were willing to raise capital through loans. But 
in fact only 32.1 percent of farming households did so, which 
was 48.9 percent of farming households having a capital shortage. 
  As resource allocation and the economic means of regulation 
have changed, capital has begun to flow as the "glue" of 
resource allocation. But the capital market has yet to be 
established in the countryside. To promote rural financial 
system reform, and enable limited capital to work more 
positively in rural resource allocation, we should permit 
pluralized growth and development while developing and 
perfecting major channels of finance and capital, strengthen 
administration in the process of development, and enlarge rural 
cooperative fund associations, bringing their mutual assistance 
function into play. 
<H5>  A Slow Shift in Land-Use Rights </H5>
  Land functions as a special production element, its market 
formation signaled by shifting and flowing land-use rights, 
allowing its allocation to accord perfectly with benefit 
principles. For many years, along with the development of rural 
non-agricultural industry and the improvement in 
non-agricultural product degree of marketization, smashing the 
situation of land being isolated and sealed, there has appeared 
a shift in land-use rights. This also displays several new 
characteristics. 
  First, land contracts are basically stable, with not many 
shifts in contractors. Based on the survey, since the 
implementation of the household responsibility system of linking 
remuneration to output, 63.9 percent of farming households have 
readjusted their contracted land, while 36.1 percent of farming 
households have never done so. Among sample households, 93.8 
percent of farming households have not subcontracted their land, 
4.2 percent of farming households subcontracted only part of 
their land, and 1.99 percent of farming households have 
subcontracted all of their land to others. 
  Second, in the current phase, it is impossible for land-use 
rights to shift on a large scale, as these are restricted for 
the most part by society's safeguard functions. The survey shows 
that in grain production, which occupies most of the land area, 
production decisions are based primarily on the family's life 
requirements. Whether farm households subcontract their land 
largely depends on how much of a labor force the households have. 
  Third, this shift in land-use rights is still in a 
spontaneous and disorderly situation, lacking regulated 
administration. 
  Fourth, in a situation where the planting business brings 
fewer benefits, farming households are reluctant to put more 
land into operation. 
  The survey shows that there are many features restricting 
shifts in land-use rights. In addition to the major role still 
played by the land's societal protection function, the original 
collective property rights are unclear; leaving the land means 
abandoning all that one has built up, while development of rural 
urbanization and township enterprises regional construction is 
also quite slow. To resolve the land problem, we must positively 
invigorate operation and usage rights under the precondition of 
maintaining collective ownership and stabilizing farming 
families' contractual rights. We should not only allow, but 
should also guide and regulate compensation for shifts in 
land-use rights, to bring about a perfect reorganization of the 
key elements of production. 
<H5>  Circulation of the Labor Force Has Accelerated </H5>
  The survey of fixed observation sites shows that since the 
breakup of the old pattern in which the entire labor force was 
bound to the land, labor has started to flow among the various 
rural businesses and between urban areas and the countryside. 
Some farmers are now choosing their jobs based on their 
qualifications, their preferences, and the law of value. So we 
are just in the midst of cultivating a labor market. 
  One, the fact that surpluses and shortages of labor force 
exist at the same time in industries, regions, and farming 
households makes it both possible and necessary to make 
adjustments between surplus and shortage and the circulation of 
labor. Based on research and estimates, the surplus labor force 
is about one-third to one-fourth of the average farming 
household's labor force; but meanwhile, about two-fifths of 
farming households are confronting shortages of labor in family 
operations in varying degrees. Among these, 4.5 percent of the 
households had labor shortages throughout the year, while 35.5 
percent of the households had a shortage during the busiest 
farming season. In the production and operation of 
non-agricultural industries, the labor shortage problem was more 
urgent, with the total frequency reaching 40.8 percent. 
  To meet the need of maintaining normal production 
operations, 
30.8 percent of the families sampled hired help. Those who did 
not hire outside help despite having a labor shortage gave their 
inability to afford it as the reason. The rate for this was 62.2 
percent. 
  Second, as hiring of help increased, so did wages. Most of 
the outside hiring was done by non-agricultural industries. 
Non-agricultural industries accounted for 60.7 percent of the 
outside hiring in 1992, 24.1 percent by planting businesses 
(12.7 percent in grain production), and a very small part by 
forestry, fishing, and stock raising. 
  Spurred by the economic benefits and lured by job openings, 
labor is shifting from undeveloped to developed regions. This 
trend became very clear when the households in the survey were 
divided along regional lines. The average hired help workdays in 
the eastern areas were 35 percent higher than in the inland 
areas, and 2.8 times again higher than in the west. 
  Three, when the labor force flows on a smaller scale, with 
unstable employment, it requires wider channels for labor 
shifts, and the establishment and perfection of a labor market. 
Although at one time or another mid-level organizations in many 
places have seen the emergence of some sort of labor market with 
employment agencies, etc., these have all been in a preliminary 
status, and lacked organized leadership. 
  There are many reasons for the backward development of a 
rural labor force market. Besides the poor qualifications of the 
labor force itself, being unsuited to the requirements of new 
job openings, even more important have been the restrictions of 
the economic development level and system. Two different types 
of resident registration systems have created a protective 
screen and barrier blocking the flow of labor between the cities 
and the rural areas. Township enterprises' situation of "leaving 
land doesn't mean leaving the countryside" also delays 
construction in small towns by restricting the labor force 
shift. The restricting elements listed above must be resolved in 
order to develop a rural labor force market. 
<H5>  [6 Jan p 1] </H5>
  [Text] The change from a planned economy to a market 
economic system will by no means be successful in every 
instance, but will have to deal with complex and rapidly 
changing markets. There are various kinds of contradictions 
between the small-scale production of farming households and big 
markets, two of which are the low qualifications of the farmers 
and a lack of fundamental change in the role of government. 
Resolution of these problems requires persistence in opening 
and conscientious organization, in order to create better 
external circumstances for farmers going into the markets. 
  One, the lower qualifications of farmers makes it difficult 
for them to match up with market economy requirements. 
  Rural reform has pushed farmers to the primary position in 
the market economy, but whether they can swim freely in the 
ocean of the market economy will be determined to a very high 
degree by their qualifications. Looking at documents for 
different groups which indicate the labor force's educational 
level as one of the important indicators of farmers' 
qualifications, the educational level shows a positive 
relationship to family operational benefits. Looking at share of 
productive fixed assets (initial value), illiterate farming 
households are at 100, grade school level households at 122, 
junior high school level 116, and middle high school level 130; 
looking at gross income from family operations, illiterate 
households are still at 100, followed by the others in order at 
110, 113, and 116 respectively. Among households surveyed, 13.8 
percent of heads of household or those making production 
decisions were illiterate, 41.5 percent had a grade school 
education, 34.5 percent had a junior high school education, and 
10.1 percent of them had a high school education. In addition, 
11.5 percent of the farmers had special skills, and only 3.9 
percent of the farmers had received professional education and 
training. 
  A low educational level, combined with the affects of the 
traditional production economy and the old, planned economic 
system, has resulted in conservative thinking and narrow vision 
in a great many farmers. They are contented with slight 
financial improvements, they are afraid of risk and worry 
excessively, they do not know how to arrange production and 
operations activities, nor do they have any way of obtaining 
such information when they get into the market economy. They can 
deal with regular farming work only by traditional ways and 
their experiences, they do not understand market rules, they 
cannot take advantage of market regulations. 
  The survey showed that quite a few farmers have only a dim 
understanding of marketing concepts, and very little of 
contractual concepts. There is a low rate of contracting and 
implementing contracts for the purchase and sale of agricultural 
products. In 1992, only 159 households of sampling households 
signed purchase and sales contracts, which was only 2.3 percent 
of the total number of families. 
  Two, the small production scale of farming households and 
their low specialization level make it difficult for them to 
face the big markets. Based on the study, the average family had 
4.76 people, a labor force of 2.63, farming 11.7 mu of land 
which was divided into 8.08 pieces, and at year's end owned 
2,480 yuan of the initial value of production fixed capital. 
Among households surveyed, 57.5 were engaged completely in 
agriculture, 29.6 percent of the households engaged mostly in 
agriculture but with other businesses as well, 11.1 percent of 
households engaged mostly in non-agricultural business but in 
farming was well, 1.3 percent were involved completely in 
non-agricultural operations, and 1.5 percent were other. 
  In this situation of small scale operations, the coexistence 
of self-supply and self-merchandising has brought production 
into the "small but complete" pattern, and led to a trend of 
holding different businesses, in order to deal with market 
risks. The activity of holding different businesses on a small 
scale must lead to small batch production, leaving them 
powerless to engage in market competition and lacking a 
negotiating position. Other than what they supply to themselves, 
very few of the farmers' products can go into the market for 
exchange. In a way, this is an exchange of surplus products: 
when the markets offer a good price, farmers sell more; when 
not, they take more for themselves, so they have no way of 
establishing a competitive advantage. This can be explained by 
the fact that completely agricultural households sell so many 
kinds of products. Among these totally agricultural operators, 
33.5 percent sell one or two types of agricultural products, 
14.6 percent sell three or four types, 16.5 percent sell more 
than five kinds of agricultural products, with the extreme 
example being the sale of 15 kinds of agricultural products. 
Meanwhile, trade methods have been unorganized and scattered, 
with very little organized sales or regulated trust sales, 
wholesale, or futures, so they were also in an unfavorable 
trading position in trade. Many of the self-operation rights 
received from production and operations are lost in market 
circulation. 
  Three, the role of government has not really changed, 
macroscopic adjustment and control lack force, and there is no 
regular and perfected market environment for farming households 
entering the market. In the conflict that arises from the new 
old systems coexisting, one still often sees the administrative 
order of the old system, and farmers' self-operation rights in 
production have not been implemented completely. In some cases, 
farmers' rights to make their own decisions concerning what to 
plant have been replaced by administrative plans. The markets 
for certain products are often closed by administrative means. 
All these things have restricted farmers' activities in varying 
degrees. Construction of a market economic system is very 
imperfect, especially for that macroadjustment and control which 
are essential to a market economy. The foundations are lacking 
for a perfect system. 
  First is the information foundation. In recent years, 
although relevant departments have attempted to improve the 
means of information transfer to promote development of a market 
economy, all their efforts have been far short of what is 
needed, regardless of whether it has been the quantity of 
information supply or how up-to-date or accurate; this has 
resulted in losses for producers. Some farmers have even gotten 
the idea that whatever the government encourages us to plant, 
that will be hard to sell; whatever the government restricts us 
from planting, that will sell well. In the situation of a market 
economy, vast numbers of farmers are thoroughly familiar with 
the principle of maximizing income. In addition, while budgetary 
restrictions are very efficient in household operations, 
extremely few farmers know what will earn them more money, so 
they urgently require "information guidance". 
  Second is the facilities foundation. Constructing a market 
system for trade in agricultural products is delayed and 
backward, with even primary level trading markets for 
agricultural products trading markets having trouble attaining a 
satisfactory status. According to documents which classify the 
sampled households by their distance agricultural products 
trading markets, 30.1 percent of farming households' lived more 
than 20 km away from the markets, and 26.4 percent of farming 
households' lived more than 10 km from the markets. Under 
circumstances of inconvenient transportation and backward means 
transport, things are more difficult for farming households who 
live far from the markets. The shortage of storage facilities 
and poor means of processing have made agricultural products a 
"short leg", with most of them having to be sold locally. 
  Third is the system foundation. Regulations and laws 
essential to the market economy are very imperfect: In some 
places there are no regulations to comply with, and especially 
in the countryside, those laws which do exist are not complied 
with. Most of the problems farmers encounter in shipping 
agricultural products and selling them are due to the 
imperfection of laws and system. Of the sampled farming 
households, 306 stated that the greatest difficulty they had in 
going into circulation was, first, that there were too many 
barriers, and the phenomenon of levying arbitrary charges was 
severe; second, poor social security made them lack a sense of 
security. These both involve legal construction. 
  Many of the sampled households, when confronting the great 
wave of the market economy, summarized their desires in such 
sentences as this: What farmers want is to prosper; what they 
lack is the means to do it; what they are short of is capital; 
what is difficult for them is technology; what they worry about 
is marketing channels; what they expect is service. 
  To remove the barriers for farmers going to market, from the 
standpoint of developing major entities for producing 
merchandize, there must be a rise in the farmers' own 
qualifications in education, technology, and merchandizing 
economics. From the standpoint of establishing a market economic 
system, the changeover from the old to the new system must be 
stepped up. There must be a change in the role of government, 
stronger macroadjustment and control, development of a 
production elements market, and a greater degree of opening in 
rural economic development. Comprehensive development of the 
rural economy must be shifted into the channel of a socialist 
market economy. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20421 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar014___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  2 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Impact of GATT on Grain Trade </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0260A Beijing GUOJI SHANGBAO in Chinese 25 Dec 93 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0260A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUOJI SHANGBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Shen Anran (3088 1489 3544) and Liu Liedong </F>
(0491 3525 2639) of the China National Cereals, Oils, and 
Foodstuffs Import and Export Corporation: "Impact and 
Countermeasures to the Reentry into GATT on China's Cereals, 
Oils, and Food Trade"] 
  [Text] With the conclusion of the Uruguay Round of 
negotiations, there will be greater liberalization of 
agricultural product trade and various types of interference, 
such as subsidies, tariffs, quotas, and monopolies, will all be 
converted to tariffs, thereby bringing measures that affect 
market entry and export competition under stronger and more 
effective tariff and trade regulations and laws. At the 14th 
symposium on China's entering the GATT held in May of this year, 
China made an announcement regarding agricultural policy. China 
announced that it would no longer seek special exceptions for 
agriculture, and would implement its agricultural development 
policy within the scope of current GATT regulations, and would 
actively participate in the Uruguay Round negotiations on 
agricultural product concessions. 
<H5>  I. Principal Affects </H5>
  1. Improved capability of earning foreign exchange for the 
state to help to expand cereals, oils, and food exports. China 
is a major agricultural country and from the founding of the 
country, cereals, oils, and food have always been major exports. 
With China's industrial development and the constant improvement 
in the mix of export products, the share of cereals, oils, and 
food in China's exports has constantly fallen, but the total 
value of these exports has risen from year to year. For 
example, China's food exports had an average annual increase of 
10.5 percent from 1980 through 1988. Its share of the total 
value of world food exports rose from 1.5 percent in 1980 to 2.5 
percent in 1989. In 1992 cereals, oils, and food exports made up 
12.4 percent of the total value of national exports. The natural 
component in China's cereals, oils, and food production is 
great, contamination is great, and the prices are low, and they 
have a certain competitiveness on the international market. The 
foreign price for wheat is 52 percent higher than the domestic 
price and that of polished round-grained nonglutinous rice is 16 
percent higher, live hogs are 56 percent higher, eggs are 27 
percent higher, and corn is 39.6 percent higher. After the GATT 
agreement on agricultural products is reached, with reduction of 
various countries' domestic production supports, further 
curtailment of export competition measures, improvement in 
market entry conditions, and environmental and hygienic 
standards, huge subsidies of various nations that lead to 
distorted prices in international agricultural product trade 
will be further rectified. Reform of the foreign trade policy of 
major agricultural product and trading nations, especially the 
United States, Japan, and the European Community, could cause a 
general rise in world agricultural product prices. The prices of 
such agricultural products as rice, sugar, corn, wheat, pork, 
and beef will more than double. In another respect, after 
developed countries eliminate some domestic agricultural 
production supports, because domestic production costs will 
increase and the volume will decrease, exports will decrease and 
imports will increase, thereby conceding some of the 
international market and the domestic market. With China's 
"reentry into GATT," discriminatory anti-dumping and 
anti-subsidy suits encountered in cereals, oils, and foodstuffs 
exports will be eliminated as demanded by GATT regulations. This 
is an excellent opportunity for China to expand it cereals, 
oils, and foodstuffs exports and will help to further stabilize 
and develop the cereals, oils, and foodstuffs export market that 
we already have and continuously open new markets, increasing 
foreign exchange earned from exports and improving the ability 
to compete. 
  2. Numerous cereals, oils, and foodstuffs markets will 
suffer 
impact. China's agricultural businesses will implement the 
system of contracted household responsibility linked to output, 
a high degree of business diversification, a rather low level of 
productivity, and state investment in and subsidization of 
agriculture far short of developed countries. These 
characteristics have determined that China's agriculture is 
comparatively fragile and unable to endure the impact of 
liberalized trade in agricultural products. After "reentry 
into GATT," while being able to use tariff reductions and 
exemptions and elimination of nontariff barriers to increase 
cereals, oils, and foodstuffs exports, China also must use the 
same conditions to permit the entry of foreign cereals, oils, 
and foodstuffs products. Despite the fact that China presently 
has some cereals, oils, and foodstuffs for which they have 
certain price advantages or other advantages on the 
international market, there also are a great many cereals, oils, 
and foodstuffs where they are clearly inferior in such respects 
as quality, variety, and designs and colors, as well as 
transportation conditions, production costs, packaging, and 
storage. Not only will it be difficult for these products to 
capture the international market, but their domestic market also 
will be impacted to various degrees. 
  3. State foreign trade companies specializing in cereals, 
oils, and foodstuffs import and export trade will be totally 
oriented to the market. After "reentering GATT," China first 
must trim tariffs and reduce nontariff restrictive measures. Not 
only is China's current average tariff higher than developed 
countries, it is also higher than developing countries. A 
large-scale lowering of tariffs cannot be avoided. In addition, 
some Chinese nontariff restrictive measures are contrary to GATT 
regulations and nontariff restrictive measures must be reduced 
or even eliminated. The licensing system especially must be 
gradually eliminated, and complicated administrative revision 
and approval procedures must be reduced. This means that the 
market will be further opened and enterprises will lose 
government protection. The legal monopolies and privileges that 
state foreign trade companies engaged in specialized cereals, 
oils, and foodstuffs import and export trade are granted will be 
limited or even eliminated. Faced with the challenge of 
competition and selection, they must seek their own survival and 
development. Such situations as "multiple external relations, 
forcing up prices and rushing to purchase, lowering prices and 
competing for sales, and killing each other off," currently 
present in cereals, oils, and foodstuffs exports, will shortly 
become more serious. 
<H3>  II. Initial Impact of "Reentry Into Gatt" on Various Major 
Types of Chinese Cereals, Oils, and Foodstuffs Import and Export 
Trade </H3>
  1. Cereals. Generally speaking, in the initial stage 
"reentry 
into GATT" will not have too great an impact. But it could have 
a different impact on different varieties at different times. As 
regards exports, it will help rice, corn, soybeans, and some 
other small grains to further expand exports. As regards 
imports, if the developed countries, mainly the United States, 
trim their subsidies of export cereals or further lower the 
foreign exchange rate, the prices of imported cereals, 
especially wheat, will surely rise. If the rise of domestic 
grain prices is higher than import prices, it could stimulate 
excessive grain imports, impacting the domestic market. 
  2. Vegetable oil. In recent years, Chinese imports have been 
greater than exports and the scope of imports has been very 
great, seriously impacting the domestic market. After "reentry 
into GATT," imported oil with price, variety, and quality 
advantages will have an even greater impact on the domestic 
market. For China's traditional export products, such as tung 
oil, peanuts, and sesame, because they have a resource advantage 
and comparatively low domestic prices, "reentry into GATT" will 
help to expand exports and further open foreign markets. 
  3. Meats. This situation involves three issues: (1) 
permission to enter the market; (2) elimination of subsidies; 
and (3) health and quarantine standards. China is the world's 
largest meat and egg producing nation. Pork and beef are 
traditional Chinese bulk export commodities. Supplies are ample, 
prices are cheap, and the export potential is very great, but 
actual exports are limited, and they still have not penetrated 
the markets of such developed countries as the United States, 
Japan, Korea, and the European Community. The reason is that 
they are restricted by various countries' health and quarantine 
standards. In regard to chicken, in recent years the European 
Community has eliminated subsidies to the chicken industry and 
European Community countries one after another are turning to 
China to buy chicken, but exports are affected by excessive drug 
residue in chicken meat. China's leading export to the European 
Community, frozen rabbit meat, also had pesticide residue in the 
feed leading to a sudden decline in exports. GATT signatories 
could unify the health and quarantine standards stipulated for 
these commodities. After "reentry into GATT," linking up with 
international standards will help China's meat exports. 
  4. Canned goods. Canned goods are an important foreign 
exchange earning commodity for China. Western nations, 
especially the European Community, all have a growing demand for 
such Chinese canned goods as asparagus and mushrooms. But some 
Western countries have implemented nontariff barriers against 
China's canned goods exports. The domestic production price of 
galvanized tin used in canned goods packaging is high, largely 
relying on imports. After "reentry into GATT," GATT signatories 
must remove nontariff barriers against China, which will help to 
expand the volume of Chinese canned goods exports. 
  5. Sugar. International sugar production has increased very 
rapidly, but consumption growth has slowed. World sugar reserves 
have increased and sugar prices have fallen. A number of 
countries with lower sugar production costs than China have 
adopted high tariffs or quantitative restrictions toward 
imported sugar and have subsidized the price of domestically 
produced sugar to protect their own country's sugar market. 
After "reentry into GATT," if China does not adopt protective 
measures, it will seriously impact the domestic market. 
  6. Aquatic products. In 1992 China's total aquatic product 
output was 13 million tons, becoming the world's largest fishing 
nation. China's aquatic products have a certain competitiveness 
on the international market because of cheap prices. Because 
they lack special new varieties and profound processing 
technology to keep them alive and fresh, the added value of the 
products is low. 
  7. Fruits and vegetables. If the quality of China's fruit 
does not remarkably improve, after "reentry into GATT," fruit 
exports still will not sharply improve and high quality foreign 
fruits will constantly flow into China's coastal cities. China 
has ample vegetable resources and the prices are cheap. After 
"reentry into GATT," it will be helpful to expand exports to 
neighboring countries. 
  8. Alcoholic beverages. After "reentry into GATT," it will 
be 
helpful to the export of alcoholic beverages produced in China, 
but foreign alcoholic beverages will have an even greater impact 
on the domestic market. China has a single variety of beverages 
and the quality is not stable. It is very hard to compete with 
foreign beverages. After "reentry into GATT," foreign beverages 
could seriously impact the domestic market. 
<H3>  III. Grasp Opportunities, Meet Challenges, and Accelerate 
the Development of China's Cereals, Oils, and Foodstuffs Import 
and Export Trade </H3>
  1. Further accelerate the commercialization, grouping, and 
internationalization of cereals, oils, and foodstuffs import and 
export trade companies. The expansion of China's cereals, oils, 
and foodstuffs import and export trade is based on the formation 
and growth of multinational companies. At the same time, because 
much of international cereals, oils, and foodstuffs trade is 
large-scale primary product trade, wholesale markets, futures 
markets, and commodity exchanges occupy a major position in 
large-scale primary products and their trade. China must 
accelerate the development of high-quality markets---wholesale 
markets, futures markets, and commodity exchanges and related 
markets, and link up with world markets. 
  2. Fully utilize the advantage of China's agricultural 
resources and improve production, processing, and sales of 
traditional cereals, oils, and foodstuffs. We should strive to 
tap the demands of the international market and strive to expand 
the foreign market for traditional products most appropriate to 
the export products that China produces (such as medicinal 
foods). We should actively develop high production value 
agriculture, for example, by exploiting coastal and inland 
aquatic resources and expanding the export of seawater products; 
fully utilizing agricultural and pastoral region resources to 
develop livestock product exports; and concentrate on the 
vegetable and fruits requirements of neighboring countries to 
develop garden crops. In the future, cereals and oils trade 
should have imports and exports and in ordinary years cereals 
and oils import and export values should maintain an overall 
balance. Utilizing the low grain prices on the international 
market in recent years, we should appropriately import some to 
make up for grain and oil deficits that can be brought on by 
adjustments in the structure of the domestic market. At the same 
time, we should gradually establish a cereals, oils, and 
foodstuffs reserve system capable of adjusting the domestic 
market so that we will not have any regrets when international 
trade competition intensifies. 
  3. Diversify the cereals, oils, and foodstuffs export 
market; 
utilize the opportunities conferred by GATT and promptly exploit 
international markets and make an all out effort to expand 
exports. We should fully utilize the advantage of low labor 
costs and fully utilize favorable conditions conferred by being 
a signatory to GATT, speed up entry into signatory markets and 
turn around unreasonable market structures as much as possible 
to make for diversified and multilateral export product sales 
markets. At the same time, we should participate extensively in 
domestic market competition and further expand domestic markets. 
  4. Diversify means of competing. At the current stage, 
Chinese cereals, oils, and foodstuffs export products basically 
use price competition, that is, they compete for markets by 
commodity price concessions. Because international market 
competition is becoming ever more intense, non-price competition 
is currently the main means of competition on the international 
market. After "reentering GATT, China should take the use of 
nonprice competition seriously and gradually make thoroughly 
processed cereals, oils, and foodstuffs the main objective, 
while enhancing product advertising and improving product 
quality, including varieties, standards, and external design and 
packaging and strive "to succeed by quality." We should change 
our orientation from mainly price competition to mainly nonprice 
competition. 
  5. Avoid forcing down prices to compete for sales and reduce 
transshipment trade. China is a vast country and after "reentry 
into GATT," the same types of cereals, oils, and foodstuffs 
products will be exported by numerous companies and numerous 
ports. If all the companies and all the ports, to increase the 
foreign exchange earned from exports, adopt the method of 
forcing down prices to compete for foreign sales, it will become 
ever more intense. We must strengthen controls and insure that 
the "profits" do not run off. In the 1980s, one third or more of 
Chinese cereals, oils, and foodstuffs exports were made through 
transshipment channels. According to international market price 
calculations, this made China lose 30 percent to 50 percent of 
the profits. "Reentry into GATT" will facilitate the development 
of direct trade. 
  6. Become proficient at using GATT provisions to enhance 
self-protection. We should increase investment in agriculture 
and expand supports to cereals, oils, and foodstuffs exports. 
GATT has a number of types of preferential treatment for 
developing countries. Various types of direct supports for 
agriculture by developing countries are permitted. But in name 
the supports are to increase agricultural productivity and 
improve farmers' livelihood, and it should not in name support 
earning foreign exchange from exports to avoid producing the 
suspicion of direct export subsidies. Becoming proficient in 
using some GATT preferential treatment regulations for 
developing countries can become an efficient instrument in 
China's developing cereals, oils, and foodstuffs import and 
export trade. In addition, for the easily impacted varieties 
where China does not have the ability to compete 
internationally, in accordance with GATT exceptional provisions, 
we can demand that the government give the necessary protection. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20422 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar014___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  2 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Impact of GATT on Grain System </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0284B Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO in Chinese 17 Jan 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0284B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Deng Yiming (6772 0001 7686), affiliated with </F>
the CASS Rural Development Institute: "The Impact of GATT 
Reentry' on China's Grain System"] 
  [Text] The GATT is aimed at eliminating tariffs and 
nontariff barriers to effect free trade throughout the world, 
thus realizing the full development of international commodity 
exchange and production. But all countries throughout the world 
sharply subsidize grain producers, imposing tariffs and quota 
protection on international grain trade, which severely distorts 
real grain prices, affecting the growth of grain production. 
<H3>  The Impact of International Grain Protectionism on China's 
Grain System </H3>
  The longstanding lack of restraint by basic GATT principles 
and provisions on grain production and international trade has 
severely distorted the production and international trade in 
grain of all countries. 1) Developed market-economy 
grain-exporting countries have used price supports, export 
subsidies, farm (grain) import tariffs, and quantitative 
quotas for domestic grain producers to distort world 
grain-market prices. 2) These grain-protection policies have 
brought pluses and minuses for China. The pluses are that China 
is a net grain importer, while grain world-market prices have 
fallen due to the grain-protection measures of developed 
grain-exporting countries, enabling China to import grain 
cheaply. The minuses are three: 1) Cheap grain imports are a 
blow to domestic grain producers and add to our national 
financial burden. Until grain is deregulated, this impact will 
be somewhat less, as grain prices are set by the state, cutting 
the impact of world grain-market price variations on China. But 
once our grain market is deregulated, with grain-market prices 
being determined by supply and demand, cheap grain imports will 
be even more of a blow to our grain producers. 2) China is 
generally a net farm-product exporter. While developed 
market-economy countries can acquire certain advantages from 
grain imports for domestic production and trade protection, 
other farm-product export opportunities and export earnings will 
drop, which is generally a minus for China. 3) Grain-protection 
policies will add to China's grain-market price instability, 
mainly because once China deregulates its grain market, our 
domestic market will have to link up with overseas markets. 
Overseas market volatility will spill over very easily to our 
domestic market, thus touching off domestic-market price 
instability. 
<H5>  The Impact of GATT Membership on China's Grain System </H5>
  1. The Positive Impact 
  1. The ultimate objective of GATT negotiations is to effect 
worldwide free trade, which is the only way to ensure the most 
efficient disposition of resources on a global scale. But 
trade protection interferes with this efficient disposition of 
resources. A UN Food and Agriculture Organization's simulated 
study results show that if all developed market-economy 
countries completely lifted all of their trade restrictions, 
prices would rise 20 percent for wheat, 16 percent for coarse 
food grain (such as maize, sorghum, and millet as distinct from 
wheat and rice), and 14 percent for (husked) rice. Except for 
the former Soviet Union and Eastern Europe, if all wheat-trading 
countries adopted free trade, world wheat prices would go up 11 
percent, with market price volatility down 35 percent. Based on 
this simulated study, once China joins the GATT, if developed 
grain-exporting countries could lift their trade restrictions 
(which would be extremely difficult), grain prices would 
generally rise, which would be a plus for China's grain 
producers. But if China simultaneously lifted its trade 
restrictions, conceding some of our domestic grain market, 
particularly while China's grain costs or prices were higher 
than world market prices, large amounts of overseas grain would 
pour in, shocking China's grain market, which might have a 
negative impact on our producers. 
  2. As grain protection eases in degree, the general rise in 
farm product and grain prices not only will raise farm product 
export earnings (with China being generally a net farm-product 
exporter), but also might indirectly raise peasant income, which 
may increase investment in grain. So China's grain production 
can take advantage of this opportunity to speed up grain 
development. 
  2. The Negative Impact 
  1. As farm tariff protection weakens and nontariff barriers 
are dismantled, our domestic grain market will necessarily open 
wider, with GATT member nations exploiting the opportunity to 
grab China's grain market, which will have a crucial impact on 
China's overall balance of grain supply and demand. 
Particularly as China has not yet completed the conversion 
from a "dual-track system" to market forces or the transition in 
grain from a product economy to a commodity economy, Chinese 
grain, which is produced on a small scale, high in cost, low in 
labor productivity, and poor in quality, will be in a 
disadvantageous market-competition position with overseas grain, 
which is high in quality, low in cost, and high in labor 
productivity. 
  2. As control over grain imports is eased, particularly 
while domestic grain prices are higher than international ones, 
China's southeastern coastal provinces and cities (our 
grain-market zone) will very likely import foreign grain, which 
will shrink our domestic grain market, exacerbating our 
"grain-selling difficulties." 
  3. As China is a large grain importer, grain trade 
protection enables us to acquire grain cheaply. But as trade 
protection is eliminated, the general rise in grain prices will 
confront us with two options: 1) Paying more money for grain 
imports. 2) Reducing imported grain and increasing domestic 
grain self-sufficiency. While raising domestic grain 
production will require government investment in grain and 
higher domestic grain prices, this will mean greater sacrifices 
for grain consumers and domestic taxpayers, which would be a 
minus for consumers. 
<H5>  Adapting to "GATT Reentry" by Intensifying Reform </H5>
  1. In light of its basic principles and prerequisites, the 
GATT is actually a market-economy-based free trade system. In 
respect to this basic principle, China's grain market reforms 
are still sharply lagging. While over 700 counties in one-third 
of our provinces and cities have deregulated their grain 
markets, our basic system still remains a "dual-track one." In 
order to join the GATT, we will have to speed up our 
market-reform pace as, unless we complete our market reforms 
before becoming a GATT member, we will be unable to complete the 
linkup of domestic to overseas grain markets. 
  2. We need to link up our domestic grain market to the 
international grain market. This market linkup is based on 
China's grain-market reforms achieving the desired result, to 
operate through the same forces as the international market. 
Completing the domestic-overseas market linkup on this basis 
will mean doing the following particular jobs: 1) We will have 
to push our grain foreign trade organs and domestic grain 
business enterprises toward the market, by establishing a sound 
market network oriented to international service. 2) We need to 
adjust our grain product mix to raise our grain quality. While 
Chinese rice, soybeans, and corn are exportable, their lower 
quality leaves them quite lacking in world competitiveness. So 
we need to widen the price differences for quality, practicing a 
uniform international standard for export grain, and eliminating 
the two standards, domestic and overseas. 3) We need to import 
overseas fine varieties and grain production technology, to 
reach international standards for variety and technology. 
  3. We need to establish and perfect as quickly as possible 
China's two-level grain reserve system. As linking up the two 
markets will mean that international grain-price volatility will 
spill over domestically, establishing a domestic grain buffer 
reserve will help to ease the shock of international grain-price 
volatility on our domestic market. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20423 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar014___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  2 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liu Jiang Urges Rural Development Through S&amp;T </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0244A Beijing NONGYE JINGJI WENTI [Problems of 
AGRICULTURAL ECONOMY] in Chinese No 11, 23 Nov pp 2-4 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0244A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing NONGYE JINGJI WENTI [Problems of 
AGRICULTURAL ECONOMY] </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Liu Jiang of Ministry of Agriculture: "Rely on </F>
Science and Technology To Further Promote Agriculture and Rural 
Economic Development"] 
  [Text] Since the beginning of the reform program, China has 
scored tremendous achievements in agriculture and rural economic 
work, and made great contributions to developing agricultural 
science and technology. According to an estimate, 27 percent of 
the growth in China's total output value in agriculture during 
the 1970s should be attributed to scientific and technological 
progress. This figure rose to 35 percent in the 1980s. 
Scientific and technological progress plays a significant role 
in developing rural enterprises, improving production conditions 
in agriculture, helping peasants increase their income and 
readjusting the structure of rural industry and product mix. 
China's economic development has entered a new stage in the 
1990s. The development of agriculture and the rural economy is 
dependent upon scientific and technological progress and on the 
raising of the educational level of workers to a greater extent. 
Therefore, we must pay great attention to the issue of closely 
combining agriculture, science and education. 
<H3>  I. Issues on Actively Promoting the Combination of 
Agriculture, Science and Education </H3>
  If we seek to achieve the goal of doubling the gross 
national product in the 1990s, rural and agricultural 
development is a key to realizing this strategic target. In face 
of this arduous task, we cannot but soberly realize that 
problems which now confront us are our peasants' lack of 
scientific and general knowledge, low standards in 
agro-technology, slow scientific and technological progress, and 
ineffective use of scientific and technological findings in 
agriculture. To solve these problems, we must actively promote 
the integration of agriculture with science and education in the 
course of implementing the strategy of "revitalizing agriculture 
by relying on science and education." 
  "Economy is dependent upon science and technology. Progress 
in science and technology is dependent upon professionally 
trained people. The training of professional people is dependent 
upon education." Agro-scientific research, education and the 
promotion of agro-technology are the three major pillars in 
ensuring progress in agro-science and technology. They are also 
the main forces in revitalizing agriculture with science and 
education. The combination of agriculture, science and education 
is an effective way to solve problems in science and technology, 
education and production, to promote science and technology and 
to reform the educational system. The main technological 
resources in promoting agro-technology come from research work. 
The main resources of scientific and general knowledge of the 
agro-scientists and technicians and peasants are mainly from 
their education. Only by putting the findings of agro-scientific 
research into agricultural production will it be possible to 
turn such findings into the actual productive force. Conversely 
the popularization of agro-techniques also provides agricultural 
research and education some feedbacks and a vast field for 
carrying out practice. Meanwhile such practice will help verify 
the achievements in education and scientific research and 
further spread and improve them. 
  Illiterate and semi-illiterate people account for 30 percent 
in China's rural population. Revitalizing agriculture with 
science and technology will be empty talk if peasants' 
educational and technical standards are not raised. Education in 
agriculture plays a significant role in helping the large number 
of peasants improve their quality, increase their sense on 
developing highly efficient agriculture today, and train more 
professionals. A host of facts show that only when a large 
number of peasants have mastered the results in agro-scientific 
research, will it be possible to turn such results into gigantic 
material wealth. To help agro-science and technology leave the 
laboratories and books and become popular on farms, it is 
necessary to broaden technical education among peasants and help 
them raise their level in science and technology. This 
constitutes the foundation in revitalizing agriculture by 
relying on science and technology. This is an important measure 
in raising agricultural productivity and building up the 
potential in farming. That is precisely why the developed 
countries are attaching great importance to education. 
  The essence in combining agriculture, science, and education 
is to carry out scientific research and education, and 
popularize technology with the focus on agricultural 
development. It is necessary to conduct scientific research with 
an aim to solve major problems in agriculture and in rural 
economic development, ensure that more scientific and technical 
personnel will go to the major battlefield in agriculture and in 
rural economic development, and help them score even greater 
achievements at an earlier date. In carrying out education, 
emphasis must be placed on raising the educational level of the 
rural workers, broadening basic and professional education in 
the countryside and training more people with agro-technical and 
managerial skills. The department in charge of the promotion of 
agro-technology must strengthen its efforts in verifying and 
popularizing their scientific and technical achievements and put 
them to use as soon as possible. In the process of carrying out 
this procedure, the various departments in charge of agriculture 
must play their administrative role well, and do a good job in 
exercising their leadership, and in organizing and coordinating 
with other sectors in the society for the use of science and 
education to revitalize agriculture. On the one hand, the 
various departments in agriculture, science and education must 
take advantage their own merits to share out the work; clearly 
define their own task and coordinate with one another; and bring 
into full play the wisdom and the technical potential of the 
scientific and technical personnel and educational workers in 
developing agricultural production and rural economy. On the 
other hand, they must help improve external environment and 
ensure the supply of funds, improve their work in agricultural 
scientific research and education, and provide better living 
conditions for the staff members and workers. They must also 
help solve problems, work out and improve the policy of giving 
scientists and technicians incentive and protecting intellectual 
properties in support of the work of combining agriculture, 
science, and education so as to achieve the final goal of 
building the irrigation canal of education, and of using the 
water of science and technology to irrigate the farmland of 
agriculture. 
<H5>  II. On Issues of Increasing Storage of Agro-Technology </H5>
  For the past 40-odd years, China has established a fairly 
complete system for carrying out scientific research in 
agriculture from the local to the central level, and scored 
tremendous achievements in scientific research. According to 
incomplete statistics, nearly 3,000 major scientific and 
technological achievements were given awards by various 
departments at and above the ministerial level during the past 
decade. Right now, approximately 7,000 items in agro-science and 
technology have been submitted every year for citation. Some of 
the items fill in the gaps in China's fields of science and 
technology, while others are approaching or have reached the 
world advanced level. Still others are in the forefront in the 
world. About 30 to 40 percent of the achievements have been put 
to good use in agricultural production and in the development of 
rural economy, attaining tremendous economic results. Twenty two 
of the 32 scientific and technological awards which exceed 100 
million yuan in economic results announced at the first national 
invention awards meeting in 1985 were in agriculture. Their 
economic results totalled 24.163 billion yuan with achievements 
in agriculture winning the top nine awards. The achievement in 
science and technology in hybrid rice, which was put to good use 
since 1973 has helped China increase its grain output by more 
than 80 billion jin in the past ten years. However, our 
scientific research work in agriculture still lags far behind 
the world advanced nations as a whole. Particularly China's 
agriculture is marching along the path of developing a 
high-efficient agriculture which provides greater and better 
yields. It urgently needs the support of new achievements in 
scientific research. We must proceed from the actual situation 
in our country, keep pace with the development of science and 
technology in the world, and strengthen our efforts in 
conducting scientific research in agriculture. We must strive to 
make breakthroughs in tackling major issues in agro-science and 
technology, score even greater and more scientific and 
technological achievements in order to increase our potential in 
agricultural production. To meet the current needs in 
agricultural production, we must strengthen our research work in 
the following four aspects: 
  1. We must work out measures to transform large tracts of 
medium- and low-yielding farmland and help arid and semi-arid 
areas raise its per-unit yield. 
  2. We must study how to develop new protein and assorted 
feeds, make diversified use of resources of animal and plant 
life and reduce the pressure imposed by the society for grain 
production. 
  3. We must study and cultivate new varieties of high-grade 
animal and plant life that provides high yields and is of 
high-quality and disease-resistant and weather-proof. 
  4. We must study how to arm agriculture and rural 
enterprises 
with modern industrial technology and equipment and make 
technical breakthroughs in preventing and destroying cotton 
bollworms, cultivating new varieties of high-quality farm 
products, treating epidemic diseases and solving other serious 
problems that hamper and restrain the development of 
agricultural production. 
  Once breakthroughs in these aspects are made, a new "green 
revolution" will take place in China's agriculture and a leap 
forward in terms of quality will emerge in the development of 
rural economy. 
  It takes a fairly longer time to carry out scientific 
research in agriculture. While studying basic sciences and new 
high-technology and conducting applied technological research, 
we must energetically keep pace with and introduce the findings 
of scientific and technological research work abroad; reduce 
unnecessary repeats; quicken our tempo in carrying out research; 
and strive to score achievements and put them to good use in 
agriculture as soon as possible. 
<H3>  III. On Issues of Steadily Developing the Contingents of 
Grass-Roots Level Workers for Popularizing Agro-Technology </H3>
  The popularization of scientific and technological 
achievements in agriculture among peasants is dependent upon the 
grass-roots organizations and the large number of workers in 
spreading agro-technology. The system for the popularization of 
agro-technology is the media used by the government department 
to provide technological guidance and the pillar of the 
operational mechanism for the popularization of scientific and 
technological findings in agriculture. After scores of years, 
the system of the popularization of agro-technology has become 
an important sector in rendering agro-technical services, the 
core in developing the rural social service system and a major 
pillar in support of the rural tertiary industry. There are more 
than 220,000 organizations for agro-technology popularization, 
over 900,000 workers on official payroll to disseminate 
agro-techniques, over one million peasant-technicians and more 
than 6.6 million families which are assigned to demonstrate 
agro-techniques to fellow peasants in the vast countryside. 
Nevertheless, the number of people who promote agro-technology 
in China is far from being adequate as compared with the 
developed nations. It fails to meet the requirements for the 
development of modern agriculture. There is only one 
agro-technician for every 10,000 peasants. In some developed 
countries, there are an average of 13.5 agro-technicians in 
Germany, 7.2 agro-technicians in the United States and five 
agro-technicians in Japan for every 10,000 peasants. Centers for 
agro-technology popularization have not been completed in 36 
percent of the counties, and institutions for the promotion of 
agro-technology not built in 20 percent of the townships and 
villages (administrative villages). A large number of 
institutions for agro-technology popularization are unable to do 
their jobs well because of lack of funds. This is the main 
reason for hampering the promotion of the achievements in 
scientific and technological research and preventing 60 to 70 
percent of the fruits of China's scientific and technological 
research from being used on a large scale and on time. 
  Not long ago, a trend of ignoring and even weakening the 
efforts to promote agro-science and technology has cropped up. 
During the structural reform, some localities have even 
eliminated funds for popularizing agro-technology, and curtailed 
or even abolished institutions for the popularization of 
agricultural science and technology. The local authorities have 
tried to "break off relations with these institutions" and "wean 
them from the breast." Attending the trifles to the neglect of 
essentials, their practice will seriously affect agricultural 
production and the development of rural economy. 
  Most of departments in the development of agro-science and 
technology and in the popularization of agro-technology are 
faced with problems such as low revenues and high risks because 
of the fact that agriculture is often restrained by natural 
conditions, that production in agriculture remains unsteady, 
that the comparative efficiency in agriculture is low, and that 
it is difficult to keep agro-technological findings 
confidential. However, agricultural science and technology 
brings considerably greater social benefits to agricultural 
production. The increase of farm and sideline products and the 
development of rural economy brought about by the application of 
new technological findings will promote the development of the 
entire national economy. Therefore, we cannot evaluate the 
cost-benefit ratio by viewing the procedure of popularizing 
agro-technology only. We should do so by taking into 
consideration the overall benefit to the whole society. On the 
basis of this view, the government must give vigorous support to 
scientific and technological research and to the popularization 
of agro-technology. It is precisely because of this reason that 
some developed countries have set up huge agro-science research 
institutions, educational departments for agriculture and a 
system for the popularization of agro-technology; and provided 
them with financial support. Although agriculture only accounts 
for a limited percentage of each nation's gross national 
product, these developed countries have taken into consideration 
the unique position and role of agriculture. 
  It is necessary to steadily develop the contingents of rural 
grass-roots service personnel for the popularization of 
agro-technology. This is the basic carrier to popularize science 
and technology in thousands of peasant households, an important 
means of revitalizing agriculture with science and education and 
an important form of organizational guarantee in laying a solid 
foundation in agriculture. We must act in strict accordance with 
the "two laws" and the circular issued by the six ministries and 
commissions to ensure the authorized number of staff members and 
the supply of funds for rendering basic-level services in 
promoting agro-technology; and further set up and improve the 
system to promote science and technology at the grass-roots 
level in the countryside. We must truly form a network to train 
peasant-technicians and promote agro-technology, which links 
colleges, universities and research institutions with 
specialized groups and households. The organizations which 
provide technical services may also collect fees for their 
services, become economic entities for self-development, and 
improve their services in support of agriculture. However, the 
governments in various localities must not reduce or suspend 
their financial support to these organizations and force them to 
abandon their services and become profit-oriented alone. 
<H5>  IV. On Issues of Accelerating the Training of Professionals </H5>
  Our future economic development is determined by whether or 
not we can master advanced science and technology, while the 
development of advanced science and technology is dependent upon 
a large number of advanced professionals. Those who command a 
large number of professionals have a good future. This is an 
inevitable trend in historical development. Revitalizing 
agriculture with science and technology is also dependent upon 
professionally trained people. Without a large number of highly 
competent scientific and technological personnel, it is 
impossible to revitalize agriculture with science and technology. 
  In the past, a large number of our scientists and 
technicians 
have persistently worked hard on the rural forefront for a long 
time, dedicate themselves to agricultural development and made 
tremendous contributions. Under the influence of many factors in 
the society, there are less and less young people working in the 
field of agro-science and technology at present. Many young 
scientists and technicians are unwilling to carry out scientific 
research work in agriculture. Particularly they are unwilling to 
go to the forefront in the countryside to guide peasants in 
agricultural production. A situation whereby there is a shortage 
of professionals and successors to carry on their work in 
support of agriculture prevails. This is the most serious 
potential crisis facing us in the development of agro-science 
and technology. If that continues, it will seriously affect 
China's agricultural production and the development of its rural 
economy. 
  In face of the advent of the 21st century, the challenge of 
constantly changing new technology and the strong demands to 
further develop agriculture, we should put our task of training 
a contingent of middle-aged and young agro-scientists and 
technicians with great academic attainments in both theory and 
practice as an important item on our daily agenda. We must make 
use of all types of public media to stress the important role of 
scientists and technicians in agricultural development in both 
theory and practice, and create a fine general mood in the whole 
society in which professionals are respected and cherished. The 
vast countryside must adopt even more open-minded policy on 
professionally qualified people and carry out its work well to 
attract more competent people. We must not only create better 
living conditions to attract more professionals; create better 
working environment for them, establish a good mechanism of fair 
competition; and encourage competent people to distinguish 
themselves from others. We must boldly assign young scientific 
and technical personnel to important posts and give them 
support; help them temper themselves, improve their skills and 
broaden their knowledge; and encourage them to score greater 
achievements at an earlier date. We must strengthen ideological 
education among young scientific and technical personnel; and 
vigorously promote the spirit of arduous struggle and selfless 
dedication while we must give priority to improving working and 
living conditions for those scientific and technical personnel 
who are working on the rural forefront and try our best to 
increase their pay and elevate their status. We must strictly 
demand that young scientists and technicians temper themselves 
in practice and withstand severe tests. We must also encourage 
the younger generation to make contributions to revitalizing 
agriculture and the rural economy. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20424 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar014___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  2 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liaoning Peasant Burdens Remain Heavy </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0284A Shenyang LIAONING RIBAO in Chinese 27 Dec 93 p 6 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0284A </F>
<F P=104>  Shenyang LIAONING RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Ni Weiling (0242 0251 7881): "A Year of </F>
Implementation of the Center's Emergency Circular on Lightening 
Peasant Burdens Leaves Concern About the Good News, With Some 
Peasant Burdens in Liaoning Province Still Quite Heavy"] 
  [Excerpt] [passage omitted] So how has the job of 
lightening peasant burdens actually been implemented in Liaoning 
Province? 
<H3>  A Year of Conscientious Enforcement Has Brought Countless 
Great Achievements </H3>
  On 19 November 1993, the State Council Peasant Burden 
Enforcement Inspection Group fully affirmed Liaoning Province's 
work in lightening peasant burdens. 
  In 1993, Liaoning has lightened peasant burdens by over 200 
million yuan. The Liaoning Provincial Party Committee and 
Peoples Government have inventoried 98 documents on 113 items 
involving peasant burdens; they have published and issued 
700,000 copies of the "Regulations on Peasant Responsibility for 
Costs and Labor Management," with supervisory organs having 
dealt with 28 cadres for discipline violations; Liaoning 
Province and all townships have set up committees on lightening 
peasant burdens, with many peasants having received "burden 
cards"; according to State Council provision, direct payments 
by peasants throughout Liaoning of village charges and township 
overall planning fees have been kept under 5 percent of the 
previous year's per capita net income. Heishan County has 
discontinued 410 village mess halls, saving 1.68 million yuan a 
year. Peasants report that these actions have provided real 
incentives. 
<H5>  But Peasant Burdens Remain Quite Heavy in Some Areas </H5>
  As to the current existing problems in peasant burdens, I 
interviewed Xiao Zuofu [5135 0155 4395], director of the 
Liaoning Control and Management Commission on Lightening Peasant 
Burdens. Vice Governor Xiao pointed out sharply that: "We are 
now again suffering certain setbacks in peasant burdens, the 
real root of which is the higher authorities, with beyond-quota 
apportionments occurring at times, in which some departments 
mandate apportionments through executive orders, while the 
leaders of certain other departments give them a free hand. This 
needs to be stopped at the source, with investigation and 
prosecution of each case, not even a single case going 
unpunished, and the disposition results being broadcast in the 
media and published in the papers for public viewing." 
  Good! Just take a look at this example. 
  On 18 December 1993, I interviewed an office director in the 
Shenyang Municipal Government Office on Lightening Peasant 
Burdens, who waved a document at me and complained that: "Even 
we are being obstructed. Despite our decision to charge peasants 
only 2 fen [cents] a KWh for power, the province has issued a 
document raising this to 2.5 fen." The units issuing this 
document were the "Provincial Pricing Bureau, the Provincial 
Agropower Office, and the Provincial Power Industry Bureau." 
When I reported this matter to Vice Governor Xiao, he 
immediately made a phone call to investigate it, telling me that 
"without the approval of the Liaoning Management Committee on 
Lightening Peasant Burdens, arbitrary issuing of documents to 
raise prices is prohibited." 
  Such "audaciousness" is not limited to this one case alone! 
  While the Liaoning Party Committee and Government published 
in LIAONING RIBAO on 2 July 1993 its first group of 10 peasant 
burdens to be eliminated, one of which was the "charge for 
keeping a dog," departments, such as the Anshan Municipal Public 
Security Bureau and the Anshan Management Office on the Keeping 
of Dogs, still issued an official document in September, 
brazenly charging peasants 50 yuan per dog, which one case alone 
cost peasants the huge amount of millions of yuan! 
  Good, that's enough! Any more such details might lead to 
concern that I was seizing on these incidents to exaggerate the 
matter. 
  But there are even more infuriating cases. 
  In Changtu County, 59 percent of the salaries of public 
school teachers are actually paid by peasants, meaning that the 
over 14 million yuan becomes a peasant burden! And for the whole 
city of Tieling, this figure reaches a high of 27.9 million yuan. 
  And even this is not the whole extent of the problem. 
  Peasants complain bitterly about tractor fees. I 
investigated this matter in the two cities of Shenyang and 
Jinzhou, finding that 1,000-2,000 yuan a year has to be paid to 
the authorities for one "small four-wheeler," with more than 20 
fees, and even an idle tractor requiring the payment of an 
eight-month road toll! 
  The city of Benxi has 3,400 tractors, meaning an extra 
annual 
expense of over 50 million yuan, which forces peasants who own 
tractors to collectively appeal to the authorities for help. 
Even worse, peasants in the vicinity of Gaotaizi Township in 
Benxi had to pay 5 yuan to drive their tractors across a bridge, 
and the same toll again on their return, which ended only after 
the toll booth had been repeatedly toppled by the peasants. 
  A host of mandated press charges weighs heavily on peasants. 
I discovered in Shengli Township, Heishan County that the 
township was unable to stop the assessed quotas assigned by 
various departments, with 803 press subscriptions throughout the 
township for 41 newspapers and periodicals, costing over 40,000 
yuan. Such burdens are also very much the same for other 
townships. 
  In addition, peasants are also threatened by certain other 
hidden peasant burdens: 
  1. While certain peasant-burden items have been removed in 
1993, their staffs and agencies are still not fully dismantled. 
While the burden of "timber buying- and selling-agent fees" has 
been abolished in the Kuandian Manchu Autonomous County, the 286 
personnel in company-installed centers in all villages have 
certainly not yet been dismissed. 
  2. While the center has clearly ordered that peasant burdens 
are to be controlled at 5 percent, with no one daring to 
overstep this limit, certain poverty-stricken townships have too 
many economic problems to cope with, so are forced to raise 
money by borrowing from Peter to pay Paul. And how could such 
debts not be later put onto peasants heads? 
  3. Peasants complain bitterly about the public fundraising 
problems of the Taizi He [river] dredging project. In the next 
four years, the Liaoyang section of the Taizi He will need 25.52 
million yuan to be raised, or 18 yuan a year per capita, 
amounting to 1.6 percent of peasant burdens; and the Haicheng 
section will require an additional 60 million yuan, costing 
peasants 20 yuan a year each. 
  4. Certain townships have persistently high spending on 
entertainment, with it being common for donkey carts to come to 
collect the empty wine bottles. Might not such extravagant 
entertainment be running wild? 
  And there are 5, 6, 7, etc. 
  So what does all of this say? 
  As to resolving the fundraising by all departments, no one 
is 
willing to "fill up the holes." And the projects that need 
stopped or slowed are like stiff-necked "ducks." This is the 
concentrated expression of a problem: Some departments are so 
blinded by greed and insatiably avaricious that it makes one 
boil with anger! In their own selfish interests, they brazenly 
exploit their authority to wantonly hold out their hands to the 
peasants. Unless such regressive corruption is ruthlessly and 
thoroughly punished, its cheating of the peasants will grow even 
worse. 
<H5>  What Is the Root of the Heavy Peasant Burdens? </H5>
  "While the problem of heavy peasant burdens shows up in the 
rural areas, it is rooted in all upper-level departments." The 
center has sharply pointed out the crux of the matter. 
  In a document entitled "The Pace of Reform Needs Speeded 
Up," 
Comrade Deng Xiaoping has pointed out acutely that: The 
objective that our reform needs to reach is to develop the 
productive forces under the leadership of the party and the 
socialist system. Rural reform was necessary to stimulate 
peasant initiative. Why did reform have to start in the rural 
areas? This is because the rural population makes up 80 percent 
of China's population so that, without rural stability, our 
overall political situation would be unstable and, unless 
peasants overcome their poverty, China will not cast off its 
poverty. 
  Lightening peasant burdens is essentially the major matter 
of 
stimulating peasant initiative. Today's peasants, as producers 
and consumers, are the most important players in China's market 
economy, so that their initiative is the most vital element of 
the productive forces. Formalistic things among the 
abovementioned leading cadres of certain departments, such as 
not yet having escaped in their heart of hearts from the 
longstanding planned-economy trap, still being accustomed to 
issuing the same old orders, going in for grandiose 
achievements, and engaging in unrealistic striving for position, 
competition, and reaching standards, are precisely the real root 
of the heavy peasant burdens! What they lack is exactly the key 
line of an objective approach! 
  No wonder the first group of 46 rural standard reachings 
that 
were eliminated by Liaoning included those, such as "reaching 
toilet standards," "rat-extermination standards," and 
"fuel-economy standards." The following jingle is spreading in 
the area around Changtu, Liaoning: "Tobacco, big sheds, and 
irrigated wheat are the peasants' three scourges." The disaster 
is that certain cadres apply or copy mechanically, without 
regard for the relation beween market supply and demand, 
forcibly raising funds from peasants to start projects. From 
this "construction project" and that "reaching of the standard" 
to your village raising funds to install a computerized 
telephone system, everything is praised, so that my village too 
must install one. Such "left" formalistic things that proceed 
not from reality have pervasively infiltrated from life to the 
system and directly into the bones of certain leading cadres, 
thus leading to a onesided emphasis on enlarging and developing 
the collective economy at the expense of property-rights 
components, and to a unilateral stress on the dominance of the 
publicly owned economy to the neglect of the reality of the 
coexistence of diversified economic components. How could an 
ideological method and workstyle that so distorts reality not 
make peasant burdens too heavy? 
<H5>  On Daring To Ask the Way </H5>
  The basic way to solve the heavy peasant burden will be for 
the leading cadres of the abovementioned departments to give 
their minds a rest, by genuinely shifting their standpoints from 
a planned economy to a socialist market economy, and 
conscientiously establishing objective ideological concepts. 
  As a socialist market economy is one that is governed by law 
and order, particular attention needs to be paid to establishing 
laws and regulations for the rural economy and peasant assets, 
in order to strengthen oversight and inspection mechanisms, so 
that peasants dare to face up to their material interests, by 
taking a genuine part in the legislative process. It is only in 
this way that the laws and regulations to protect and lighten 
peasant burdens will be able to lead the way out of the burdens 
that infringe on peasant interests! 
  Whether Liaoning's second undertaking can now rely on taking 
off on the two wings of agriculture and industry, by lightening 
peasant burdens to stimulate peasant initiative, is of extreme 
importance. 
  As peasant problems are of importance to the national 
economy 
and the people's livelihood, better lightening peasant burdens 
is a top priority for Liaoning's intensification of rural 
reform! We can no longer allow man-made problems to make 
peasants run our roads carrying such heavy burdens. 
  This is a demand and a call of history and of the times! 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20425 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar014___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  2 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Outlook for Sugar Industry in 1994 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0303G Beijing ZHONGGUO WUZI BAO in Chinese 5 Jan 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0303G </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO WUZI BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] Major factors that will influence the sugar 
market in 1994 are: 
  1. In 1994 China will continue to strengthen macroeconomic 
regulation and control, and funds for the sugar wholesale market 
will be limited. China will strengthen price controls, and 
increases in retail prices will slow. China will strengthen 
management over the foreign exchange market, and the exchange 
rate between the renminbi and foreign currency will stabilize. 
These factors will be beneficial to stabilize the sugar market. 
  2. Sugar output will decline. In 1993 the sown area in major 
sugar-producing regions declined. It is estimated that during 
the 1993-1994 pressing season gross output will be 6.8 million 
tons, a decrease of 900,000 tons from the previous period. 
  3. Exports will decline. Because China's sugar prices are 
higher than the average international price, exports are 
unprofitable. In addition, domestic supplies are tight, 
therefore sugar exports will decline by about 700,000 tons. 
  4. Imports will remain at the same level as 1993. In 1994 
international sugar prices will rise, and it will be difficult 
for China to increase import funds. 
  5. In 1994 demand will increase by 400,000 to 450,000 tons. 
However, because sugar prices will rise in 1994, demand is 
likely to decrease. 
  Based on the above, in 1994 China's sugar supply will not 
meet demand, there will be a shortage of about 600,000 tons. 


</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20426 </DOCNO>
<HT>      "jpcar014___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  2 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Southwest Sets Up Grain Transport Corridor </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0303J Shenyang ZHONGHUA DISAN CHANYE BAO in Chinese 3 
Jan 94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0303J </F>
<F P=104>  Shenyang ZHONGHUA DISAN CHANYE BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] To improve grain circulation in Guangxi, Yunnan, 
and Guizhou, China will use World Bank loans to set up a grain 
transport corridor. Guangxi is constructing a port grain depot. 
Guangxi alone has used World Bank loans of $25,690,000. In 
addition to internal funds, the total investment is 322 million 
yuan. When the corridor is completed, the area will have the 
ability to receive 1.6 million tons of grain annually. 


</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20427 </DOCNO>
<HT>      "jpcar014___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  2 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Guangxi Rural Savings </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0303K Chongqing XINAN JINGJI BAO in Chinese 8 Feb 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0303K </F>
<F P=104>  Chongqing XINAN JINGJI BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] According to statistics at the end of December, 
rural saving deposits in agricultural banks and credit 
cooperatives totaled 16.843 billion yuan, an increase of 5.184 
billion yuan, or 44.46 percent over the beginning of 1993. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20428 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar014___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  2 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Yunnan, Anhui Set Grain, Oil Sale Prices </TI></H3>
<H4>   Yunnan Sale Prices </H4>
<F P=102> 94CE0303F Chongqing XINAN JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 10 Jan 94 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0303F </F>
<F P=104>  Chongqing XINAN JINGJI RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] In 1994 Yunnan Province has set the following 
prices for grain and edible oil: The retail price for early 
polished long-grained nonglutinous rice may not exceed 70 yuan 
per 50 kilograms, polished round-grained nonglutinous rice may 
not exceed 78 yuan per 50 kilograms, standard flour may not 
exceed 72 yuan per 50 kilograms, and second grade vegetable oil 
may not exceed 320 yuan per 50 kilograms. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20429 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar014___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  2 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Yunnan, Anhui Set Grain, Oil Sale Prices </TI></H3>
<H4>   Anhui Sale Prices </H4>
<F P=102> 94CE0303I Hefei ANHUI RIBAO in Chinese 6 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0303I </F>
<F P=104>  Hefei ANHUI RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] Beginning 31 December, Anhui Province set the 
following sale prices for grain and edible oil: The retail 
price for early polished long-grained nonglutinous rice may not 
exceed 65 yuan per 50 kilograms, standard flour may not exceed 
59 yuan per 50 kilograms, and second grade vegetable oil may not 
exceed 300 yuan per 50 kilograms. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20430 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar014___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  2 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> SOCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Article Describes `Money Worshipping' Phenomenon </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0126A Shanghai MINZHU YU FAZHI [DEMOCRACY AND THE LEGAL 
SYSTEM] in Chinese No 172, 7 Nov 93 pp 16-18 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0126A </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai MINZHU YU FAZHI [DEMOCRACY AND THE LEGAL 
SYSTEM] </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wang Jingfu (3769 2529 1381): "Money Worship: A </F>
Raging Black Whirlpool"] 
  [Excerpts] [passage omitted] 
<H5>  Phenomenon and Characteristics </H5>
  [passage omitted] 
  One: Money supremacy. 
  To money worshippers, raking in money is the only goal in 
life. Provided they can grasp money, they can do without any 
morals, conscience, dignity or honor. National interests or the 
people's well-being are not worth a cent indeed in the eyes of 
such people. Satisfaction of their own insatiable desires alone 
is perfectly justified. 
  In the great surge of reform some have thrown away beliefs, 
oaths, ideals, party spirit, and national and moral dignity. 
Coveting money, they are like a group of madly flying moths; 
facing a roaring fire, they still flit around like crazy, even 
to the point of cremation. In 1992, money-grabbing was the chief 
cause of crimes committed by the 1,142 people detained at the 
Tangshan municipal guardhouse; of this figure, 50.87 percent of 
the total was for theft and 9.8 percent for robbery. Graft also 
is on the rise. Seven of nine female criminals presently 
detained committed graft. Of those locked up, a four-person gang 
led by a certain Liu killed four people, wounded five and 
committed more than 30 robberies in less than one year. They 
understand the mercilessness of the law even more than good and 
honest people but disregard all for money. Just as one criminal 
said, "So, it's 100,000 yuan after all, this purse full of 100 
yuan bills. I could not earn that much in several lifetimes!" He 
was destroyed by money. 
  Two: Abuse of power. 
  Under market economy conditions, power enters the market and 
becomes a "magic weapon" to gain money. Certain leading cadres 
corrupted by money abuse power with inflated selfish desires in 
the great surge of commodities. They disobey the law and create 
disorder. The methods used in the power-for-money trade are 
thought-provoking and make one feel righteously indignant. 
  With a nod of the head some people can provide others with a 
great quantity of parity goods and materials and then 
magnificently collect several thousand, ten thousand or several 
hundred thousand in handling fees. Others rely on power to 
contract out certain construction projects, issue loans or 
special funds, promote some officials, or alter work posts. With 
a signature, by writing a note, or by making a telephone call, 
money seems to have grown hands to stick itself into their 
pockets. In what was the former Hulan county, agricultural bank 
chief Gao Heng used loan approval power to accept verifiable 
bribes of more than 430,000 yuan. After Gao's case, deputy bank 
chief Liu Kui was awed by the dignity of the law and confessed 
to inspectors the criminal facts of accepting more than 140,000 
yuan in 12 bribes. The director of that bank's credit 
cooperative in a certain town, Li so-and-so, together with his 
partner Suo so-and-so, vice stock head of the county 
agricultural credit stock, loaned 600,000 yuan to individual 
households, from which they skimmed off 60,000 yuan. At the same 
branch, seven other workers illegally loaned six million yuan to 
individual households, from which they took 170,000 in bribes. 
  Three: By hook or by crook. 
  To gain even more funds, people sullied by money worship 
ignore legal orders, seek private gain with power, engage in 
graft, take bribes, pervert justice for bribes, and even 
publically strecth their hands out in extortion or blackmail. 
They defy morals, ignore honor, and sell their bodies and souls. 
They do not mind being imprisoned or beheaded. They wantonly 
sell people, arrange prostitution and gambling, steal cultural 
artifacts, sell state secrets or manufacture inferior products. 
These are by no means isolated cases. 
  Between January 1988 and June 1990, Han Aihua, a female 
office staff policewoman with great authority administering 
household registration at the people's police substation of a 
certain county, and her partners illegally handled more than 300 
"peasant transfer to non-agricultural" migration permits for 96 
households for which they accepted more than 200,000 yuan in 
bribes. Between 1987 and 1990, Zhang Mayun, household 
registration policeman of the South Liberation Road police 
substation in a certain city, illegally handled household 
registration procedures for more than 60 people, taking in a 
total of 210,000 yuan in bribes. Chen Lu, the vault and loan 
officer of a certain credit cooperation covertly disposed of the 
keys to the vault held by two others. On four occasions he 
secretly opened the vault and stole 650,000 yuan worth of 
national treasury bonds. The head of the bond group at the 
People's Bank of China in a certain county fled in a panic after 
stealing 120,000 yuan in funds. Sun so-and-so, cashier at a 
certain credit cooperative, together with Zhang so-and-so, a 
savings officer at another credit cooperative, absconded with 
110,000 yuan in public funds. In November 1992 the procuratorate 
of a certain city uncovered five graft and embezzlement of 
public fund cases, for a total misappropriation of more than 
400,000 yuan in state fiscal resources. The majority of the 
public funds were squandered, gambled or used for prostitutes. 
  Four: Money spent like water. 
  The life of those tainted with money worship is extremely 
decadent. Most spend money like water, squander it to no end, 
are gluttonous in appetite, recklessly waste food, and live in 
wanton extravagence. They stake 1,000 gold pieces on one throw. 
They are insufferably arrogant, buy followers and insult women 
for the scent of money. Some sell their souls for money, 
fabricate evils, invert justice, and confuse right and wrong. 
  In a certain province, someone spent 300,000 yuan on a 
miniature-type dog and 400,000 yuan on a tropical fish. They 
even have "golden banquets" only to "parade their wealth." Some 
are tired of eating the delicacies of land and sea. Others are 
bored with beautiful clothing. They enjoy getting married, 
courting mistresses, or being with prostitutes. When some 
upstarts gamble they think it troublesome to count the stakes so 
they invented a new calculation method using a ruler to count 
the height of a wad of bills. Some "big spenders" who have just 
learned to walk in life are beginning preparations for the 
"netherworld." They spend several thousand or tens of thousands 
to build and repair such things as ornate furniture for the 
afterlife. Some of the rich and powerful are so silly that they 
toss on the table several thousand or tens of thousands yuan to 
order food, drink and female "companions." There are even those 
who are ensnared in heavy debt yet ride in fancy cars instead of 
walking. They eat and stay in high-class hotels, immersed in 
pools of wine and feasts of food the whole day long. The head of 
a private enterprise had no fixed assets at all and owed more 
than 200,000 yuan in bank loans and interest yet he himself was 
in a foreign-style building with high quality consumer goods and 
a motorcycle all there. It is said that almost all individual 
businessmen unanimously believe that one is a fool to use one's 
own money in business or to build a factory. The notion has 
developed to the point that people believe one should consume a 
lot if one has the money: "I will get drunk this morning because 
I have wine today." Such willfull squandering really makes 
people stare. 
  Money worship is an extremely harmful corrosive, the 
"alienation" of commodity currency. It brings about the evil 
inflation of egoism and individualism. It twists normal 
interpersonal relationships to out and out cold and unfeeling 
monetary relationships. The outcome is a loss of ideology and 
morals and the emergence of corrupt and vulgar mores. When the 
social atmosphere is undermined, politics are corrupted, 
meaning severe hardship for the work of the party and the people. 
  The masses ask: Where is party organization? Where is the 
government of the people? Party and government leaders at all 
levels are images. There is great harm and even worse influence 
when some leading cadres in party and government organs are 
corrupt or bad. This not only directly harms the image of the 
party and the government but also could become the source and 
umbrella for departmental, business or even social impropriety, 
seriously harming socialist spirit, educational work and party 
and government behavior. This could have an inestimable negative 
effect on the party and the people. 
  China's vitality has thrived in a decade of reform. However, 
the flood of money worship following the upsurge of the market 
economy has brought severe obstacles to and effects on reform, 
opening up to the outside world, and market economy and 
enterprise development. In this respect "peaceful coexistence" 
will not work. There will be no end to future trouble if allowed 
to take its natural course. 
<H5>  Sources and Things To Be On Guard Against </H5>
  [passage omitted] One, a confused understanding of the 
boundary between the Marxist principle of material interests and 
money worship which mixes the concepts of money and money 
worship in the development of socialist commodity and market 
economies, contending that a market economy inevitably means 
money worship. Two, the influence of improper behavior. All of a 
sudden some party member and cadres cannot set examples by the 
incorrect practice of "big bribes for big authority and little 
bribes for little authority." Taken to the next step, those 
without authority illegally seize money in reckless moves. 
Three, unforceful penalty attacks. At present the level of 
investigation and case breaking by certain organs is unsuited 
to the complex situation of cases and crimes since reform and 
opening up to the outside world. They are weak and lenient in 
terms of the volume of cases, penalties and disciplinary action. 
Thus there is no change in the perniciousness of criminal 
elements. Four, looser party leadership, giving up on 
ideological and political work an d a loss of spiritual stamina. 
Five, imperfect restraint mechanisms and a lack of essential 
internal and external supervisi on and control measures. 
[passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20431 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar014___94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  2 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> SOCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Juvenile Delinquency Ascribed to `Weakened Control' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0126B Xian FALU KEXUE [LAW SCIENCE] in Chinese No 52, 10 
Nov 93 pp 27-28, 16 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0126B </F>
<F P=104>  Xian FALU KEXUE [LAW SCIENCE] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Miao Lizhou (5379 0448 3166): "Social Controls </F>
and Juvenile Delinquency"] 
  [Excerpts] [passage omitted] 
  B. In recent years, weakened social controls or being 
out of control in some areas have been a major cause of 
consistently high juvenile deliquency. 
  1. The weakened internal control function of the party and 
government organizations has brought on rampant corruption, 
causing many youths to be antagonistic toward social production, 
a key reason for delinquency. As everyone knows, for a long time 
now there have been no effective control or check on party and 
government organization corruption. Many officials use authority 
to seek private gain, accept bribes and dinner invitations, seek 
high class enjoyment, or even gain items by force or trickery. 
The 8 April 1993 edition of WENZHAI BAO said that China spends 
more than 100 billion yuan of public funds annually on food, 
drink and travel. It may not be an exaggeration to say that, at 
present, in general, dinner invitations and gifts are a common 
occurrence -- not at all strange. Direct monetary or high-class 
commodity gifts are nothing new. In some departments, it has 
practically reached the stage where nothing gets done unless 
favors are given. Although the party and government have 
repeatedly punished such actions, corruption is always 
prohibited to no end and even gets stronger. The masses have 
reacted strongly to this. 
  Party and government corruption and degeneracy are the 
source 
of social impropriety. Internal party and government corruption 
is always a visible or invisible example or suggestion to 
youths. It makes them feel that they can get money by any means 
and that there is nothing that money cannot do. Directness and 
malleability are characteristics of the juvenile socialization 
process. In this process, the role of social examples often 
precedes all others. In particular, the behavior of those in 
authority who dominate society is directly perceived and 
important in affecting youth. 
  2. A major cause of rising juvenile delinquency is weakened 
judicial control functions, meaning the loss of legal weaponry's 
proper deterrence. 
  The principle requirement of implementing China's socialist 
laws is the stipulation that all citizens must equally be 
responsible for executing the constitution and legal 
regulations; no citizen is permitted to have special powers 
superseding the constitution or law. "There are laws which can 
be obeyed, and there are laws which must be obeyed; they must be 
enacted strictly and transgressors of the law must be 
investigated." However, for various reasons, in recent years 
some judicial departments have disobeyed the law, not enacted it 
strictly, not investigated transgressors and even bent the law 
for relatives and friends. A weakened judicial control function 
has made some of the masses, in particular, those who have been 
harmed, opposed to those departments which implement the law. 
This has helped engender juvenile delinquency and dampened the 
enthusiasm of the masses to struggle against transgressing 
criminal elements. 
  3. Discipline is commonly lax in various social 
organizations. Organization is slack, meaning constituent member 
law abiding consciousness is not properly strengthened. Some 
even take the criminal road. The evolutionary process of many 
juvenile delinquents proves that crime always begins by 
disobeying disciplinary constraints. In China in the 1950s and 
early 1960s, management was orderly, discipline tight, and 
ideological and political work deeply entered people's thinking 
nationwide at all levels of party, government and social 
organization. This transformed many negative elements and 
constrained some illegal crimes. The current situation is very 
different. In some departments management is lax, discipline is 
slack and managment systems are weak. Bad things are listened to 
without being heard and perceived without being seen. This 
provides some youths with conditions for illegal crimes. 
  4. Weakened social and moral control functions bring on a 
more faint public opinion atmosphere for censuring bad people 
and bad things. It instigates some youths to lawless and wild 
illegal criminal behavior. Morals are social standards. In a 
certain sense, their constraining role on people's behavior is 
broader and stronger than that of the law. When some bad action 
encroaches on another person or the interests of society yet 
does not constitute a crime, morals can use powerful public 
opinion to intervene and condemn it, containing some who carry 
out or plan to carry out bad acts to have some scruples under 
positive mass pressure. In recent years an undeniable result of 
the development of a commodity economy has been social 
prosperity and wealth. It has greatly enhanced the vitality of 
the entire society. However, another undeniable aspect is that 
people really feel bitter hatred regarding society's morals. It 
seems that the entire society puts money above all. Isn't money 
always exciting someones nerves? To get money by any means, some 
can cheat, swindle, ignore national and personal dignity and 
morals and disregard national laws. In such soil, the 
propagation and spread of juvenile delinquency toxins is 
unavoidable. 
5. Weakened family educational and control functions over 
children is the first lost line of defense against juvenile 
delinquency. The family is a social cell. Parents are a child's 
first teachers. When most youths leave family supervision and 
prior to living on their own, most of their time is spent 
alongside their parents. The family is their main living space. 
Therefore, parental teaching and the influence of the family are 
of utmost importance to their growth. In particular, the 
family's restraining and correcting role when a child first has 
a tendency to do bad are irreplaceable by any other organization 
or individual. At present, the function of family teaching and 
control clearly are weakened and hindered under conditions of 
youth's earlier physiological maturity and a great number of bad 
enticements in the external society. In some families, children 
grow up getting everything they want. They neglect character 
training and only look at test scores, pampering their children 
who become spoiled or are simple and rude. When children act bad 
they are beat instead of taught, are treated overleniently or 
winked at to shield their shortcomings. Some parents only worry 
about earning money and do not care a bit about the children's 
education or studies. Some parents or other family members have 
poor schooling themselves or behave improperly. This directly 
affects and instigates children and siblings to delinquency. 
Some families only blindly grumble about poor social mores while 
neglecting or casting off their restraining responsibility over 
children. The bad thinking and behavior of some youths have 
reached a certain stage due to such weak family training and 
control that it is hard to avoid overstepping the limits of the 
law and becoming delinquent. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20432 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar015___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  8 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Bureau Issues Jan Textiles Output Figures </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  HK0203144594 Beijing CEI Database in English 2 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK0203144594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CEI Database </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Beijing (CEIS)--Following is a list of the output 
of textiles in January 1994, released by the State Statistical 
Bureau: 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Item              |Unit              |1/94              |1/93              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Yarn              |10,000t           |39.99             |32.72             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Yarn              |10,000pc          |222.54            |182               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Cloth             |100m.m            |13.42             |11.37             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Of: Pure cotton   |100m.m            |7.26              |6.34              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Chemical fiber    |100m.m            |4.44              |3.78              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Silk              |10,000t           |0.72              |0.57              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Silk fabric       |100m.m            |2.32              |1.73              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Woolen fabric     |10,000m           |2378.43           |1902              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Knitting wool     |10,000t           |2.41              |1.84              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Garment           |100m.pc           |2.54              |1.86              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Notes: t -- ton, pc -- piece, m.m -- million meter, m.pc -- million piece  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 




</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20433 </DOCNO>
<HT>      "jpcar015___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  8 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> CONSTRUCTION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Macroeconomic Regulation Eases Housing Construction </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0302A Beijing JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 27 Jan 94 p 7 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0302A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yi Dan (6654 0030): "Macro-Regulation of Real </F>
Estate Market Achieves Initial Results in 1993, Still Faces 
Arduous Tasks in 1994"] 
  [Text] How is the work of exercising macro-regulation and 
control over the real estate market since the state's 
implementation at the end of last June? According to the latest 
statistics compiled by the Ministry of Construction, the trend 
of rapid expansion of the scale of real estate development has 
somewhat subsided with the implementation of the various 
macro-regulatory and control measures. That is, the work has 
achieved initial results. 
  Comparing the growth rates for January-November 1993 
versus the same period in 1992 and the growth rates for the 
first half of 1993 versus the first half of 1992, we can see the 
following changes: The growth rate fell 14.9 percentage points 
for real estate investment, 26.7 percentage points for the floor 
space of buildings for sale under construction, 67.2 percentage 
points for the floor space of newly launched building projects, 
15.9 percentage points for the floor space of buildings 
completed, 22.4 percentage points for the floor space of 
buildings sold, and 3.2 percentage point for the total sales 
volume. 
  Since July 1993, strengthening and improving 
macro-regulation and control over the real estate market has 
been one of the focal tasks for all levels of governments and 
construction departments. Under the overall planning by the 
party Central Committee and the State Council, the Ministry of 
Construction promptly called a meeting in mid-July, attended by 
chairmen and directors of construction commissions and 
departments across the country, to make arrangements for the 
macro-regulation and control of the real estate market. After 
that, special teams led by six leaders from the Ministry of 
Construction were sent out on two different occasions to various 
places to listen to local work reports on strengthening 
macro-regulation and control over the real estate market and on 
conducting inspections of real estate development units. 
Meanwhile, similar arrangements for macro-regulation and control 
and plans for inspections were promptly mapped out by party 
committees and governments of all provinces, autonomous regions, 
and municipalities and by all relevant departments and 
commissions of the State Council. Among other things, leading 
inspection groups were formed with the local governments' 
comrades in charge of construction work as the heads. The groups 
were composed of representatives from the departments of 
construction, land administration, industry and commerce, 
taxation, planning, and finance with the construction department 
representatives as the leading members. 
  The concerted efforts made by the various levels of 
pertinent government departments have not only reined in 
remarkably the growing scale of real estate development, but 
also produced many positive results in the real estate industry, 
such as a better mix of investments, stable prices, and the 
gradual improvement of market rules. Plus, the management of 
real estate companies has also been improved to a remarkable 
extent. 
  With the gradual shift of the focus of investment to urban 
residential construction, between January and November last 
year, 84.6 percent of the building projects around the country 
being constructed for sale were residences. Of the new building 
projects launched in this period, 85.5 percent were residences. 
Residences accounted for a whopping 89.7 percent of the building 
projects completed. All these topped the 1992 records. 
  With the market under macro-regulation and control, real 
estate prices during the latter half of last year remain 
basically stable even in those areas that had been hot spots for 
real estate business. In some areas, prices of buildings 
completed and to be completed fell by 20-30 percent and 10-20 
percent, respectively, compared with the beginning of last year. 
  While progress is made in the macro-regulation and control 
of the real estate market, a number of pertinent regulations 
drawn up by the concerned departments of the State Council have 
been promulgated and put into effect. These include the "Statute 
for Value-Added Tax on Land," "Regulations Governing Assets of 
Real Estate Development Enterprises," and "Provisions on 
Comprehensive Acceptance Inspection of Newly Completed Small 
Housing Areas." Zhejiang, Guangdong, and other provinces have 
also promulgated local laws and regulations governing sales and 
transfers of land-using rights, real estate transactions, real 
estate price appraisal, and standard land prices. This has 
prepared the ground for legalizing the operations of the real 
estate market. 
  With the market under macro-regulation and control, a 
number of incapable real estate development companies have 
closed down of their own accord. For example, 380 real estate 
companies in Guangxi have closed down in this way. Meanwhile, 
the authorities concerned in various localities have forced 
incapable real estate companies to cease their operations. In 
Guangdong Province, 170 real estate companies have been thus 
shut down. In addition, a number of illegally operating 
companies around the country have been investigated and dealt 
with. With regard to real estate companies established by land 
administrative departments or financial institutions, steps are 
being taken to separate them from these departments and 
institutions as required by the state regulations. 
  Through more than a half year's efforts, remarkable 
results have been achieved in exercising macro-regulation and 
control over the real estate market. However, many problems 
exposed in the course of real estate development have yet to be 
radically resolved. For example, due to a lack of self-provided 
funds, many real estate development companies cannot fulfilled 
their contracts. To get foreign funds, some localities have 
often sold their land not in accordance with their established 
plan or even without a plan. The result is that they have 
arbitrarily sold a lot of farmland, especially vegetable land, 
leading to a sharp rise in vegetable prices within a short 
period. This has made it difficult for people to satisfy their 
vegetable demand. Besides, quite a number of localities have 
over-expanded their scale of development, making it necessary to 
move a large number of people out of the old residential areas. 
These people have to take care of themselves during the 
transitional period. They get no timely assistance from the 
government. 
  In view of the above, some experts say that the 
macro-regulation and control of the real estate market over the 
past six months has only solved some urgent problems in 
developing the real estate industry, and the results obtained 
are merely initial-stage achievements. To truly put our real 
estate market on the track of orderly development and healthy 
operations, we should still do a lot of hard and careful work on 
the basis of what we have achieved at present. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20434 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar015___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  8 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> POPULATION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Article Analyzes Population Management System </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0271A Beijing RENKOU YANJIU [POPULATION RESEARCH] in 
Chinese No 84, 29 Nov 93 pp 56-57 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0271A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing RENKOU YANJIU [POPULATION RESEARCH] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Sun Huaiyang (1327 2037 7122) and Hu Ying (5170 </F>
5391): "Analysis of Reasons for China's Slowed Population 
Increase Growth Rates"] 
  [Excerpts] [passage omitted] B. Chief Causes for 
Lower Birth Rates 
  1. Enhanced family planning 
  In 1991, the Central Committee of the Communist Party of 
China and the State Council published the "Decisions Regarding 
Enhancing Family Planning and Strictly Controlling Population 
Increases." They also convened family planning working symposia 
over the next two years which emphasized that "the party and 
government as first in command must assume overall 
responsibility and emphasize family planning themselves." This 
undoubtedly will have a powerful role in promoting family 
planning. First, all levels of leadership further improved 
their understanding of population issues. They are responsible 
for resolving problems and matters that arise in family 
planning, bringing family planning into overall national 
economic and social development plans and organizing 
coordination of joint management by involved departments. At the 
same time, they implemented a responsibility system over 
population and family planning management goals to determine 
whether each level of the government is doing a good job of 
family planning and fulfilling population control plans as an 
important component in evaluating official achievements. Second, 
in recent years all sectors of society have actively 
participated in family planning. State and local fiscal input 
have further improved contraceptive and birth control technology 
services and mother and childcare conditions. A stronger family 
planning basic service network increases the number of women of 
child-bearing age who select contraceptive measures. According 
to family planning sector statistics, in 1988, 145.79 million 
among 205.04 million married women nationwide chose 
contraceptives, for a contraceptive rate of 71.2 percent. In 
1992, 199.83 million among 239.61 million married women chose 
contraceptives, for a contraceptive rate of 83.4 percent, up 
12.2 percentage points from 1988. 
  2. Higher average first marriage age rate for women, fewer 
early marriages and births 
  In recent years, the higher average female first marriage 
age 
rate in China has had a definite influence on lowering birth 
rates. In 1988, the average female first marriage age was 21.81 
years. In 1990, it rose to 22.05 years and in 1991 it continued 
to climb to 22.21 years. By 1992, it had risen to 22.47 years, 
0.66 years higher than 1988. According to provincial figures, 
in 1992, the average age for females' first marriages in the 
three municipalities of Beijing, Tianjin and Shanghai was 24.41 
years, 23.29 years and 24.46 years, respectively, a consistently 
stable rate in recent years. The average age for first 
marriages of females in other areas was higher than in 1988, up 
an average 0.78 years, and it rose by more than one year in the 
four provinces of Fujian, Shandong, Hunan and Hainan. At the 
same time, the number of women in China who marry early dropped; 
the number of those who marry late rose. According to family 
planning sector statistics, in 1987, the early marriage rate 
based on female age calculations was 23.6 percent. In 1992 the 
figure fell to 12.9 percent, down 48 percent over 1987. 
Likewise, the late marriage rate rose from 29.0 percent in 1987 
to 36.5 percent in 1992. 
  After promulgation and implementation of China's new 
"marriage law" in 1980, there was a sharp rise in the number of 
marriages in the lower age groups. Female childbearing levels 
recovered and there was a great increase in the phenomenon of 
early childbearing. In 1981 the birthrate to Chinese women in 
the 15-19 year old age group was 6.1 per thousand, up 18.8 per 
thousand over 1986. In 1989 it continued to climb to 22.1 per 
thousand. In the 1980s, the early marriage and early 
childbearing phenomenon was relatively serious; it both brought 
about a rise in female childbearing levels and also had a 
negative effect on the physical health of women and children. 
In the past two years, the government everywhere has paid great 
heed to the issue of early female marriage and childbearing. It 
has effectively controlled the matter by augmented propaganda 
and education and adoption of a series of measures. Since 1990, 
there has been a marked reduction in early childbearing. In 
1990 the birthrate by women in the 15-19 age group fell to 12.1 
per thousand from 22.1 per thousand in 1989; in 1991 it 
continued to drop to 8.9 per thousand, falling to 7.4 per 
thousand in 1992, down 15 per thousandths from 1989. In 
particular, there has been a notable decrease in early 
childbearing by rural women. In 1989 the birthrate by rural 
woman in the 15-19 age group was 26.1 per thousand, down to 10.4 
per thousand in 1991, and down further to 8.5 per thousand in 
1992, or down 18 per thousand over 1989. According to estimates, 
10 percent of the children born in the 1980s were to females 
younger than 20 years old, implying that nearly two million of 
the 23 million new children born each year are the result of 
early childbearing. In the past two years, control of early 
marriage and childbearing has brought about a reduction in the 
birthrate of six percent, accounted for by children born 
annually in early childbearing, or nearly a reduction of one 
million children annually. 
  3. Total female birth rates lower than replacement levels, 
smaller urban-rural gap 
  Considering China as a whole in 1992, the total birth rate 
which synthetically reflects female childbearing levels fell 
from 2.25 in 1990 to below the replacement level of 2.1. In 
various areas in 1992 the total female birthrate generally 
dropped as compared with 1990, and this can be divided into 
three general categories. One category had total birth rates 
already below 1.5, which included the nine provinces and 
municipalities of Beijing, Tianjin, Liaoning, Jilin, Shanghai, 
Zhejiang, Jiangsu, Shandong and Sichuan; their natural 
population increase rate in 1992 was controlled within 10 per 
thousand. Another category had total birth rates between 1.5 and 
2.1, which included the 12 provinces and regions of Hebei, 
Shanxi, Inner Mongolia, Heilongjiang, Anhui, Fujian, Jiangxi, 
Hunan, Hubei, Henan, Shaanxi and Gansu; the natural increase 
rate was lower than 13 per thousand. The third category had 
total birth rates higher than replacement levels, which included 
the nine provinces and regions of Shandong, Shanxi, Hainan, 
Guizhou, Yunnan, Qinghai, Ningxia, Xinjiang, and Tibet; their 
natural increase rate still exceeded 13 per thousand. At the 
same time, childbearing for women of childbearing age in China 
is moving further toward the pattern of bearing children "later, 
scarcer and fewer," with a short period of sustained peak curve 
for women who did not give birth. From 1986 to 1989, nationwide 
the peak value age for female childbearing was 23 years, and the 
peak age birthrate fluctuated from 242.76 per thousand to 260.70 
per thousand. In 1991 and 1992, the peak value age for female 
childbearing rose to 24 years; the peak value age birthrate fell 
to 226.14 per thousand and 232.69 per thousand, respectively. 
Birth rates for women in all other age groups dropped in 
varying degress. 
  In the past two years the gap between urban and rural female 
birth levels has shrunk notably. In 1986, the total female 
birthrate was 2.66 in rural areas and 1.66 in urban areas. In 
1989 the respective figures were 2.60 and 1.57. Although the 
levels dropped slightly, the gap did not diminish. In the 1990s, 
this gap fell to below one. Total rural and urban female 
birthrates nationwide were 2.0 and 1.3, respectively. Although 
actual total female birthrate situations in some rural areas may 
be higher than the survey figures, the shrinking trend still 
stands for the gap between urban-rural female birth levels. 
  4. Clear drop in large family rate among children born. 
In the past two years, there has been a clear change in the 
structure of the numbers of children women bear. The number of 
unplanned for births has been reduced, especially in large 
families. The one child family rate in China rose from 51.87 
percent in 1990 to 55.24 percent in 1991; the two child rate 
fell from 31.47 percent to 30.89 percent; and the large family 
rate (three or more children) fell from 16.66 percent ot 13.87 
percent. In 1992 the one child rate further rose to 60.45 
percent while the two child and large family rates fell to 27.52 
percent and 12.03 percent, respectively. 
  Although there still are differences in the structure of the 
numbers of children in families in various parts of China, in 
1992 all are as jointly showed a rising trend in the one child 
rate and drops in the two child and large family rates. 
Compared to 1990, the one child rate rose an average 8.5 
percentage points in various ares, of which, the greatest rise 
was in Shandong province which rose from 54 percent in 1990 to 
76 percent, up 22 percentage points. The two child and large 
family rates fell 3.9 percentage points and 4.6 percentage 
points, respectively, in various areas. In 1990 the proportion 
of large families surpassing 20 percent in Shanxi, Fujian, 
Jiangxi, Henan, Hunan, Hubei and Shaanxi provinces in 1992 all 
fell more than five percentage points. 
  Single children accounted for 12.81 million of the 21.19 
million births in China in 1992, up 410,000 people over 1990; 
second children accounted for 5.83 million people, down 1.69 
million people; and third or higher children accounted for 2.55 
million people, down 1.43 million people. The numbers for second 
and third or more children fell 22.47 percent and 35.9 percent, 
respectively. Based on analyses, in 1992 the number of third or 
more children born was down alone by nearly two million people 
from the average number of third or higher births in the 1980s. 
  5. Fewer female pregnancies; "empty files" on female births 
in some areas 
  According to analyses, besides stronger and better family 
planning, the number of children born to women of childbearing 
age fell also because of a reduction in the number of women 
meeting childbearing policy conditions in some areas. In recent 
years in these areas the number of women who should give birth 
have done so in the past few years because of early marriage and 
early childbearing. In other areas in recent years there were 
relatively many unplanned births and at present strict family 
planning regulations are being implemented to control this. 
Furthermore, to mitigate the 20 - 29 year old high birth period, 
in 1991 and 1992 various areas commonly adopted a series of 
effective measures and went about family planning work in a 
tighter, earlier and firmer manner. Post-conception remedial 
measures gradually were turned into preconception management for 
women of childbearing age. Births of three or more children were 
gradually reduced to two births, meaning a corresponding 
decrease in the number of pregnant women. In addition, in 1992 
the aftereffects of long-term or permanent birth control 
measures taken in recent years played an important role in 
controlling the birth of second, third or more children. As a 
result, in some areas there were "empty files" on births of 
women in the childbearing age. 
  Although in the 1990s there will be an increase in the 
number 
of women in China in the 15 - 49 age group, rising to 310 
million people, in some areas the number of childbearing age 
women in the 20 - 29 age group is shrinking because of China's 
large population and eneven population distribution. For 
example, the number of childbearing age women is falling in the 
provinces and municipalities of Jiangsu, Zhejiang, Shandong, 
Beijing, Tianjin and Shanghai. This has played a definite role 
in reducing births in the past two years. 
  6. Change in notion of female childbearing in line with 
gradual establishment of socialist market economy. 
  China has had rapid economic development in recent years. In 
1991 China's GNP grew 7.74 percent over 1990, and rose another 
12.8 percent in 1992 over 1991. Economic development has had a 
positive role in family planning. There have been noteworthy 
successes in some areas that have tied family planning work to 
rural economic development, to peasant hard work to get rich and 
rush to become comparatively well off, and to establishing 
modern civilized happy families. 
  The gradual establishment and development of a socialist 
market economy has made economic activity flourish and increased 
circulation of the population. According to analyses, the 
percentage of people among the total population in the two 
categories of those who "have lived in their own county or town 
less than one year and have left their place of permanent 
family registration more than one year" and those who "await 
determination of permanent family registration while living in 
their own county or town" rose from 0.86 percent in 1990 to 0.94 
percent in 1992. Various areas in China rose in differing 
degrees, of which, the percentage rises of the above two 
categories in the provinces of Liaoning, Jilin, Jiangsu, 
Zhejiang, Fujian, Shandong, and Guangxi were relatively large. 
Under reform and open door conditions, a considerable portion of 
women have put more effort into economic activities. They give 
birth to fewer children at a later age in order to "get rich 
quick and rush to be comparatively well off." For example, in 
Jilin Province a survey analysis of six or seven towns, villages 
and street association family planning situations indicated 
that, of 5,750 women who received approval to give birth but did 
not give birth in 1992, 1,890 postponed childbirth because of 
business or outside work. This group of women accounts for 32.87 
percent of the number who drew birth permits but did not give 
birth, corresponding to one one-thousandth of the birth rate in 
these towns and villages in 1992. At the same time, urban 
lifestyles and the notion of having fewer but better children 
have affected rural youth near to urban areas. The concept of 
childbirth among rural youth is undergoing further change and 
beginning to move toward later marriage and birth, meaning a 
reduction in the number of those anxious to bear children and an 
increase in the number of those willing to wait. [passage 
omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20435 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar015___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  8 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> POPULATION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Report: "Chengde Model" of Population Control </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0270A Beijing RENKOU YANJIU [POPULATION RESEARCH] in 
Chinese No 84, 29 Nov 93 pp 45-48 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0270A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing RENKOU YANJIU [POPULATION RESEARCH] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Du Peng (2629 7720), Chen Gong (7115 0501), Liu </F>
Chengming (0491 2052 2494), Zhang Hanmo (1728 3466 1075), and 
Yang Huaquan (2799 5478 2938), Demography Department, Chinese 
People's University: "Hard Work; Solid 
Accomplishments--Analytical Report on the Chengde Population 
Control Model"] 
  [Excerpts] Chengde Prefecture is a classic mountainous 
region made up of old, young, and impoverished people, but 
thanks to the close attention of CPC committees and governments 
at all levels in the prefecture, as well as the efforts of the 
broad masses of planned parenthood cadres, it has worked out a 
coordinated development plan for planned parenthood methods and 
for curing poverty, curing ignorance and becoming wealthy. It 
has also established a whole body of corresponding control 
mechanisms. Since 1989, the total birth rate of childbearing age 
women in Chengde Prefecture has been consistently maintained at 
below 1.63, and the planned parenthood rate has been maintained 
at better than 98 percent. In 1992, the peak year of the third 
birth peak, the birthrate for the entire prefecture was only 
11.72 per 1,000, and the natural rate of population increase was 
only 6.29 per 1,000. Chengde Prefecture's planned parenthood 
achievements have attracted attention, and the Chengde 
population control model has also attracted the interest of 
government departments and academicians concerned. It was 
against this background that 90th form classmates from the 
Chinese People's University Demographics Department went to 
Chengde Prefecture to conduct an on-site social survey for the 
purpose of more fully critiquing Chengde's population control 
model. The following analytical report has been written on the 
basis of a collation and analysis of the survey data. [passage 
omitted] 
<H5>  1. Analysis of Parenthood Desires </H5>
  During this survey, we canvassed the parenthood desires of 
childbearing age married women in Chengde Prefecture. Analysis 
shows that even in the absence of the limitations of planned 
parenthood policy, 16.3 percent of those surveyed felt that a 
single child was enough; 68.7 percent felt two children were 
enough; and 12.8 percent felt three or more children were 
better. Another 2.2 percent had no opinion. Clearly, the desire 
for a single child was greater than for multiple births [as 
published]. This shows that even in the absence of the 
limitations of planned parenthood policy, 85 percent of the 
people's parenthood desires were consistent with the prevailing 
parenthood policy. Actually, it also tells us that the 
prevailing planned parenthood policy really restricts the 
parenthood desires of only approximately 13 percent of the 
people. As society and the economy develop, and with the 
intensification of planned parenthood propaganda, the 
coerciveness of the prevailing policy is no longer its main 
function. The parenthood requirements of the prevailing policy 
have become the codification of people's behavior. This change 
in parenthood desires shows that planned parenthood propaganda 
work in Chengde prefecture has truly wrought outstanding results. 
  The reasons given in the survey for the number of children 
desired show that 43.6 percent of those surveyed who want only a 
single child feel that many children mean heavy burdens and high 
expenses in rearing them; 35.6 percent feel that they cannot 
afford to rear many children; and 33.7 percent feel that they 
can do a better job of rearing fewer children. Among those 
surveyed who want two children, 59.1 percent gave as their 
reasons the economic one that "many children mean heavy 
burdens"; 35 percent felt that "one is two few, three are too 
many, but two are just right." Those wanting only one or two 
children accounted for 85 percent of the total population 
surveyed. Those giving economic reasons for fewer children were 
in the majority. This shows that they have already begun to 
think seriously about the effects of childbearing on family 
economic life and their own development. In addition, despite 
the decrease in the number of people giving "continuation of the 
family line by producing a male heir" as their childbearing 
goal; nevertheless, 49 percent wanted to have three children. 
  Results of the above analysis show that although traditional 
agriculture holds a dominant position in Chengde prefecture, and 
although peasant income remains very low, the phenomenon of the 
poorer the more children has not appeared here. During the 
course of the survey, we had a marked sense that childbearing 
ideas today have basically changed from having many children to 
having fewer but better cared for children. Below, we will try 
to analyze the influences that have changed the parenthood ideas 
of the local populace. 
<H5>  Atmosphere Surrounding Population Control in Chengde </H5>
  The change in the public outlook on having children is 
attributable to the understanding of the importance of planned 
parenthood work at every local government level. A distinctive 
atmosphere about population control exists in Chengde 
Prefecture. We will try to analyze it below in the following 
several regards. 
  1. Leaders' close attention to ideology. Close attention to 
ideology is an intangible part of planned parenthood work. Only 
when sufficiently close ideological attention is paid to planned 
parenthood work can cadres at all levels devote themselves to 
doing real deeds in planned parenthood work. Chengde 
prefecture's planned parenthood cadres diligently carried out 
the regulations pertaining to planned parenthood, setting up 
multi-purpose education schools to provide training and study. 
Party and government leaders at all levels personally took 
command to ensure good planned parenthood performance. They also 
established a planned parenthood day for the specific purpose of 
hearing reports, and for the prompt discovery and solving of 
problems. Government units at all levels gave first place to 
planned parenthood work. They gave priority to ensuring that 
funds and other material needs of planned parenthood work were 
provided, and they did all possible to provide conditions 
favorable to the conduct of planned parenthood work. 
Consequently, cadres were able to devote themselves to the work 
at hand without concern for extraneous matters. Administrative 
cadres in the prefecture frequently went into the countryside to 
check on the work of selected units and to listen to the views 
and complaints of grassroots level cadres and the public. They 
prescribed remedies as needed for timely solution to problems. 
Leading cadres at all levels showed deep affection for planned 
parenthood cadres and held them in high esteem. They provided 
them great respect and support. This stirred the initiative and 
the zeal of the planned parenthood cadres, stimulating them to 
clarify their personal responsibilities. It also made the public 
feel that the government was serious about planned parenthood 
work. 
  A survey of grassroots level planned parenthood cadres found 
that 10.5 percent of them felt that the motivation for their 
work came from the support that leaders provided. The public 
also said that this prefecture took firm action on planned 
parenthood work; 77.7 percent of the public saying that cadres 
visited them regularly. Clearly the cadres were concentrating on 
their work. 
  2. Scientific population control methods. The planned 
parenthood control organizations and various systems in being in 
Chengde prefecture provided the indispensable prerequisites for 
planned parenthood work. They emphasized propaganda first, 
providing the services required, and "working along many lines 
at the same time." Consequently, all aspects of planned 
parenthood work were performed level by level. 
  Standardization, systematization, and legislation are 
prerequisites for smooth conduct of planned parenthood work. 
All the areas we surveyed practiced a two-track leadership 
system (CPC committees directing CPC branches, CPC branches 
directing party members, and party members maintaining contact 
with individual households; government directing village 
committees, village committees directing the heads of key 
households, and the heads of key households maintaining contact 
with childbearing age women). It also practiced a four lines and 
one point control system (the "four lines" being the government 
administration line, the party administration line, the planned 
parenthood cadre line, and the association line; and the "one 
point" being childbearing age women). They established 
level-by-level control in which forces were concentrated and 
responsibilities spelled out, and they also instituted complete 
contract system control. Clear regulations were provided on 
marriage, childbearing, and the floating population, and these 
regulations had to be followed. A system was instituted for 
childbearing age women of a family visit once every 20 days, 
filing of a report every 30 days, a pregnancy inspection once 
every two months, a ring insertion once every three months, and 
a general check once every six months. Specific punishments were 
prescribed for violations of regulations, and these were linked 
to economic returns. 
  3. Propaganda and education that truly influences people. 
This is closely linked to the hard work of the grassroots 
planned parenthood cadres who go from door-to-door to work with 
childbearing age women, providing publicity and briefings about 
pertinent information. It is only because of this work that the 
survey results showed that it was through the propagandizing of 
planned parenthood cadres that 97.1 percent of people learned 
about the planned parenthood policy. We also found the same 
thing from a number of people surveyed who did not have much 
education, but who were rather well acquainted with the planned 
parenthood policy. 
  The main approach to planned parenthood in the prefecture 
surveyed was to "use poverty to cure poverty, the main sense of 
which was to use poverty as a means of convincing the public 
about planned parenthood. Every county and town emphasized 
investment in propaganda equipment. The survey found 
eye-catching slogans everywhere one looked in Chengde 
Prefecture. Everytime the public address system sounded in each 
village, everyone thought that a planned parenthood announcement 
was to be made. Propaganda teams roamed the villages showing 
movies and video cassettes that publicized the basics of planned 
parenthood and popularized basic knowledge. They used plain and 
easy to understand slogans like "if mountain region people want 
to get rich, they should have fewer children and plant more 
trees," which linked poverty to realities so that the peasants 
themselves could grasp the connotations of planned parenthood. 
  Survey results showed that 59.6 percent of the public had 
learned about planned parenthood from meetings and the 
organization of study, 31.0 percent learned about it from news 
media (radio broadcasts, television, and posters, 13.7 percent 
had learned about it from the above two means, 7.0 percent 
learned through events around them and their own experiences, 
and 2.9 percent learned about it from all of the above. 
  The survey found that cadres believed they devoted 64.9 
percent of their time to childbearing age women; 24.6 percent 
felt they devoted their time to both husbands and wives, 3.5 
percent spent their time on husbands and old people in the 
household, and 7.0 percent spent their time with all members of 
the family. 
  The above statistics show the difficulty of planned 
parenthood work, but one heartening matter is that the gains are 
equal to the effort made. Planned parenthood work has truly 
produced results. Virtually everyone has heard propaganda about 
the planned parenthood policy, and they understand planned 
parenthood work. As a public opinion tool, propaganda has 
played a mouthpiece role. Once the public understands this 
propaganda and internalizes it, very good results can be 
obtained. Once planned parenthood takes root in people's minds, 
the change in outlook on parenthood is not difficult to 
understand. 
  4. The effective work of cadres. The survey found cadres 
engaged in planned parenthood work to be conscientious, 
hardworking, highly responsible, and having a rather high 
professional caliber. Cooperation with them made us feel that 
the achievements made in planned parenthood work in Chengde 
prefecture are attributable to the high caliber of the planned 
parenthood corps. It is their hard work at the grassroots level 
that has translated scientific control methods into reality, and 
won outstanding results. 
  This survey of planned parenthood cadres shows 97 percent of 
them to be between 20 and 49 years of age; 72 percent of them 
have a junior middle school education or higher; and 28 percent 
have a primary school education. They also expressed delight 
about doing planned parenthood work. 
  Although planned parenthood cadre pay is low (better than 
the 
pay of nonplanned parenthood cadres, but affected by the level 
of overall economic development, and thus still fairly low), and 
though annual bonuses amount to only between 100 and 200 yuan, 
and cadres bear planned parenthood contract risks; nevertheless, 
the survey showed that despite the lack of inducements and care, 
100 percent of them still want to do planned parenthood work. 
Eighty percent of planned parenthood cadres said that their work 
motivation stems from a personal sense of responsibility and the 
country's need; 10.5 percent said it came from the support that 
leaders provide; and 3.5 percent said it came from the power the 
job conferred. (In the statistical tabulation, the three answers 
of national need, sense of responsibility, and benefit to the 
public overlapped). The family members of all planned parenthood 
cadres understood and support their relatives involvement in 
this sacred and arduous work. 
  The above survey results show a large cadre corps in the 
prime of life, having a high educational level (for the local 
area) a sense of responsibility, that takes the initiative in 
work, that is ideologically well-prepared, and that has strong 
backing. 
  The survey results show that 56.3 percent of the public 
feels 
that relations between the cadres and the public are very close, 
39.3 percent feel that relationships are all right or ordinary, 
and only 3.4 percent feel that relations are not good. This 
shows that the planned parenthood corps here has gained the 
respect and support of the public. The cadres may say proudly to 
everyone: "I do planned parenthood work." 
  5. Natural conditions and other. Chengde Prefecture is a 
mountainous prefecture of old, young, and poor people. One 
senses the warmth and honesty of the public here from their 
attitude in the public survey. If one presents the facts and 
reasons things out, they readily accept, displaying a very high 
ideological awareness. 
  The peasants in this area have lived in poverty for a long 
time. Their desire for and interest in escaping from poverty is 
extremely urgent. One can see from their hopes for their 
children that 95 percent of the peasants feel rural income is 
low and their social position is low. They urgently desire to 
change their own miserable fate. The people hope to be able to 
escape from poverty by having fewer children but rearing them 
well and by concentrating their energies. Thus, the lightening 
of family burdens is bound to be on their daily agenda of 
important things to do. Consequently, propaganda about using 
poverty to cure poverty, decreasing childbearing, and improving 
the economy strikes a very responsive chord with the public. A 
market and a climate for this propaganda exists. 
  Eighty-five percent of the public realize from their own 
personal experiences and reality of numerous children around 
them, heavy burdens, and many years of hardship that having many 
children holds back one's own development. They know that the 
lightening of the burden of rearing children, and saving 
opportunity costs has a very great influence on young husbands 
and wives. 
  This study found that 77.6 percent of the families in this 
prefecture are of the nuclear type, 20.3 percent are directly 
related families, and only 2.1 percent are joint families. 
Family parents who are in good health generally do not live with 
their sons and daughters but rather depend on the income that 
their own labor provides to live alone, unless one parent is 
dead and the other is feeble and thus has no choice but to live 
with the children. Children's main economic obligations to their 
parents are: to help the old ones by doing some farm work during 
the busy season, being responsible for some medical expenses, 
and being responsible for the old one's funeral expenses. There 
is little difference whether one has reared a son or a daughter. 
Social advances have improved the status of children, but the 
value of children to a family has declined greatly. The peasants 
are personally aware of the too high cost of rearing children; 
consequently, their feelings about expecting the children to 
look after them in their old age are not pressing. Only 2.8 
percent of the peasants wanted to rear children as a defense 
against old age, while 10.2 percent wanted to raise fewer 
children well. Another 4.2 percent linked their personal welfare 
and the state's welfare out of consideration for the needs of 
the country. Better rearing of a smaller number of children has 
increasingly become a trend in rural childbearing behavior. 
  The elderly bear historical witness to the changes in local 
social life. The rich experience of the aged provide us data for 
a comparison of changes in the past and present standard of 
living. A survey of the elderly shows that 77.5 percent feel 
that the present standard of living has risen greatly, and 19.6 
percent feel it has improved and is more affluent that formerly. 
At the same time, in the process of understanding the substance 
of planned parenthood, 47.6 percent of the public obtained 
information through the media (radio broadcasts and television). 
This also shows that durable consumer goods such as television 
sets have entered peasant families. This shows that the rural 
standard of living has improved generally enabling the peasants 
to advance to improve their living standards. Seeing the clash 
of urban cultural and urban ways of life and value concepts, 
people have begun to wise up. They have begun to open their eyes 
and look at the world with the result that their thinking has 
changed. The huge difference between the development of cities 
and the poverty of this area has made the urban cultural impact 
more poignant. The peasants have begun to be dissatisfied with a 
subsistence standard of living. They hope to get out from under 
the limitations of their miserable peasant status. They want to 
throw down their "mud rice bowls" and stride with a brand new 
outlook toward a truly cultured life. 
  A survey of future expectations for their children shows 
that 
95 percent of peasants feel that "so long as they do not farm, 
it will be all right." Of these, 53.8 percent hoped that their 
children would go to college. The peasants know that lack of 
education hampers them. They hope that their children will be 
able to escape from farming, that they will have high income and 
a corresponding status, and that they will become the cultured 
persons that they now envy. 
  Although the survey showed that 12.8 percent wanted to have 
many children, even they expressed approval of the prevailing 
planned parenthood policy. Granted that many of them were 
deterred by the strict systematic control and severe penalties, 
they also revealed awareness of the rural contradiction between 
a large population and little land, and worried about their own 
ability to provide support. At the same time, among those 
supporting the policy, most had a psychology of vying with each 
other and going along with the flow, a psychology of "fish must 
swim, birds must fly and people must breathe till they finally 
die," and a psychology of whatever others may do, they will make 
no criticism. Understanding and guiding the direction of the 
main stream is extremely crucial in planned parenthood work, but 
one cannot neglect to apply the spur in time to those who go 
along with the flow. [passage omitted) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20436 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar015___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  8 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Guangdong Grain Area </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0303N Beijing NONGMIN RIBAO in Chinese 19 Feb 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0303N </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing NONGMIN RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] The planned grain area in Guangdong Province is 
50 million mu, and the planned rice area is 41 million mu. Gross 
output of grain will reach 17.5 million tons, and gross output 
of rice 15.4 million tons. The province, cities, and counties 
will invest 300 million yuan over the next three years to set up 
50 commodity grain production base counties. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20437 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar015___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  8 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Grain Price Situation After Deregulation Reviewed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0280B Beijing GONGREN RIBAO in Chinese 21 Dec 93 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0280B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GONGREN RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhang Xuefa (1728 1331 3127): "The First Year of </F>
Grain Price Deregulation -- Perspectives on Grain Production, 
Consumption, Circulation"] 
  [Text] The first of April 1993, is a day that people would 
consider out of the ordinary. 
  Beginning on that day, the national grain price deregulation 
policy was formally implemented and urban residents' grain and 
oil was no longer provided based on the plan. Its price stopped 
being based on "planned supply" and was thoroughly freed up. 
  Grain planting farmers no longer planted in accordance with 
the national mandatory plan. Some regions also eliminated grain 
contract fixed quota purchases, and farmers set up and adjusted 
their planting structure and set up their planting plan based on 
market demand, and grain and oil sales freely entered the market. 
  When people regard food as heavenly, in the set traditional 
thinking of Chinese urban residents, freeing up grain prices 
undoubtedly was a major break through from the era of the plan! 
  In the first year that grain prices were freed up, what was 
the status of grain production, grain markets, grain purchases, 
grain consumption, and grain departments? 
  Urban Residents Everywhere Find Convenience 
  The deregulation of grain prices was a "great liberation" 
for 
hundreds of millions of urban residents. The residents did not 
need to go every month to line up to receive grain coupons, and 
did not need to go to the designated grain stores to buy grain. 
At every grain exchange market there were large and small 
packages of grain for sale. Moreover, the vendors' service was 
enthusiastic and the price could be negotiated. At the food 
market one could even conveniently pick up the Thai fragrant 
rice, jiaozi flour, and cornmeal that he needed. 
  An organizational cadre said that for a number of years 
before we ate plenty of old rice. Now it is better. After we get 
off from work, we go to the exchange market and we can buy 
either a lot or a little. It is all new rice and the price is 
fair. His viewpoint is rather representative. 
  Grain Enterprises Move Toward the Market 
  In several places the state grain stores are no longer 
crowded as they were. According to a survey of a certain city's 
state grain store business, grain stores throughout the city 
realized a profit of 991,000 yuan from January through October 
of this year, a 74.03 percent decline from the same period last 
year, and 85 percent of total grain stores suffered a loss. 
Grain enterprises are quietly turning to the market. 
  One county's grain and oil supply company established six 
grain stores in the county seat. Formerly monthly grain sales 
were more than 3 million jin, but this year in the first two 
months that grain prices were deregulated, they only sold 
slightly over 10,000 jin of grain. 
  The freeing up of grain prices forced grain stores to 
actively participate in the intense competition of "the great 
market, the great circulation, and the great commerce." Several 
state grain stores have begun to engage in grain finishing and 
manufacture semi-finished products. They are striving to 
establish a foothold in market competition. 
  Exchange Markets Are Full of Customers 
  The pattern of state grain stores being the only business 
throughout the country has been broken. So, in the area of 
circulation, in addition to the grain department, retail stores 
and exchange markets are emerging in streets and lanes all over. 
  Grain exchange markets, in comparison to the one-price, 
several-variety state grain stores, are a cut above. The crowded 
situation in several exchange markets says it all. 
  Four Great Grain Purchasing Wars 
  This is the first year that grain prices have been freed up 
and there are numerous difficulties with grain purchases in 
localities throughout the nation. The reason is that after the 
grain market was freed up, there were numerous rushes to 
purchase. 
  In this year's summer and fall grain purchasing seasons, the 
grain that the farmers harvested still had not been entirely 
dried when in several localities and townships several 
collective and individual purchasers and grain using units one 
after another put up signs as purchasers. In some local 
townships, in addition to those in the locality concerned with 
grain, supply and marketing, farm machinery, transport, and seed 
units; flour mills, rice mills, breweries, and vermicelli 
factories came directly to the people for purchases. 
  Numerous purchasing units, in order to scramble for grain 
sources, raised the purchasing price on one another. In this 
year's fall grain purchases for example, the purchasing price 
for hybrid paddy was bid up from 0.64 yuan per kilogram to 0.66 
yuan, 0.68 yuan, and a high of 0.74 yuan. Some individual grain 
dealers drove their tractors to the field and immediately 
purchased the grain that the farmers had just husked. They took 
it in with their left hand and put it out with their right hand. 
When making purchases, they played with the "scales" to entrap 
the farmers and do everything possible to avoid taxes and 
industrial and commercial administrative fees. They drove up 
prices and expanded the differential with the grain department's 
purchasing price. 
  Numerous rushes to purchase disrupt the order of the market, 
and the grain department's grain purchases face a serious crisis. 
  Mixed Emotions for Grain Planting Farmers 
  With the total freeing up of grain purchases and prices, 
farmers who plant grain have mixed emotions. They are happy 
because the self-determination in planting that farmers have 
been crying for for several years has been implemented. Farmers 
can take the initiative in selecting what they will plant based 
on market demand, and contract grain orders are changed to 
parity purchases to add protective prices to the purchases 
determined by the market, and farmers can acquire many benefits. 
  Farmers are sad because nowadays planting grain does not 
make 
money. Although farmers benefit from the state's freeing up of 
grain prices, a large part of this benefit is offset by the rise 
in prices of the means of production. According to statistical 
estimates, nowadays those who plant one mu of paddy 
essentially do not earn any money, and some have to take money 
from their own pockets. So, farmers' enthusiasm for planting 
grain is dampened. Second, those who have the freedom to plant 
crops do not know what they can plant to earn money. Before, 
whatever they planted, the state would purchase it. Nowadays 
what one plants must be determined by the market situation and 
the risks are great. Third, they are worried about heavy 
burdens. Since opening up, township cadres have run economic 
entities and weakened their function of serving the farmers, 
increased charges, and made burdens heavier, and the funds and 
materials to support agriculture have been squeezed out. Fourth, 
delaying the signing of contracts until production and delaying 
payment until the purchase make it difficult to arrange planting. 
  Existing Problems Cannot Be Easily Overlooked 
  If the problems that have occurred since grain prices were 
freed up are not promptly adjusted and resolved, the 
consequences are dreadful to contemplate. 
  Grain volume has gone down and grain prices are seen 
constantly rising. With the freeing up of grain prices and 
farmers free to plant what they want, they plant whatever makes 
money. Prompted by economic benefit, farmers see that planting 
grain does not make money and one after the other change to 
planting cash crops such as garlic, peanuts, rape, and 
medicines. According to relevant department statistics, the area 
planted in early rice this year throughout the country is 119 
million mu -- 12.17 million mu less than 
last year. Because the grain area is reduced, production has 
declined, making formerly tight supply and demand relations 
tighter and leading to an expected constant rise in the market 
prices of grains and oils. Purchasing is chaotic and grain 
reserves have fallen dramatically. Multi-channel grain purchases 
are intensely competitive, making purchasing extremely chaotic. 
In Jiangsu alone, this year's grain reserves are 50 percent 
lower than at the same time last year. 
  Individual businesses play tricks and the residents are 
greatly harmed. Because various sets of remedies are still not 
sound, especially because there is no central quality testing 
department to check the quality of grains and oils, some 
individual business people, intent on nothing but profit, mix 
gypsum powder into flour and market it and some mix 
semi-finished oil or semi-finished sprouts with mixed oil, 
cottonseed oil, and bran oil and sell it as first or second 
class rapeseed oil. The consumers' rights are damaged. 
  The grain stores' path is difficult and it is not easy to be 
optimistic about the prospects. Grain stores that for a long 
time depended on planned supply do not have their own funds. All 
business activity depends on bank loans. In addition, old and 
new debts build up and do not go down, the bank interest that 
enterprises are burdened with builds up from year to year, and 
burdens become heavier and heavier. Since the opening up of the 
market, grain enterprises have been bearing this burden and 
there is no way to go into battle with a light pack. In 
addition, old employees are in the majority in grain 
enterprises. In some urban areas, the ratio of retiring 
employees to employees on the job has reached approximately 1:1. 
Enterprise burdens are heavy. Some units even have difficulty 
maintaining employees' basic livelihood. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20438 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar015___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  8 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hog Output, Sales Stabilize </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0280A Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO in Chinese 13 Dec 93 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0280A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Jun Yue (0689 6390): "Hog Production, Sales Will </F>
Stabilize This Winter and Next Spring"] 
  [Text] Judging from the response of various regions and the 
level and development of current prices, this year's national 
hog production growth is essentially settled. The hog production 
and sales situation this winter and next spring will not 
experience very great fluctuations. 
  According to information supplied by the Ministry of 
Agriculture, at the end of the third quarter of this year, hog 
volume reached 388 million head, the number of hogs removed from 
the inventory was 244 million head, and total pork output 
reached 24.2 million tons, an increase of 8.6 percent, 6.5 
percent, and 9 percent, respectively. Included, the 8.2 percent 
growth rate of pork and the hog production situation can be 
considered hopeful. 
  Along with the growth in hog production, in recent months, 
pork prices also have generally risen nationally. According to 
State Statistics Bureau statistics of pork prices in 35 large 
and medium-sized cities in September of this year, pork prices 
on average increased by 17.8 percent over the same period last 
year. Within that, Beijing's 64.4 percent rise, Tianjin's 20.8 
percent rise, Chongqing's 34.2 percent rise, and Guiyang's 47.2 
percent rise were rather pronounced. 
  The relevant department of the Ministry of Agriculture 
analyzed this and they believe that brisk consumer demand is an 
important factor leading to the simultaneous rise in pork 
production and prices. From January through September, urban and 
rural resident cost of living expenses increased by 29 percent 
and 17 percent, respectively. If the price factor is deducted, 
they are 12 percent and 5 percent, respectively. This cannot be 
separated from this year's rather rapid growth of state fixed 
asset investment. Experts in the field estimate that 
approximately 40 percent of fixed asset investment funds are 
converted to cost of living funds. So, despite the rise in pork 
prices, with the exception of epidemic areas, the hog and pork 
markets have not experienced a "difficulty in selling hogs," and 
buying and selling have remained brisk. 
  As a result of the spread of hoof and mouth disease, hogs 
cannot be transferred out of some infected production areas and 
sales regions must concentrate on transferring meat from those 
production areas unaffected by the epidemic, such as Sichuan, 
causing meat prices in these regions to rise further. The state 
commerce system purchases, sales, and reserves have decreased, 
and market adjustment capabilities have been reduced, also 
creating a rise in meat prices. As of the end of September, 
state commerce system hog purchases were down by 34.3 percent 
and reserves were down by 44.1 percent. 
  Feed prices rose and the cost of raising hogs increased, 
another important factor leading to the rise in pork prices. 
According to Ministry of Agriculture statistics on the cost of 
raising hogs from 160 points on the information network, in 
addition to the rather large rise in such feed production costs 
as water fees, electrical fees, and oil fees, the rural market 
price of corn rose from 0.64 yuan per kilogram in January of 
this year to 0.74 yuan per kilogram in September and hog feed 
prices reached as high as 1.29 yuan per kilogram. Some rather 
highly intensified hog producing units were rather sensitive to 
this. Because large-scale pig farms and specialized hog raising 
households near urban areas were rather greatly affected by the 
rise in feed prices, pork supplies around large cities 
correspondingly decreased, directly pulling up urban pork 
prices. The good consumption of high-quality, high-priced fresh 
meat and lean meat and meat products by residents of large and 
medium-sized cities also to a certain extent strengthened the 
rising trend in pork prices. 
  Despite this, relevant personnel at the Ministry of 
Agriculture still are rather optimistic about hog production and 
sales this winter and next spring. They believe that the 
response from various regions and the level and development of 
current prices indicate that this year's national hog production 
growth is settled and current pork supplies are not at all 
considered too high and hog production and sales this winter and 
next spring will not experience great fluctuations. 
  According to their analysis, compared to the rate of 
increase 
in production costs, pork prices still should not be considered 
too high. According to the composite indicator of comparative 
hog and grain prices, current hog and grain comparative prices 
still have not reached the levels from the beginning of the year 
and are still in the rebounding stage. September comparative hog 
and grain prices were 1:5.87; May's were 1:5.4; and at the 
beginning of the year, they were 1:6.23. Hog raising profits are 
not great. Precisely because of the rise in pork prices in the 
last half of the year, the rare situation of a decline in the 
price of sows and piglets in May and June has been turned around 
and hog production is tending to stabilize. 
  In addition, in the general background of widespread price 
increases, current pork prices also are not considered high. 
According to data provided by the State Statistics Bureau, 
compared to the same period last year, from January through 
September cost of living prices of residents of 35 large and 
medium-sized cities throughout the nation rose 18.9 percent. 
Within this, non-staple food prices rose by 18.0 percent and 
among non-staple foods, the prices of aquatic products rose by 
29.6 percent; meat, fowl, and egg prices rose by 15.8 percent; 
and pork prices rose by 14.8 percent. 
  But Ministry of Agriculture officials also point out that if 
feed prices continue to rise too rapidly or meat prices continue 
to rise to the point that they restrain the rate of consumption, 
it could affect hog production in the second half of next year. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20439 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar015___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  8 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liaoning Forecasts Cotton Shortages in 1994 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0303O Shenyang LIAONING RIBAO in Chinese 15 Feb 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0303O </F>
<F P=104>  Shenyang LIAONING RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] In Liaoning Province more than 140 textile 
enterprises will need more than 4.2 million dan of cotton. 
Based on a planned cotton area of 1 million mu, this will only 
meet about 20 percent of demand. 


</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20440 </DOCNO>
<HT>      "jpcar015___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  8 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs Continued </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0117A Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 30 Jun, 1, 2 Jul 
93 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0117A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installments No 57, 58, and 59 of serialized memoirs of Xu </F>
Jiatun (6079 1367 1470): "Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
<H5>  [30 Jun 93 p 2] </H5>
<H3>  Hong Kong Democracy Must "Proceed One Step at a Time"; Hong 
Kong Business Community Should Organize "Keidanren"; Liao 
Chengzhi Orders Support for a Certain Tycoon To Organize a Party </H3>
  [Text] Before I came to Hong Kong, Liao Chengzhi told me 
that he wanted the business community of Hong Kong to become 
organized like the "Keidanren" of Japan. Japan's "Keidanren" is 
an organization for the Japanese major capitalist class. It is 
the behind-the-scenes boss of the ruling Liberal Democratic 
Party of Japan and influences the government through the ruling 
party. 
  In 1978, the State Council organized a governmental 
delegation to visit Japan. The delegation leader was Vice 
Premier Gu Mu, and I was the assistant delegation leader. In 
Japan we met with three former and current Prime Ministers and 
several major corporation leaders. When we met with Konosuke 
Matsushita, who is called the "God of Business," the elderly man 
said with pride "We keep the best talent in industry for our own 
use; and send only the second best talent to government." This 
illustrated the influence of the major capitalist class on 
government in Japan. 
  Liao Chengzhi also told me that Deng Xiaoping shared his 
view. This showed that the Central Committee had considered 
that: 1) Political power in Hong Kong is primarily influenced by 
the capitalist class; and 2) if there is to be a political party 
it must consist of an organized capitalist class not of 
individuals of the capitalist class. Liao Chengzhi ordered me to 
support a certain tycoon in activities to organize a political 
party. This indicated that the Central Committee leaders 
advocated the organization of a political party. The certain 
tycoon wanted at that time to organize a political party and had 
even thought of a name similar to that of Britain's Conservative 
Party. Later, problems developed and he shifted his support to 
another group. In my activities in Hong Kong, I had urged 
individuals from the upper and middle classes to "get organized" 
and organize a political party. I had discussed this with Yang 
Sen, Luo Kang-rui, and Szeto Wah and with Y. K. Pao and Li 
Kashing. But enthusiasm was low among the upper class. I thought 
of using the Hong Kong Macao International Investment Company as 
a fledgling form to organize the major Chinese capitalists, 
especially the major capitalists with various types of 
influence, but in the end, they had no interest in cooperating 
and had to "disband." 
  Some people critized me for being too conservative and 
leaning towards the capitalist class. I felt that the special 
circumstances of Hong Kong were: politically, there really was 
unequal capitalist political power. Political power at the 
moment was still in the hands of the British and the Hong Kong 
British government primarily protected the interests of the 
capitalist class. But economically, the policies and approaches 
it adopted were all relatively suited to providing "fair" 
opportunities for development. Thus, in the drafting of the 
Basic Law, we wanted to maintain with little change the policies 
of the current Hong Kong government which allowed for ample 
economic freedom with little or no government interference. The 
development of political "fairness," or the course of 
democratization, would be on the principle of proceeding in an 
orderly fashion, or one step at a time. The development of 
political structure in Hong Kong would have to be adapted to 
"getting organized," and to the process of the Hong Kong people 
gaining an understanding of and experience with democracy. It 
could not influence the stability or economic prosperity of Hong 
Kong. It would not benefit anyone for the Hong Kong economy to 
"collapse." 
  The debate surrounding the course of democratization in Hong 
Kong was exceptionally intense as could be seen in the multitude 
of proposals put forth by various circles. The stand-offs among 
the different political proposals began when the business 
community put forth a 57-person proposal and, in rebuttal, the 
extreme democratization faction put forth a 19-person proposal. 
Before long, the middle faction put forth a 38-person proposal. 
The 57-person proposal evolved into an 89-person proposal. The 
19-person proposal developed into the "190" proposal. The 
British Government promoted "mutual recognition" and added 
"double investigation," "double recruitment" and "4,42." After 
"4 June" there were many proposals lined up. 
  Because the compromise among the different political 
proposals and the passage of the Basic Law did not happen until 
after "4 June," these events could not avoid the influence of "4 
June." For convenience of narration, I will address these issues 
in the later chapter "The Storm of 4 June." 
  (During the drafting phase of the Basic Law, the Hong Kong 
people had many opinions on political issues. The points of 
dispute mainly surrounded the speed of the development of 
democracy in Hong Kong. This referred to the proportion of seats 
for different classes of people in the legislative body and the 
rate of development towards direct elections. Another area of 
debate was the relationship between the legislative body and the 
administration and how the head official of the administration 
would be chosen. During the early phases of the drafting of the 
Basic Law, society divided those with different views into the 
"democracy faction," the "business faction" and the "middle 
faction." The so-called "190 Proposal" was a political system 
proposal jointly suppported by 190 individuals and groups in 
society. The views of this faction represented the thinking of 
those of the "democratic faction" of the time. Their main demand 
was that the political system design, including the election of 
legislative representatives and administrative officials, 
develop in the direction of universal suffrage with one 
person-one vote.) 
  The "business community's 89-person proposal" was the 
political system suggestion supported by the business and 
professional members of the Advisory Committee. The final draft 
was supported by 89 members of the Advisory Committee and thus 
was termed the "89-person proposal." The thrust of the proposal 
was the establishment of a "great electoral body" with persons 
from various circles. The electoral body would select 
administrative officials and part of the legislative 
representatives. Representatives from the business and 
professional communities would occupy most of the seats in the 
electoral body. 
  The "38-person proposal" was the concept of 38 members of 
the 
Advisory Committee. They combined the characteristics of the 
various factions and found compromise among the views of the 
different factions. For example, the nomination of 
administrative officials would be done by a nomination body. The 
officials would then be elected by one person one vote. They 
also took a middle ground approach to the proportion of seats in 
the legislative body, a compromise between the positions of the 
"democratic faction" and the "business faction." 
  The content of these proposals changed constantly during the 
drafting stage. Later, even more proposals emerged, but 
generally speaking, all primarily addressed the issues of the 
proportion of seats in the legislature and the extent of direct 
elections. [End of Installment No. 57] 
<H5>  [1 Jul 93 p 2] </H5>
<H3>  Temporary Cooperation. I Discuss the "Political System" With 
Youde. </H3>
  [Text] The formal signing of the PRC-UK Joint Communique by 
the head of both governments marked the beginning of a period of 
cooperation and negotiated resolution of Hong Kong issues by 
China and Britain. 
  Cooperation between Britain and Hong Kong during this period 
was demonstrated mainly in two areas: 
  First: During the drafting of the Basic Law, China respected 
and made every effort to include Britain's suggestions. Of 
course there was debate but there was mainly cooperation and 
compromise. 
  Second: Both sides cooperated on the issue of maintaining 
prosperity and stability in Hong Kong. 
  During this period, I got along very well with both Governer 
Youde and Governor Wilson. 
  On May 1 1985, Youde visited Shanghai and Jiangsu province 
at 
my invitation. I returned to Nanjing the day before so that I 
could greet Youde at the airport with Jiangsu Governor Gu 
Xiulian. Youde stayed at Nanjing's Zhongshanling No. 5 Hotel. 
This was built during the "Great Leap Forward" to accomodate Mao 
Zedong and Liu Shaoqi. Building No. 1 was reserved for Mao 
Zedong's exclusive use. Building No. 2 was for Liu Shaoqi and 
other authorities of the Central Committee. Both are separate 
villas with complete suites, built among ancient trees towering 
overhead between the tomb of Sun Yatsen and "Ming Xiao Ling," 
the tomb of the Ming Taizu Emperor Zhu Yuanzhang. After the 13th 
National Party Congress of the Chinese Communist Party, they 
were opened to the public and used to accomodate honored guests 
and foreign businessmen. Responsible individuals of the Jiangsu 
provincial government accompanied Youde to visit the scenic 
areas and factories of Nanjing and to brief him on Jiangsu 
province. 
  Youde was revisiting old haunts. In the late 40's, Youde was 
a Counselor in the British Embassy to China. According to our 
information, he was a senior intelligence agent of the British 
Government. On 1 April 1949, the People's Liberation Army of 
China forced its way across the Chang Jiang River, occupied 
Nanjing and other large and medium cities, and controlled the 
Jiangyin fortress at the passage to the lower reaches of the 
Chang Jiang. At that time, the British warship the Amethyst was 
on the river near Nanjing to provide assistance to the 
Kuomintang. Liu Bocheng and Deng Xiaoping issued an order to 
seal off the Chang Jiang and not allow the Amethyst to "escape." 
Youde obtained this intelligence. The British Embassy ordered 
him to find a way to tell the warship to take the risk of 
breaking through the blockade on the night of the 22d. Youde 
received honors and an award for this. 
  At that time, I was a political committee member of the 88th 
Division of the 29th Army of the People's Liberation Army. I was 
the leader of a vanguard camp. On the night of the 21st, I was 
in a wooden boat on the eastern stretch of the river campaign 
battleline, and we stormed the shore at Changshan in Jiangyin 
County. On the night of the 22nd, we were pressing towards Wuxi 
when we suddenly heard artillery fire towards Jiangyin behind 
us. A line in the sky several dozen miles long glowed up red 
with artillery fire which finally ceased after about one hour. 
Only on the next day did we know that the Amethyst had "broken 
through the blockade" and "escaped." 
  In Hong Kong, Youde and I had talked of his desire to visit 
the ancient cultural city of Yangzhou. When he was stationed at 
Nanjing in the past he had regretted not being able to visit 
Yangzhou. On this trip special arrangements were made for him to 
visit Yangzhou, including allowing him to enjoy the artistic 
treasures of the "Eight Yangzhou Eccentrics," famous painters 
from the Ming and Ching dynasties. Afterwards, we crossed the 
river at Zhenjiang and went to Wuxi and stayed in the Li Garden 
Cottage on the edge of Lake Tai. This was the former home of Fan 
Li, a doctor of the Kingdom of Wu during the Warring States 
Period. 
  Youde's visit to Jiangsu happened to occur during the market 
season for the Chang Jiang herring. During the season around 
Chingming Festival, when the willow cotton flurries from the 
trees, the Chang Jiang herring swims upstream from the mouth of 
the Chang Jiang to spawn and this is the time when the flesh is 
full and tasty. When I invited Youde in Hong Kong to make this 
visit, I promised him an opportunity to taste this fish. I went 
to Nanjing a day early and asked the head of the tourism bureau, 
who was responsible for the visit arrangements, to have some 
Chang Jiang herring for the banquet. In the end, however, Youde 
did not eat herring in Nanjing because during the previous few 
years, the Chang Jiang had been subjected to much industrial 
pollution. Overfishing had also helped cause an annual decrease 
in production so that the market supply was very low. I 
expressed my apologies and promised to make up for it in Wuxi. 
Who would have expected that even in Wuxi we could not achieve 
our wish. 
  After we arrived in Shanghai, Mayor Wang Daohan held a 
banquet for Youde at the Jinjiang Hotel. At the banquet, herring 
unexpectedly appeared on the table, causing me great 
embarrassment. I could only try to explain away my awkwardness 
by saying to Wang Daohan, "You Shanghainese have money and 
means. A Jiangsu product cannot be found in Jiangsu but is found 
in Shanghai!" Everyone laughed. Later I asked Wang Daohan and 
found out that they had especially sent someone to buy the fish 
directly from a fishing boat. [End of Installment No. 58] 
<H5>  [2 Jul 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] I Discuss the "Political System" with Youde; 
Deep Sorrow at the Sudden Death of Youde 
When Youde visited Jiangsu, Britain was already implementing a 
parliamentary system in Hong Kong and there were already 
conflicts between Britain and China. I exchanged views with 
Youde in Wuxi on this issue. With an interpreter for each of us, 
we spent about two hours talking. 
  I initially expressed my appreciation for success of the 
Hong 
Kong British government's economic policies and advisory system. 
After 97, when the new special district government is designed, 
these experiences will be worth studying and preserving as much 
as possible. Because Hong Kong has not had a democratic 
tradition, the implementation of democracy, especially "direct 
elections," should not be done too quickly but one step at a 
time. The future special district government will have to 
protect and balance the interests of different classes. The 
major owners of capital in Hong Kong are most concerned that 
those involved in democratization will change the Hong Kong 
government's current tax system of low taxes and narrowly 
applied taxes. We must give the major capitalists time to 
organize and participate in elections. 
  Youde explained in response to my comments that they were 
designing an essential political system and would not concern 
themselves only with the interests of the capital owners. On the 
question of "direct elections," the Hong Kong government had 
made detailed calculations and felt it could maintain "control" 
and that the Chinese Government could rest at ease. "Our 
attitude is very cautious," he said. I did not critique his 
essential political system as a colonial dictatorship 
representing the British capitalist class but said only "I hope 
that Britain will not use the same methods in Hong Kong as those 
used in withdrawing from other colonies." Hong Kong's conditions 
and qualifications are not the same as those of other colonies. 
Particularly on the economic front, both Britain and China share 
the same desire to maintain economic prosperity in Hong Kong. 
Furthermore, Britain would only withdraw after 12 more years. We 
wanted to join with Britain to strive for unity among all 
circles in Hong Kong and avoid social divisiveness or the 
creation of negative effects. I used terms like "we hope that 
Britain will not violate empiricism." Although our views were 
diametrically opposed to each other, our purpose was cooperation 
and the atmosphere was always friendly. 
  Later, when I discussed Hong Kong political reform with 
newly 
appointed Governor Wilson, I also used the expression "don't 
violate empiricism." 
  While Youde was visiting Jiangsu, he casually mentioned that 
he and his wife were both very interested in ancient Chinese 
culture. I suggested that they visit Xi'an to see the recently 
unearthed Qin Dynasty terracotta army. Youde was very pleased 
and indicated that he wanted to find an opportunity to make that 
visit. After returning to Hong Kong, Youde was very busy with 
official duties and did not have time to go, but his wife wished 
to go without him. I asked the authorities in Xi'an to issue the 
invitation and make the arrangements. 
  When Youde died, his wife was touring Xi'an, accompanied by 
Deng Lianru. When the news arrived, I was in Beijing 
participating in a meeting of the Hong Kong Macao Office. 
Everyone felt that it was terribly sudden, because on the 
previous evening, Youde had attended a banquet with Ji Pengfei 
at the Diaoyutai Guest House. I was also present. His health and 
mood appeared fine. He even drank several glasses of Maotai 
liquor. I heard that he had a heart attack during the night and 
was found lying on the floor. Some people guess that he had an 
attack and was going to get some medicine, but it was too late 
and he collapsed. I felt great sorrow that he died this way. I 
attended his funeral after returning to Hong Kong. Having been 
adversaries with him for some time, I felt that we had come to 
know each other well and he was a person with whom I could 
communicate. 
  [Text] Joint Rescue of the Stock Market; Hong Kong 
and Britain Jointly "Rescue the Market" Through Pu Weishi 
  On October 19, 1987, the United States New York stock market 
crashed, and the world stock market crisis hit Hong Kong. The 
Hang Seng Index lost about 1,000 points in one day. It was 
called "Black Friday." The Hong Kong stock exchange Chairman Li 
Fuzhao announced that the market would close four days. All the 
stockholders in the market were in a constant state of anxiety, 
and it was a miserable scene. 
  On that day it happened that Beijing's Vice Mayor Zhang 
Baifa 
was in Hong Kong seeking donations to prepare funding for the 
Asian Games. I had invited a group of commercial magnates to a 
banquet at the Meilihua Hotel, intending to ask them for 
generous donations at the banquet. At that time I knew about the 
stock market crisis, and we were discussing it endlessly even 
before the meal. Furthermore, I knew that many among the guests 
had experienced great losses. Although they attended the event, 
they looked as if their thoughts were elsewhere and they were 
simply forcing themselves to fulfill their obligations to 
attend. I intervened with Zhang Baifa, "Don't bring up the 
question of donations at the banquet today. Leave it for another 
day." Zhang Baifa indicated that he understood and agreed. 
  I asked stock expert Xiang Zhiqiu, known as the "Great 
Knight 
Xiang," for advice. He suggested: "The Hong Kong government 
should come out to rescue the stocks." He briefly explained his 
reasoning. Although I did not completely comprehend, I grasped 
the phrase "the government can come to the rescue." 
  Two days later, Jiang Wengui, Chairman of the Hong Kong 
Macao 
Management Office of the Bank of China, called and asked to see 
me concerning an urgent issue relating to the stock market. I 
asked him to come over immediately. He told me that Hui Feng 
Chairman Pu Weishi had asked the Bank of China to work with him 
to rescue the stock market. Pu had indicated that this was also 
the desire of the Hong Kong British government. A total of two 
billion Hong Kong dollars was needed. Three parties would 
contribute the funds. The Hong Kong government would provide one 
billion, Hui Feng would provide 500 million, and the Bank of 
China would give 500 million. Jiang asked for my view. I 
immediately convened the economic leadership team of the Working 
Committee to discuss this. Everyone agreed that relations 
between China and Britain were very friendly, and since this 
request had come from the British Government, we could agree to 
cooperate in rescuing the market. Hui Feng, however, had a much 
larger volume of business in Hong Kong than the Bank of China 
and a much larger interest in the stock market. The Bank of 
China should not be asked to carry as large a burden. At the 
same time, "rescuing the market" would also include a certain 
risk which someone would have to carry but not the Bank of China 
alone. The Bank of China would not demand interest, regardless 
of the amount provided. All at the meeting agreed that "Society 
would know that the Bank of China had joined in the `rescue of 
the market.' This would indicate the Chinese Government's 
support of the Hong Kong stock market with greater political 
influence than economic influence." [End of Installment No. 59] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20441 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar015___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  8 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0118A Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 3 - 6 Jul 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0118A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installment No 60-63 of the serialized memoirs of Xu Jiatun </F>
(6079 1367 1470): "Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
<H5>  [3 Jul 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] Joint Rescue of the Stock Market -- Finance 
Department Head Zhai Kecheng Asks for Joint Rescue of Stock 
Disaster 
I telegrammed our conclusions to the Chinese Communist Party 
Central Committee and to the State Council, asking for approval. 
  The next day, the Chairman of Hui Feng asked to see me at 
the 
XINHUA SHE Branch. When we met, he brought up the same request. 
I responded that, in principle, it could be considered and that 
I had already telegrammed Beijing to ask for guidance. That 
afternoon or the next day I would be able to tell him the 
results. I also mentioned to him, "It would not be quite fair 
for Hui Feng and the Bank of China to put up 500 million each. 
You should put up a bit more." Pu Weishi indicated his gratitude 
for the cooperation of the Bank of China and said that the 
amount put up by each could be negotiated. At the same time, the 
Foreign Affairs Office of the XINHUA SHE Branch received the 
same request from the Political Department of the Hong Kong 
government. Finance Department Director Zhai Kecheng also asked 
someone to convey the same request to me. (Hong Kong British 
government officials had never done this before.) I conveyed the 
same message to him that I had given to Pu Weishi and asked him 
to give it consideration. 
  After dinner every night, I waited for a response from 
Beijing and, at the same time, asked some experts to give me 
lessons in the stock market. I wanted to study the stock market 
situation and also to research the participation of Chinese 
capital in the stock exchange. My preliminary understanding was 
that, apart from "Guangda" (which was operated by Wang Guangying 
and reported directly to the State Council), there was little 
participation. It was not clear how much XINHUA SHE's "Shin 
Long," a "periodic indicator," had lost, but the figure was not 
large. At that time, the regular meeting of the National 
People's Congress Standing Committee was beginning and I had 
been contacted to attend. Because of the stock market rescue, I 
had sent a telegram to the Standing Committee of the National 
People's Congress asking for leave to stay in Hong Kong and join 
the Hong Kong British government's "rescue of the market." 
  On the third day, Jiang Wengui of the Bank of China called 
me 
several times to say that Hui Feng was anxious to get a 
response. Pu Weishi also called me once directly to ask the same 
thing. They were clearly anxious. At about three o'clock in the 
morning, Zhai Kecheng sent someone to find me and ask for the 
results (during those few days, I never slept until the early 
morning hours). I immediately placed a direct call to Zhao 
Ziyang. I assumed he would be sleeping. When the call went 
through, my first words were, "I must have awakened you." I 
would not have guessed that the response would be "it's nothing, 
we are having a meeting." I told him about the "joint rescue of 
the market" and that the Hong Kong government was extremely 
anxious. I asked him to give a response as soon as possible. 
Zhao Ziyang said "We are discussing it now. I'll ask Comrade 
Jingfu to tell you about it." Zhang Jingfu, Secretary-General of 
the Central Economic Leading Group, then asked me about my 
situation over the phone and gave me this response, "We agree 
with your suggestion to support the Hong Kong British government 
and participate in the rescue of the market. They must agree to 
three conditions: The first is that the main burden must be 
carried by the Hong Kong British government. The second is that 
our burden must not be as much as Hui Feng's. If they put up 500 
million, we will put up a little less. The Central Committee has 
agreed to allow the Bank of China to put up 300 million. The 
third is that the Hong Kong British government must guarantee 
that they will be responsible for any losses incurred by the 
Bank of China." I immediately told Jiang Wengui and asked him to 
inform our counterparts. During this period, the Bank of China 
Group also issued a talk on supporting the stock market to 
reassure people. 
  Afterwards, some people told me that Hui Feng not only did 
not lose money during the stock market disaster but actually 
reaped great profits through the "market rescue." A certain Hong 
Kong tycoon also made a huge profit. Some people thought that 
the Chinese Government and the NEW CHINA NEWS AGENCY had done a 
"foolish" thing. Some colleagues in the economic leading group 
in the News Agency felt the same way. I explained that we should 
not just look at this in economic terms but consider it mainly 
from a political perspective. Our support for the Hong Kong 
British government and cooperation with them let Hong Kong and 
the international scene know that we support the stipulation of 
the Joint Communique -during the 12 years remaining of British 
control of Hong Kong, China will cooperate and coordinate with 
Britain. How can this be "foolish?" Wang Guangying's stock 
transactions were approved by the State Council as a "trial." He 
did not admit to any losses and we had no way of verifying this. 
"Shin Long" as a "periodic indicator" lost over 10 million Hong 
Kong dollars. The other companies with Chinese funding had not 
yet been allowed to participate in the stock market and did not 
not lose much. This stock market disaster increased their 
understanding of the stock market to a certain degree. 
  3. Tearing Down and Moving the Walled City of Kowloon: 
Sending Qiao Zonghuai To Participate in the Organization of a 
Joint Team 
In 1986, the British Government directly informed the Ministry 
of Foreign Affairs of their intent to demolish Kowloon's Walled 
City and move out its residents. Qiao Zonghuai brought back this 
news and added that the Hong Kong and Macao Office and the 
Ministry of Foreign Affairs leaned toward agreement but wanted 
the views of the Working Committee. 
  The Walled City of Kowloon was still Chinese territory in 
name but, in fact, China could not control it. The British also 
could not control it, due the restrictions of the treaties. 
Furthermore, the China U.K. Joint Communique had already 
confirmed that Britain would return Hong Kong to China in 1997. 
What motivation could the British Government have for 
demolishing the Walled City now and turning it into a park? 
That was worth careful consideration. The strongest possibility 
was that Britain wanted to do more good works to leave a good 
impression on the people of Hong Kong. 
  I went to the Walled City and learned that many residents 
there made their living on the special characteristics of the 
Walled City. For example, unlicensed dentists, many of whom were 
not at all itinerant charlatans but medical practitioners from 
the mainland, with relatively long academic training and good 
standing in the medical community in the mainland. They had come 
to Hong Kong for various reasons but could not practice medicine 
in Hong Kong due to the restrictions of Hong Kong law. Thus, 
they were forced to practice in the Walled City to make a 
living. What would happen to their livelihood when the Walled 
City was demolished? 
  At first, I did not approve of demolishing and moving the 
Walled City at that time. I especially did not agree with the 
reason given by some people in the Hong Kong and Macao Office 
that "it will be trouble in the future anyway, why not let the 
British deal with it and let the British Government pay for it." 
How can a responsible government worry about being troubled on 
behalf of its citizens? Doesn't the Hong Kong British government 
get its funding from taxes paid by Hong Kong residents? Doesn't 
it use the money of our Hong Kong compatriots? 
  Many colleagues at the News Agency Branch, including Qiao 
Zonghuai, approved of demolishing and moving the Walled City. I 
sent him to ask for the views of the local residents' welfare 
promotion society. Their response was that they could accept 
being moved if certain conditions were met. Thus, I agreed with 
the suggestion to demolish and move the Walled City under 
certain conditions. The two firm stipulations were: First, the 
Hong Kong government would have to take responsibility for 
living arrangements for residents removed from the Walled City 
and provide conditions for their livelihood, with better housing 
after the move than their current residences. Unlicensed 
dentists must be given a means to continue their practices or 
assistance in changing professions. Second, some members of the 
residents' self-governance organizations must be allowed to 
participate in the Hong Kong government's group which is 
organizing the demolition and removal and their opinions must be 
respected. 
  Qiao Zonghuai informed Beijing and they agreed. Qiao 
Zonghuai 
was also in touch with the relevant people in the Hong Kong 
British government and communicated with them on behalf of the 
Hong Kong and Macao Office, the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, and 
the NEW CHINA NEWS AGENCY branch. Later we designated him to 
participate in the China-U.K. Joint Work Team organizing the 
demolition and move, but this was not made public. [End of 
Installment No. 60] 
<H5>  [4 Jul 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] Solving the Ka Wah Bank Crisis Hong Kong 
British Government Agrees To Use Foreign Exchange Fund to 
Guarantee Bad Loans; CITIC gets Approval To Take Control, Jin 
Deqin becomes Chairman of the Board 
  In 1985, a crisis occurred at Ka Wah Bank, for reasons 
similar to those which had caused crises in a series of ethnic 
Chinese-owned middle and small sized banks since 1983. In 
addition to the effects of the sluggish economy in Hong Kong 
since 1982, many of these banks were family-owned, with 
inappropriate internal management and illegal loans, including 
too many bad loans. 
  Ka Wah Bank was a family bank owned by the Chen family. When 
the crisis occured, they went to the Hong Kong Macao Management 
Office of the Bank of China and to the China Travel Agency of 
Hong Kong hoping that Chinese funds could be used to invest in 
their stock and help them overcome the crisis. 
  At that time, the China Travel Agency had obtained the 
approval of the Overseas Chinese Committee (the State Committee 
for Overseas Chinese Affairs, the director of which at that time 
was Liao Hui) to work with a Malaysian businessman and 
considered investing in Ka Wah Bank stock. Perhaps because the 
bank was already having difficulty maintaining, the Hong Kong 
British government could not allow any further delay which could 
cause a total banking crisis. Therefore, the Hong Kong Office 
for Oversight of the Banking Industry sought out Jiang Wengui of 
the Hong Kong and Macao Management Office of the Bank of China 
to ask for China's assistance in solving the problems of Ka Wah 
Bank. 
  When Hang Lung Bank, Overseas Investment Trust Bank, Union 
Bank, and other banks had experienced crises in the past, the 
Hong Kong British government had handled the problem, to avoid 
disrupting the order of the whole finance market, maintain Hong 
Kong's position as a finance center and guarantee interest on 
deposits. In the case of Hang Lung Bank, for example, the Hong 
Kong British government enacted a new law and mobilized 
government foreign exchange reserve funds to take it over as a 
government bank. 
  The Hong Kong Management Office of the Bank of China brought 
the question to the Working Committee's Economic Leading Group 
to discuss. I was the leader of the Group. We discussed three 
different aspects of the issue. 
  One - After the two countries signed the China 
U.K. Joint Communique, the relationship between China and 
Britain had developed well. If the Hong Kong British government 
was now having difficulty handling the Hong Kong finance market, 
we should cooperate with them. We guessed that the reason they 
were now asking for China's assistance may have been related to 
the Hong Kong public reaction and criticism from all circles 
they had received the previous times when they had come to the 
rescue by directly using foreign exchange funds. 
  Two - According to the preliminary understanding 
of a Bank of China representative sent to examine Ka Wah Bank's 
books, Ka Wah had made a large number of bad loans. Many of 
these were made in the name of another holding company belonging 
to the family which did not have the means to repay the loans. 
This was a violation of Hong Kong's banking laws. Furthermore, 
many of the bank's high ranking officers were family members who 
did not concern themselves with the bank's losses or profits but 
still drew high salaries. 
  Therefore, the Bank of China Hong Kong Office had two views 
on whether to acquire stock in Ka Wah. One view was opposed to 
assisting Ka Wah, due to its poor management and bad loans. The 
other view was that, from a political perspective, we could 
consider helping, if the Hong Kong government were willing to 
take care of the bad loans. 
  Three - On the question of funding from China - 
the Overseas Chinese Committee had already agreed that the Hong 
Kong China Travel Agency could work with an overseas Chinese 
businessman to buy stock, but China International Trust and 
Investment Corporation [CITIC] was also interested in being a 
sole invester in the stock. If we agreed to provide assistance 
and cooperate with the British, who would provide the funding 
from China? Would we purchase stock or receive it? We needed to 
make a policy decision. 
  Apart from the third aspect, the group decided that we 
should 
agree to the British request, but we should ask them to 
guarantee the bad loans. We reported this simultaneously to the 
Central Committee, the State Council, and the People's Bank of 
China to ask for approval. We also asked Beijing to determine 
who would contribute the funds from China. 
  I immediately went to Shenzhen and telephoned my report to 
Zhang Jingfu, asking him to give us a reply as quickly as 
possible. The Central Overseas Chinese Committee and CITIC both 
showed a great deal of interest in Ka Wah. The Central Overseas 
Chinese Committee wanted the Hong Kong China Travel Agency to go 
to Chen Daming (who was responsible for the work of the Hong 
Kong and Macao Overseas Chinese Committee) and ask for his 
support in participating in the stock or taking over control. 
CITIC Chairman of the Board Rong Yiren had his Vice Chairman 
Tang Kewei seek out my views. I indicated that in principle we 
had no objections, as long as the State Council and the relevant 
ministries agreed. But the Central Overseas Chinese Committee 
had the same idea, and they had already had contact with Ka Wah 
before CITIC did. Therefore, we asked all parties to look to 
Beijing to decide who would paricipate in the stock and who 
would take control. 
  The final result was that the Hong Kong British government 
agreed to use foreign exchange funds to provide guarantees and 
to take responsibility for the bank's bad loans. The State 
Council gave approval for Rong Yiren's CITIC to take control and 
sent former Bank of China Chairman of the Board Jin Deqin to 
serve as Ka Wah's Chairman of the Board and General Manager. 
After one year of rectification, the Bank was finally 
straightened out. [End of Installment No. 61] 
<H5>  [5 Jul 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] Temporary Cooperation--The Storm over the 
Daya Bay Nuclear Plant: At Li Peng's Request, I Encourage 
Kadoorie to Sign Agreement; Deng Xiaoping Instruction to 
"Resist" the Anti-Nuclear Tide 
  [Text] The Daya Bay nuclear power plant project was 
initiated by the Hong Kong China Power and Light Company long 
ago. Later, the Hong Kong British government, with the agreement 
of the Chinese Government, also decided to participate in the 
establishment of a nuclear power plant at Daya Bay. At the end 
of April 1986, the nuclear power plant accidents at Chernobl in 
the Soviet Union and at Three Mile Island in the United States 
caused the residents of Hong Kong to fear for their future 
safety and inspired an unprecedented extent of anti-nuclear 
activities among the citizens of Hong Kong. 
  The nuclear reactor for this nuclear plant was built by a 
French manufacturer, and the power generating equipment was 
built by a British manufacturer. The joint venture between a 
company set up by the Chinese Ministry of Water Resources and 
Electric Power and the China Power and Light Company, led by 
Hong Kong British industrialist Kadoorie, received support from 
both governments. The "Daya Bay Nuclear" Agreement signed by 
both sides in March 1986, seven years from the inception of the 
project, received a positive reaction from society. The view was 
that the plant would help maintain the confidence of Hong Kong 
and foreign businessmen in investment in China. During the final 
phase of negotiations between the two parties there was a period 
when they bargained and disputed but could not reach agreement 
over a few "conditions." At that time Li Peng was the Vice 
Premier charged with the oversight of water resources and energy 
affairs. He invited me to come to the Shenzhen Hotel where he 
asked me to act as an intermediary with Kadoorie. He was 
extremely polite to me, constantly addressing me as "Bureau 
Chief." He explained the situation to me and asked me to speak 
with Kadoorie. I was to transmit Li Peng's position that if 
agreement could not be reached, China would disband the project. 
(Exactly which issues were at an impasse, I did not know.) In 
the end, when he escorted me to the door of the hotel, he smiled 
and said, "Sorry to trouble the `Bureau Chief' for his help." 
  After I returned to Hong Kong, I invited Kadoorie to a meal 
at the "Meixin" restaurant in the World Trade Center Building. I 
conveyed Li Peng's view to him very indirectly, without bringing 
up the word "disband." I told him that Vice Premier Li hoped for 
cooperation and that Hong Kong already understood the bottom 
line of the relevant ministries on the disputed areas. I said 
that Hong Kong already knew that Li would not change his mind 
and that we hoped to come to agreement and not have to terminate 
the discussions. Kadoorie did not demur. It appeared that he 
understood. The old man may have been suffering from Parkinson's 
disease. His hands shook so badly that it was difficult for him 
to feed himself, so I assisted him repeatedly. Not long 
afterwards, the parties signed an agreement. 
  The Daya Bay nuclear power plant is located 50 kilometres 
from Hong Kong, upwind from Hong Kong. In the beginning, some 
environmental groups opposed it. Then some pressure groups 
joined in. Finally, in late April the anti-nuclear movement 
developed great momentum and, with reputedly one million 
signatures, sent representatives to carry these signatures to 
Beijing to petition the State Council to either cancel 
construction or move the Daya Bay nuclear power plant. 
  The anti-nuclear movement was growing daily. The slogan most 
appealing to the people of Hong Kong was, when it comes to 
safety, "don't be afraid of most cases, just be afraid of what 
if." This was an irrational but emotionallly appealing notion 
which was very difficult to counteract. At the same time, it 
also indicated a lack of confidence in China's management 
ability. 
  I made a special trip to Beijing to see Zhao Ziyang and ask 
him "Could we consider moving the nuclear power plant to another 
site further away from Hong Kong?" 
  When Hua Guofeng was in charge, I was working in Jiangsu. I 
had obtained permission from the Central Committee to construct 
China's first nuclear power plant at Changshan in Jiangyin 
County. The generating power was to be 900,000 kilowatts. We 
also set up a nuclear power research institute in Suzhou to do 
preparation work. Thus, the Ministry of Water Resources and 
Electric Power decided to move its planned project for a 
Ministry-designed 300,000 kilowatt nuclear power plant in 
Jiangsu to Qinshan in Zhejiang in order to concentrate all 
resources on a major nuclear power plant. Later, the movement to 
oppose "premature advances" forced the "dismount" of the 
Changshan nuclear power plant project. At the beginning of 
opening up and reform, Guangdong Province grabbed the 
opportunity and moved this "dismounted" project to Daya Bay to 
"remount" it. 
  I joked with Zhao Ziyang, "If the nuclear power plant were 
still in Jiangsu, we wouldn't have this problem!" Zhao Ziyang 
responded "This issue has already been considered. Either it 
stays where it is or it is moved elsewhere. Comrade Xiaoping has 
aleady inquired into this matter, so we must follow his 
opinion." Zhao told me to wait a few days. 
  The next day Zhao Ziyang called me to his office and told 
me, 
"Comrade Xiaoping's view is that we must hold firm and not 
change our original plans. Comrade Xiaoping's meaning is that if 
China cannot hold firm now it will be even more difficult to 
hold firm if the Hong Kong government runs into trouble later." 
  The Central Committee had decided. After I returned to Hong 
Kong, I could strive for the assistance of the Hong Kong British 
government in making every effort to work on the Hong Kong 
people. 
  The Working Committee considered two points on this "nuclear 
panic" and "nuclear demonstrations" movement." There must be an 
appropriate response to "pressure." We must strive for the 
support of the Hong Kong people and quell the disturbances. 
First we must work for the cooperation of the Hong Kong British 
government in solving this problem, because the nuclear power 
plant is a cooperative project between China and Britain. 
  The Hong Kong British government was very cooperative. They 
sent a delegation of Executive Council and Legislative Council 
members to France, the United States, and Japan to gather 
information, and the delegation concluded that safety could be 
guaranteed. In November of the same year, Finance Department 
Director Zhai Kecheng issued a public report saying that the 
approved agreements to purchase power from the nuclear power 
plant and to allow Hong Kong China Power and Light Company to 
participate in the nuclear power plant plan could not be 
arbitrarily abandoned without greatly affecting the credibilty 
and foreign relations of Hong Kong. 
  China and Britain both set up nongovernmental organizations 
to enhance the citizens' understanding of the nuclear power 
plant. The Nuclear Safety Advisory Council was also established 
at that time and is still operating. We sent the News Agency 
Deputy Chen Daming to liaison with the Ministry of Water 
Resources and Electric Power and the Daya Bay nuclear power 
plant planning office. With the assistance of the Chinese 
Academy of Sciences, we published a research report on the 
technical safety of the nuclear plant. The conclusions were 
consistent: the French style reactor is safe and different from 
the one used in the Soviet Union. We also organized a group of 
specialists from the mainland to present a nuclear technology 
fair in Hong Kong and took people from Hong Kong to visit the 
Daya Baya construction site. Nuclear power experts from China 
and natural science professors from several universities in Hong 
Kong published articles in the mass media on the world progress 
in nuclear power technology, the effects of leaked radiation on 
the human body, etc. 
  The Hong Kong government provided close cooperation on all 
of 
these efforts. Although many people in Hong Kong still object to 
the plant, the intense "anti-nuclear power plant" wave gradually 
subsided. [End of Installment No. 62] 
<H5>  [6 July 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] The Storm at Beidaihe (1) Sudden Attack 
NEW CHINA NEWS AGENCY Branch Elevated; Conflicts Arise 
between Hong Kong Macao-Working Committee and the Ministry of 
Foreign Affairs; Ji Pengfei Wants Self-Criticism of Hong Kong 
Macao Working Committee at Beidaihe 
  [Text] In the summer of 1986, the Chinese Communist Party 
Central Committee office called me to Beijing for a meeting. 
When I arrived in Beijing, the person who met me from the office 
told me to go to Beidaihe where the authorities of the Central 
Committee were holding a meeting. Ji Pengfei had also gone there. 
  After I arrived at Beidaihe, I went to see Ji Pengfei. He 
did 
not say much but just told me to rest for a couple days. On the 
next day, he sent a secretary to deliver two batches of 
materials to me. These were drafts of two documents under 
preparation for transmission to the central committees of all 
the provinces and municipalities. One was on the work in Hong 
Kong and included a critique of the current work of the Hong 
Kong Macao Working Committee as well as regulations for 
personnel sent from all localities to Hong Kong and Macao. The 
second document was several principles which should be upheld by 
the Chinese side during the drafting of the Basic Law. After 
reading these documents, I could see that the first one was 
actually a criticism of our work in Hong Kong and was directed 
against me. The submission of a document for discussion by the 
Central Committee's Political Bureau, as a plan to use a formal 
document of the Central Committee to report my "errors" to all 
the provinces, municipalities, ministries and commissions of the 
entire country, without even discussing it with me first, was 
not a normal approach. I read the documents in the morning and 
called up Ji Pengfei at noon. I said, "I have read both 
documents and have no objection to the one on the `Basic Law' 
but I do object to the other document. Has this document been 
finalized? If not, and it is discussed at a meeting of the 
Central Committee, I intend to speak and raise my views on this 
document. I request your view on handling the matter this way." 
  Ji Pengfei indicated that he wished to consider this a 
while. 
That evening, he asked the secretary to inform me that he had 
discussed this with Secretariat Secretary Hu Qili and that, at 
the meeting the next day, the Central Committee would only 
discuss the document on the Basic Law. Conditions were not yet 
ripe for discussions of the other document and therefore it 
would not be discussed at this meeting. Thus, the matter was 
temporarily dropped. 
  As soon as I began working in Hong Kong, the Hong Kong Macao 
Working Committee was elevated to a central agency, the 
equivalent level of a Provincial government, under the direct 
supervision of the Central Committee. The Hong Kong Macao Office 
of the State Council and the Hong Kong Macao Working Committee 
became "brother organizations" at the same level. According to 
the organizational principles of the Chinese Communist Party, 
local party committees should accept guidance on work from 
central government ministries and commissions. The position of 
the Hong Kong Macao Working Committee within the party differed 
from that during Wang Kuang's era in that, at that time, Wang 
was supervised by Liao Chengzhi, who served as representative of 
the Central Committee, whereas we were supervised directly by 
the Central Committee. On everyday tasks, Wang Kuang could not 
submit reports or requests for guidance directly to the Central 
Committee, the State Council or any authority of the central 
government. After I assumed office, according to our 
organizational principles, the reports of the Hong Kong Macao 
Working Committee could be submitted to the Central Committee or 
the State Council. After receiving the document, the Secretary 
General, the Standing Committee Secretary, or Standing 
Vice-Premier, of the Central Committee or the State Council 
would then direct the document, with instructions to offer 
criticism or implement a task to the relevant ministries. During 
the first few months, I followed this procedure. Later I heard 
that the Ministry of Foreign Affairs and the Hong Kong and Macao 
Office had reacted negatively to this. Therefore, I had all 
reports and guidance requests addressed to the Central Committee 
and the State Council readdressed to the "Central Committee, the 
State Council, cc: the Hong Kong and Macao Office." If the 
report concerned party issues only, then it would be addressed 
only to the Central Committee. If it concerned foreign affairs, 
it would be sent to the "State Council, cc: Hong Kong and Macao 
Office; Ministry of Foreign Affairs." At the same time, for 
issues of a purely business nature, or relating to a ministry, 
reports and guidance requests would not be submitted under the 
name of the Working Committee or the Hong Kong Branch Office but 
submitted directly by the relevant ministry to the Hong Kong and 
Macao Office or the Ministry of Foreign Affairs. Hu Qili once 
said to me, "the document header does not need to include the 
Hong Kong and Macao Office, we will assign the document to the 
relevant ministry to handle." To smooth out relations, I 
continued to use the "courtesy copy" method. Ji Pengfei was a 
senior member within the party and my long-time superior. I had 
always respected him. When he assumed the Directorship of the 
Hong Kong Macao Office, at the request of the Central Committee, 
he took on the supervision of the work in Hong Kong and Macao 
and became my direct supervisor. When I needed to report to or 
request guidance from the Central Committee or the State 
Council, in addition to written reports, I always first made a 
verbal report to Ji Pengfei and followed his guidance. 
  During the past few years, there have been many changes in 
the assignment of cadres to the Hong Kong and Macao Working 
Committee and the authority to assign mainland cadres to work in 
the Hong Kong Branch of the NEW CHINA NEWS AGENCY. In fact, 
there was a change in the authority of the Hong Kong and Macao 
Office and they strongly resisted it. Based on our request, the 
Hong Kong and Macao Office relinquished the authority to assign 
working level personnel (technician level) and allowed the Hong 
Kong and Macao Working Committee to handle this matter. They 
were reluctant, however, to relinquish the authority to assign 
cadres. Later, the Central Organizational Bureau intervened and 
decided that Office level cadres would be selected and assigned 
by the Working Committee, with passport procedures handled by 
the Hong Kong and Macao Office and the Ministry of Foreign 
Affairs. This was later expanded to the Division level. Finally 
it was decided that cadres equivalent to the vice-minister level 
would also be nominated and chosen by the Working Committee, 
with approval from the Central Organizational Bureau. The 
organization procedures would be handled by the Central 
Organizational Bureau and the foreign affairs procedures would 
be handled by the Hong Kong and Macao Office and the Ministry of 
Foreign Affairs. Of course, I would not venture to guess the 
mood of the Hong Kong and Macao Office after the authority was 
released to this latter degree. 
  From the chilly reception when I assumed office to the 
negative reception at the Shenzhen Meeting, from the debate 
stirred up by the Kowloon Walled City to the handling of the 
book storm, I gradually came to recognize that there were many 
conflicts between myself and the Hong Kong and Macao Office and 
the Ministry of Foreign Affairs on the understanding, specific 
work approach, and policies on Hong Kong. Furthermore, these 
conflicts were continuously growing. Although this "circular" 
type document was temporarily not to be submitted to the Central 
Committee for discussion, the matter was not really over. I had 
a premonition that before long there would be trouble. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20442 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar015___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  8 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs 67-70 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0134A Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 10-13 Jul 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0134A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installments No. 67-70 of the serialized memoirs of Xu </F>
Jiatun (6079 1367 1470): "Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
<H5>  [10 Jul 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] Reshuffling Leadership Groups of the Hong Kong 
and Macao Working Committee (Part 1 of 2) 
  Mao Junnian [3029 6874 1628], Qiao Zongzhun [0829 1350 0402] 
Promoted Deputy Directors 
  Song Renqiong [1345 3067 2781] and a deputy director of the 
Central Organization Department in charge of Hong Kong and Macao 
cadres asked to see me together to ask about my opinions on 
reshuffling the leading group of the Hong Kong and Macao working 
committee. 
  I put forward a plan under which Li Zhuwen [2621 6308 2429] 
would retire and be transferred back to the mainland and Mao 
Junnian and Qiao Zongzhun would be promoted deputy secretary and 
deputy director, respectively. I also asked the CPC Central 
Committee to name someone to help me assume overall charge of 
the work as my right-hand man and succeed me in the future. The 
deputy director suggested that since Chen Daming [7115 6671 
2494] had also reached retirement age, we should consider 
recalling both him and Li Zhuwen to the mainland. I realized the 
intent behind this suggestion--to make the change less traumatic 
for the latter--and indicated my agreement. But I did note that 
Chen Daming, being from Guangdong, had an intimate knowledge of 
the situation in Hong Kong. I proposed that he stay on as 
adviser for a period of time, as Qi Feng [4359 6912] had done in 
the past. Song Renqiong said he could go along with the idea of 
Chen Daming remaining in Hong Kong to help with the work, but 
not as adviser. As for my bold suggestion of promoting the two 
men, they indicated that in principle they would consider having 
the Organization Department send people to Hong Kong to inspect 
their performance, with a decision to be taken later. They 
instructed me not to discuss the elders' retirement with the 
working committee upon my return to Hong Kong since it was up to 
the CPC Central Committee to decide what to do. As for promoting 
the new people, the working committee should solicit opinions 
broadly. 
  Back in Hong Kong, I sought out the views of cadres above 
the 
office level in all working committee organs as instructed by 
Song Renqiong. While there was no consensus, the reactions were 
largely positive. The inspection group from the Central 
Organization Department came and concluded that the two people 
should be appointed deputy director but refused to consider 
making one a deputy secretary for the time being. The leader of 
the inspection group and his deputy briefed me on the findings 
of their group and asked for my opinions. I voiced no objection 
and agreed to try out Mao Junnian and Qiao Zongzhun on the job 
before reconsidering whether or not they should be appointed 
deputy secretary. 
  Zheng Hua [6774 5478] was very cautious even about the most 
minute of things. He did what he was told by his superiors in 
all things, never taking a personal initiative, and lacked drive 
and creativity, which made him unfit to be my right-hand man. 
More than once I asked the CPC Central Committee to send a 
replacement. On his own initiative, a concerned Hu Yaobang 
nominated Wu Guancheng [0702 1351 2973], then mayor of Wuhan, 
for the position. But it was not long before Hu Yaobang came 
back to me with the word that Wu Guancheng had another job lined 
up and could not come to Hong Kong. He asked me to name another 
person, saying, "You know Jiangsu well. Find someone from 
Jiangsu." I said, "I don't want to do that for fear of causing 
any misunderstanding." There were rumors both within the party 
and in society at large that I was putting together a 
"Jiangsu-Zhejiang faction." He nodded in approval. 
  An overwhelming majority of the cadres on the original Hong 
Kong and Macao working committee were natives of Guangdong, 
which abuts Hong Kong. There is no linguistic barrier between 
the two places, which are bound by numerous ties. For these 
reasons, the cadres from Guangdong got along very well with the 
locals readily, a plus for getting our work done. However, the 
former leaders of the working committee were narrow in thinking 
and sectarian in outlook. To put an end to that situation, we 
must look for new cadres from "all corners of the world." As 
part of my restructuring, I suggested to the CPC Central 
Committee in 1984 that some cadres be transferred from the 
interior to beef up the Hong Kong and Macao working committee. 
  In addition to a few cadres to be transferred directly from 
Beijing by the Central Organization Department, I proposed that 
we go talent-scouting in the four provinces of Guangdong, 
Fujian, Jiangsu, and Zhejiang as well as the municipality of 
Shanghai. The CPC Central Committee accepted the idea and 
decided that the Central Organization Department and the working 
committee should visit the provinces and municipality jointly to 
look for qualified people. Representing the working committee on 
this trip was Zheng Hua. More than a month later, over 20 cadres 
above the office level were selected, most of them the cream of 
the crop in their respective locality, such as Tan Fuyun [6223 
5397 0661] (later assistant to the director of Xinhua She Hong 
Kong office and minister of economic affairs) and Yang Zhenhan 
[2799 2182 3352] (younger brother of Nobel Prize winner Yang 
Zhenning [2799 2182 1337] and head of the Dongnan information 
center), both of Shanghai; Zhang Junsheng [1728 3182 3932] 
(minister of propaganda) of Zhejiang, and Weng Xinqiao [5040 
1800 2890] (vice minister of culture and education) of Fujian. I 
also named several people in Jiangsu, none of whom, however, was 
approved by the provincial CPC committee. Only after some 
negotiations did they agree to the transfer of "scholar" Niu 
Zhao [3662 6856] to help me with writing. The new group of 
cadres got on well with the existing cadres in most cases and 
quickly adapted to the work environment in Hong Kong, giving 
rise to a new atmosphere at Xinhua She Hong Kong office. 
Society's negative perception that Xu was putting together a 
"Jiangsu-Zhejiang faction" reflected the thinking of just a 
handful of people. (Installment No. 67) 
<H5>  [11 Jul 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] Reshuffling Leadership Groups of the Hong Kong 
and Macao Working Committee (Part 2 of 2): Zhang Jingfu [1728 
0513 1133] Recommended Zhu Rongji [2612 3579 1015] As Second In 
Command; I Argued in Favor of Appointing Lu Ping [767 1627] as 
Deputy Director of Xinhua She Hong Kong and Macao Office 
  State Councillor Zhang Jingfu was full of enthusiasm. He 
made 
me this suggestion, "Zhu Rongji (currently member of the 
politburo of the CPC Central Committee and the standing 
committee of the CPC Central Advisory Commission, and vice 
premier of the State Council) is well suited to be your right 
hand man." Zhang Jingfu used to be Zhu Rongji's boss so he knew 
him well. Zhang Jingfu thought highly of his caliber, 
considering him competent and open in his thinking. Naturally I 
welcomed the idea. We talked it over and decided that I would 
ask the CPC Central Committee to let the man go while Zhang 
Jingfu would put in a good word. Some time passed and we heard 
nothing. I asked Zhang Jingfu about it. He said, "The CPC 
Central Committee has decided to appoint Zhu Rongji mayor of 
Shanghai. Go look for somebody else." Once again it did not work 
out. 
  Someone recommended Li Hao [2621 3493], then deputy 
secretary 
general of the State Council, to be my deputy, telling me Zhao 
Ziyang had a high regard for him back when Zhao Ziyang was in 
Guangdong, which was why Li Hao was later transferred to the 
State Council. A transfer to Hong Kong must be approved by Zhao 
Ziyang. Later I met with Zhao Ziyang and asked him to release Li 
Hao. He shook his head and said, "Don't think of asking him." It 
turned out that Tian Jiyun [3944 4764 0061] then vice premier, 
had come to rely heavily on Li Hao's work and was reluctant to 
release him. Not long afterwards, however, Li Hao was 
transferred to Shenzhen as both mayor and secretary of the 
Shenzhen CPC committee. So why did Tian Jiyun let him go? Later 
I heard that Li Hao had fallen out with Tian Jiyun over 
something. Privately I congratulated myself on the fact that 
Zhao Ziyang had refused to let Li Hao go. Otherwise I would be 
in big trouble now. 
  I talked to Ji Pengfei [1213 7720 7378] about transferring 
Lu 
Ping to the number two spot on the working committee. I had been 
favorably impressed by him, especially his familiarity with the 
situation in Hong Kong and Macao and his liberated thinking. Ji 
Pengfei said he had already submitted a report to the Central 
Organization Department promoting Lu Ping to be deputy director 
of the Hong Kong and Macao Affairs Office. Later he said to me, 
"I submitted the report a long time ago. For some reason the 
Organization Department has shelved it. Look into that for me 
and put in an explanatory word for Lu Ping." He knew I had close 
ties with the department. After talking to the deputy minister 
involved, I learned that Lu Ping had been a rebel during the 
Cultural Revolution and written big-character posters attacking 
the leadership. I put in a good word for him, "Didn't Li Hou 
behave badly during the Cultural Revolution?" If the mistake was 
not serious and has been admitted to, just let it go." Soon 
afterward the Central Organization Department approved Lu Ping's 
appointment. Did my intercession play a part? I don't know for 
sure. 
  After all these twists and turns, Zheng Hua was still the 
deputy secretary of the working committee. 
  Wang Fang [3769 5364], then minister of public security, 
approached me about transferring Zhang Junsheng to Zhejiang. He 
said, "When Zhang Junsheng balked at coming to Hong Kong, I 
promised him a two-year stint at the end of which he could 
return to the province." Zhang Junsheng himself also asked the 
working committee to send him back to Zhejiang. 
  Before coming to Hong Kong, Zhang Junsheng was deputy 
secretary of the Hangzhou CPC committee as well as deputy mayor 
of the city. The provincial CPC committee had decided to make 
him deputy governor. Aware of this decision, Zhang Junsheng had 
balked at coming to and working in Hong Kong. He yielded to Wang 
Fang's persuasion only after the Hong Kong and Macao working 
committee and the Central Organization Department explicitly 
used the word "borrow" with reference to his appointment. 
  Zhang Junsheng was an enthusiastic and highly adaptable 
worker, liberated in thinking too. In my discussions with Wang 
Fang about him, I had already proposed to the Central 
Organization Department that he be made deputy director of 
Xinhua She Hong Kong Office. The department approved that in 
principle but put off taking a decision until after the 
investigation group had a chance to do its work. I told Wang 
Fang about this and he said, "I can go along with that." 
  The department then proposed, reportedly on the 
recommendation of Yao Yilin [1202 0181 2651], that the deputy 
directorship be offered to Pan Cengxi [3382 2582 6932], a former 
general manager of the ocean-going engine manufacturing company 
(or some such name. I cannot remember the exact title now) under 
the Ministry of Communications. I agreed. Then Zhang Jingfu 
again approached me with another name: Wang Pinqing [3769 0756 
3237], vice minister of foreign economic relations and trade. He 
said that although Wang Pinqing had reached retirement age, he 
had expressed an interest in being deputy director of the Xinhua 
She Hong Kong office to take charge of Chinese capital affairs. 
Since the Central Organization Department had recommended Pan 
Cengxi first and I had approved the decision, my plan being to 
have him assist Zheng Hua handle Chinese capital affairs, I 
explained the situation to Zhang Jingfu and he agreed to 
withdraw his recommendation. 
  The fact that there were 30 to 40 people on the Hong Kong 
and 
Macao working committee rendered it difficult to meet in full 
session, given the reality in Hong. I suggested to the CPC 
Central Committee that it be reconstituted as a new streamlined 
working committee comprising the director, deputy director, and 
the secretary of the Macao working committee so that a meeting 
could be called anytime to discuss and adopt a resolution on a 
matter. In conjunction with the drafting of the Macao Basic Law 
soon to be launched, I also proposed to the CPC Central 
Committee that a Xinhua She macao office be set up to be headed 
by Zhou Ding [0719 7844], instead of having Nanguang Company 
represent the Chinese Government, as originally planned (End of 
Installment No. 68) 
<H5>  [12 Jul 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] Reshuffling Leading Group of Hong Kong and 
Macao Working Committee: Report On Transition Praised by Zhao 
Ziyang; Li Hou, Lu Ping Asked To Keep Their Mouths Shut 
  More than two months later, the CPC Central Committee 
approved the new working committee as follows: 
  Member and secretary of the working committee and director 
of 
XINHUA SHE Hong Kong Office: Xu Jiatun 
  Member and deputy secretary of the committee and deputy 
director of XINHUA SHE Hong Kong Office: Zheng Hua 
  Members of committee and deputy directors of Xinhua She Hong 
Kong Office: Mao Junnian, Qiao Zongzhun, Zhang Junsheng, Pan 
Cengxi 
  Members of committee, secretary of Macao working committee, 
and director of XINHUA SHE Macao office: Zhou Ding 
  Since Deng Xiaoping and the CPC Central Committee asked me 
to 
remain on the job for a while longer, I went to Zhao Ziyang with 
a request that the leading group be reshuffled. I also told him 
there were neither coherent planning nor complete instructions 
in the work of XINHUA SHE Hong Kong office and noted the lack of 
response to a report that the working committee had submitted. I 
told him I would do some more research and studies on the basis 
of the original report and submit to the CPC Central Committee a 
new report outlining plans and policies for Hong Kong during the 
transitional period in the hope that the CPC Central Committee 
would approve it as a basis for our work. I told Zhao Ziyang 
that I would inform Ji Pengfei about this. Zhao Ziyang said 
fine. When I briefed Ji Pengfei, he also was agreeable. Back in 
Hong Kong I spent between three and four months putting together 
a new report and sent a copy of the draft to the Hong Kong and 
Macao Affairs Office for its revisions and comments. The office 
made some changes in wording but otherwise left the content and 
principles largely intact. 
  Next I formally submitted the report to the CPC Central 
Committee, the State Council, and, of course, the Hong Kong and 
Macao Affairs Office and the Ministry of Foreign Affairs. In my 
report I adhered to the ideas I had raised in the heart-to-heart 
talks, ideas that I thought to be correct. In my analysis of 
Hong Kong, for instance, I stuck to the "unrest, division, and 
reorganization" theory, the only change being the deletion of 
the word "great." As for Sino-British relations, I again 
emphasized that the Sino-British conflict lay at the heart of 
the contradiction during the transitional period. In the past, 
we used to say, "There is unity as well as conflict in the 
Sino-British conflict. Emphasize unity and use conflict to 
achieve unity." Now unity had been replaced by cooperation. 
These days we said there were both cooperation and conflict in 
the Sino-British conflict. Emphasize cooperation and use 
conflict to achieve cooperation. Turning to united front work, 
the report emphasized that the main target was intermediate 
forces and that we should continue to zero in on the big 
bourgeoisie and big rightists. Once we won over these people, 
our influence would increase among the intermediate forces. The 
report also reiterated the notion that relying on the 
proletariat, on the one hand, and launching patriotic united 
front work broadly, on the other, were the two wings of Hong 
Kong work. In mass work, the report stressed considering the 
interests of both management and labor. We must do a good job 
not only in working with the laboring people but also in working 
with the residents. Basically the new report elaborated some of 
the points in the original document. 
  After the report was sent to the CPC Central Committee, Zhao 
Ziyang told me in person that it was very well written, that 
they all endorsed the report in principle, and that as far as 
the details were concerned, I should ask Ji Pengfei for his 
opinions. I assumed Zhao Ziyang was speaking for the CPC Central 
Committee and State Council. I told Ji Pengfei what Zhao Ziyang 
had told me. He did not offer many suggestions. I said, "Since 
you are all agreeable, I would like some sort of written 
response. In the future, we will simply do our work based on the 
report." My idea was to have the Hong Kong and Macao Affairs 
Office instead of the CPC Central Committee or State Council 
draft something. I recalled my last words in the heart-to-heart 
meeting: "When something important happens in the future, I 
would ask for instructions." The report was an important event. 
Ji Pengfei verbally agreed at the time that I should have some 
response in black and white just in case. Yet in the end nothing 
ever happened. 
  In Hong Kong work, the Hong Kong and Macao working committee 
took the initiative on many occasions. It occurred to me that 
the Hong Kong and Macao Affairs Office and the Ministry of 
Foreign Affairs were critical of that. During the drafting of 
the Basic Law, Ji Pengfei called countless meetings to discuss 
the detailed issues. We too made many suggestions and did some 
studies on, among other things, the future system of government 
for Hong Kong. Some meetings were held only after the working 
committee asked to hear a report. Li Hou and Lu Ping spoke on 
several occasions and society reacted strongly to their remarks. 
We thought that wasn't quite right. I asked Ji Pengfei time and 
again to tell Lu Ping and Li Hou to cut back on public speaking. 
If they had to open their mouths at all, they should first do 
some thinking. Once or twice I even made the same point to them 
personally. Ji Pengfei did not take any position. 
  These contradictions only intensified after the June 4 
incident. (End of Installment No. 69) 
<H5>  [13 Jul 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] Let the Pearl Sparkle Even More Brightly: 1) 
Campaign To Retain British Capital (Part One of Two); Boosting 
Chinese Capital Would Not Divert Profits From Hong Kong People; 
Possibility of Hong Kong and Shanghai Banking Corporation 
Withdrawing Before 1997 Analyzed 
  Hong Kong earned the name "Pearl of the Orient" because of 
its prosperous economy. How were we to keep the Hong Kong 
economy prosperous and growing so that the "pearl" could sparkle 
even more brightly during the transitional period leading to its 
return to the mainland? This question was of intense interest to 
the CPC Central Committee leadership. It was also what our work 
in Hong Kong was all about. 
  In my work report to the leaders of the CPC Central 
Committee 
in September 1983, I summarized the principle of our economic 
work in Hong Kong with five phrases consisting of 20 characters: 
"Keep British capital, stabilize Hong Kong Chinese capital, woo 
foreign capital, unite overseas Chinese capital, and boost 
Chinese capital." Among the leaders on the CPC Central 
Committee, I believed Zhao Ziyang essentially approved the 
principle, Hu Qili [5170 0796 4539] was even more enthusiastic, 
while Li Xiannian [2621 0341 1819] had a different opinion 
regarding, for instance, the increase of Chinese capital in Hong 
Kong. 
  Within the working committee, most colleagues supported the 
principle. However, top officials at the Bank of China in Hong 
Kong as well as a number of local cadres did not. The bank 
leaders did not consider it an economic principle. I realized 
their perspective was the banking industry, not the Hong Kong 
economy as a whole. I explained to them that we were not in Hong 
Kong to run the place. It was not within our power to put 
forward a coherent set of detailed principles and even if we 
did, it would be to no avail because we could not translate them 
into policies and laws. That would be up to the Hong Kong 
British Government. 
  Some local cadres did not approve of the idea of boosting 
Chinese capital in Hong Kong, which they considered neither 
necessary nor possible. I pointed out that as long as we ran 
Chinese-funded organizations using the same methods commonly 
used in Hong Kong and did not seek privileges or vie for profits 
at the expense of the Hong Kong people, our participation in the 
Hong Kong market would not only add to the wealth of the nation 
as well as that of Hong Kong, but would also provide many new 
opportunities for development for Hong Kong and boost the 
confidence of the locals. The enlarged presence of Chinese 
capital in Hong Kong would also have stabilizing effects on the 
Hong Kong economy in the future. 
  As far as economic work in Hong Kong was concerned, I stuck 
to this 20-character principle, which turned out to be in line 
with the reality in Hong Kong. 
  Among the major British-funded conglomerates in Hong Kong, 
some, like the Hong Kong and Shanghai Banking Corporation, 
Jardine Matheson and Company, and Kadoorie, are basically based 
in Hong Kong, while others, such as Swire and the Chartered 
Bank, have their headquarters in Britain. As Hong Kong Chinese 
capital grew, it has acquired a number of British-funded 
conglomerates. For instance, Hutchison-Whampoa and Wheelock have 
been purchased by Li Jiasheng [2621 0857 6134] and Bao Yugang 
[0545 3768 0474], respectively. Nevertheless, it would be 
difficult for Chinese capital and Hong Kong Chinese capital to 
dislodge British capital from its dominant position in the Hong 
Kong economy in the near future. The standing of the Hong Kong 
and Shanghai Banking Corporation in the local banking industry, 
for example, is unparalleled. 
  British-funded conglomerates are characterized by support 
from the colonial government and owe their rise and development 
to monopolies of varying magnitude. A classic example is the 
Hong Kong and Shanghai Banking Corporation. 
  The Hong Kong and Shanghai Banking Corporation is a 
commercial bank but has been granted a number of special 
privileges by the Hong Kong government that are normally enjoyed 
by a central bank. It can print banknotes and acts as the 
treasurer and cashier of the Hong Kong British government. It 
also supervises and manages financial institutions on behalf of 
the government and takes care of the local banks' account 
settlement, which gives it a knowledge of the business 
activities of other local banks. The Hong Kong and Shanghai 
Banking Corporation serves as chairman of the Hong Kong Banking 
Association. Its board of directors consists almost entirely of 
ex-officio members of the Executive Council and has much say and 
wields a good deal of influence in the formulation of local 
financial and economic policies. There is a local joke that Hong 
Kong has three governors, one of them being the chairman of the 
board of the Hong Kong and Shanghai Banking Corporation, which 
gives you an idea of the bank's standing and role in Hong Kong. 
The bank's board of directors is made up almost entirely of 
Britons. Under the charter of the bank the board chairman is 
elected by the board. In fact, we have never been able to 
determine just who picks the chairman, the Hong Kong British 
government or some organization in London. I have personally 
posed this question to Bao Yugang, an ex-vice chairman of the 
board. He did not know for sure either. According to information 
made available by a long-time employee of the bank, 
decision-making power in the bank resides in the hands of just 
five or six Britons, including the board chairman and its 
general manager. 
  How would the bank react to the prospect of China taking 
back 
Hong Kong? This was something we must study and determine in 
advance. In late 1983 I set up a special investigation group 
made up of people from the economics department and research 
section of the XINHUA SHE Hong Kong office to conduct a study on 
the bank. The gist of its 10,000-character report was that owing 
to the enormous losses suffered by the bank when it withdrew 
from the mainland in 1949, the memory of which still haunts it, 
the bank may leave Hong Kong before 1997 without, however, 
evacuating completely. It would decide whether to remove some or 
most of its operations from Hong Kong depending on the economic 
situation here and in China. 
  This assessment differed from that of the leaders of the 
Bank 
of China in Hong Kong. They believed that "as long as it can 
make money here, the bank will not withdraw from Hong Kong." 
Echoing this viewpoint were the Hong Kong and Macao Affairs 
Office in Beijing, the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, and the head 
office of the Bank of China. No follow-up study was done at the 
time. (70) 
leadership. 
  China's reform and opening up once again brought the Hong 
Kong people's spirit of seizing every available opportunity into 
full play. China was a main target of Hong Kong investments. 
Prior to 1990, Hong Kong had accounted for more than 60 percent 
of all investments made by foreign nations and regions. Today, 
although there are substantial Taiwanese and foreign 
investments, the percentage of Hong Kong investments remains 
high. Today, not only small ad medium-sized businesses are 
investing in the mainland, but some of the biggest names such as 
Li Ka-Sheng and Wu Kuang-zheng [0702 0342 2973], Pao Yu-Kang's 
son-in-law, are also doing business there. No doubt they will be 
very successful. 
  We can say that Hong Kong has not failed to seize every 
political and economic development opportunity the world and 
Southeast Asia have to offer; it has made timely development 
every time. Hong Kong has become a free, open, diversified 
market. Despite its tiny size, it has shown tremendous capacity. 
Today, Hong Kong businessmen and Hong Kong money are showing up 
all over the world. To different extents the continents have 
become Hong Kong's market and business arena. 
  Hong Kong is indeed a miracle to be proud of. 
(Installment No. 70) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20443 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar015___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  8 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs 71-74 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0135A Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 14-17 Jul 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0135A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installments No 71-74 of the serialized memoirs of Xu </F>
Jiatun (6079 1367 1470): "Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
<H5>  [14 Jul 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] Keeping British Capital From Moving Away 
  To keep the Hongkong and Shanghai Banking Corporation 
[H&amp;S 
Banking Corporation] from moving away, the future government for 
the special administrative region will not set up a branch of 
the Central Bank; Li Peng supported Rong Zhijian's [2838 2535 
0256] transfer to Hong Kong to effect a "lian, he, guo" 
[uniting, merging, and nationalizing, or in combination, "United 
Nations"]. 
  Not long ago, Henry Kissinger visited Beijing with a message 
that he had been asked by Mrs Thatcher, at that time British 
prime minister, to transmit verbally to the Chinese leadership: 
"Mrs Thatcher indicated that it was not an idea of the British 
Government that the H&amp;S Banking Corporation merge with the 
British Lloyds Bank, but that it was a business decision of the 
said bank itself, which thereby planned to extend its operations 
to Europe. It is for that reason that they will move 
headquarters to England, namely to London." 
  The fact is that the said bank took the mentioned merger as 
a 
pretext for its actually moving away, and this only confirms the 
earlier opinion held by the Hong Kong and Macao Affairs 
Commission. At a conference discussing suitable countermeasures 
-- a conference presided over by Ji Pengfei -- it was the 
unanimous opinion that assent should be refused to the decision 
of the H&amp;S Banking Corporation. 
  The State Council informed Kissinger of this and requested 
him to transmit the information to Britain. The H&amp;S Banking 
Corporation thereupon withdrew its decision to merge with the 
Lloyds Bank, but merely bought a parcel of Lloyds Bank shares. 
  However, after the 4 June incident, the H&amp;S Banking 
Corporation bought further shares of the Lloyds Bank, 
transferred its headquarters to London, and thus, in the end, 
did realized its intention of moving away. Since the H&amp;S 
Banking 
Corporation occupied a decisive position in financial circles, 
its moving headquarters away from Hong Kong indicated a lack of 
confidence in China's policies, and this has had an adverse 
effect on the mood of Hong Kong residents. On the other hand, it 
is impossible for the said bank to completely withdraw from 
business dealings with Hong Kong and China. Its main profits 
come from Hong Kong and from business with the interior of 
China, a trade which has greatly developed following China's 
reform and opening up to the outside world. 
  Before the H&amp;S Banking Corporation moved away, the 
British 
Government of Hong Kong had gradually transferred some of the 
official central bank functions of the H&amp;S Banking 
Corporation, 
such as its monetary administrative functions, to be exercised 
by another, separately established organization. This fact shows 
that Britain had all along never ceased dispositions with regard 
to the bank's withdrawal, and that it was only after the 4 June 
incident that the H&amp;S Banking Corporation came out openly 
with 
its actual withdrawal. 
  Although views differed as to whether the H&amp;S Banking 
Corporation could effect a withdrawal, the attitude of the Hong 
Kong and Macao Affairs Committee toward the said bank remained 
one of close cooperation and active coordination, as a means of 
strengthening the said bank's confidence in the situation. 
Normal contacts were maintained with the two former presidents 
Shelby and Purves, cooperating in the recovery at the Hong Kong 
stock market and helping Hong Kong's medium-sized and small 
Chinese banks in their difficulties. In the formulation of the 
Basic Law it was also decided, so as to keep the H&amp;S Banking 
Corporation from moving away, that the future government of the 
special administrative region of Hong Kong would not set up a 
central bank. The policies of allowing the H&amp;S Banking 
Corporation, after 1997, to have certain central bank functions, 
allowing it to issue banknotes, operating with participation of 
the Bank of China, and other such policies, were to be 
maintained. 
  After the H&amp;S Banking Corporation had entered the Inner 
China 
market, Purves once told me that they had certain bad debts in 
the interior, which they could not recover, and he gave me some 
details. As soon as I heard of it, I immediately agreed to help 
them, asking to be informed of the particular items and 
circumstances, and we did help them in their negotiations in the 
interior. Later, certain problems were indeed resolved through 
these negotiations, but some could not be resolved, and I 
reported to him the circumstances of the negotiations, having 
him understand and telling him not to be concerned. This work 
had certainly shown some positive results for the H&amp;S Banking 
Corporation. 
  Beijing did not completely agree with us in the perception 
of 
the situation, and some of their measures were hard to explain. 
For instance, Li Peng (at that time vice chairman) did not 
solicit our opinion, also did not keep us informed, when he gave 
Rong Zhijian funds (Rong was in charge of the Hong Kong office 
of the China International Trust and Investment Corporation; he 
is the son of Rong Yiren [2837 3015 0088]), having him buy up in 
Hong Kong the shares of the China Light and Power Company of 
Hong Kong. When Rong was unable to do so, he bought the shares 
of the Guotai Company instead. This process of buying up shares 
had positive as well as negative effects. It may have a certain 
positive effect from the standpoint of holding back British 
capital. However, on the other hand, it will also create a 
certain anxiety among Hong Kong's general public: Is it the 
intention of Chinese capital with this "grandiose show of 
capabilities" to effect nationalization of enterprises through 
the buying-up of their shares? Will this buying up of shares not 
indeed effect a "lian" [uniting], then by controlling the 
shareholdings a "he" [merging], and finally the "guo" [nation] 
as in nationalization, thus truly achieving a "lian he guo" 
["United Nations"]? Arousing this anxiety was detrimental to 
efforts to keep British capital from moving away and detrimental 
to creating a sense of stability that Chinese capital, Overseas 
Chinese capital, and foreign capital desired. 
  Being supported by the their colonial government, the 
British-owned financial groups in Hong Kong were not only of a 
colonial character, but their character was also, to a certain 
extent, monopolistic. This was most evident in the public 
utilities and postal service, but also in telecommunications, 
resources, electric power, and other such undertakings. In the 
face of these facts it was our intention, in order to keep 
British finance from moving away, to maintain an attitude that 
did not altogether negate their monopolistic character, but to 
rather adopt a policy of restricting further amplifications. The 
problem of such restrictions was also not be solved by setting 
up laws or policies, or by administrative measures of the 
government, but rather by allowing the laws of the market to 
gradually take effect. 
  When I once visited the Hongkong Telephone and Electric 
Light 
Company, they expressed to me their desire to invest in the 
interior and expand their business operations. I thereupon 
consulted the Chinese minister of posts and telecommunications 
on whether that company should be permitted to go into the 
interior to help improve the backward state of post and 
telecommunications services. We truly needed help from abroad, 
financially and technically. However, the minister would not 
agree to my proposal, as a matter of principle. He indicated 
that we already had four firms inside China, investing in 
telecommunications. Hong Kong has invested in Shenzhen, and was 
actively maneuvering to enter Jiangsu Province. He said his 
ministry opposed this kind of activity because it would result 
in a diversity of systems and great confusion, and he also 
inclined to refuse all further developments in matters of 
telecommunications investments. My efforts, thus, did not find 
his support. 
  Generally speaking, efforts to keep British capital from 
moving away have had a certain effect, but results were not 
ideal. (End of Installment No. 71) 
<H5>  [5 Jul 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] Giving Chinese Capital a Sense of Stability 
Still Requires Economic Measures: Reorganizing the "Hong 
Kong-Macao International" for the Purpose of Opening the Way for 
Investments in China Proper; Limiting Approval of Land Sales Has 
Had Positive Effects in Bringing Stability to the Real Estate 
Trade 
  Chinese capitalists have already become a vital new force in 
Hong Kong's economy. On the announcement by China that it will 
recover its sovereignty over Hong Kong, some Chinese capitalists 
hurriedly moved their funds away, and the outflow of capital, as 
also the emigration of people, became increasingly serious. In 
the interest of Hong Kong's prosperity and of its economy, it 
became therefore critically necessary to assure the Chinese 
capitalists of the stability of the situation. 
  We worked on this problem from a political as well as from 
an 
economic angle. In political respects, we worked for a 
broadening of the united patriotic front, and stressing the key 
points, tried to persuade the major capitalists, assuring them 
first of the stability of the situation, which in turn, we 
hoped, would have an effect on the other Chinese capitalists, 
and would achieve the objective of stabilizing a large sector or 
even the entire situation. At the same time, we employed 
economic means to support and help the Chinese capitalists, to 
dispel their anxieties and build up their confidence. 
  Of course, it would not have been sufficient to rely merely 
on our work in Hong Kong; it was very important to be able to 
rely on China. China did persist in its policy of reforming and 
opening up to the outside world, of rapid development of the 
economy, and of making increasing use of Hong Kong. Of course, 
the attraction of China proper for Hong Kong was also increasing 
substantially. As a consequence, Chinese capitalists changed 
their views on China, and confidence rapidly increased. That was 
the general trend of the stabilization in Hong Kong. 
  There were quite a few Chinese capitalists who relied on 
British support, since they had grown up with the support of 
British banks, but some of them also relied on support from 
China. China's support was political as well as --and that more 
importantly -- commercial support, but the two kinds were 
actually hard to separate from each other. Some capitalists were 
no doubt guided by purely commercial considerations. However, 
there were also those who were guided by political 
considerations or by both political and commercial 
considerations. 
  We asked the Hong Kong branch of the Bank of China and 
organizations with Chinese capital funds to more effectively 
contribute to the work of stabilizing Chinese capital, and that 
they should broaden their cooperation with the Chinese 
capitalists and engage in business. We asked that they assist 
the Chinese capitalists with regard to sources of supplies, 
short-term loans, and that they also get the Chinese capitalists 
to invest in China proper. This policy would have been of 
benefit for both sides, as it would have meant profits for the 
merchants and would also have been helpful for China's reform 
and opening up by increasing exports, attracting capital funds, 
and introducing new technologies and managerial experiences. 
  The arrival in Hong Kong of delegates from various Chinese 
provincial and municipal departments and commissions has been an 
important "resource" for stabilizing Chinese capital. Following 
the change in foreign trade policy, the various ministries and 
commissions of the central government, as well as the various 
provinces and municipalities, have shown a desire to trade by 
themselves in the products produced in their territories. They 
were eager to contact by themselves markets abroad, and this 
provided much opportunity for Chinese capital in Hong Kong, as 
it brought them the opportunity to act as agents for the sale of 
Chinese commodities, and to engage in either wholesale or retail 
business, and also to undertake other types of cooperation. We 
supported the move of various provinces and municipalities to 
have their departments or commissions set up organizations in 
Hong Kong and helped them by introducing connections. 
  To induce Hong Kong's Chinese capitalists to invest in China 
proper, we organized several informatory trips by representative 
personalities from Hong Kong industry and commerce to important 
provinces and municipalities in China, so as to facilitate more 
mutual contacts and mutual understanding, and also to increase 
opportunities for mutual business relations. I personally led 
several of these groups on visits to Jiangsu, Fujian, Shanghai, 
and other places, where I requested leading cadres in these 
places to personally receive the visitors. For instance, one 
year in Jiangsu, it was provincial governor Gu Xiulian [7357 
4423 5571] and in Shanghai Mayor Jiang Zemin [3068 3419 3046] 
who personally received the visitors, informed them of the 
situation and conditions, and replied to their questions. 
  In the middle and later years of the 1980's, few major Hong 
Kong capitalists invested in China proper. Those who really went 
in were medium-sized and small firms. In order to get large and 
medium capitalists and shareholders to invest in China proper, 
also to dispel their anxieties and increase their confidence, we 
reorganized the stock ownership and functions of the "Hong Kong 
and Macao International," allotting to it as main task: to bring 
large and medium-sized capitalists from Hong Kong, Macao, and 
also Overseas Chinese from Southeast Asia to China to invest in 
China. It might be done by adopting cooperative methods "to 
build bridges for them and pave the way for them," or they might 
also be helped in the resolution of their difficulties in their 
own independent business operations. Because soon after the 
reorganization the 4 June incident occurred, the reorganization 
was of little effect. 
  We suggested that the Bank of China increase its business 
dealings with large and medium-sized firms. The work style of 
the Bank of China group in Hong Kong was staid and conservative. 
Targets of their lending activities were mainly medium-sized and 
small firms and industrial enterprises. Their work was quite 
successful, but the drawback was that they had few dealings with 
major firms. Considering the Bank of China group's development 
by itself, and starting out from the needs of united front work, 
everybody should expend greater effort and increase business 
contacts with the large firms. Of course, risks involved would 
be somewhat greater, but that should not stop the further 
pursuit of the reform. Acting in this way will lead to new 
developments in the business operations of the Bank of China, 
will increase contacts with large and medium-sized firms, and 
would, in the same manner as in the case of medium and small 
firms, through these contacts gradually, in the economic sphere, 
bring about a sense of stability also among these large- and 
medium-sized firms. 
  The Sino-British Agreement stipulates that the use of land 
in 
Hong Kong must be approved by a land committee, and that 
approval must not be given for the sale in excess of 50 hectares 
per year. China established this principle on a directive from 
Deng Xiaoping: Britain should not be allowed to sell off all 
Hong Kong government land before 1997; there had to be a 
restriction. To facilitate Sino-British negotiations and the 
resolution of mutual problems, a special land committee was set 
up, and it was furthermore stipulated that half of the income 
from the sale of government land by the British Government of 
Hong Kong must be left for the use of the future government of 
the special administrative region. 
  Hong Kong's real estate firms, especially the major ones, 
were very much in favor of this arrangement. They owned large 
tracts of land, and restrictions on the sale of government land 
would bring them, the real estate dealers, even higher profits 
in their business transactions. In business contacts that we 
have had with large real estate firms, some repeatedly requested 
us: "Don't let the Land Committee approve more land deals." 
Because there was this stipulation in the Sino-British 
Agreement about not approving too many land sales, and also 
since we really did not have any experience as to what effects 
our action could have in other respects, we did act in those few 
years essentially in accordance with the agreement. Although 
some more than permissible land sales might have been approved, 
the amount was small and has had some positive effect in 
enhancing the sense of stability among the large real estate 
firms. 
  However, we soon also discovered that a few large real 
estate 
firms gradually came to constitute a kind of monopoly in Hong 
Kong's real estate market. I asked the Chinese members of the 
Land Committee, and also asked its investigation and research 
office, to study this problem and to determine what after all 
would be the desirable amount of land for which sales could be 
approved, particularly also in the coming years, because if too 
many land sales would be approved, it would depress land prices, 
while the approval of too few land sales would have the effect 
of demand exceeding supplies, and thereby causing steep rises in 
real estate prices. This task of assessing the proper limits was 
proposed by me after 1987, but I did not get to know the 
conclusions from this investigation. (End of Installment No. 73) 
<H5>  [16 Jul 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] Giving Chinese Capital a Sense of Stability 
Requires Adoption of Economic Measures: With Bank of China's 
Help, Li Guobao Weathered the Storm; No Response From the Hong 
Kong Government to Hu Yingxiang's New Airport Plan 
  We also helped Chinese capitalists to solve their 
difficulties. When people started to loose confidence in the 
situation, some of the major shareholders of the Bank of East 
Asia wanted to withdraw their capital. This caused a dispute 
among the shareholders, and a French bank tried to take 
advantage of the situation and buy up the shares of the Bank of 
East Asia, which was thereby in great danger. It was then that 
the chairman of the board of directors, Li Guobao, sought help 
from the Bank of China. He approached the Hong Kong branch of 
the Bank of China and also approached me in the NEW CHINA NEWS 
AGENCY. After a study by the economic leading group of the Hong 
Kong Affairs Committee, it was decided to support the Bank of 
East Asia, and that the Bank of China should come forward to 
render assistance. Shares of the Bank of East Asia, held by the 
Bank of China, were not to be sold, and more of these shares 
should be acquired, to get Li Guobao out from his dangerous 
position. 
  In the course of supporting Chinese capitalists by means of 
economic measures, it also happened that such action caused 
losses. The most serious case of this nature was the case of the 
Kangli Company. Shortly after I had come to Hong Kong, Cao 
Weilian [2580 1218 1670], deputy director of XINHUA SHE, in 
charge of economic affairs (a former vice minister in the 
Ministry of Machine Building and Electronics, a person with 
close links to Jiang Zemin) informed me that the Kangli Company 
was a large electronics enterprise in Hong Kong, and that its 
manager, Ke Junwen [2688 0193 2429], was a highly esteemed 
person with high ideals and great competence in business 
affairs. Ke himself also boasted that he will become Hong Kong's 
Konosuke Matsushita (the founder of the Matsushita enterprise in 
Japan, revered as the "God of Business"). Cao Weilian had hoped 
that Ke Junwen would visit China proper and place investments 
there, and Cao personally accompanied Ke on a visit to Fujian, 
Jiangsu, Beijing, and other places, and also introduced him to 
leading cadres in the central government; Gu Mu [6253 3668], a 
state counselor, also met him. Ke, then, proposed cooperation 
with Chinese capital, and after we studied his proposals, we 
also agreed with him, and would have three parties in Hong Kong, 
the Bank of China, Huarun, and China Merchants, jointly raise 
capital and cooperate with him. After all the capital was 
invested, Ke Junwen ran away. We investigated and found that he 
had also used the name of yet another company for large-scale 
transfers of Kangli capital and movable property. This was a 
serious lesson indeed. Later, experts from China assessed the 
value of Kangli's real estate and equipment and stated that its 
equipment was still very good, some of it even not yet available 
in China, so that the economic loss, fortunately, was not too 
serious. However, the continuous losses in business operations 
will be a burden for many years to come. 
  Supporting Chinese capitalists in the development of their 
undertakings is also an important aspect. In 1986, Hu Yingxiang 
and Li Jiacheng [2621 0857 6134] came together to see me with a 
plan for the development of a stretch of ocean west of Hong Kong 
island and of Lantau Island, there to build a second airport. As 
one location being considered for the project was Chek Lap Kok 
Island, another was the area between Lantau Island and Hong Kong 
island. They were also planning to reclaim land from the sea 
between Lantau Island and Hong Kong and build a new harbor, a 
residential area, and a commercial area there, also submarine 
tunnels between Lantau Island and Hong Kong, and also between 
Lantau Island and Kowloon, and an express highway from Lantau 
Island to the new border port of Luomazhou. 
  After listening to their plan, I fully concurred with them, 
convinced that this plan would not only satisfy Hong Kong's 
needs for sea, land, and air transportation in the 1990's, but 
also those of the first part of the 20th century, and that it 
would further enhance Hong Kong's function of import-export base 
in South China. I said: "This is a very good plan, it has to be 
reported to Beijing; I can be responsible to do that." I asked 
them: "Have you talked to the Hong Kong government? Better first 
talk to them and get their support." My concern was that since 
Hong Kong was still administered by the British Hong Kong 
Government, it stands to reason that so huge an engineering 
project would only be possible if it had that government's 
consent and support. I also suggested that they should not 
divulge the plan to outsiders before having clarified the 
position of the British Hong Kong government. Li Jiacheng asked 
Hu Yingxiang: "Do the reporters know about it?" Hu said he had 
already made arrangements to meet the press. I suggested not to 
do that, and Li Jiacheng agreed with me, but Hu persisted in 
doing it. As a consequence, after publicizing the plan to the 
press, there was no response at all from the British Hong Kong 
government, who apparently shelved the matter. 
  After the 4 June incident, the British Hong Kong government 
came out with its own plan for building a new airport. I think 
things would have been quite different if Li and Hu had first 
solicited an opinion from the British Hong Kong government. (End 
of Installment No. 72) 
<H5>  [17 Jul 93 p 3] </H5>
  [Text] Seeking Foreign Capital, Rallying Support 
From Overseas Chinese Capital; Foreign Banks Resent the 
Privileges of the H&amp;S Banking Corporation; the Basic Law 
Stipulates That Foreign Banks May Be Empowered To Issue Banknotes 
  Hong Kong is a metropolis of international character, all 
countries and all quarters are interested in it. Foreign capital 
uses Hong Kong mainly to expand activities into Southeast Asia, 
especially into China. Since China's reform and opening up to 
the outside world, especially after the signing of the 
Sino-British Joint Statement, the position of Hong Kong as an 
intermediary, and as a springboard and bridge, has foreign 
capital increasingly recognize its usefulness and has foreign 
capital find Hong Kong increasingly attractive. 
  Under these circumstances, the opportunity must not be lost 
for extensive and close contacts with the diplomatic agencies 
and commercial institutions in Hong Kong, stationed there by the 
various countries and territories, and we must assist them in 
gaining an understanding of China's policies and to resolve 
whatever difficulties they may have. That is one of the major 
tasks of the branch office of NEW CHINA NEWS AGENCY. 
  With this in mind, the said branch office instituted an 
internal division of labor: Main responsibility of the external 
affairs department was to maintain broadest contacts with the 
diplomatic organizations in Hong Kong, stationed there by the 
various countries and territories. The economics department had 
mainly to contact the commercial organizations of the various 
countries and some mass organizations, as for instance, the 
American General Chamber of Commerce. I myself had frequently 
accepted their invitations to meet with them, and, at their 
requests, had answered some of their questions. Foreign capital 
was at that time generally concerned about two problems: One was 
whether there could be a political change in China's Hong Kong 
policy, and, secondly, they resented the monopolistic position 
of British capital in Hong Kong, a situation which they hoped 
would be changed. 
  For instance, bankers from other countries than Britain, 
stationed in Hong Kong, resented very much that the H&amp;S 
Banking 
Corporation would enjoy many privileges of a central bank, but 
would not have the obligations of a central bank. Especially 
American and French banks expressed their criticism to the Hong 
Kong branch of the NEW CHINA NEWS AGENCY and to the Chinese 
Government, and also expressed the hope that when China will 
formulate the Basic Law, it will include restrictions on Britain 
in the future monetary policy of what will be the government of 
the special administrative region. 
  I was pondering how to take care as much as possible of the 
interests of foreign capital and how to satisfy their demands as 
far as possible without unduly offending the British Government 
and harming the interests of British capital. Some 
foreign-financed banks in Hong Kong are pressing for the right 
to issue banknotes. I positively suggested to Ji Pengfei and 
Zhao Ziyang [6392 4793 7122] to consider allowing American, 
Japanese, and French banks to participate to a limited amount in 
the issuing of banknotes, so as to give the Hong Kong currency a 
more international character. Later, the Basic Law included a 
provision of a decisive character, as it stipulated: "The right 
of issuing Hong Kong currency shall be a right of the Government 
of the Special Administrative Region. ... The Government of the 
Special Administrative Region...may confer the right to 
specially designated banks within legally prescribed 
limitations, which banks then may issue, or continue to issue, 
Hong Kong currency." Bankers of other nationalities stationed in 
Hong Kong have been quite satisfied with this arrangement. The 
basic law consultative committee had admitted as members and 
advisors several foreign capitalists and bankers, giving them a 
chance to state their opinions. 
  As the economy of Hong Kong has developed, foreign capital 
has become increasingly active in Hong Kong, and it has become 
an absolutely indispensable matter, in the interests of Hong 
Kong's stability and prosperity, to effectively deal with 
foreign capital. 
  We had attached the greatest importance to our dealings with 
the capital funds held in Hong Kong by Overseas Chinese. Apart 
from devoting myself personally much effort to contacts with 
them on a broad scale, work was also done through relevant 
departments in China and organizations of Chinese capital in 
Hong Kong. The aim was to dispel their doubts and anxieties, 
affirm their resolve to make use of Hong Kong and to enter Hong 
Kong, to provide them with facilities, to cooperate with them, 
and to render service to them. 
  Capital of Overseas Chinese refers mainly to the capital 
held 
in Hong Kong by the overseas Chinese of Southeast Asia. Some of 
the major overseas Chinese capitalists of Southeast Asia, such 
as Lin Shaoliang [2651 4801 5328] of Indonesia, Guo Henian [6753 
7729 1628] of Malaysia, and Xie Guomin [6200 0948 3046] of 
Thailand, all have considerable investments in Hong Kong. That 
is so because, on the one hand, Hong Kong itself has its 
particular attractiveness, and, on the other hand, because of 
political considerations. For instance, Lin Shaoliang has close 
relations with Indonesia's president Soeharto, and at one time, 
when Soeharto's position had become shaky, Lin Shaoliang 
regarded Hong Kong as a safe haven for his capital. When the 
Malaysian Government for a time behaved anti-Chinese, the 
Chinese in Malaysia also often used Hong Kong as safe haven for 
their capital. Since China's reform and opening up, Overseas 
Chinese capital flowed through Hong Kong on its way to China 
proper; the Overseas Chinese had always attached great 
importance to the useful function of Hong Kong. (74) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20444 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar015___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  8 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs 75-78 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0136A Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 18 - 21 Jul 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0136A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installments No 75-78 of the serialized memoirs of Xu </F>
Jiatun: "Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
<H5>  [18 Jul 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] Seeking Foreign Capital, Rallying Support 
From Overseas Chinese Capital 
  Overseas Chinese merchants intend a subterranian electric 
pathway; no reaction from the Hong Kong government. 
  The majority of Overseas Chinese in Southeast Asia are from 
Fujian Province, and we designated the deputy director of our 
agency, Cao Weilian [2580 1218 1670], to particularly work on 
having Fujian Province render assistance to the Overseas 
Chinese. Guo Henian [6753 7729 1628] was a rubber plantation 
owner in Malaysia, but had gained fame and fortune mainly in the 
sugar business. He was renowned as the "King of Sugar" and had 
excellent connections to the Huarun Company. We worked on him 
through the intermediary of the Huarun concern, and Guo 
gradually transferred the base of his business operations to 
Hong Kong. He achieved considerable success in Hong Kong, and 
from there, furthermore, penetrated China and invested in China 
proper. 
  Huang Tingfang [7806 1694 2455] was in the real estate 
business in Singapore. At one time in the past, he had served as 
general manager of the Singapore Branch of the Bank of China; he 
is well acquainted with Xue Wenlin [5641 2429 2651], who is the 
present deputy director of the Hong Kong and Macau Affairs 
Office of the Bank of China. In the early 1980's, when the high 
tide of real estate business in Singapore had passed, Huang 
extended his business interests to Hong Kong. That was precisely 
the time when real estate business in Hong Kong was at a low 
ebb. At that time Huang bought up much land in Hong Kong, using 
his good connections to Xue Wenlin. We, on the other hand, were 
at that time just preoccupied with measures to restore 
confidence among the residents of Hong Kong, and our attitude 
toward Huang's daring and large-scale purchases of land was 
therefore very supportive. The Bank of China was actively 
loaning him funds for these purchases. With this support, Huang 
went all out in land purchases, acquiring almost as much land as 
Guo Desheng [6753 1795 0524], the giant in the real estate 
business. Soon thereafter land prices recovered, and Huang was 
able to earn huge profits. What he had not accomplished in 
Singapore, he accomplished in Hong Kong, namely to score a 
tremendous success. Huang Tingfang, having seized the right 
opportunity, had acquired a fortune by buying up cheap land and 
had risen to the ranks of prominent real estate merchants, just 
after Li Jiacheng [2621 0857 6134] and Guo Desheng. 
  Huang Tingfang was also among the first large real estate 
merchants who went into China and invested in real estate in 
China proper. Prior to the 4 June incident, he had invested in 
real estate in Fujian Province and in its city of Xiamen. He had 
signed a contract with the Xiamen City government, undertaking 
to upgrade Xiamen's busiest street, and he also engaged in real 
estate developments in his native place, Changle county in 
Fujian Province. When others stopped doing business in China 
after the 4 June incident, Huang continued. Huang Tingfang had 
confidence in Hong Kong, that was the most important element 
contributing to his success. In 1983, he publicly expressed 
approval of China recovering Hong Kong and also expressed full 
confidence in Hong Kong's future. This made him a unique figure 
at that time. 
  We had been actively supportive of the desires and plans of 
Overseas Chinese to expand their business operations to Hong 
Kong. Mao Junnian [3029 6874 1628] had a classmate by the name 
of Ke [2688], who was also a native of Fujian Province, and who, 
after graduating from Hong Kong University, had gone to the 
United States and had been doing well there, prospering in his 
industrial undertakings. Mao Junnian introduced him and brought 
him to see me. He put forward a novel plan, namely to build a 
subterranean electric walkway below Kowloon's busiest tourist 
center from Tsim Sha Tsui and all along under Nathan Road, as an 
additional attraction for tourism. The subterranean electric 
walkway would entail construction of a subterranean metal 
roadway with a conveyor belt, on which the people would stand. 
Instead of walking, they would be moved along on the conveyor 
belt. Space on both sides of the walkway could be developed for 
shops and the service industry, and markets or buildings with 
other purposes could be built at both entrances to the walkway. 
He was prepared to invest in the scheme and hoped for 
cooperation from Chinese capital. 
  This novel idea of his has had my full support, and I 
promised to cooperate with him, but the crucial prerequisite 
would be to get the consent and approval of the British 
Government of Hong Kong. I asked him to pursue the matter in the 
normal social order, first to consider the feasibility, prepare 
a feasibility report, and then to apply to the Hong Kong 
government. After he quickly finished this preparatory work, I 
asked Zheng Hua [6774 5478], deputy director of NEW CHINA NEWS 
AGENCY, to contact the relevant department of the Hong Kong 
government, to tell them of our interest in the matter, and to 
discuss the matter with them over a dinner, pointing out to them 
that it would be beneficial for developments in Hong Kong and 
hoping that the Hong Kong government would give the matter its 
attention. However, throughout 1985 and 1986, and all the time 
up to my departure from Hong Kong, the Hong Kong government was 
never heard of again in this matter. This is really regrettable. 
  (4) Course of Growth in Strength of China's Capital 
Involvement (1st of 5 pts). 
  Provinces and municipalities appeared in Hong Kong to set up 
representations; reform had to adopt the principle of opening to 
the outside world. 
  China's investment of capital funds in Hong Kong has 
occurred 
in stages. During the initial stage, its purpose was the covert 
protection of underground work and to start up all kinds of 
commercial enterprises to provide funds for the expenses of 
underground activities. Later and gradually, it was providing 
funds to develop some organizations to further its import-export 
trade. 
  After the withdrawal of the Kuomintang from the mainland, 
some of the organizations left behind by them were taken over; 
for instance, the China Merchants Company, and were made to 
serve further developments. 
  Following initiation of the reform and opening-up policy, 
departments and commissions in charge of industrial production 
and trade of the central authorities and of the various 
provinces and municipalities of China proper had become very 
eager to establish their own organizations in Hong Kong. 
However, the guiding ideology of the Central Committee tended to 
favor restrictions in this matter. Some members of the Central 
Committee suggested to let the various provinces, 
municipalities, ministries, and commissions establish 
appropriate bases in Hong Kong. Others again were against 
allowing more such components to be established as there were 
already, in their opinion, quite a sufficient number there, and 
that it instead should be a time for reorganization and 
retrenchment. In 1983, on the initiative of the Hong Kong and 
Macau Affairs Office and the Ministry of Foreign Economic 
Relations and Trade [MOFERT], the State Council issued a 
document that restricted the establishment of new organizations 
in Hong Kong by the various provinces, municipalities, 
ministries, and commissions and ordered the reorganization of 
those formerly set up there. Prior to my assuming my duties in 
Hong Kong, Li Hou [2621 0683] showed me the said document and 
asked me to enforce its provisions after my arrival in Hong Kong. 
  I have been originally working at the local level, and I 
thought from the standpoint of relevant departments and 
commissions of provinces and municipalities, it would have been 
quite necessary to establish bases in Hong Kong, since the 
policy was to be one of reform and opening up. For instance, the 
province of Jiangsu maintained a small outfit in Hong Kong, 
attached to the Huarun Company, consisting of only two or three 
persons. They were unable to do much, while; on the other hand, 
the local people at home base urgently required information to 
better understand the situation outside their home province, 
required expanding contacts with foreign and Hong Kong business 
firms to increase their import-export opportunities, as well as 
learning about appropriately responding to conditions and 
experiences in outside market activities. I disagreed with the 
spirit of this document and tended to favor expanding the 
organization of China's capital. At that time, Liao Chengzhi 
[1675 2110 1807] was still alive, and I proposed to him and Li 
Hou that enforcement of these provisions be delayed until my 
transfer to Hong Kong, when I would have gained a better 
understanding of the situation there. They both agreed. 
  After I had been in Hong Kong for some time, I again 
proposed 
to them to ask Beijing to send someone to Hong Kong, so that we 
could jointly review the situation. The State Council agreed and 
sent a vice minister of MOFERT to Hong Kong to investigate. 
After two to three months of investigation, a new report was 
submitted, which was quite different from previous reports. It 
reflected a very externally oriented attitude and suggested that 
the State Council permit provinces, municipalities, ministries, 
and commissions to establish, within conditions, additional 
organizations in Hong Kong. In response to my urging, the deputy 
minister soon revisited Hong Kong, leading a delegation of 
representatives from most of China's provinces and 
municipalities to open a trade fair of unprecedented scale. 
Several hundred people from China proper attended the fair, 
which had a considerable impact on Hong Kong. 
  In the past, China unifiedly transacted all its foreign 
trade 
through the government's foreign trade agencies. The production 
departments were essentially ignorant of foreign market 
conditions. The government's foreign trade agencies transmitted 
the trade plan, did the ordering of purchases, and all 
marketing. Establishment by the various provinces, 
municipalities, and other localities of their own organizations 
in Hong Kong practically destroyed the former centralized 
system, as these agencies would inform themselves of market 
conditions, do research and decide on production plans, thus 
effectively initiate a reform of China's entire foreign trade 
system. End of Installment No. 75) 
<H5>  [19 Jul 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] Course of Growth in Strength of China's 
Capital Involvement 
  Chen Yun [7115 0061]] instructed: "Don't let others pocket 
all profits." Various obstacles building up against an expanding 
role of China's capital involvement in Hong Kong. 
  Considering the way developments were taking place in Hong 
Kong, the interests in Hong Kong in British capital, foreign 
capital, the local Chinese capital, Overseas Chinese capital, 
and Taiwanese capital deserved to be protected and offered 
opportunities for continued growth. However, China's capital 
should also have had a certain share. China's capital could, 
and also had to strive for a certain measure of participation in 
the developments, without claiming any prerogative, but merely 
by studying and applying Hong Kong market experiences, and on 
the premise of not "stealing the rice bowls" from the people of 
Hong Kong, while also not adversely affecting their interests. 
If by chance an element of instability should appear in Hong 
Kong some time in the future, reliance on this foundation, the 
use of capital from China, could mitigate the potential negative 
effects on Hong Kong. 
  In my opinion there should be continuous growth in the 
strength of China's capital. Why can't we have in Hong Kong a 
Chinese "Hongkong &amp; Shanghai Banking Corporation," a Chinese 
"Jardines," and a Chinese "Buterfield &amp; Swire"? We must not 
replace them or drive them out, claiming certain prerogatives, 
but must act in the mutual interests of both, co-existd, and on 
this premise, do our utmost to develop our own affairs. Is that 
not possible? 
  However, some among my Hong Kong comrades did not agree with 
me, and some leading cadres in Beijing were also against me. 
When I submitted my first report to the Central Committee on 
work done in Hong Kong, in September of 1983, as mentioned 
earlier, Li Xiannian [2621 0341 1819] felt that China-financed 
organizations in Hong Kong must not expand their activities. He 
furthermore expressed disapproval of any stock transactions, 
which he considered "speculation and profiteering." He was 
against investing in Hong Kong real estate, and wanted the Bank 
of China to pay attention to and exercise control over all real 
estate loans. 
  Following the mentioned report, the Hong Kong and Macau 
Affairs Office called a conference at the end of 1983 to discuss 
economic work in Hong Kong and Macau. Leading cadres of relevant 
departments of the central authorities and leading cadres from 
provincial and municipal departments in charge of foreign trade 
participated at the conference. Leading cadres from 
China-financed agencies in Hong Kong and Macau, who also 
participated at the conference, and the Hong Kong and Macau 
Affairs Office designated myself and Li Chuwen [2621 0328 2429] 
to chair the conference. 
  There has never before been this kind of an all-China 
conference to discuss in particular the economic work in Hong 
Kong and Macau, and it was for the first time too that the Hong 
Kong and Macau Affairs Office, representing the State Council, 
chaired a conference of this nature. Two documents were produced 
at the conference. One was a report by the Hong Kong and Macau 
Affairs Office to the Central Committee. The report based on the 
various speeches and directives by Chen Yun, Li Xiannian, and 
other leading cadres of the Central Committee, and also on my 
work report from Hong Kong, that time in September. This was 
edited into several paragraphs of opinions of a policy 
character, requesting in response instructions from the Central 
Committee and suggesting to hold a nationwide conference for 
their implementation. Several members of the Standing Committee 
of the Central Committee, among them Deng Xiaoping, Chen Yun, Li 
Xiannian, Hu Yaobang [5170 5069 6721], and Zhao Ziyang [6392 
4793 7122] initialled the report, thereby signifying their 
consent and approving the conference. The other document was a 
draft resolution, which was submitted to the conference for 
deliberation and amendment, which would then, in its final form, 
also be submitted to the Central Committee and the State Council 
for approval, to become an official resolution. 
  Almost 200 persons participated at the conference. As I 
remember, no one delivered a speech at the start of the 
conference, and there was then a discussion of the documents. 
Most participants dissented from the contents of the documents. 
  The provisions of a policy nature in the documents were 
condensed by the participants into what amounted to "ninefold 
prohibitions." I remember more or less the following: they did 
not allow anyone to proceed to Hong Kong and set up new foreign 
trade organizations, they did not allow China-financed 
investment activities, they did not allow China-financed 
organizations to engage in "speculative" undertakings, they did 
not allow to speculate in shares, in foreign exchange, in real 
estate, and in gold. Foreign exchange held by China-financed 
organizations must not be deposited with foreign banks, but must 
be deposited with the Bank of China. They were against opening 
markets for Hong Kong products in China and against marketing 
such products inside China. 
  In sum, Chen Yun's directive, "don't have others pocket all 
the profits," signified the main spirit of this policy, a policy 
that erected all kinds of obstacles against the expansion of 
China-capital financed undertakings in Hong Kong. Most of the 
participants at the conference were highly dissatisfied, I too 
was dissatisfied. Jiang Wengui [5592 2429 2710], director of the 
Hong Kong and Macau Administrative Office of the Bank of China, 
asked me: "Why does the Central Committee hold this kind of a 
conference?" I replied: "I also don't know why." Throughout the 
entire duration of the conference, I maintained complete 
silence. (End of Installment No. 76) 
<H5>  [20 Jul 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] Course of Growth of Strength of China's 
Capital Involvement (3rd of 5 pts) 
  Li Qiang [2621 1730] had once engaged in "speculation and 
profiteering" and had reaped a profit of 600 billion for 
Mainland China. Zhao Ziyang froze the "ninefold prohibitions" 
directive and China's capital escaped a disaster. 
  I suggested that China's capital in Hong Kong should emulate 
the Hong Kong merchants and use all the tricks of capitalism in 
active business operations. I remember, when I had just arrived 
in Hong Kong, the minister of the MOFERT, Li Qiang, stopped over 
in Hong Kong on his trip abroad and inspected the Huarun 
Company, which was an organization directly under the MOFERT. We 
two were fellow townsmen and old friends. He was almost 70 years 
old and in good health. He liked to eat candied haws on sticks 
and the shoulder of pork; and of the latter, if plainly fried, 
he could eat three to four kilos at one sitting. It was really 
frightening. Whenever we met in Jiangsu, he asked me to get him 
shoulder of pork. This time in Hong Kong, he had not changed. I 
found a cook from Jiangsu Province and satisfied Li's craving. 
During the meal, we talk leisurely and came to talk about the 
Hong Kong merchants and how they got rich by trading in shares 
and gold and could lead a life of abundance. We could only do 
business in the old ways, were not to "speculate and profiteer," 
so our country could not get rich. Then, Li Qiang mysteriously 
said: "Who says we don't know how to do some "speculating and 
profiteering, I myself have once done some `speculation and 
profiteering'! Once I `speculated' in gold and earned for the 
state a profit of 600 million. We looked at each other and 
laughed hilariously. 
  As to the document that was presented to the conference for 
general discussion, almost all the units present at the 
conference raised objections, but the sponsors of the conference 
would not take note of them. After the conference I went to see 
Zhao Ziyang. 
  Zhao Ziyang received me at his Zhongnanhai home. His library 
there was about 30 or 40 square meters, with several bookshelves 
filled with old and modern books. I told Zhao that this 
conference had been conducted badly, and he asked me, why? I 
said: "In the matter of China's capital funds engaging in 
economic and commercial activities in Hong Kong, the conference 
would disallow this and forbid that. The conference did not 
start out from active developments, but was negatively 
defensive, not at all in accordance with the need to expand from 
a centralized position to the outside, and not at all utilizing 
the spirit of Hong Kong." Zhao said: "Why did you not raise 
objections?" I said: "You members of the Standing Committee all 
initialled the report which the Hong Kong and Macau Affairs 
Office had submitted to the Central Committee, how could I 
openly voice opposition at the conference? I can only report 
this to you and state my objections." Zhao Ziyang pondered this 
for a while and then asked me: "What are we then to do? Should 
we hold another conference and again issue another document?" 
  I understood that he personally could not very well 
immediately invalidate the conference we have had. However, I 
was concerned that if things were not immediately remedied and 
if the "ninefold prohibitions" were enforced, as a consequence 
of the conference, much more and significant damage would be 
done. I therefore said: "It will not do, I am afraid, to handle 
the situation in this way. I suggest that the documents from 
this conference not be issued to lower levels, and that when we 
go back we also do not relay them to anyone else." 
  Zhao Ziyang did not clarify his position at that time. I 
thought he tacitly agreed, but did not feel he should 
immediately declare his consent. After all, he still wanted to 
go on working as a member of the Standing Committee. 
  After I returned to Hong Kong, I notified those leading 
cadres in organizations working with China-provided capital 
funds who had attended the conference: For the time being, don't 
relay anything of the spirit of the conference, but await the 
receipt of the documents before you implement anything. Later, 
sure enough, the documents were never transmitted, and the 
"spirit" of the conference was never disseminated. China's 
capital in Hong Kong thus escaped a disaster. 
  In addition to giving my full support to the establishment 
of 
Hong Kong organs by the various provinces, municipalities, 
ministries, and commission, I also suggested that their leading 
cadres more frequently visit Hong Kong, broaden their horizon, 
and learn from market experiences. At that time, I had only a 
superficial knowledge of market economy, I only knew some 
aspects of it in the buyer's market and the seller's market. In 
China proper it was essentially a seller's market with 
production regulated by plan, but in a buyer's market production 
is determined according to consumption needs and marketing 
conditions. 
  When I passed through Hong Kong on my visit to Australia in 
1979, some Hong Kong capitalists informed me of the ways of 
trade, how to adapt to the needs of the market and how to 
participate in the competition according to the law of the 
survival of the fittest. They said, enterprises are not only a 
matter of production and management, the main thing is effective 
business operations. If products are produced in excess and 
cannot all be sold and have to be stockpiled, the enterprise 
will sooner or later collapse. 
  On my return, I emphasized in my report to Hua Guofeng [5478 
0948 6912], who was at that time leading cadre in the Central 
Committee, that it simply would not do that China's factories 
concern themselves only about management and not about effective 
business operations. Hua Guofeng agreed with my opinion and in 
one of his speeches he brought up the problem of more effective 
business operations of enterprises. (End of Installment No. 77) 
<H5>  [21 Jul 93 p 2] </H5>
  [text] Course of Growth of Strength of China-Provided 
Capital Funds 
  Economic reform led to the "Shekou [Shek O] Incident," Yuan 
Geng [5913 1649 was personally accused. Diversification in the 
business of the Huarun Company; reforms and improvements also 
carried out in the Bank of China. 
  After I started to work in Hong Kong, I felt even more 
strongly that leading cadres inside China should come to Hong 
Kong and look around how Hong Kong people conduct trade. I did 
my very best to suggest that the checking procedure should be 
more liberal, allowing more people to visit Hong Kong. As 
mentioned earlier, in the past the Hong Kong and Macau Affairs 
Office had exercised strict controls, and I had repeatedly 
requested that they should relax these controls, but they never 
took notice. Up to 1986, the Central Committee had delegated the 
right of approving business trips to Hong Kong to the Hong Kong 
and Macau Commission. Nominally, the State Council had entrusted 
the Hong Kong and Macau Commission to give approvals on the 
State Council's behalf, thereby resolving the problem. I again 
and again urged the executives of the NEW CHINA NEWS AGENCY to 
have the checking procedure relaxed, allowing more people from 
inside China to visit Hong Kong and study things there. 
Developments were fastest in the provinces of Guangdong and 
Fujian, especially in Guangdong because of its more favorable 
location. The China-financed organizations also experienced very 
rapid development at this stage. 
  Reform and opening up to the outside world, as it was taking 
place within China, also posed problems for some of the Chinese 
capital-financed organizations which had been well-established 
"old Hongs" in Hong Kong, as to how to adapt to the new 
situation. The new task they were now facing was how to improve 
and reform their business operations to conform to the new 
requirements of China proper. One who has done outstanding work 
in this respect was Yuan Geng of the China Merchants Company. 
  Yuan Geng built up a new district at Shenzhen-Shekou. 
Although the area is part of Shenzhen, the way it was developed 
right from the start was quite different from Shenzhen. In 
Shenzhen emphasis was placed on tourism, the service industries, 
and real estate, while Shekou placed emphasis on small industry. 
Its subsequent development about matched that of Shenzhen. 
  In administrative respects, Shekou is a ward of Shenzhen 
City, but it is independent; its cadres are allocated by the 
China Merchants Company itself. Yuan Geng knows how to choose 
the right person for the right job, and he also employed new 
management tactics. He regularly employed some scholars and 
experts from inside China to explore and work out economic 
reform problems. The well-known "Shekou incident," which 
occurred later, was indeed due to the fact that a "Youth 
Education Experts and Shekou Youths Symposium" was held in 
Shekou. Some new problems were brought up which offended some 
of the oldsters in Beijing. At a meeting of the Central 
Committee Standing Committee, someone pointed to Yuan Geng 
personally as being an instigator of bourgeois liberalism. 
Although the Central Committee never officially notified me, 
someone told me that Hu Yaobang and Zhao Ziyang actually 
protected Yuan Geng at the Standing Committee meeting and 
prevented the affair to have further consequences. I have a 
friendly hello for Yuan Geng: the reform has to be pursued, but 
with some care, so that others will not give you trouble. 
  Shekou developed very fast, and the China Merchants Company 
itself developed rapidly. Yuan Geng adopted the business methods 
of the capitalist world. Tonnage of China Merchants' ocean 
transport fleet rapidly increased, and their other business 
undertakings also flourished. The Ministry of Communications was 
very satisfied, and Ye Fei [0673 7378], who was then minister of 
the said ministry, came to hold esteem for Yuan Geng even more 
highly because of his successes. 
  Under the pressure of circumstances, the Huarun Company also 
began to diversify its business activities. Formerly, it was the 
main foreign trade organization in Hong Kong of the MOFERT, in 
fact Huarun monopolized China's foreign trade in Hong Kong. 
Currently, the various provinces and municipalities are 
themselves taking up business operations, and Huarun's 
monopolistic position is gradually being undermined, so that 
Huarun is compelled to diversify and to somehow enhance its 
business operations. Zhang Jianhua [1728 1696 5478], Huarun's 
chairman of the board, is very reform-minded, and has also had 
much success. They expanded their operations not only in Hong 
Kong, but also toward the United States and Europe, where they 
set up branch organizations. The China-financed group has 
already become a large and influential enterprise in Hong Kong. 
  Even the Bank of China group, traditionally very 
conservative, has instituted some reforms and improvements. When 
I first came to Hong Kong, I heard many reports about the 
excessively cautious way in which the Bank of China granted 
loans, and that they were not eager to get involved in large 
projects. On the other hand, Zhuang Shiping [8369 0013 1627], 
chairman of the board at the Nanyang Commercial Bank, had an 
excellent reputation and was believed to be a very active 
businessman. I sought confirmation from Jiang Wengui [5592 2429 
2710] and Huang Tingyen [7806 1694 1484] of the Bank of China, 
but they both disagreed with the opinion of the general public. 
They acknowledged that Zhuang Shiping was a man of great 
courage, but that he also had a lot of loans that went bad. I 
contended that they give more thought to the impressions held by 
those outsiders. 
  The fact that the leading cadres of the Bank of China are 
thoroughly versed in the banking business, are continuously 
expanding the scope of their business, and reforming and 
improving their procedures, has a powerful influence on Hong 
Kong's financial affairs and economic development, is supportive 
of the reform in China proper, and is also particularly 
influential in efforts to rally Chinese capital in Hong Kong for 
united action. [End of Installment No. 78] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20445 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar015___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  8 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs 79,80,81,82 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0140A Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 22 - 25 Jul 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0140A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installments No 79-82 of the serialized memoirs of Xu </F>
Jiatun: "Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
<H5>  [22 Jul 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] The Course of Expanding Chinese Capital (part 
5 of 5): Li Xiannian Warns Against Using Chinese Money To Make 
the British Look Good; Central, Local Governments' Funding for 
Chinese-Funded Organizations Is Limited 
  At one time, the development of Mainland Chinese-funded 
organizations in Hong Kong worried some local Chinese. First 
they worried about the Chinese merchandise wholesalers. In the 
past, China controlled foreign trade mainly through the China 
Resources Company which in turn sold its products through local 
wholesalers. After reform and opening up, the foreign trade 
system was restructured in steps, and MOFERT allowed some 
products to be managed directly by various ministries and 
commissions, provinces and municipalities. Once again the 
localities rushed to find managers and agents for their own 
products, jeopardizing the profit of the original Chinese 
merchandise wholesalers. This had to be changed; it was 
inevitable. To the Hong Kong merchants, although the original 
wholesalers were hurt, some new agents in Hong Kong benefitted, 
because the provinces and municipalities, ministries, and 
commission still had to operate through the Hong Kong market; 
overall, it was a win-some, lose-some situation, a situation not 
entirely avoidable. 
  The Working Committee discussed the situation internally and 
determined that the original wholesalers should be looked after 
as much as possible. For example, they should be introduced to 
various provinces and municipalities, ministries and commissions 
to get new sources of merchandise. They also asked China 
Resources Company to come up with new businesses and pay some 
kind of compensation and so on. 
  The launching of Chinese-funded businesses was based on 
diversification. At first, many Hong Kong people worried that 
the mainland Chinese-funded organizations had state funds, and 
so whether they were making money or not, they could go on, 
making it impossible for the Hong Kong people to compete with 
them. Such businesses existed, but they were the minority. There 
were rumors circulating in Hong Kong that the Chinese-funded 
businesses had brought this much or that much money to invest in 
Hong Kong. Some estimated the amount to be $8 billion, others 
suggested $10 billion. Looking at the Chinese-funded 
organizations' total investment, those numbers obviously were 
exaggerated. Those who said that the money had come from the 
mainland obviously did not know what they were talking about. 
  Back then, Mainland China was making every effort to absorb 
foreign funds. How could they have brought so much money to 
invest in Hong Kong? This was what Li Xiannian and Chen Yun were 
worried about. Li Xiannian once said, "We need money. We cannot 
take money from the mainland to invest in Hong Kong to make the 
British look good." 
  As far as I know, there were two types of funds being 
invested in Hong Kong. The first was state or local government 
appropriations. Such funds were limited in amount. The few 
fairly large sums, as I understand, came from the following 
sources: One was funds the state allocated to the several large 
corporations such as China Trust and Investment Company and 
Everbright; they could not have been more than $300-500 million. 
Another was the $100 million allocated to XINHUA SHE's Hong Kong 
branch. Individual provinces and municipalities could not have 
appropriated anything close to $100 million, and even though 
some central government ministries and commissions might have 
more money, they could not have reached $100 million. Thus, if 
we add them together, the sum would be around $1 billion. 
  Another type was funds some pertinent provincial and 
municipal departments had earned and kept while doing business 
elsewhere and which they invested in Hong Kong. China Resources 
Company and Bank of China handed over some of their profits each 
year, but they also retained a percentage. That was normal. We 
could not rule out some corruption and irregularities with 
respect to the retained profits of the provinces, 
municipalities, ministries and commissions; but it could not 
have been a huge amount. It was estimated at that time that 
retained profits came to about $1 billion, and adding the $2 
billion or so appropriated by the state, the sum would be $3 
billion at the most. 
  Thus, if the Chinese-funded organizations did indeed invest 
$8-10 billion in Hong Kong, then most of the money was Hong Kong 
money, or we could say that it was money borrowed from Hong Kong 
banks. The development of Mainland Chinese-funded organizations 
in Hong Kong was in some ways facilitated by the mainland, and 
on that basis, they also learned from Hong Kong's market 
experience in order to grow. 
  Back then, the Chinese-funded organizations in Hong Kong 
grew 
fairly rapidly and played an increasing role in the Hong Kong 
market. But based on the general estimate that they had $10 
billion invested, it was still not much compared to society's 
total investments, and they could not begin to threaten or 
replace Hong Kong's British or Chinese capital. Thus, Mainland 
Chinese capital's growth in Hong Kong was basically healthy. 
  Practice proved that the general principle of developing and 
strengthening Chinese capital was a positive move. It 
contributed to the mainland's reform and opening up and to Hong 
Kong's stability and prosperity; they helped and benefitted each 
other. 
<H3>  V. Consolidating Hong Kong's Chinese-Funded Organizations 
(Part 1 of 3) </H3>
  Chinese-funded organizations in Hong Kong became somewhat 
chaotic in 1987 and 1988. There were complaints from the public. 
For example, some units did not know what they were doing and 
were making some wrong decisions; they were defrauded and 
suffered loses. Some set up parent companies, subsidiaries and 
sub-subsidiaries, thus over-expanding themselves. Some 
management personnel were involved in corruption, bribery, and 
fraud, and to some extent, things got out of control. [End of 
Installment No. 79] 
<H5>  [23 Jul 93 p 4] </H5>
  [Text] Consolidating Hong Kong's Chinese-Funded 
Organizations (Part 2 of 3): Ji Pengfei Suggests Checking Out 
Everbright and China Trust; Zhao Ziyang Instructs Everyone To 
Leave Everbright Alone 
  The State Council, the Hong Kong and Macao Affairs Office, 
and MOFERT wanted to consolidate the Chinese-funded 
organizations in Hong Kong. The Hong Kong and Macao Working 
Committee pointed out that the overall development of the 
Chinese-funded organizations was basically healthy, but there 
were some problems, and some rectification was necessary; 
however, the consolidation process should not obstruct their 
development, and we must not use the same measure across the 
board but should deal with different situations in different 
ways. For example, Guangdong and Fujian provinces had a fairly 
large number of businesses in Hong Kong. Guangdong not only had 
provincial and municipal companies but even its counties and 
townships had set up businesses in Hong Kong. They had many 
connections, and most people came to Hong Kong on personal 
connections, and it was impossible to estimate the actual 
figure. In those situations, some companies could be abolished 
or merged. But other mainland provinces and municipalities had 
few organizations in Hong Kong, and for the sake of opening up, 
they had asked to set up new businesses, which was fair. 
  Upon checking and registering, we had approximately 2,000 
companies in Hong Kong, and after consulting the provinces and 
municipalities, ministries and commissions, we decided to keep 
more than a thousand. Meanwhile, some necessary adjustments 
were made to their business operations. 
  On the matter of corruption and irregularities within the 
Chinese-funded organizations, there were many complaints. 
Someone made a speech at a Beijing meeting and wrote to the 
newspapers about the serious situation of corruption and 
malpractices within the Chinese-funded organizations. I asked 
the person to provide some facts and expressed our sincerity in 
seriously investigating and remedying the charges. He only gave 
us some information on some minor matters, in sharp contrast to 
what he had described in his speech and article. There were 
other merchants complaining to us about similar situations, but 
when I asked them for specifics, they could not deliver. It is 
my guess that there could be two possibilities: First, someone 
was blackmailing or bribing them, and they did not want to 
provide any information, fearing that it might jeopardize future 
businesses. Another possibility may be that it was all hearsay, 
and so they could not substantiate their charges. No matter 
what, we did not ignore the matter. We knew that there was a 
serious problem in certain units, and certain famous 
personalities in some large companies were deeply involved. Yet, 
it was difficult to conduct an investigation; we needed evidence 
before we could deal with the matter. Reportedly, a certain 
manager had a large bank account. Hong Kong banks are bound by 
law to keep their clients' business confidential. It made 
investigations impossible. 
  At a related meeting in Beijing, Ji Pengfei suggested the 
State Council sent people to investigate Everbright and China 
Trust. I agreed and seconded his suggestion. 
  Everbright was founded after Wang Guangying [3769 0342 
5391], 
CPPCC vice chairman, paid a visit to Hong Kong and submitted a 
report to the State Council, and with Zhao Ziyang's approval, 
funds were allocated by the state and the business was started 
in Hong Kong. Wang was given permission to manage real estate 
and stock. Zhang Jingfu [1728 0513 1133], secretary general of 
the economic leading group, was put in charge and was in direct 
contact with Wang Guangying. 
  When Wang Guangying arrived in Hong Kong, he drummed up a 
lot 
of publicity; it was sensational. He boasted that his special 
rank put him above that of a minister, that he was one of the 
nation's leaders, and that he was making investments on behalf 
of the State Council. The company name, "Guangda" 
["Everbright"], was approved by Zhao Ziyang. Wang said that at 
first they had thought of naming it "Ziguang," but Zhao thought 
that it was inappropriate, and they chose "Everbright" instead. 
  At the beginning, Wang Guangying was very ambitious. Back 
then Hong Kong's real estate market was in a slump. His dealings 
with Li Ka-shing [2621 1367 2052] regarding Garden City created 
quite a stir in Hong Kong. He said that it was a move based on 
his optimism in Hong Kong's future. But then he backed out of 
the contract soon after. 
  There were objections to Wang Guangying's management style 
and internal administration in the pertinent departments in 
Beijing and within Everbright itself. Everbright's cadres were 
handpicked by Wang himself, and after arriving in Hong Kong, 
those who agreed with him were trusted, but those who disagreed 
with him were discriminated against and alienated. When Wang was 
still a target of the Tianjin City Party Committee's united 
front, a united front cadre had looked after him and had thus 
won his trust. He was later transferred to Everbright, but 
because he disagreed with Wang on something, he was immediately 
rejected. Subsequently, cultural revolution-like measures were 
adopted inside the company; criticism sessions were held, and he 
was accused of wrongdoings. The cadre reported to the relevant 
units in Beijing and to the Hong Kong-Macao Working Committee. 
We tried to get a handle on the situation and asked questions. 
For that reason, Wang Guangying was upset with the Working 
Committee. 
  I went to Beijing to discuss the matter with Zhang Jingfu. 
He 
said, "He is beyond my jurisdiction." He told me to go directly 
to Zhao Ziyang. I did. Zhao said, "From now on you should leave 
Wang Guangying alone." I told Zhang Jingfu what Zhao had said. 
He shook his head, "You should get Zhao to put it in writing." 
How was I doing to get anything in writing? Soon thereafter, 
Zhang Jingfu told me, "I won't touch the Everbright matter 
either. There is nothing I can do." 
  A 29 year-old wealthy businessman, Zhang Shaohuang [1728 
1421 
4106], who claimed to be an Overseas Chinese from South America 
suddenly showed up in Hong Kong and dove deep in the real estate 
business. There were all sorts of speculations about him. Zhang 
opened a company in Hong Kong and invited me to the 
ribbon-cutting ceremony. The company had the support of 
Beijing's Song Jingling Foundation. Song Jingling Foundation's 
chairman was Kang Keqing [1660 0344 3237], Marshal Zhu De's 
wife; its vice chairman was a deputy director of the General 
Office of the Central Committee whom I knew well, because 
whenever I visited Beijing, I was received by him. He personally 
told me that elder sister Kang had asked for my support. He 
said, "This Mr. Zhang is very patriotic. He is enthusiastic 
about mainland affairs and has donated HK$2 million to the 
Chinese Children's Welfare Fund." So I agreed to attend the 
opening ceremony. Zhang Shaohuang advertised his company's 
opening, saying that yours truly would take part in the 
ribbon-cutting ceremony. (End of Installment No. 80) 
<H5>  [24 Jul 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] Consolidating Hong Kong's Chinese-Funded 
Organizations (Part 3 of 3): Zhang Shaohuang Hides Wang 
Guangying To Commit Fraud; Wan Li's Son, Wan Zhongxiang, Rated 
the Best in the Princelings Party 
  Just to be safe, I checked out Zhang Shaohuang's company 
registration. The registered capital was over HK$10,000, but 
actual upfront money was only HK$2. I sensed something was 
wrong. When the deputy director of the General Office came to 
Hong Kong to participate in the opening ceremony in the capacity 
of vice chairman of the Song Jingling Foundation, I did not meet 
him but sent Qiao Zongzhun [0829 1350 0402] instead. When he 
came back, I questioned him, and he too felt that something was 
wrong. Reportedly, Zhang Shaohuang had sent out invitations to 
many business tycoons, but none showed up. 
  Further investigations conducted by a pertinent department 
revealed that Zhang was Wang Guangying's future grandson-in-law 
and was getting financial support from Wang and led an 
extravagant life. 
  Soon thereafter, Zhang Shaohuang's fraud case was exposed: A 
Liaoning company in Hong Kong thought that because both Song 
Jingling Foundation's elder sister Kang and Wang Guangying 
supported Zhang, this man had to be trustworthy and therefore 
lent him HK$200 million. Upon getting the loan, he donated HK$2 
million to the Chinese Children's Welfare Fund and used the rest 
of the money to speculate in real estate. When the Liaoning 
company became suspicious and wanted to get the money back, 
Zhang had vanished. Negotiations through lawyers and some of 
Zhang's cohorts helped recover some of the money. 
  The State Council's restructuring of Everbright took place 
after "4 June." I don't know the details. 
  There were also many complaints about China Trust. According 
to rectification and improvement information released by 
Beijing, China Trust was meddling in illegal foreign exchange 
management. Most people believed that there was more to it. The 
Working Committee alone received many complaints. 
  The "rectifications" of these two large companies were 
handled directly by the State Council, and despite the Working 
Committee's reports to Beijing on the public's complaints, the 
State Council failed to follow up. 
  As far as I know, nearly 200 sons and daughters of 
high-ranking cadres were doing business in Hong Kong. I had Qiao 
Zongzhun keep in frequent touch with them and work on them, 
hoping that they would not get into trouble; otherwise it would 
have an adverse effect internally and externally. Qiao Zongzhun 
introduced me to some of them, and I told them that I would 
support their normal business activities in Hong Kong as much as 
I could and hoped that they would abide by the laws and 
regulations of the Hong Kong market and keep personal and 
business matters separate. Indeed many of them were able to do 
that. The person making the best impression and displaying the 
most upright workstyle was Wan Li's son, Wan Zhongxiang. Those 
making the worst impression were a certain person's son-in-law 
and a certain person's son. The two mixed their public and 
private lives, made lots of money, and led extravagant lives. 
One has already emigrated to Australia. The central authorities 
were going to transfer him back to the mainland, but he had 
already gone. The other is still in Hong Kong, making money. The 
Working Committee had no evidence and could not conduct an 
investigation, and the reports went unnoticed. There was nothing 
anybody could do. 
  At the beginning, Xue Wenlin [5641 2429 2651] was in charge 
of the Xinlong Company, a XINHUA SHE subsidiary. He had been a 
vice president of the Bank of China's Hong Kong-Macao 
Administrative Office. The Beijing headquarters wanted him to 
retire, and I asked to borrow him and kept him in Hong Kong, 
making him CEO and general manager of the Xinlong Company. 
  Xue Wenlin was in charge of Bank of China's Singapore branch 
at one time. He was familiar with situations in Singapore. After 
he went to work for Xinlong, he and a Singapore businessman got 
together to form a company, dealing with leather and herbal 
medicines. He was swindled: He hired a cadre, a transferee from 
Shanghai, who delivered a letter of credit and paid out $2 
million before the other side had delivered the merchandise. 
  An investigation revealed that possibly it was part of a 
setup. The Shanghainese cadre's wife and the Singapore 
businessman together owned a company, but we had no proof. 
  The Xinlong Company lost nearly HK$10 million with its 
stocks 
in the market crash of 1987. Adding the money defrauded, it lost 
more than $10 million--more than HK$100 million. Under the 
circumstances, we decided to replace the company leaders. On 
Zhou Ding's [0719 7844], secretary of the Working Committee's 
Macao branch, recommendation, we replaced Xue Wenlin with Sun 
Kaifeng [1327 0418 7364], general manager of a Shenzhen company. 
  The person in XINHUA SHE also in charge of business in 
Xinlong Company was deputy director Zheng Hua [6774 5478]. He 
often inquired about the company's detailed business, but he 
also missed some opportunities. For example, when Xue Wenlin was 
still in charge of the company, the owner of Hong Kong's 
Qingfeng Theater wanted to sell the property and was asking for 
a little more than HK$200 million. They sounded out Xinlong. 
Since Qinglung was one of the major movie theaters, Xue Wenlin 
was eager to buy; the Cultural and Education Department was 
enthusiastic too. They sought out Zheng Hua who brought up the 
matter for discussion at a meeting. I supported the move, but 
since Zheng Hua took no position, out of deference for him, I 
said, "detailed business matters are up to your CEO and general 
manager. We need not discuss the matter. It is your decision." 
  Two months later, I read in the newspaper that they had not 
bought it. They missed a good opportunity. 
  We certainly paid a price in the reform and development of 
the Chinese-funded organizations in Hong Kong, but 
business-wise, some progress was made. More importantly was that 
they learned a lot about management and business administration 
in the capitalist world market and made and unified a lot of 
friends. (End of Installment No. 81) 
<H5>  [25 Jul 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] Chapter 10 Revelations of the Hong Kong 
Experience 
<H3>  The Hong Kong Phenomenon That Attracted Worldwide Attention 
(Part 1 of 2): Hong Kong Seizes Every Opportunity and Emerges </H3>

From a Crack; China Is the Determining Factor Behind Hong Kong's 
Development 
  In the first volume of "Introduction To Hong 
Kong," edited by Yang Qi [2799 1142] and others, it was 
pointed out that in the late 1960's, there was an economic 
miracle that caught the world's attention: It was the "Hong Kong 
Phenomenon." The book enumerated the characteristics of Hong 
Kong's accelerated economic development and discussed each in 
brief. Those interested should indeed get hold of a copy of the 
book. 
  Hong Kong is very small in area. Hong Kong Island, Kowloon, 
and the New Territories together measure only a little over 
1,000 sq m. Hong Kong has few natural resources. But in the 
40-some short years since World War II, Hong Kong has developed 
from a poor, backward colonial city into a world-renowned 
financial, trade, ocean shipping, information, and tourist 
center, becoming an international metropolis founded on the 
service industry. There is no denying that it was a miracle. 
  Today, Hong Kong is among the richest cities. A few years 
ago, Mr. Lin Hang-chih [2651 5887 2972] of HSIN PAO said, "Based 
on total wealth, every person in Hong Kong is a millionaire." I 
am afraid they have far exceeded that today. Whether based on 
Chinese statistics or Western statistics, Hong Kong's per capita 
GNP is approximately $15,000, catching up with Japan's. A recent 
newspaper report said that Hong Kong ranked 90th in population 
but 10th as an economic entity in the world, surpassing many 
large countries. In 1992, it exported $40 billion's worth of 
goods. Amazing. 
  While many regions around the world are in an economic 
slump, 
how come Hong Kong is still growing? The reasons are very 
interesting. 
  People say heaven, earth, and men are working in Hong Kong's 
favor. Indeed, Hong Kong may be small in area, but it is 
perfectly situated geographically, with mainland China at its 
back while facing the main Pacific and Indian ocean shipping 
lanes head on. Whether one is going from east to west or north 
to south, Hong Kong is a midway station. Victoria Harbor is wide 
and deep; it never freezes, and it is one of the world's best 
natural harbors. 
  Hong Kong may lack natural resources, but after World War 
II, 
for geographic reasons, it became a political and economic 
buffer zone between the two major camps. It became the political 
and economic safe haven for mainland China and even some 
Southeast Asian countries and regions, which brought Hong Kong 
new resources, that is, cheap labor, valuable talents, and ample 
funds. 
  Hong Kong may be a colonial city, but in the post-war era, 
England has slowly changed the way it ruled and has adopted a 
policy of control through conciliation. Instead of absolute 
dictatorship, it gradually adopted a smart policy known as 
consultative democracy. On economic matters, they actively 
pursued a policy of nonintervention, creating a fairly good 
investment environment, including "hard" environment and "soft" 
conditions, in Hong Kong. The so called "soft" conditions refer 
to the set of laws and policies, especially the low and 
limited-scope tax policy, drawn up by the Hong Kong government, 
as well as the subsequent setting up of the Independent 
Commission Against Corruption [ICAC] that ushered in an honest 
government policy. "Hard" environment refers to the set of 
planned modern municipal constructions, including financial, 
transportation, telecommunications, and other service 
facilities, so that the Hong Kong people are brought into full 
play in a great investment environment. 
  After the founding of New China, Mao Zedong and Zhou Enlai 
decided not to take back Hong Kong immediately. They removed all 
interferences and resolutely adopted the general policy of 
"long-term planning and full utilization" to stabilize Hong 
Kong, and only with that was Hong Kong able to maintain a 
long-term stable political environment. China's reform and 
opening up created a once-in-a-lifetime opportunity for Hong 
Kong's economic development. Thus, China was a determining 
factor in Hong Kong's development. 
  The first time I went to Hong Kong, a local capitalist said 
something that made a very deep impression. He said, Hong Kong 
has emerged from a narrow crack by utilizing every opportunity. 
I admire the Hong Kong people's vigor in taking advantage of 
every opportunity. Wherever there is an opportunity, they will 
seize it; not just opportunities in Hong Kong or in the 
mainland, but worldwide. They have become increasingly skillful 
at seizing opportunities; they have set increasingly higher 
standards. This in fact is a positive spirit of adapting to 
changes, a spirit of holding on to every opportunity and not 
letting go. This is an important reason behind Hong Kong's 
development. 
  We can say that Hong Kong takes full advantage of every 
political and economic opportunity in the international domain. 
It took advantage of the Korean war and the Vietnam war to 
become not only one of the U.S. military supply and 
reconnaissance bases, but because China broke the blockade, Hong 
Kong in fact became a base for smuggling foreign products into 
the mainland. Many Hong Kong entrepreneurs who eventually 
prospered had started out as smugglers. It not only benefited 
them personally but also benefited Hong Kong. 
  When the world economy evolved, the well-developed 
capitalist 
nations' economy changed from being labor-intensive to 
capital-intensive and technology-intensive, and in the process, 
Hong Kong seized the opportunity and used its cheap labor to 
sell its low-cost products to other nations, especially the 
United States. Back then, Hong Kong had a large quota. It became 
a major export center for textile goods in the late 1970's by 
taking advantage of that transformation of the world economy. 
[End of Installment No. 82] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20446 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar015___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  8 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs No 83-85 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0141A Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 26-28 Jul 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0141A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installments Nos. 83 - 85 of the serialized memoirs of Xu </F>
Jiatun: "Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
<H5>  [26 Jul 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] The Hong Kong Phenomenon That Caught Worldwide 
Attention: A Worm in the Mainland Turns Into a Dragon in Hong 
Kong; Hong Kong Is Indeed a Miracle To Be Proud Of 
  Let us tell a story here. There was a young Hong Kong 
capitalist, 30-some years old, who was in the textile-garment 
business, primarily making blue jeans. Sorry I cannot recall his 
name now; I only remember people used to call him "trousers 
king." He was from Guangdong's Huizhou. During the Cultural 
Revolution, he was among the Red Guard's "leisure faction," and 
he fled to Hong Kong illegally. At first he worked in a small 
garment factory, and after finishing his own work, he would 
volunteer to help the boss with odd jobs. The boss liked him and 
promoted him to foreman and later assistant plant manager to 
help run the business. During the oil crisis in 1977, Hong Kong 
was in an economic slump. The boss did not want to continue the 
business and sold it to him at a very low price. Then he began 
to receive orders from the United States and got his quotas, and 
that was how he got started. 
  When I visited him, he had already set up a branch company 
in 
the United States. He had more than a dozen branch factories in 
Hong Kong, Africa, and the mainland. He not only had Hong Kong 
quotas but also mainland quotas and was doing $200 million in 
business a year. This was a typical example of how Hong Kong 
people took advantage of every opportunity. This young man was a 
vegetarian; he never married; he worked hard and was an honest 
man. He moved his brothers from Guangdong to Hong Kong and let 
them manage his companies. When Tan [word omitted] yun and I 
toured his factory, he laid out everything and talked for more 
than an hour about how he got started by utilizing Mao Zedong's 
dialectics to run his business. He changed the quotations from 
Mao Zedong slightly and turned them into his own ideologies, 
terms, and rules in educating his workers. Slogans were posted 
everywhere on the walls of his factory. He told me that he had 
gotten started on the quotations from Mao Zedong. He did not 
appear to be insincere; he probably did apply the principle of 
dialectics to market operations. I asked him, "How many are 
there in Hong Kong who are just like you?" He said, "I am not 
the only one." I was moved. There was a saying, "a worm in the 
mainland turns into a dragon in Hong Kong." It vividly showed 
that the mainland system restricted human development as well as 
economic development. 
  Let's tell another story of how a "worm turned into a 
dragon." Liu Yongling [0491 3057 7881] went to Hong Kong in the 
1960's, and when he first arrived, he had only $20 on him. I 
visited him when I was working in Hong Kong. By then, his house 
was no smaller than Pao Yu-kang's [0545 3768 0474] summer home. 
  He was working with Nanjing's No. 8 Machine Tool Factory and 
Suzhou's Changfeng Machinery Factory to produce plastic molding 
machines. At that time, the mainland's plastics industry was in 
its infancy, and there was tremendous demand for plastic molding 
machines. His method was to process imported materials; he 
imported spare parts and components and made large molding 
pieces in the Chinese factories and then complete the assembly 
work. In fact, based on the amount of work performed to complete 
each machine, more than 70 percent of the processing work was 
done in the mainland; basically, they were mainland-made 
products. But according to Chinese policies at that time, 
processed imported materials were not counted as Chinese-made, 
and basically they had to be sold abroad. Liu Yongling took 
advantage of that loophole and used the so-called "taking 
delivery of a foreign-sale product on the mainland" approach to 
sell those machines on the mainland. That was how he got 
started. Subsequently, he set up a processing plant in 
Shataukok's tax-free zone and became very successful. His 
company was appraised to be worth more than his original 
investment. He then mortgaged his assets and took out a loan 
from a Hong Kong bank to open a 100,000 sq meter factory in 
Shenzhen's Shekou. 
  I cut the ribbon for his new factory when it opened in 1989. 
He told me then he intended to hire 10,000 workers. He already 
had 3,000 people, including several hundred technical personnel 
who had graduated from various Chinese universities. He no 
longer limited himself to making molding machines but was also 
producing some mechanical and electronics products. He had 
invited the presidents and vice presidents of Beijing 
University, Qinghua, Fudan, Shanghai's Jiaotung University, and 
Nanjing University to attend the opening ceremony. He told me 
that he had signed contracts with those five famous universities 
to do scientific research and development work. I thought that 
was indeed farsighted. Giving priority to scientific and 
technological development meant that success would be no 
accident. He had gathered the technological and scientific 
talents of several hundred university graduates and was 
combining that with the scientific and technological strength of 
five famous universities. His future development will be even 
greater. He probably was the first in Hong Kong to take that 
approach. He also has a unique way of thinking. He said he did 
not support communism, but he supported the current CPC 
leadership. 
  China's reform and opening up once again brought the Hong 
Kong people's spirit of seizing every available opportunity into 
full play. China was a main target of Hong Kong investments. 
Prior to 1990, Hong Kong had accounted for more than 60 percent 
of all investments made by foreign nations and regions. Today, 
although there are substantial Taiwanese and foreign 
investments, the percentage of Hong Kong investments remains 
high. Today, not only small and medium-sized businesses are 
investing in the mainland, but some of the biggest names such as 
Li Ka-Hsing and Wu Kuang-cheng [0702 0342 2973], Pao Yu-Kang's 
son-in-law, are also doing business there. No doubt they will be 
very successful. 
  We can say that Hong Kong has not failed to seize every 
political and economic development opportunity the world and 
Southeast Asia have to offer; it has made timely development 
every time. Hong Kong has become a free, open, diversified 
market. Despite its tiny size, it has shown tremendous capacity. 
Today, Hong Kong businessmen and Hong Kong money are showing up 
all over the world. To different extents the continents have 
become Hong Kong's market and business arena. 
  Hong Kong is indeed a miracle to be proud of. [End of 
Installment No. 83] 
<H5>  [27 Jul 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] The Unique Hong Kong Culture (Part 1 of 2): 
Hong Kong People's Real Estate Dealings Are Equal to Yokohama's; 
Mainland Advised To Separate Ownership Rights From Use Rights 
  Gu Mu [4474 2606], a State Council member, and I visited 
Japan in 1978. Yokohama left a deep impression. Of Japan's eight 
major cities, Yokohama was the only self-sufficient one; the 
Japanese central government had to subsidized the others. When 
we toured the city, the mayor made a special point of telling us 
their experience, and I was very interested and asked some 
detailed questions. Gu Mu teased me, telling the mayor, "Mr Xu 
is very interested in your experience because he hopes to apply 
that in Jiangsu." 
  The reason Yokohama was self-sufficient was because the city 
government operated many businesses, especially the real estate 
business. To build the grounds for the World's Fair, they 
leveled mountains and filled the sea to create land. Must of the 
funds came from bank loans. They signed one contract with the 
banks and took out loans in installments. 
  At that time, I could not understand why they turned to bank 
loans and how they took out loans in installments. I asked the 
mayor. He explained that the first loan installment was for 
development. After the preliminary development, the project was 
turned over to private parties for further development. The 
businesses that took over the project had to pay a percentage in 
deposit, and the city government used that money to start 
another project and used the second and third loan installments 
to make interest payments. The mayor said that not only were 
they reclaiming land from the sea but the flattened hillsides 
also provided new land for development. The land development 
projects were undertaken by city-owned companies. The city 
government used revenues generated by these city-owned companies 
to supplement tax revenue shortfalls and other municipal 
expenses, and therefore they did not need central government 
subsidies. 
  That was the first time I learned about how real estate 
development could be so profitable. 
  When I began working in Hong Kong, I felt that Hong Kong 
people's approach to the real estate business was no less 
brilliant. 
  Take the example of Huang Jin-hui [7806 6930 6540], 
son-in-law of former KMT general and united front target Wang 
Yao-Wu [3769 5069 2976], who developed a piece of land in the 
New Territories and built a village there. Fei Yimin [6316 1744 
3046], a good friend of Huang, persuaded me to take part in the 
ribbon-cutting ceremony. I agreed. 
  Fei Yimin's son was manager of Huang's company. On the day 
of 
the opening ceremony, he gave me a ride, and in the car, he told 
me about how they did business. Huang Jin-hui had bought a piece 
of land in the New Territories for more than HK$100 million. 
After the land was developed, they began to offer pre-sales, 
meaning that even before they began building the houses -- when 
they only had the drawings on paper, they would sell those 
houses; the buyers only made a down payment. 
  In the village to be built by Huang Jin-hui, the buyers paid 
30 percent down. With those deposits, he had the money to build 
the houses and could operate without borrowing money from the 
bank. Installment payments allowed more people to afford their 
own homes, and it made it easier for the sellers to sell homes. 
This kind of "buy now pay later" policy which increased the 
consumers' purchasing power and accelerated the circulation of 
real estate funds really impressed me. 
  I reported to Zhao Ziyang and Li Xiannian on this approach. 
I 
said, Hong Kong's real estate industry has become one of the 
Hong Kong economy's mainstay industries. Its real estate 
industry to a large part owes its development to the separation 
of ownership rights and use-rights. Ownership right to the land 
belongs to the Hong Kong government, but use-right can be bought 
and sold, and a time limit is put on the use-right -- 99 years 
for Hong Kong island and 75 years for the New Territories. I 
suggested that the mainland also adopt the method to develop the 
real estate industry -- ownership right should go to the state 
and should be publicly-owned, so as not to compromise the public 
ownership system, and use-right should be privately owned. They 
did not respond at the time, but they probably paid some 
attention. 
  With respect to the use of bank funds and social funds, Hong 
Kong people are very smart. This was obvious in the way the Hong 
Kong businessmen invested in hotel constructions in the 
mainland. When they built hotels, they utilized little of their 
own funds, but they were very profitable. This was because they 
mainly used bank funds, and at first, their loans were 
guaranteed by Bank of China. From the selection of hotel sites 
to the design, construction, installation, finishing of the 
interior, and actual operations, everything was managed by the 
Hong Kong businessmen. Often they were able to recoup their 
investment, and even made a profit, in material and equipment 
purchases and in interior installations alone. At first I did 
not understand the arrangement where the Chinese side would 
provide the land and the Hong Kong side would control the stock 
and the operation but let the Chinese take over the hotels in 15 
or 20 years. It was later that I came to understand that by the 
time the hotels were turned over to the Chinese, the Hong Kong 
businessmen would have earned 15-20 years' worth of profit 
already. (Installment No. 84) 
<H5>  [28 Jul 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] The Unique Hong Kong Culture 
  Hong Kong is an open society. Information travels fast and 
business competition is intense, and these allow the Hong Kong 
people to quickly adapt to and utilize the latest methods of 
modern market and enterprise management and administration. They 
make continuous improvements and changes with each passing day. 
In 1986, a Hong Kong entrepreneur introduced me to the 
investment concept of mutual funds. Back then, Hong Kong did not 
have many mutual funds, but within a few years, they became very 
popular. Mutual funds of all types flourished like bamboo shoots 
after a spring rain. 
  Hong Kong people accept and utilize modern, advanced tools 
and management methods quickly and effectively. The driving 
force behind that ability is Hong Kong's unique cultural pattern 
(and that itself is also a part of Hong Kong's own culture.) 
This is a main reason behind Hong Kong's rapid rise to becoming 
a great international metropolis. 
  We should begin with the educational background of Hong 
Kong's development. Hong Kong's education system, from 
kindergarten to university, emphasizes English. English is the 
first language of the upper-middle class. Government documents 
and company and institutional correspondence are primarily in 
English. It is this language foundation that enables Hong Kong 
people to go everywhere in the world to do business without 
having to rely on translators. Businessmen from all over the 
world who come to make connections and do business in Hong Kong 
find it extra convenient because they speak the same language. 
  Hong Kong's lower-middle class primarily speaks Cantonese, 
but Hong Kong's Cantonese is different from that spoken in 
Guangzhou. Hong Kong's language contains a lot of English terms 
which have been turned into a sort of colloquialism for the 
common people. For example, they call street cars, "bashi" 
("bus"); a ball, "bo" instead of "qiao"; and hired cars, "dishi" 
("taxi".) Some people say that Hong Kong culture is neither 
Eastern nor Western, Chinese nor English. They think that this 
is backward. I disagree. I find Hong Kong's culture a good mix 
of Chinese and foreign cultures; it has its progressive side. We 
cannot judge it by its inability to carry forward and to absorb 
our intrinsic culture; we should also look at the development 
side. 
  Hong Kong's language and culture give it a definite edge and 
facilitate international exchange and rapid absorption of 
advanced experiences. With the exception of Singapore, no other 
major Far Eastern cities, including Tokyo, Shanghai, Taipei, and 
Soeul, are equipped or ready to replace Hong Kong in this 
respect in the near or even not-so-near future. Hong Kong indeed 
owes it all to the "English." 
<H3>  A Proposal To Develop the Hainan Special Zone (Part 1 of 2): 
Li Ka-Shing Expresses Interest In Investing in Hainan; He Wants 
To Make Me Consultant and Li Pengfei Chairman of the Board </H3>
  Applying the Hong Kong experience to develop the Hainan 
Development Zone was an idea I suggested to Deng Xiaoping in a 
letter. 
  Around 1986, at a private meeting with Li Ka-shing, we 
talked 
about constructions in Hainan Island. Li himself said that he 
was interested in investing there. He said, "I can make a 
one-time investment of HK$100 million to develop Hainan. But I 
have one condition: Either you go to Hainan and take up 
leadership position there -- perhaps as a concurrent position, 
or I can set up a company and you act as chairman of the board." 
  When I first arrived in Hong Kong, Li Ka-shing had indicated 
that he had no interest in investing in the mainland. He had 
been complaining then that, "Even before I finished negotiating 
a project, people are already saying I am making this much or 
that much money off of the state. I have decided never to invest 
in the mainland. I may donate some money though." This time, he 
actually volunteered to invest in Hainan, which was quite 
unexpected. I immediately applauded him, but I also said, "I am 
already 70-something. I am too old to govern Hainan. The central 
authorities probably will not let me go. I am too old and have 
little energy left. The central government probably will not 
let me serve as chairman of the board either. But if you invest 
there, I can be your consultant. I think the government will 
agree to that." 
  I figured that Li was worried that his investing in the 
mainland would make things difficult all around. I could serve 
as his advisor to smooth things for him, and he would have less 
to worry about. 
  Upon hearing that, Li asked me, "How about getting Li 
Pengfei 
to be chairman of the board?" I said, "So long as you trust 
him." I promised Li Ka-shing that I would report to the central 
government on his plans. 
  At that time, I thought, if Li Ka-shing would indeed invest 
in Hainan Island, it not only would help develop the mainland 
but would also create a new situation where Hong Kong and 
overseas funds would be attracted to the mainland. It would also 
have a tremendous effect on stabilizing Hong Kong. But I had 
never been to Hainan, and everything I knew were second-hand. I 
decided to pay a visit. At that time, the National People's 
Congress was in session. I looked up Guangdong's provincial 
party commission secretary, Lin Ruo [2621 5387], and Governor Ye 
Xuanping [5509 6693 1627], indicating that I was interested in 
visiting Hainan while the Congress was holding group meetings. 
They both said that I would be welcomed. Ye Xuanping explained 
that he was heading the delegation and could not take time off 
and so he could not accompany me, but he immediately called up 
Hainan's district party committee and made arrangements for me. 
  I requested a few days off from the Congress's secretary 
general and went off to Hainan. Hainan Administrative District's 
party committee secretary, Yao Wenxu [1202 2429 4872], met me 
and showed me around the island. He and the Hainan district, 
county, and city leaders made a detailed presentation of the 
situation there. Hainan indeed is another pearl of South China. 
It has great location, climate, and plenty of natural resources 
(although it has a shortage of trained personnel, and its 
educational standard is low.) The only thing it needs was to be 
developed. 
  I told Yao Wenxu my tentative plans after the tour. I said I 
planned to suggest to the central government to separate Hainan 
from Guangdong and turn it into a separate province and make it 
the nation's largest special zone. I wanted the central 
government to grant the Hainan special zone more "special" 
policies than any other special zone. Upon hearing that, the 
district party committee comrades were delighted. Yao Wenxu 
said, since the "auto incident" (see footnote,) the central 
government had "taken away" all preferential policies once 
granted to Hainan. Things had been tough and morale had been low 
among the cadres. He was hopeful that the central authorities 
would consider my proposal. He added, "Before setting up the 
large special zone, it would be best that the central 
authorities could restore the preferential policies, or at least 
restore some of them even if not all them." I understood. He 
had little confidence that my suggestion of a large special zone 
would be accepted. (Installment No. 85) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20447 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar015___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  8 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs 86, 115, 116 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0143A Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 29 Jul, 27, 28 
Aug 93 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0143A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installments No 86, 115, 116 of the serialized memoirs of </F>
Xu Jiatun: "Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
<H5>  [29 Jul 93 p 3] </H5>
  [Text] Recommending Development of Hainan SEZ (Part 
2): Zhao Ziyang supported making Hainan a province and a special 
economic zone. Hainan asked me to serve as an advisor. The 
center gave recognition. 
  After returning to Hong Kong, I immediately wrote a letter 
to 
Deng Xiaoping and the CPC Central Committee, relating the 
inspirations I got from Li Ka-shing's intention to invest in 
Hainan, my feelings generated by the visit to Hainan, and the 
views of the CPC special economic zone committee; I suggested 
that Hainan be made a province, thereby becoming a large special 
economic zone which would allow the free entry and exit of 
goods, people, and capital and become a second customs territory 
(it was necessary to use barbed wires in Shenzhen and create a 
"second line" zone, whereas Hainan was an island in the first 
place), and that goods flowing to or from the hinterland could 
be treated as exports. I especially suggested that Hainan be 
turned into a large special economic zone and a free port 
through consulting the experience of Hong Kong and utilizing 
Hong Kong's capital and trained personnel. 
  Deng Xiaoping referred this letter to Zhao Ziyang, asking 
Zhao Ziyang to dispose of the matter. Zhao immediately referred 
it to Gu Mu [6253 3668], asking him to form more concrete ideas. 
Zhao wrote some comments on my letter: (the gist) agree with 
Xu's idea; already thought about making Hainan a province; it is 
now proper to consider establishing a special economic zone and 
a province; before the large special economic zone becomes 
reality, it is proper first to restore the preferential policies 
originally granted to Hainan. Soon afterwards, the center 
ordered the preparatory group for the establishment of the 
province headed by Xu Shijie [6079 1102 2638], former secretary 
of the CPC Guangzhou Municipal Committee, and Liang Xiang [2733 
3276], former secretary of the CPC Shenzhen Municipal Committee, 
to enter Hainan. The news that Hainan would be made a province 
and a large special economic zone caused a sensation at home and 
abroad. Waves of people making investment-related 
investigations, conducting business negotiations, and seeking 
jobs crossed Qiongzhou Strait continuously. Before becoming a 
province, Hainan was already bustling with activity. 
  After Hainan was officially made a province on 25 April 
1988, 
the CPC Hainan Provincial Committee and the Hainan Provincial 
government formally asked me to serve as an advisor, and the 
center also gave recognition. Regrettably, policies on the 
special economic zone have never been fully implemented, and 
there has been no progress in regard to Li Ka-shing's investing 
in Hainan. 
  The process of putting forward the idea of developing Hainan 
Island was the process in which I first came to understand Hong 
Kong and then realized that it was necessary to fully utilize 
the entity and experience of Hong Kong. After I came to work in 
Hong Kong, I gradually came to realize the importance of the 
issue of the need to fully utilize Hong Kong in China's reform 
and opening up. The change from believing at the beginning that 
Hong Kong only served as a channel and springboard for imports 
and exports to utilizing Hong Kong in an effort to attract 
overseas funds, to understanding the need to consult Hong Kong's 
economic development experience, to consulting the British Hong 
Kong government's successful ruling experience in the process of 
formulating the Basic Law, and to utilizing the unique mixed 
Chinese-Western culture of the people of Hong Kong constituted a 
process of gradual development over several years. 
  Consulting Hong Kong's experience involves many spheres 
ranging from economics to politics and culture, and the exercise 
will have rich contents. It is now still rather difficult to put 
all the relevant understandings in a clear form. But I believe 
that in the process of economic and political reforms in China 
in the late 20th century and early 21st century, fully utilizing 
Hong Kong's experience is an issue which warrants great 
attention. The earlier and more deeply people come to 
understand its value, the sooner and more extensively it will 
contribute to the development of the hinterland and Hong Kong. 
  Note 
  The Hainan Automobile Incident: In January 1983, the CPC's 
central leaders such as Hu Yaobang, Zhao Ziyang, and Gu Mu 
inspected Hainan Island, and decided to accelerate the reform 
and opening up of Hainan Island; the CPC Central Committee and 
the State Council approved and circulated the document, "A 
Summary of Discussions of the Issue of Accelerating the 
Development of Hainan Island," in April, and issued the Eight 
Rules on Expanding Hainan's Autonomy on External Economic 
Relations and Trade of the CPC Central Committee in October of 
the same year. 
  Under the Eight Rules, Hainan Island could independently 
decide to import 17 state-controlled commodities, of which the 
main one would be automobiles. This was a special privilege that 
the other special economic zones did not have. In addition, it 
was also stipulated that Hainan Island be allowed to keep all 
the foreign exchange earned from the exports it delivered. This 
rule was also more favorable than enjoyed by other special 
economic zones. For instance, Shenzhen was allowed to keep 70 
percent, and had to hand over 30 percent. 
  The Eight Rules did not clearly stipulate that the 17 
commodities imported by Hainan Island not be resold to the 
hinterland areas of the mainland. As there were no customs sites 
between Hainan and the hinterland areas of the mainland, Hainan 
was able to import state-controlled commodities and then resell 
them to the hinterland areas of the mainland, thereby acquiring 
a way of getting rich in a smooth, unhindered manner. 
  Reselling automobiles could result in huge profits. At that 
time, the import price of a 12-passenger van-truck was $5,000, 
and reselling it could produce a net profit of $12,000. For a 
time Hainan Island became the "paradise" of automobile trading 
of the country, and tens of thousands of automobiles were being 
resold. 
  The huge profits from automobiles were also accompanied by 
huge profits from foreign exchange arbitrage. The foreign 
exchange used by Hainan Island to import automobiles was all 
bought at high prices through arbitrage. According to newspaper 
reports, a unit in Hainan withdrew 1 million yuan in cash from a 
bank all at once, and used an automobile to transport the money 
to places such as Shenzhen to be used in foreign exchange 
arbitrage. Black market trading in foreign exchange was even 
more prevalent on Hainan Island. 
  At the time of the climax of Hainan's activities of 
reselling 
imported automobiles, Liang Lingguang [2733 7227 0342], governor 
of Guangdong, reported to the center on the disorderly situation 
in Hainan. In December 1984, a task force headed by Vice Premier 
Wan Li investigated the automobile incident, and promptly 
formulated emergency measures, which required, among other 
things, that the automobiles already shipped to Hainan be 
immediately frozen and then shipped away under arrangements made 
by the center, that the center buy automobiles from Hainan on 
the basis of the listed uniform rate (1 U.S. dollar to 2.8 
yuan), that free trading be prohibited, that implementation of 
all automobile purchase contracts concluded with foreign 
businesses be suspended, that the issue of compensations 
demanded by foreign businesses be handled by the center in a 
unified manner, and that there be investigations into the 
sources of foreign exchange used to buy the automobiles which 
had already been sold and into the tax matters related to those 
automobiles. 
  After the emergency measures were implemented, Hainan's 
foreign trade came to a complete halt. Automobiles and imported 
materials were being stockpiled; high-price automobiles were 
appropriated by the center. The center would only pay the amount 
calculated according to prices based on parity exchange rates. 
As a consequence, companies in Hainan suddenly lost all the huge 
gains made through reselling automobiles. (End of Installment 
No. 86) 
<H5>  [27 Aug 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] The Trip to North America (Part Two): As there 
was not enough time to have an official meeting approved, it was 
unfortunate that a meeting with Bush did not materialize. 
  The 1988 trip to North America was very fruitful. Within 
three weeks I visited a dozen or so cities in the United States 
and Canada, thereby greatly enlarging my horizon in terms of 
getting to understand capitalist countries. I saw the positive 
as well as negative social impact on people produced by the 
social welfare policies followed by capitalist countries, and 
some aspects of a situation where, under a democratic political 
system, political parties cared only about the present and did 
everything possible to win votes in their efforts to come into 
power, while giving little consideration to the consequences. 
  At that time the United States was in the midst of the 
presidential election held once every four years. Reagan, a 
Republican President, was no longer running, and made Vice 
President Bush the presidential candidate. We visited over 10 
metropolises along the east coast as well as the west coast of 
the United States, and met with executives of several dozen 
large industrial, commerce, and financial enterprises and some 
experts and scholars of economics and finance, some of whom were 
Republicans, while others were Democrats or independents. When 
discussing which party was likely to win in the general 
election, most of them, including a few Democrats, expressed the 
belief that Bush of the Republican party would win. Several 
large enterprise executives, who were Democrats, even took the 
initiative in openly saying that they would vote for Bush of the 
Republican party for the reason that they "like Bush's 
platform." The frankness was beyond my understanding. 
  During my trip to the United States, a Hong Kong tycoon, who 
was a Consultative Committee member, accompanied me when I 
visited Washington and New York. He and Bush were friends. He 
got Bush to agree to meeting me on a private basis. At that time 
the campaign was gradually entering an intensified stage. That 
tycoon, who was a Consultative Committee member, met Bush first. 
When discussing the presidential election, Bush himself said 
that he was not very confident, for most of the several previous 
Vice Presidents who had run had failed. Bush believed that he 
himself was unlikely to become an exception. But as it turned 
out, he won. 
  Later there were some changes in regard to Bush's plan to 
meet me. According to a source, the U.S. State Department argued 
that the meeting had to be an official one. I was asked about my 
opinion on the matter. I said to myself that an official meeting 
had to be approved by the State Council in Beijing and that 
there was not enough time. Thus the plan was shelved. Later, 
after being elected, Bush sent me a letter, expressing his 
regret for not being able to meet me and giving me two small 
gifts emblazoned with his name to serve as souvenirs. 
  My impression of the U.S. presidential election was: only by 
making its platform in line with the wishes of the majority of 
the people and the electorate, would a political party have the 
possibility of coming into power. Surely, platforms used during 
the campaigns often are not or cannot be implemented, and some 
have even to be fundamentally altered, as candidates often break 
their promises after being elected. Nevertheless, voters are 
very practical and short-sighted, resulting in the defect of 
campaigning parties' writing a great deal of "checks" in order 
to win votes while disregarding all consequences. In order to 
win votes, political leaders pay great attention to having 
contact with all sectors of society, whether in ordinary time or 
during election campaigns. Bush's letter to me seemed to have 
been drafted and typed by his secretary and signed by him; the 
small gifts might have been specially prepared. He treated, in 
such a manner, someone whom he did not know and had had only an 
indirectly set appointment, and made appropriate responses to 
people, whatever social strata they belonged to--all this gave 
people the impression that he was courteous and respectful to 
people. Generally Chinese leaders would not handle things in 
such a manner. It is said that generally American leaders give 
responses to their own countrymen in the same manner. This not 
only shows their respect for their voters, treating them as 
equals, but also serves to increase "resources" for election 
campaigns. This is a phenomenon demonstrating the superiority of 
democratic politics. 
<H3>  The June Fourth Storm. -- An Angry Tide of Patriotism (Part 
One): Sending Videos of the Student Movement, Made by the Hong 
Kong Media, to Zhao Ziyang </H3>
  In January 1989, Fang Lizhi wrote a letter to Deng Xiaoping, 
demanding the granting of amnesty and calling for the release of 
Wei Jingsheng, who had been arrested for involvement in the 
Xidan Democracy Wall activities. During February and March, some 
well-known cultural figures and a number of first-rate natural 
scientists at home wrote their respective joint open letters to 
the chief responsible persons of the CPC Central Committee and 
the State Council, expressing support for Fang Lizhi's proposal 
and raising a series of democratic demands: reform the political 
system, release political prisoners, and terminate the practice 
of convicting people of ideological crimes. 
  Many of those people were CPC members, and some were 
deputies 
to the National People's Congress and members of the National 
Committee of the Chinese People's Political Consultative 
Conference. Thus the actions aroused strong reactions at home 
and abroad. Many famous figures of the intellectual and 
scientific communities overseas responded by starting a 
signature drive to show solidarity. The political climate in 
China resembled to a great extent the situation before a huge 
storm. While in Hong Kong, I also strongly felt that a political 
storm was coming. 
  I asked the propaganda department of the Hong Kong Branch of 
the XINHUA NEWS AGENCY to collect and sort out information about 
reactions from Hong Kong society and international reactions, 
and started the practice of transmitting to the CPC Central 
Committee and the State Council information about the outside 
world through the facsimile transmission device of the XINHUA 
NEWS AGENCY (the small branch) on a daily basis, providing them 
with some reference information in the hope that they would take 
note of outside reactions when handling the matter. 
  On 15 April 1989 Hu Yaobang died. University students of 
Beijing began to go to the streets. On 22 April, the day of the 
Hu Yaobang Memorial Meeting, tens of thousands of students 
gathered at Tiananmen Square. They sent three representatives to 
kneel down in front of the Great Hall of the People, demanding 
that responsible persons of the center meet them. But no one 
from the center went to meet them. I and several deputy 
directors of the Hong Kong Branch of the XINHUA NEWS AGENCY saw 
the scene on Hong Kong television. We all thought that such a 
way of handling things was not appropriate. Why could Zhao 
Ziyang and Li Peng not have come out to meet the students? If 
they themselves did not want to meet the students, they could 
have sent a secretary to meet the students. It was totally 
incomprehensible why they should have totally ignored the likely 
effects, letting students keep kneeling for several hours. 
Students acted out of their patriotism and their support for the 
reform and opening policy of the Communist Party of China. What 
was there to fear? Why should CPC leaders be afraid of meeting 
the masses and students? We really did not approve of the 
central responsible persons' approach which was characterized by 
being divorced from the masses. 
  Beijing students progressed from carrying out marches and 
presenting petitions to staging a sit-in in Tiananmen Square, 
and from demanding a meeting with central leaders to demanding a 
dialogue with central leaders; but all the while the leaders in 
Beijing failed to deal with the developments in a timely and 
appropriate manner. The situation was getting increasingly 
grave, and there had been strong expressions of dissatisfaction 
from the outside world. I was extremely worried, and specially 
asked people to deliver to Zhao Ziyang and the Central Committee 
Secretariat, videos, made by Hong Kong reporters in Beijing and 
broadcast in Hong Kong, of the student movement in Beijing, and 
materials on reactions from the Hong Kong media, in the hope of 
arousing their attention so that they might dispose of the 
matter appropriately at an early date. After seeing them, Zhao 
Ziyang said to the delivery people that they provided more 
information than he got in Beijing and requested that such 
videos and materials continue to be sent to him from time to 
time. [End of Installment No. 115] 
<H5>  [28 Aug 93 p 3] </H5>
  [Text] An Angry Tide of Patriotism (Part Two): The 
Political Bureau Meeting Determined That the Student Movement 
Was a Case of Turmoil; Li Peng Completely Jettisoned the CPC's 
Glorious Tradition of Relying on the Masses 
  On 23 April, Zhao Ziyang left Beijing to visit Pyongyang, 
North Korea. The next day Li Peng gathered and presided over a 
Political Bureau meeting, at which Li Ximing [2621 6932 6900], 
secretary of the CPC Beijing Municipal Committee, and Chen 
Xitong [7115 1585 0681], mayor of Beijing, reported to the 
Political Bureau of the CPC Central Committee on the student 
movement in Beijing. They exaggerated the situation, or even 
distorted facts and gave false information. As a result, the 
meeting concluded that the student movement constituted a 
"serious organized and planned political struggle guided by an 
anti-Communist, anti-Socialist program," and that the movement 
was a case of "turmoil" in terms of its nature. After the 
meeting, Li Peng told Yang Shangkun that he would report to Deng 
Xiaoping. On 25 April, Deng Xiaoping met Yang Shangkun and Li 
Peng. After listening to reports, Deng expressed agreement to 
their views and the Political Bureau meeting's conclusion on the 
nature of the student movement. 
  After Deng Xiaoping expressed his attitude, on the same 
night 
Li Peng asked the party and government institutions of Beijing 
Municipality to transmit the decision made by Deng Xiaoping and 
the Political Bureau meeting, and informed the provincial and 
municipal party committees by telegram. He also asked Hu Qili to 
immediately arrange for RENMIN RIBAO to write an editorial. On 
the next day, that is, 26 April, RENMIN RIBAO published an 
editorial, entitled "It Is Necessary to Take a Clearcut Stand 
Against Turmoil," publicly claiming that the student movement 
"is a planned conspiracy, is a case of turmoil, and is in 
essence aimed at fundamentally rejecting the leadership of the 
Communist Party of China and the socialist system." On the same 
day Beijing and Shanghai held their respective meetings each 
attended by 10,000 CPC-member cadres, calling on all CPC members 
to take part in this serious political struggle. 
  Upon learning the news, I felt that something was very 
wrong. 
According to analysis made at that time, a small array of 
foreign forces and anti-Communist forces did get involved in the 
student movement, and some even played some behind-the-scenes 
manipulation in the student movement, but the student movement 
was patriotic. The conclusion that the student movement as a 
whole was a case of turmoil represented an exaggeration of the 
seriousness of the problem, and an action of striking at a very 
large number of people. This action was not proper in view of 
the actual situation, and was very unwise. 
  After being published, the editorial aroused strong 
reactions 
from cadres at large and the broad masses. On 27 April, nearly 
100,000 college students of Beijing demonstrated in the streets. 
The CPC Beijing Municipal Committee had already issued, through 
organizations at the various levels, strict orders of dismissing 
and transferring those taking moderate actions to support 
turmoil instigators and of arresting and punishing those taking 
energetic actions to support turmoil instigators, but the 
students still received warm responses and support from the 
broad masses of residents and cadres when conducting marches. 
Before 26 April, the student movement mainly targeted Li Peng. 
After the publication of the editorial, things began to change, 
and Deng Xiaoping began to be targeted directly. Some children 
of senior cadres, close to the Deng family, spread the idea that 
"Deng Xiaoping was sold out by Li Peng." The student movement 
"escalated," thereby forcing Yuan Mu, Chen Xitong, and others to 
carry out a "dialogue" with student representatives. Their rigid 
attitude characterized by the insistence that the student 
movement was a case of "turmoil" not only failed to moderate the 
student movement, but added fuel to the flames. On 13 May 
several hundred students began a hunger strike as part of the 
petition effort. Students on hunger strike numbered several 
thousand on the next day. Tiananmen Square, Beijing, and the 
entire country were seething and were in an uproar. The were 
reports, from time to time, of students fainting and being sent 
to hospitals. The number of students on hunger strike continued 
to increase. Some even began to refuse to drink water. It was 
such a grave situation that forced Li Peng to come out to carry 
out a dialogue with student representatives. As shown by live 
television coverage, Li Peng put on executive airs and assumed a 
condescending attitude, while demonstrating no trace at all of 
the CPC's practice of mass work. Especially, on the one hand Li 
Peng told student representatives: "Neither the government nor 
the CPC Central Committee has ever said that you students are 
creating turmoil." On the other hand he refused to accept the 
demands contained in the petitions made by the students on 
hunger strike, would not conduct any substantive dialogue with 
student representatives, and refused to recognize that the 
students were being patriotic. Li Peng also said that he would 
express his own views at an appropriate time, thereby 
effectively declaring that RENMIN RIBAO's "conclusion on the 
nature of the movement" would not be changed. He continued to 
threaten representatives of the students on hunger strike, 
behaving in an abominable way. The scene was really unbearable 
to watch. After seeing the scene, I and some of my colleagues at 
the XINHUA NEWS AGENCY were totally disgusted, believing that 
the CPC's tradition of believing in and relying on the masses 
was completely jettisoned by Li Peng. It would had been better 
that he had not come out to conduct the dialogue. After he 
engaged in dialogue, the situation was certain to further 
deteriorate. 
  Just a day later, on the night of 19 May, Li Peng, shouting 
at the top of his voice, declared at the meeting of party, 
government, and military cadres in Beijing that the student 
movement was a case of turmoil, and that it was necessary to 
fight back against turmoil. Yang Shangkun claimed that troops 
were already being ordered to enter Beijing. Zhao Ziyang did not 
participate in the meeting. I felt that Zhao Ziyang might have 
already been driven out of power and that the situation would 
deteriorate quickly. 
  The next day the marshall law decree signed by Li Peng was 
made public, triggering even more powerful resistance activities 
in Beijing and Hong Kong, and the situation became even more 
serious. In Beijing a million people staged marches and 
demonstrations, demanding the rescinding of the marshall law 
decree. The slogan, "Down with Li Peng," was heard all over 
Beijing, and even some workers at the CPC Central Committee and 
the State Council took part in the activities, holding banners. 
The powerfulness and scale were unprecedented. [End of 
Installment No. 116] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20448 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar015___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  8 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs 117-119 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0145A Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 29-31 Aug 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0145A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installments No 117-119 of the serialized memoirs of Xu </F>
Jiatun: "Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
<H5>  [30 Aug 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] An Angry Tide of Patriotism (Part Three): 
Workers of the XINHUA SHE and Chinese-Owned Institutions Were 
Swept Along by the Torrent, I Did Not Try To Stop Their Actions; 
WEN WEI PO Left a Hole of Blank Space on Its Page; Zhang 
Junsheng Made the Decision on the Phrase, "Extremely Pained and 
Bitter" 
  During this period, people of Hong Kong changed their 
deep-rooted habit of paying no attention to politics and 
launched a patriotic movement. Most proceeded from their 
patriotism, their love for Hong Kong, their support for reform, 
and their demand for the progress of the country and the CPC. 
Participation was widespread. People of the left, the middle, 
and the right all got involved. There were people ranging from 
big capitalists to ordinary residents such as taxi drivers and 
street vendors. Several middle-aged big capitalists told me 
personally that they had taken part in million-man marches, and 
walked some distance. When interviewed by a reporter, Li 
Ka-shing openly expressed support for the students' patriotic 
movement. Some large stores conducted "benefit sales," donating 
the revenues or profits to be used for supporting students' 
patriotic activities at Tiananmen Square. Vendors and small 
business operators along the streets also voluntarily carried 
out similar "benefit sales" activities. During that period the 
patriotic torrent swept most people in Hong Kong along with it 
and swept across every corner of Hong Kong, creating an 
unprecedented situation. 
  Most workers of XINHUA SHE, and Chinese-owned institutions 
also, like others, voluntarily got swept along by the torrent, 
becoming an exceptionally prominent force in the movement, 
thereby creating an unprecedented episode in the history of the 
Hong Kong Branch of XINHUA SHE and Chinese-owned institutions. 
  Some time back when the Tiananmen student movement had just 
started, some workers of the XINHUA SHE and Chinese-owned 
institutions had already begun to participate in activities in 
society which were carried out to show solidarity with the 
patriotic student movement in Beijing; there were even signature 
drives in the XINHUA SHE in support of the patriotic student 
movement. 
  Zheng Hua was in charge of party affairs and organizational 
work. He suggested that those activities should be stopped. 
During discussions at a meeting of the CPC Work Committee, I 
said: "Don't call such a move stopping; call it persuading. If 
persuasion is not successful, let it pass. They should not be 
forced to do things!" "Leading cadres of the level of directors 
and deputy directors of the departments or above must be 
persuaded, in whatever ways, to refrain from taking part in 
activities in society and to refrain from giving their 
signatures." 
  Actually, almost all directors and deputy directors of the 
departments had by then given their signatures. After being 
informed of the decision of the CPC Work Committee, most 
retracted their signatures, but a few people stubbornly refused 
to retract their signatures. Zhen Hua asked me the question of 
what to do. I asked him to let it pass if they should refuse to 
retract their signatures, and told him not to force them to do 
things. 
  At that time some cadres of the Hong Kong Branch of the 
XINHUA SHE not only took part in the marches but also used 
identity banners of the Hong Kong Branch of the XINHUA SHE. 
Furthermore Xu Haining made a speech at a mass rally held at the 
racecourse. With regard to those incidents, I told him not to 
blame them. We also decided that mass organizations and trade 
unions of the left be also permitted to take part in marches and 
show their identity banners and that their leaders be permitted 
to openly take part in marches or other activities. In my view, 
amidst the current upsurge of mass patriotism on such a scale in 
Hong Kong, if leaders of mass organizations did not participate, 
those leaders would become seriously divorced from the masses, 
and the mass organizations might collapse; or, even if the 
organizations did not collapse, they would weaken greatly. Only 
by taking the initiative in participating would it be possible 
to keep contact with the masses. Later things developed to the 
extent that some marchers shouted the slogan, "Down with Deng, 
Li, and Yang." We decided that mass organizations of the left 
should not use such a slogan, and we pointed out that using such 
a slogan was a radical move. 
  We applied the same policy to Hong Kong's leftist newspapers 
like WEN WEI PO and TA KUNG PAO, imposing no restrictions on 
their reporting and letting them report the student movement in 
Beijing and activities in Hong Kong in support of the student 
movement in an objective manner. We did not impose restrictions 
on the newspapers' own statements, but only asked them to say 
less. 
  On 20 May, after Li Peng imposed martial law on Beijing, 
Zhang Junsheng, deputy director of the Hong Kong Branch of the 
XINHUA SHE, told me that colleagues at WEN WEI PO intended to 
react to the development by leaving the editorial space blank, 
and were planning to use one of the two phrases, "extremely 
pained and bitter" and "what else to say." After discussions, 
most colleagues at the newspaper favored using the phrase, "what 
else to say." Zhang Junsheng was inclined to use the phrase, 
"extremely pained and bitter," and asked for my advice. I knew 
that the action could not be stopped, and that such a way of 
handling things might have serious consequences. Nevertheless I 
still nodded approval, saying: "You handle this matter." In this 
way I clearly indicated my approval of his idea. 
  The four Chinese characters meaning "extremely pained and 
bitter" appeared in the editorial position on the first page of 
WEN WEI PO on the next day, causing quite a stir. Beijing was 
very angry. Li Peng ordered the Hong Kong Affairs Office to 
investigate into the incident. I asked them to tell Beijing in 
their reply: that Hong Kong was different from the hinterland 
and that we would handle the matter in an appropriate manner. In 
this way I indicated my refusal to cooperate. Later this 
incident developed into quite a storm. I will discuss the 
incident again later in the book. 
  In terms of my personal emotions, I had very complex 
feelings, seeing the warm support given by the masses of 
residents of Hong Kong as well as the marches, rallies, benefit 
sales activities on an unprecedented scale in Hong Kong. After 
20 May Hong Kong was hit by a typhoon, and No. 8 wind globes 
were hung. Amidst violent storms Hong Kong people of all walks 
of life still persisted in carrying out a sit-in all night long 
in front of the Hong Kong Branch of the XINHUA SHE, singing 
petition songs. I was in my bedroom on the 12th floor. Seeing 
the rain and wind and hearing the continuous singing and slogan 
shouting of people on the ground, I had all kinds of complex 
emotions. The CPC got started by promoting mass movement. In the 
past, in order to promote the interests of the masses of the 
people, the CPC led them in the fight against the Kuomintang 
rule; now, in a reversal of roles, the masses were demonstrating 
against the CPC and raising their demands. The CPC not only was 
unable to satisfy them but would also suppress them. In the face 
of such a situation that I could do nothing to change, I was 
unable to fall asleep. Seeing the masses sitting on the ground 
in the wind and rain and hearing their mournful and indignant 
singing and shouting, I could not stop my tears from flowing 
down. [End of Installment No. 117] 
<H5>  [30 Aug 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] Got Involved in the Infighting at the Core 
(Part One): Zhao Ziyang Regretted the Publication of the April 
26 Editorial of RENMIN RIBAO; Intended To Ask Yang Shangkun To 
Persuade Deng Xiaoping To Change the Conclusion on the Nature of 
the Student Movement 
  On 30 April 1989, Zhao Ziyang returned home from his visit 
to 
Pyongyang. He telephoned me on the next day, asking me to go to 
Beijing. I immediately set out on the journey. I took with me 
many materials and videos on the student movement in Beijing 
presented by the Hong Kong media so as to show them to Zhao 
Ziyang. 
  On 3 May, Zhao Ziyang talked with me for nearly two hours at 
his Zhongnanhai residence. First of all, he asked about my views 
on this student movement. I said: "This is a patriotic movement 
and a movement which supports the CPC-led reform; some people 
hope that the reform can advance further, while some people fear 
that the reform will stop or even go backward." 
  I told Zhao Ziyang that after coming to Beijing on 2 May I 
had met with some people in order to grasp the situation in 
Beijing, and that support for the student movement was 
widespread, with supporters including most cadres of party and 
government organs. There were two categories of people in 
society who supported the student movement. In the first 
category were individual business operators, and in the second 
category were executives of reformed enterprises; those people 
had benefitted from the reform and feared that there would be 
policy changes, leading to retrogression. 
  I said: "This student movement appears to be high. The 
slogans, indicating support for the CPC and Deng Xiaoping, are 
very wise in a tactical sense. On the one hand this shows that 
most people do think this way, but on the other hand this also 
shows that some people are giving them advice. I estimate that 
it is perhaps some young teachers and researchers at 
universities and research institutions who are doing the 
advising. But it should not be ruled out that some foreign 
forces or even some reactionary forces from Hong Kong are 
involved and have a hand in the movement. Nevertheless, the 
movement is good in the main." 
  I said that the 26 April editorial of RENMIN RIBAO labeling 
the student movement as "turmoil" had exacerbated the conflict 
and had thus been, in my opinion, very unwise. I had been told 
that Beijing's cadres and residents at large had been shocked by 
the editorial, and that most people had been in disagreement 
with the opinion expressed by the editorial and had cursed Deng 
Xiaoping, with some people also saying that Deng Xiaoping had 
been hoodwinked by Li Peng, Chen Xitong [7115 1585 0681], and Li 
Ximing [2621 6932 6900]. According to a rumor, during 
discussions at a meeting of the Political Bureau of the CPC 
Central Committee, Li Ximing and Chen Xitong had reported that 
the students would launch a rebellion. Chen Xitong had even said 
that if he should be given 50,000 troops he would be able to put 
down the students immediately. It seemed that Deng Xiaoping had 
believed them, thereby making a mistake. 
  I suggested: "It is still necessary to persuade and divide 
people but not suppress them. It is necessary to win over the 
overwhelming majority of the students, and to isolate a handful 
of anti-Communist elements who are trying to carry out sabotage." 
  I also suggested: "We (the Communist Party of China) cannot 
afford making another mistake. The Cultural Revolution ruined 
Mao Zedong, resulting in the emergence of the confidence, 
conviction, and belief crisis. Over the past few years we 
depended on Comrade Xiaoping. Now it is imperative not to allow 
Comrade Xiaoping to also be ruined." 
  After listening to me, Zhao Ziyang said: "We are in 
agreement." He specially stressed: "We must safeguard Comrade 
Xiaoping's prestige. I am willing to publicly accept the 
responsibility. We should tell Comrade Xiaoping the actual state 
of affairs, and persuade him to change the conclusion on the 
nature of the movement." 
  Zhao Ziyang said: "In fact I am also responsible for the 26 
April editorial in RENMIN RIBAO. I was in Pyongyang. The CPC 
Central Committee sent me the draft of the editorial, asking 
about my opinion. I indicated my approval. I will not have the 
Standing Committee held responsible. I am willing to publicly 
accept my personal responsibility." 
  He also said: "The students demand clean government, oppose 
corruption, oppose "official profiteering," and oppose 
privileges... those ideas have all been put forward by our 
party. It is good that students and the masses are now 
supporting the ideas. We should accept the reasonable part of 
the masses' demands through carrying out a dialogue. I intend 
to recommend the Standing Committee to take some concrete 
measures to suppress and eradicate those problems." 
  Zhao Ziyang discussed some specific ideas. For example, the 
fight against privileges should start at the center; Central 
Standing Committee members should take actions first. First, 
terminate the "special supplies" (referring to the system of 
proving central cadres of the vice premier level or above with 
inexpensive food and living goods) for Central Standing 
Committee members. Implementation of the measure may be delayed 
in the case of old people. Reform the system governing the 
special planes, special trains, guards for Standing Committee 
members during their trips outside the capital. Some old people 
should be allowed to keep the privilege. But the idea that new 
Standing Committee members should travel in a simpler manner and 
have smaller entourages should be considered. 
  With regard to privileges enjoyed by children of 
high-ranking 
cadres, Zhao said: "I intend to write a letter to the CPC 
Central Committee, saying that my children should be 
investigated first, that if they have problems they should be 
punished according to the law of the land, and that if I myself 
am involved, I should be dealt with in the same manner." He also 
said that he would propose convening a meeting of the Standing 
Committee of the National People's Congress to discuss and 
formulate measures to fight corruption, officials' profiteering, 
and privileges. 
  We also discussed some other issues, such as the issue of 
price increases and inflation. I suggested that from a long-term 
perspective it was necessary to consider carrying out financial 
reforms, and that for the time being it might be proper, first 
of all, to raise bank interest rates, so as to promote savings 
and gather more idle funds from society. 
  We also discussed the issue of the Autonomous Students' 
Union 
and the Workers' Autonomous Federation, that is, how to view the 
situation where aside from the traditional trade unions and 
student organizations there were now also independent 
organizations of students and workers. Zhao Ziyang said that we 
should not be afraid of such independent organizations and that 
it was proper to let them operate and participate in elections. 
As long as our mass organizations represented the interests of 
the masses, there should be no fear of competition. 
  Zhao said that the main issues for now were, firstly, to 
persuade Comrade Xiaoping to change the conclusion on the nature 
of the student movement and, secondly, to solicit opinions from 
Standing Committee members in an effort to change the decision. 
Zhao Ziyang said: "Please give me some help. You get along well 
with Shangkun. Please tell him the ideas we discussed today and, 
especially, the reactions from the outside world and your views, 
and ask him about his views. If he is in agreement, then ask him 
to go to talk to Comrade Xiaoping so as to persuade Comrade 
Xiaoping to change the conclusion on the nature of the movement." 
  Zhao Ziyang indicated that he planned to talk with Li Peng. 
He estimated that among the Standing Committee members, Qiao Shi 
and Hu Qili would agree with him, and that the main problem lay 
in Li Peng and Yao Yilin. [End of Installment No. 118] 
<H5>  [31 Aug 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] Got Involved in the Infighting at the Core 
(Part Two): Zhao Ziyang Was in Danger of Losing His Power 
Because of Indiscreet Remarks Made During a Meeting With 
gorbachev; the Political Bureau Rejected Zhao Ziyang's Idea on 
Handling the Student Movement 
  I agreed to do the thing that Zhao Ziyang asked me to do 
because I felt duty-bound. 
  After coming back to the place where I was staying, I 
immediately set an appointment with Yang Shangkun. We met in 
Yang Shangkun's home on the next day. I told Yang Shangkun the 
main contents of my talk with Zhao Ziyang and the main ideas 
discussed during the talk. Yang Shangkun readily expressed his 
total agreement. Yang also told me that he had just returned 
from the Great Hall of the People and had listened to the speech 
made by Zhao Ziyang to the heads of delegations to the annual 
conference of the Asian Development Bank [ADB] and senior ADB 
officials, and that in his opinion the speech was very good. 
When he had met Qiao Shi, Qiao Shi had also expressed his 
approval. In view of the statement contained in the April 26 
editorial that "this is a planned conspiracy and a case of 
turmoil," Zhao Ziyang said in his speech: "There will be no 
large-scale turmoil in China." He argued that the basic demands 
raised by the student marchers "are exactly our party's policy 
ideas." He also said that efforts would be made to resolve 
problems of common concern through a dialogue involving various 
social strata. 
  Later I learned that Zhao Ziyang's speech had been discussed 
at a meeting of the Central Standing Committee, and had been 
drafted by Bao Tong, political secretary of the Standing 
Committee of the Political Bureau of the CPC Central Committee 
and Zhao Ziyang's personal secretary. During the discussion at 
the Standing Committee meeting, Yao Yilin had suggested that a 
segment on fighting bourgeois liberalization be added to the 
draft. Zhao gave some explanation, arguing that the matter 
should not be stressed for the time being in view of such a 
climate. Standing Committee members all expressed their approval. 
  Yang Shangkun said to me: "I will talk to the patriarch 
(referring to Deng Xiaoping). You know the patriarch's 
disposition. He may accept the idea, but may also reject the 
idea. You tell Ziyang to start handling the matter in this way. 
If there is any question of responsibility, I will be the first 
to be held responsible." I told Yang Shangkun: "It is rumored 
that this time either Zhao or Li will be out of power." Yang 
Shangkun said resolutely: "No one is going to be out of power. 
Neither Zhao nor Li will step down." 
  After talking with Yang Shangkun, I telephoned Zhao Ziyang 
to 
tell him what had happened. He met me again to discuss in detail 
my talk with Yang Shangkun. Zhao Ziyang told me that he had 
talked to Li Peng. But he did not tell me the results. 
  At that time Zhao Ziyang's speeches at the May Fourth 
Commemoration Meeting and to ABD officials were well received by 
those within the party as well as the students and society at 
large. As a result I and Zhao Ziyang became overly optimistic in 
terms of our assessment of the situation of the time. Zhao 
Ziyang said to me then: "It seems that the student movement can 
stimulate reform." Thus I returned to Hong Kong, feeling 
assured. After coming back to Hong Kong, I transmitted the basic 
policy on handling the student movement (without touching on the 
related situation in the Central Standing Committee) to members 
of the CPC Work Committee. We discussed the relevant policies 
followed by Hong Kong and Macao and sent a special written 
report to the CPC Central Committee, so as to provide support 
for Zhao Ziyang's work in Beijing. The report contained mainly 
four points, basically embodying the contents of the talk with 
Zhao Ziyang in Beijing. 
  On 13 May things changed suddenly. Students began a hunger 
strike. The strike went on for several days in a row. As the 
domestic and foreign media reported the strike continuously in a 
sensational manner, the situation of the student's hunger strike 
became increasingly tense, and some students even declared that 
they would refuse to drink water. 
  I specially telephoned Zhao Ziyang and Yang Shangkun, 
suggesting that the matter of students' hunger strike be dealt 
with without any further delay, that several hundred buses be 
prepared, that hospital beds be made vacant, that doctors, 
nurses, some office workers all put on white gowns and take 
students on hunger strike to hospitals in a compulsory manner at 
dawn through having several people support or carry one student, 
that then Tiananmen Square be closed, and that a dialogue be 
carried out. I feared that conflicts would further intensify if 
some students should die because of the hunger strike. Both of 
them said on the telephone that those were good ideas. But then 
I waited and waited, but never saw any action. Perhaps they were 
also unable to do anything at that time. 
  On 15 May CPSU General Secretary Gorbachev came to visit 
China. On the morning of 16 May Deng Xiaoping said in his 
meeting with Gorbachev: "This evening you will also meet Zhao 
Ziyang, general secretary of the CPC Central Committee; that 
meeting will signify the normalization of relations between the 
Chinese and Soviet parties." However, in the evening Zhao Ziyang 
said to Gorbachev: "Your summit meeting with Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping this morning is the climax of your trip to China. I 
want to say that your summit meeting signified the restoration 
of relations between our two parties and the normalization of 
relations between our two parties. Therefore the normalization 
of relations between our two parties did not happen now but in 
the morning." Zhao Ziyang then went on to say: "The First Plenum 
of the 13th CPC Central Committee made a formal decision that 
Deng Xiaoping would still be needed to steer the course when 
important issues should be involved." 
  After seeing this news on television I said to several 
deputy 
directors that these remarks would make things worse, and that 
although he might have meant well in making the remarks, making 
the remarks at this point in time would result in having the 
remarks misunderstood by Deng Xiaoping. 
  Just as expected, the news from Beijing was that the Central 
Standing Committee had held a meeting, that Deng Xiaoping did 
not approve of changing the conclusion on the nature of the 
student movement, and that Zhao Ziyang had resigned. But, on the 
morning of the 19th Zhao Ziyang still went to visit students on 
hunger strike at the square. As I learned later, on the night of 
the 18th the Political Bureau meeting, which lasted to the early 
hours of the next day, rejected Zhao Ziyang's idea on handling 
the student movement. After the meeting, Zhao immediately went 
to visit the students at the square, saying tearfully that he 
hoped that the students would stop the hunger strike and take 
care of their health. And he said that he had come too late, and 
also said sorry to the students. 
  After I learned, while in Hong Kong, that Zhao Ziyang had 
gone to visit the students at Tiananmen Square, I also decided 
to visit the Hong Kong students in front of the XINHUA SHE 
Building for there were also Hong Kong students who were 
carrying out a sit-in and hunger strike night and day in front 
of the XINHUA SHE Building. 
  At the scene some reporters asked me about my views on the 
student movement. I said that I was in total agreement with the 
views of General Secretary Zhao Ziyang. 
  On the night of that same day (19 May), Li Peng, with a 
stern 
face, declared the imposition of martial law on Beijing City. 
(Installment No. 119) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20449 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar015___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  8 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0146A Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 1-3 Sep 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0146A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [The 120th, 121st, and 122nd installments of book by Xu </F>
Jiatun: Xu Jiatun Xianggang Huiyilu (The Hong Kong Memoirs 
of Xu Jiatun)] 
<H5>  [1 Sep 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] Got Involved in Infighting at the Core (Part 3 
of 3) 
  Beijing imposed martial law to terminate the turmoil. 
The center summoned me to get me "informed." Yang Shangkun 
unequivocally promised me that Li Peng would not be allowed to 
become general secretary. 
  On 22 May the center sent a telegram, asking me to go to 
Beijing immediately. I estimated that this was about the 
center's reorganization. Thus I arrived in Beijing on the 23d. 
The deputy director of the General Office of the CPC Central 
Committee, who met me at the airport, had a very unusual 
expression on his face and looked very nervous. He told me that 
Beijing Municipality's public security police could no longer 
perform their duties, that workers, students, and residents were 
maintaining checkpoints along the streets in the city, checking 
pedestrians and vehicles, and that government and military 
vehicles could be detained at any time if they were found at the 
checkpoints. Therefore vehicles of party organizations and 
public institutions as well as government and military vehicles 
had now all changed into using ordinary municipal license 
plates. To avoid any trouble, we went from the airport to my 
place of lodging in a roundabout way. That deputy director also 
told me that the center had transferred Jiang Zemin, secretary 
of the CPC Shanghai Municipal Committee, to the center, and that 
to avoid trouble he had pretended to be a doctor after getting 
off the plane. I asked him why the center had transferred Jiang 
Zemin here. He replied that he was "not clear," and that he only 
heard that Jiang had already replaced Hu Qili as the person in 
charge of propaganda work. I was already mentally prepared since 
I had learned that Zhao Ziyang had not participated in the 
meeting of party, government, and military cadres on the 19th, 
and therefore did not make any further inquiry. But I did not 
thought that Jiang Zemin would become general secretary. 
  On the 25th Yang Shangkun met with me in a lounge at Mao 
Zedong's Zhongnanhai swimming pool. At that time they believed 
the situation in Beijing to be very grave, and many responsible 
persons had moved. Yang Shangkun and Li Peng had moved into the 
Zhongnanhai compound, and had become next-door neighbors. One 
was living at Mao Zedong's swimming pool, and the other was 
living in a residence next to the swimming pool, which had been 
Mao Zedong's residence at the time of his death. While waiting 
for their summoning, I had learned that this trip was for the 
purpose of getting me "informed," that responsible persons of 
most provinces and municipalities had already been to Beijing, 
and that I was one of the last few persons. As for the question 
of what I would be told, I could already guess 80-90 percent of 
the answer. 
  Yang Shangkun did not say to me anything about the things 
that the two of us had discussed on 4 May. As soon as he saw me, 
he explained: "The Standing Committee has decided that I should 
talk to you and several others (Yang Shangkun did not mention 
who those several people were) because I am well-acquainted with 
you and those several persons." He also said: "According to the 
decision of the Standing Committee, Zhao Ziyang has been 
temporarily relieved of his duties. Comrade Xiaoping has said 
that there does not exist any route of retreat, and that that is 
why martial law has been used and why the People's Liberation 
Army [PLA] is being used to put down the turmoil. It is hoped 
that you can show understanding and support the center's 
decision." 
  I felt very bad then, and was speechless for a while. It was 
only after quite a while that I said: "Be sure that no blood is 
shed in the course of using the PLA!" Yang Shangkun immediately 
said: "Of course not. Of course not." He also said: "Several 
marshals, like Marshal Xu and Marshal Nie, are of the same view. 
They have also given the center the same advice." Then he said 
again: "Of course not." I then asked: "Who will be general 
secretary?" Yang Shangkun replied: "No decision has been made 
yet." Then he added: "The center has not had time to consider 
the issue." I immediately said to Yang Shangkun in a serious 
tone: "Be sure not to let Li Peng assume that office!" Yang also 
unequivocally replied: "Of course not." 
  During this process of asking and answering questions, I 
became so emotional that I shed tears. 
  Yang Shangkun also asked about the activities in Hong Kong 
in 
support of the student movement and about the situation of the 
institutions in Hong Kong which had been set up by China. He 
showed particular concern over the situation of the run on the 
Bank of China. After the meeting went on for approximately 20 
minutes, he said that he had to deal with a matter and asked me 
to see Li Peng: "You may go there to talk with him about the 
economic situation in Hong Kong." I asked myself whether it was 
because I had just criticized Li Peng that he had asked me to 
see Li Peng so that my relationship with Li Peng could become 
less tense. 
  After saying goodbye to Yang Shangkun, I immediately went to 
see Li Peng. Li's secretary said that Li was at a State Council 
meeting, and asked me to sit there for a while. He said that he 
would tell Li Peng to come back immediately. After I just sat 
down in the front room, Li Peng's wife, Zhu Lin, came out to 
greet me, and said, putting on high-official airs,: "You have 
worked very hard in Hong Kong." I was disgusted and gave a 
forced smile in reply. After sitting down, Zhu Lin immediately 
began to sing her husband's praises: "Our Old Li is steadfastly 
righteous, and is not afraid of being opposed by people. He has 
not been having an easy time lately!" She then said: "The 
students are creating so much trouble, but Zhao Ziyang would 
still play his golf...." She was talkative and arrogant. I had 
all kinds of emotions, and did not say anything to her. Seeing 
that she could not engage me in conversation, she left the room. 
  As soon as he came, Li Peng asked in a reproaching manner, 
even before sitting down: "What was the matter with WEN WEI PO 
and TA KUNG PAO? How could such an incident have happened." I 
answered directly: "Because of the effects of Tiananmen." I did 
not make any further explanation. He might have also sensed 
something; as at that time he could not do much to punish me, he 
changed into asking me about the situation in Hong Kong in a 
relaxed tone. I described how Hong Kong residents had taken 
energetic actions to support the Tiananmen student movement. 
After listening to me, Li Peng requested that I take up the 
matter with the British Hong Kong government, asking the British 
Hong Kong government to impose restrictions on the movement. He 
also suggested that the WEN WEI PO and TA KUNG PAO incident be 
investigated and that stern measures be taken accordingly. I 
said to Li Peng at once: "Circumstances in Hong Kong are 
different from those in the hinterland and therefore the way of 
handling things should also be different." I again refused to 
cooperate. After hearing my reply, Li Peng became very unhappy, 
and did not express his views any further. I did not talk to him 
about the economic situation in Hong Kong as Yang Shangkun had 
asked. I only raised to his consideration the issue of 
developing the Yangpu Special Economic Zone of Hainan once 
again. As said in the preceding pages, I had been asked by Xu 
Shijie [6079 1102 2638], secretary of the CPC Hainan Provincial 
Committee, to raise the issue. I thus raised the issue in the 
hope of persuading Li Peng to approve the report by the CPC 
Hainan Provincial Committee as soon as possible. Li Peng also 
repeated his set answer that he would approve the use of land on 
a project-by-project basis, thereby dodging the issue. This was 
the last time that I talked with Li Peng alone. As we did not 
see eye to eye with each other, I left before the talk was half 
a hour old. (120) 
<H5>  [2 Sep 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] Got Involved in the Infighting at the Core 
(Part Three of Three) 
  Li Peng issued three instructions. I transmitted them 
but had reservations. The CPC changed with the shooting in 
Beijing. I made up my mind to retire. 
  After Beijing declared that the student movement was a case 
of turmoil, on two occasions Ji Pengfei [1213 7720 7378] asked 
his secretary to telephone me, giving me the "suggestion" (he 
perhaps knew my inclination concerning the movement) that I 
follow the three instructions that Li Peng had decided to issue 
in handling the student movement-related matters in Hong Kong: 
1) the student movement in Beijing was a case of turmoil; 2) it 
was necessary to educate office cadres and workers in a positive 
manner, asking them not to participate in street activities in 
support of the students; and 3) it was necessary to persist in 
carrying out work and production. 
  After discussion, we at the CPC Hong Kong and Macao Work 
Committee decided: that Li Peng's three instructions should be 
transmitted, and that those having different views should be 
permitted to maintain reservations but should nevertheless 
implement the three instructions. In fact, this was a measure 
showing some reservation about the three instructions. After the 
talk with Yang Shangkun, I returned to Hong Kong. I relayed Yang 
Shangkun's remarks to a meeting of the CPC Work Committee, and 
reiterated Li Peng's three instructions to those within the 
institutions. However, in general people did not change their 
views on the student movement in Beijing and the mass movement 
in Hong Kong as a result. 
  Some time after 2300 on the night of 3 June, Chen Bojian, 
deputy president of WEN WEI PO, told me by phone: "Shots have 
been fired in Beijing!" For his home was at Muxudi in Beijing 
which was the first place in Beijing where shots were fired. 
  Beginning on the night of 3 June, I was sleepless for three 
days and nights in a row, that is, on the 3rd, 4th, and 5th. I 
sat on a sofa and watched television. I would lie down on the 
sofa when sleepy. Throughout the period of several days, I had 
two television sets and one radio placed in front of me. There 
was news on Beijing on television every half hour, and there was 
news on Beijing on the radio every fifteen minutes. In effect 
there was 24-hour continuous coverage of the situation in 
Beijing and reactions from Hong Kong and the outside world. No 
words can describe my contradictory emotions and indignation at 
that time. I said to myself that the CPC had changed and that 
those so-called Communists in Beijing had changed, and asked how 
they could have stood on the side opposed to the masses of the 
people. I made up my mind to retire and quit my job. I reasoned 
that I was nevertheless faced with the issue of making 
preparations for my leaving, for I did not want some office 
cadres in Hong Kong to experience problems because of my 
leaving. In addition I wanted to make some arrangements so that 
after retiring I would be able to do as much practical and 
research work as I could with regard to the use of the method of 
one country, two systems in Hong Kong. I believed that some 
Communists were finished but that this did not mean the collapse 
of the CPC, and that communism would be realized eventually in 
the future. 
  After the CPC Central Committee declared that Zhao Ziyang 
had 
been relieved of his duties and that Jiang Zemin had succeeded 
him as general secretary, I immediately asked someone to deliver 
to Zhao Ziyang a message of two sentences; one was "people 
always know who is right," and the other was "keep fit." Later 
the person delivering the message told me that after listening 
to the message, Zhao said: "Thanks!" As I recall, in history 
those upholding truth have often been treated badly and wrongly, 
but history would do justice to them in the end; people will not 
forget them, and truth will not be lost. 
<H5>  Great Changes in Popular Sentiment (Part One of Two) </H5>
  The statement that today's Beijing would be tomorrow's 
Hong Kong demonstrated the 1997 mentality. The effort to win 
over people was dealt a severe blow. We were in a position which 
was isolated to an unprecedented degree. 
  In the June 4th Incident the Communist Party of China opened 
fire on the people. The masses shed their blood, and the people 
of Hong Kong became disappointed to an unprecedented degree. 
  Against the background of the "end of time" 1997 mentality, 
people of all sectors in Hong Kong, seeing the June 4th 
Incident, came to think that they themselves might encounter 
something similar after 1997, and therefore took part in the 
movement more energetically than ever. The slogan, "today's 
Beijing is tomorrow's Hong Kong," clearly demonstrated the 1997 
mentality of the people of Hong Kong, and touched the residents' 
heartstrings. Large-scale "black" sit-ins, "black" denunciation 
meetings, and small rallies and marches of various kinds as well 
as large million-man rallies and marches stirred Hong Kong, and 
expelled Hong Kong people's long-standing political apathy; Hong 
Kong people took part in the movement in an almost frenzied 
manner. In the past, "The Internationale" and the National 
Anthem had been songs sung by people on the mainland, but now 
they were also sung by Hong Kong people. The song, "Bloodstained 
Elegance," even became a popular song sung by the general 
public. Seeing such a mentality characterized by the effort to 
express opinions through songs, one did not know whether to cry 
or laugh. 
  In addition to those who participated in the marches, in 
fact 
many more people were also affected, including all those people 
of the left, the middle, and the right in Hong Kong. 
  Almost all the local employees of the Hong Kong Branch of 
the 
XINHUA NEWS AGENCY and leftist organizations participated in the 
activities. A large portion of our basic masses--patriotic 
students and workers and CPC members including some old CPC 
members--participated in the activities. Rightist forces also 
openly took part in the marches, holding the Taiwan flag of the 
blue sky, the white sun, and red land. People of all political 
tendencies, from big capitalists to the working masses, 
including even some foreign nationals, all participated in the 
activities. There emerged a phenomenon in Hong Kong society: 
those who did not participate in the activities would be 
isolated and discriminated against. 
  In reality such activities in Hong Kong had two sides. On 
the 
one hand, in those activities the broad masses exhibited 
unprecedented enthusiasm for taking good care of China, hoping 
that the country would further reform and make progress, and 
supporting the student's patriotic movement demanding democracy 
and reform. On the other hand, the activities manifested the 
discontent with, distrust of, and opposition to the policies of 
the Communist Party of China as well as the resentment against 
the CPC's practice of suppressing the students, opposing reform, 
and opposing progress. 
  Surely it could not be ruled out that some forces which were 
hostile to the Communist Party of China and which hoped to see 
the collapse of socialist China played a role, thereby 
constituting another aspect of the activities. But it should be 
pointed out that such was not the main aspect. 
  As all kinds of forces and people of all walks of life all 
participated in the movement, a patriotic united front opposed 
to the erroneous policies of the Beijing authorities was formed. 
As a consequence there were great changes in popular sentiment, 
resulting in crushing blows to our protracted work of winning 
over people in Hong Kong, that is, the work on a united front 
based on patriotism and the love for Hong Kong, thereby putting 
us in an unprecedentedly isolated position. (121) 
<H5>  [3 Sep 93 p 3] </H5>
  [Text] Great Changes in Popular Sentiment (Part Two 
of Two) 
  There was a run on the Bank of China. Within three 
days, HK$17 billion was withdrawn. When mourning for those who 
had died during the June 4th Incident, Huang Wenfang led 
employees of the XINHUA NEWS AGENCY in holding a memorial 
ceremony. 
  After shots were fired in Beijing during the June 4th 
Incident, the people of Hong Kong were in an uninterrupted state 
of indignation. Many people expressed their mourning for the 
compatriots who had died in Beijing by carrying out workers' 
strikes, students' strikes, and shopkeepers' strikes. The stock 
market fell by 1,000 points, resulting in a loss of HK$200 
billion in the market value. The market value of real estate 
also fell by at least HK$200 billion. That is, the stock market 
and real estate alone experienced a loss of nearly HK$400 
billion. 
  As people could not express their anger in a political way, 
they staged a run on the Bank of China. Within three days, HK$17 
billion was withdrawn, creating a huge momentum. In the 1960s 
and 1970s many young students at Hong Kong's universities had 
been followers of Mao Zedong Thought, and had loved socialist 
China, thereby being called the Chinese cultural quintessence 
faction. Now those young people had mostly become the elites of 
Hong Kong society. Some were presidents or managers of Hong Kong 
branches of foreign banks, and some were chief executives of 
some large corporations. After the June 4th Incident, some of 
them held meetings. Most indignantly advocated bringing down the 
Bank of China by exploiting the run on the bank. What did this 
show? Once they had been the young people who had been the most 
patriotic and who had loved the Communist Party of China the 
most among the people of Hong Kong. But they had now undergone 
such a radical change! 
  Surely the run on the bank did produce destructive effects 
on 
Hong Kong's financial industry, but those who were hurt the most 
were in the final analysis the people of Hong Kong. After some 
discussion, the CPC Work Committee asked the Bank of China to 
take up the matter with the British Hong Kong government and the 
Hong Kong and Shanghai Bank in an urgent manner. They agreed to 
give help. The British Hong Kong government would issue a 
statement, and the Hong Kong and Shanghai Bank also planned to 
mobilize some funds to provide help. Surely the Bank of China 
would mainly rely on its own capabilities, and mobilized funds. 
The headquarters on the mainland also transferred funds here to 
provide help. Thus the run on the bank was terminated as quickly 
as possible. 
  After the June 4th incident, there was another upsurge of 
emigration. There were long lines of immigration applicants 
outside foreign consulates. Many of the hinterland-sent cadres 
who had acquired Hong Kong residence status were also planning 
to emigrate, openly standing in lines outside the consulates. 
There were intermittent reports of defections of personnel of 
Chinese embassies to foreign countries. 
  There was another wave of getting Hong Kong corporations and 
enterprises chartered in other countries. Even Li Ka-shing who 
had always indicated his disinclination to emigrate and change 
the chartering country also changed his tone and said that the 
matter of whether to change the chartering country would be 
decided by the board of directors. 
  Before the June 4th incident the Hong Kong Branch of the 
XINHUA NEWS AGENCY had been much visited. Even during the period 
of petitions and marches, there was contact with many people of 
all kinds. After the "shooting," things suddenly cooled down. 
Many people who had maintained good relations with China began 
to keep a distance. Even those people who had been close to 
China would not see us, and they also wanted to draw a 
demarcation line with Beijing and keep Beijing at a distance. 
Some merchants stopped doing business with entities inside China 
or even withdrew their offices from the hinterland. 
  After the June 4th Incident, some Hong Kong organizations in 
support of the student movement in Beijing set up a mourning 
site opposite the Hong Kong Branch of the XINHUA NEWS AGENCY 
Building to mourn for those who had died in the June 4th 
incident. Passersby would all take part in the mourning and pay 
last respects. Zheng Hua told me nervously that Huang Wenfang 
had prepared a banner, intending to take some cadres and 
employees of the branch with him to the mourning site to take 
part in the mourning. Huang Wenfang was director of the Taiwan 
work department, and he had also taken the lead when the 
department directors had given their signatures some time 
before. Zheng Hua told me that their efforts to persuade Huang 
Wenfang had failed. Zheng Hua suggested that I try to persuade 
Huang Wenfang, and that he himself try to persuade the masses. I 
expressed agreement. I told Huang Wenfang the opinion of the CPC 
Work Committee, and expressed the hope that he would not take 
the lead and that he himself would also refrain from taking part 
in the morning activities. Huang Wenfang said nothing. But 
immediately afterwards he still led a group of local employees 
in walking out of the door of the XINHUA NEWS AGENCY, with a 
banner being held high. They conducted mourning activities at 
the mourning site. Zheng Hua's persuasion efforts only produced 
some effects on a few hinterland employees, and they did not 
take part in the mourning activities. 
  For four months the walls of the Hong Kong Branch of the 
XINHUA NEWS AGENCY Building and the gymnasium across the street 
had been covered with big character posters and cartoons of all 
kinds. A little over a month after the June 4th Incident, having 
received permission from the British Hong Kong government, we 
planned to have employees of the Hong Kong Branch of the XINHUA 
NEWS AGENCY clean the walls. As the big character posters had 
been attached with glue, they could not be washed away. Thus the 
administrative department asked a cleaning company which 
belonged to Chinese-owned institutions to help clean the walls. 
Of course money would have to be paid. However, when the 
cleaning company under "leftist" institutions learned that it 
was to wash away the big character posters on the walls of the 
Hong Kong Branch of the XINHUA NEWS AGENCY Building, it 
resolutely refused to do the job. 
  The national go master, Nie Weiping, stopped over 
in Hong Kong, when traveling to Southeast Asia to participate in 
a go tournament. The bridge team of Zhejiang Province 
was also traveling with him. I invited them to a dinner at the 
Stanley guest-house of the Hong Kong Branch of the XINHUA NEWS 
AGENCY. According to the appointment, they were supposed to 
arrive at 1600. For I also liked to play go and 
wanted to take the opportunity to get some coaching from Nie 
Weiping. 
  Nie Weiping and some others came a little after 1600. The 
captain of the bridge team needed to run some errand in Kowloon, 
and therefore would come a bit late. We waited for him, while 
chatting. He did not came until 2100. We asked why he had come 
so late. According to him, when he had tried to hire a taxi in 
Kowloon, the taxi drivers would immediately drive away and 
refuse to take him after learning that the destination would be 
the Stanley guest-house of the Hong Kong Branch of the XINHUA 
NEWS AGENCY. He said that four taxis had all behaved in that 
manner. 
  Later he could not but ask a passerby to hire a taxi for 
him, 
only giving the address but not making clear that the place 
belonged to the Hong Kong Branch of the XINHUA NEWS AGENCY. Only 
in this way had he succeeded in getting a taxi to bring him 
here. I and Nie Weiping were shocked to hear the story. We had 
not thought that even the basic masses such as taxi drivers 
would assume such an attitude toward us. 
  After the June 4th Incident, in order to have Hong Kong 
people resume contact with China so as to understand the policy 
of the new leadership in Beijing, I made active efforts to talk 
to those upper- and middle-strata personalities in Hong Kong who 
were willing to have contact with us, encouraging them to visit 
Beijing. Yue-kong Pao and Li Ka-shing agreed to go to Beijing, 
but would see Deng Xiaoping only. I agreed to make arrangements 
for them. Pao and Li saw Deng Xiaoping on separate occasions. 
After coming back, they both met with me, and discussed their 
meetings. Yue-kong Pao mentioned Deng Xiaoping's attitude of 
confronting toughness with toughness towards the British 
Government. Li Ka-shing expressed his worries in a not very 
clear manner: "Mr. Deng's continuing to do what he said will not 
be good for Hong Kong." I understood that "Mr. Deng's 
statements" he referred to were the same thing Yue-kong Pao had 
talked about. 
  Successively a few other groups of people also agreed to go 
to Beijing, but the condition was that they would see only Jiang 
Zemin but not Li Peng. I also expressed my consent, and made 
arrangements. They saw Jiang Zemin. Some agreed to see both 
Jiang and Li, but demanded that the meeting with Li be not made 
public and that no news report be issued. I also accepted the 
demand and made arrangements. Only Lo Tak-shing did not express 
refusal. He saw Li Peng, and the meeting was publicly reported. 
  No matter whom they had seen, most of those who had visited 
Beijing would say the same thing in talking to me about their 
feelings: "The Beijing leadership does not understand the 
situation in Hong Kong." They would indicate their great 
disappointment. Some even said: "They (referring to the leaders 
they met) regard Hong Kong as an enemy." I did not feel proper 
to make nay further inquiry, and thus it was difficult to make 
explanation to those people. 
  Later Li Hou [2621 0683] telephoned me, saying that Jiang 
Zemin was no longer willing to see people by himself, and that 
the reason was that if they did not want to see Li Peng, then it 
would not be proper for him to see those people by himself. As 
a result several groups of people for whom arrangements had been 
made delayed their trips. At the same time it was not advisable 
to tell them Jiang Zemin's reason explicitly; so I could not but 
evade the issue. I deeply felt that there had been great changes 
in popular sentiment in Hong Kong, but Beijing was unable, and 
did not want, to understand the situation. The work on Hong Kong 
would be very difficult in the days to come. (122) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20450 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar015___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  8 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs 123-125 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0147A Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 4-6 Sep 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0147A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installments No. 123-125 of the serialized memoirs of Xu </F>
Jiatun: "Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
<H5>  [4 Sep 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] Will There Be "Account Settling"? (Part One of 
Three): The "Reflection" Report Used the Term, "Beijing 
Disturbance"; Jiang Zemin Wrote a Comment, Accusing Me of Right 
Deviation and Saying That I Should Be Transferred 
  During the 4 June disturbance, many employees of the Hong 
Kong Branch of XINHUA SHE and Chinese-owned institutions 
participated in activities in support of the students' patriotic 
activities at Tiananmen Square. After the 4 June Incident, the 
CPC Work Committee decided that "no punishment should be given 
to any of those who had committed mistakes" by participating in 
activities such as giving signatures, taking part in marches, or 
soliciting donations, and that they should learn lessons by 
themselves but should not be required to make oral or written 
self-examinations. The committee also decided to submit a report 
to the CPC Central Committee. Ji Pengfei [1213 7720 7378] 
quickly notified us, indicating approval for the idea of the CPC 
Work Committee. During the Fourth Plenum, I reported to the new 
general secretary, Jiang Zemin, on the idea. With his approval, 
we transmitted the idea to all the units, thereby calming the 
employees who had been unsettled. 
  However, when I was attending the Hong Kong and Macao work 
conference in Beijing presided over by Ji Pengfei in July, the 
conference demanded that all units supervised by the CPC Work 
Committee "reflect" on the "problems" which had occurred in Hong 
Kong during the 4 June Incident period. The so-called 
"reflecting" is a synonym of "making self-examinations regarding 
the mistakes committed." At that time, in Beijing institutions 
ranging from those at the municipal level to those at the 
central level and individuals as well as party committees at 
institutions were all engaged in "reflecting." In fact the 
practice of "having everyone go through the ordeal" was used, 
and activities of "account settling" were rampant. Ji Pengfei 
had notified us of the approval for the CPC Work Committee's 
idea of "no punishment for mistakes already committed," and 
Jiang Zemin had also expressed his approval. But now it was 
demanded that "reflecting" be conducted. In this way they went 
back on their words. I responded with silence, and did not 
indicate my attitude. Seeing this situation, Zhou Nan [0719 
0589] tried to smooth things over: "Where is the harm in doing 
some reflecting? We at the CPC Foreign Ministry group have also 
reflected." I nodded, and indicated my compliance reluctantly. 
  After returning to Hong Kong, I transmitted the instruction 
at a meeting of the CPC Work Committee, and then indicated my 
attitude: "Throughout the 4 June Incident period, I said more 
than once that if the CPC Work Committee should make any 
mistakes in handling the matter, you (referring to the other 
members of the CPC Work Committee) might shift the blame onto me 
when there should be efforts to find out who was responsible. In 
fact the decisions were made by me. We have already told our 
subordinates that there would be no punishment for the problems 
which occurred during the 4 June Incident period. Now the center 
demands that we reflect. I think that we have not made any 
mistakes, but on the other hand refusing to reflect will not be 
tolerated. I ask all of you to think about how to handle the 
matter. If there is to be reflecting, only the CPC Work 
Committee will reflect. Perhaps this instruction should not be 
transmitted to the subordinates, and it should not be demanded 
that they reflect. If any mistakes were made, I am responsible, 
and I do not want to have everyone be held responsible." Few 
people spoke at the meeting. The final conclusion was: "Write a 
reflection report!" The difficult task of "writing" it was given 
to She Mengxiao, deputy director of the branch and secretary 
general. I thought about the matter for several days, and then 
discussed with She Mengxiao the issue of how to "write" it. She 
had also prepared a preliminary draft. We agreed that we had not 
made any mistakes about which we should conduct 
self-examinations, and that we should "write" about the 
"understandings" achieved for the purpose of learning a lesson. 
How to describe the student's patriotic movement in Beijing and 
the support movement in Hong Kong and Macao? The most important 
issue was whether to use the term "disturbance" or "rebellion" 
to describe the nature of the movement in the written 
"reflection." After repeated considerations, the term, "Beijing 
disturbance," was used. 
  Written in this way, the "reflection" passed the CPC Work 
Committee and was submitted to the center. During the Fifth 
Plenum in October, to my surprise, Ji Pengfei said, when talking 
about the CPC Work Committee's "reflection" report: "Your 
reflection report is very well-written!" I could not believe my 
ears. 
  In July-August a cadre of the Hong Kong and Macao Affairs 
Office told me privately that Jiang Zemin had written a comment 
on the CPC Work Committee's "reflection" report and that the 
gist was: "It seems that Xu Jiatun is suffering from right 
deviation and should be transferred from his post." The General 
Office of the CPC Central Committee had sent the "comment" to 
the secretariat of the Hong Kong and Macao Affairs Office, and 
then had someone take it back before it had been delivered to 
the secretary general, Li Hou. The person who had come to take 
it back had not made any explanation. I believed what that cadre 
told me. For not long before, he had also told me another thing: 
Jiang Zemin had spent two days on listening to reports made by 
Li Hou [2621 0683] and Lu Ping [7627 1627]. He had not known 
what had been reported. Judging from the look on his face when 
he said those things, I understood that this was not good news 
for me. 
  During the Fourth Plenum, Jiang Zemin had taken the 
initiative in having a talk with me after he had assumed the 
high office of general secretary. The two of us had talked in a 
harmonious manner. At that time, he had been in agreement with 
the CPC Work Committee's idea that whatever the situations 
involved, none of those employees of the Chinese institutions in 
Hong Kong and Macao who had participated in the support 
activities during the 4 June Incident period should be punished. 
He had been the party's general secretary, and thus he had in 
fact given approval to the CPC Work Committee's decision on 
behalf of the CPC Central Committee. 
  He had changed his attitude after listening to the reports 
made by Li Hou and Lu Ping. I had been to Beijing several times. 
When I had been there I had asked my secretary to contact his 
secretary to request an opportunity to report to him. His 
secretary had been taken by him from Shanghai to Beijing, and 
had been friendly toward me. Once he had received a call from my 
secretary, things would be resolved. But now he had changed his 
tone, speaking in a "bureaucratic tone." First he would say that 
Jiang Zemin's schedule had been full and that he would notify me 
when time could be found. But nothing would happen afterwards. 
It would be all right if this had happened just once, but it had 
happened twice or even three times. Consequently I had not only 
felt that people would change after becoming high officials but 
also sensed that Jiang Zemin had changed his opinion of me. 
  The message given by this cadre testified to what I had 
felt, 
that is, that Jiang Zemin had labelled me as a 
"right-deviationist" and was planning to carry out "settling of 
accounts." 
  This would be the reason why during the Fifth Plenum I took 
the initiative in talking to Song Ping [1345 1627], head of the 
Central Organization Department, asking the center to approve my 
retirement. The details will be related later. (Installment No. 
123) 
<H5>  [5 Sep 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] Will There Be "Account Settling"? (Part Two of 
Three): Zeng Jianhui [2582 1696 1798] Criticized That WEN WEI 
PO's and TA KUNG PAO's Cursing the CPC Was Unthinkable; Chen 
Bojian Said That He Was Prepared To Be Transferred Back To 
Beijing and Put Into Prison at Any Time 
  After the 4 June disturbance died down, the center, the CPC 
municipal committees, institutions, agencies, units of the armed 
forces, schools, organizations, leaders of units, and 
individuals all conducted self-examinations and "reflected," and 
there were large-scale activities of "account settling." 
Although the CPC approved the CPC Hong Kong and Macao Work 
Committee's practice of "imposing no punishment for mistakes 
already committed in all cases" in Hong Kong, in practice it 
applied pressure continuously in an effort to "settle accounts." 
The difference was that whereas there was across-the-board 
"account settling" in Beijing, there were only efforts to clean 
up individual spots in Hong Kong. 
  Toward the end of June the Hong Kong and Macao Affairs 
Office 
specially notified the CPC Work Committee, asking me to go to 
Beijing and attend a meeting to discuss the problems in the 
reporting of newspapers in Hong Kong and Macao during the 4 June 
Incident period. I and Zhang Junsheng discussed the matter and 
decided that when reporting we should stress the situation in 
Hong Kong society at that time. We intended to argue that 
although the two newspapers had gone too far, we had declared 
that there would be no punishment for mistakes already committed 
in all cases. We also intended to argue that there should be no 
haste in terms of effecting "change" in the future, that a 
gradual approach should be adopted, and that the focus should be 
placed on making everyone learn a lesson. 
  I and Zhang Junsheng attended the meeting together. Ji 
Pengfei presided over the meeting, and those several people from 
the Hong Kong and Macao Affairs Office and the Foreign Ministry 
also attended the meeting. Zhu Muzhi [2612 4476 0037], head of 
the central external propaganda task force, and Zeng Jianhui, 
deputy head of the Central Propaganda Department, specially 
attended the meeting. 
  As soon as the meeting began, Zeng Jianhui asked in a 
reproachful manner: "What was the matter with WEN WEI PO and TA 
KUNG PAO?" His tone was almost the same as the reproaching tone 
used by Li Peng when he had met with me on the 25th. Zhu Muzhi 
immediately joined the exercise, demanding that the CPC Work 
Committee report on the problems of WEN WEI PO and TA KUNG PAO. 
  Zhang Junsheng reported according to the prepared outline. 
Zeng Jianhui interrupted and criticized continually: "The CPC's 
own newspapers cursed the CPC; this is really unthinkable!" I 
guessed that they had come, with the imperial sword in their 
hands, and thus waited for them to issue "instructions." Zhang 
Junsheng reported on the CPC Work Committee's principle on 
handling the matter, that is, that it would be necessary to 
adopt a gradual approach in effecting change, that there should 
be no haste, that the employees of the two newspapers should be 
allowed to go through the process of accepting the change and 
learning the lessons because otherwise there could be problems, 
and that society should also be allowed to go through a process 
of coming to show acceptance. At that juncture I saw Zeng 
Jianhui shaking his head continuously. 
  I still made some supplementary remarks. At first I still 
expressed the views that I had presented to Li Peng: It would be 
necessary not to apply the hinterland standards to the two 
newspapers, and it would be even more necessary not to use the 
hinterland's post-4 June way of handling things in handling the 
two newspapers. During the 4 June Incident period the two 
newspapers had been forced to do what they had done. At that 
time the masses in Hong Kong society and inside the newspapers 
had been so agitated that it had been very difficult for the 
leadership to keep control. Even we at the CPC Work Committee 
had encountered the same situation. The newspapers had adopted 
the contingency measures only for the purpose of preventing the 
newspapers from being brought down by the masses inside and 
outside and of preserving the battlefield position. We should 
imagine the circumstances confronting the newspaper leadership 
at that time. I emphasized that there should be no haste in 
handling the cases of WEN WEI PO and TA KUNG PAO, especially WEN 
WEI PO, and that it would be even more necessary not to use the 
hinterland methods. (At that time the news organizations of the 
hinterland were carrying out large-scale activities of "account 
settling" and of "having everyone go through the ordeal." And a 
large number of reporters and editors who had supported the 
students' patriotic activities were transferred, dismissed, or 
even arrested.) Since the center-approved policy of "imposing no 
punishment for mistakes already committed in all cases" had 
already been declared, we could only enhance education on the 
existing basis, and effect change gradually, letting them go 
through a process of coming to learn the lessons. 
  After hearing what I said, Zhu Muzhi and Zeng Jianhui looked 
at each other and indicated neither approval nor disapproval. It 
seemed that the other participants also did not want to say 
anything, and Ji Pengfei did not indicate his attitude either. 
As they did not openly express any disapproval, I thought that 
they approved of my views. 
  Eventually Zhu Muzhi talked. He asked: "How about publishing 
a party organ, like RENMIN RIBAO, in Hong Kong?" Zeng Jianhui 
further asked: "How about turning either TA KUNG PAO or WEN WEI 
PO into a party organ?" Then Ji Pengfei also took part in the 
discussion. 
  I expressed my unfavorable opinion of the idea. A RENMIN 
RIBAO-like party organ in Hong Kong would not be successful, as 
the experience of RENMIN RIBAO HAIWAI BAN would show. But, in 
view of atmosphere then, I could not show my opposition, and 
could only try to evade the issue: "We will study the issue when 
back in Hong Kong." They also expressed their consent. In this 
way the meeting ended. 
  After we returned to Hong Kong, the CPC Work Committee held 
a 
discussion meeting, and invited the CPC-member president and 
vice president of the two newspapers, Yang Qi and Chen Bojian, 
to attend the meeting as non-voting participants. After the 
transmitting exercise, everyone felt that there were heavy 
pressures, but insisted that it was necessary to adhere to the 
principle that while the two newspapers should be "changed," 
there should be no haste nor the application of pressure. 
"Change" should be achieved through using the "dilution" method 
so that those inside and outside the newspapers might go through 
a process of coming to show their acceptance. Work within the 
party and work outside the party at the two newspapers should be 
carried out together. The CPC Work Committee decided to have 
Zhang Junsheng inform Li Tzu-sung, president of WEN WEI PO, of 
the relevant views of Beijing and the CPC Work Committee, asking 
for his understanding and support. 
  The persuasion work proceeded very unsuccessfully. This was 
understandable. The problem was that Chen Bojian, vice president 
of WEN WEI PO, was overly hasty and tended to fail to use the 
right words, and that as a result the conflict could not be 
alleviated. He himself was in a very abnormal mood, and often 
clashed with Zhang Junsheng. Once he told others that he was 
prepared to be transferred back to Beijing and to be expelled 
from the party and put into prison at any time. I specially 
talked to Chen Bojian about the issue. I said: "Your problem 
related to the movement is not that serious. You are now of 
advanced age, and should already have retired. Don't take things 
too seriously. The worst that can happen would be that some 
disciplinary action is taken against you. This may be the last 
test that people like us have to face. Don't be too nervous. We 
still should do our job well now." I had been his old friend. 
When the XINHUA SHE headquarters had asked him to retire, it had 
been I who had kept him here and asked him to work at WEN WEI 
PO. I said half-jokingly: "We have done the same thing. If there 
should be any problem, let us advance and retreat together." 
Unexpectedly what I said came true later. After I came to the 
United States, he was also relieved of his duties and 
transferred back to the hinterland. Not long afterwards I saw 
the newspaper report of his death, and felt gloomy for quite 
some time. (Installment No. 124) 
<H5>  [6 Sep 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] Will There Be "Account Settling"? (Part Three 
of Three): It Was Reported That Friends of WEN WEI PO Wanted To 
Make WEN WEI PO Independent; I Misjudged the Situation; I Felt 
Guilty With Regard To Li Tzu-sung. 
  Relations between Chen Bojian and some colleagues on the one 
hand and President Li Tzu-sung on the other became very tense. 
Li Tzu-sung and some colleagues opposed the "change," and had 
not come around, while Chen Bojian was overly hasty. A newspaper 
would have to present itself to the readers every day. 
Especially some people in Beijing were watching very closely to 
see how this newspaper in which "Communists have cursed 
themselves" would "change." There were reports of clashes 
between Chen Bojian and other people almost every day. Finally 
the issue of Friends of WEN WEI PO exploded, causing an even 
more serious conflict. 
  At the informal meeting (daily meeting) of the CPC Work 
Committee, Zhang Junsheng said that it had been reported that Li 
Tzu-sung had a dinner with Liu Binyan, Lu K'eng, and Chin Yao-ju 
the other day, discussing the organizing of Friends of WEN WEI 
PO and intending to make WEN WEI PO "independent" so as to take 
it out of the leftist camp. The background was not clear. It was 
estimated that it was perhaps Taiwan or another country which 
was involved, and that it was most likely Taiwan. He also said 
that Friends of WEN WEI PO had issued a public statement, asking 
WEN WEI PO to "rise up" and become "the bridgehead for the pen 
and the gun." The situation seemed very serious. After 
discussion it was decided that firstly Chen Bojian should gather 
a meeting on the newspaper's internal affairs, that efforts 
should be made to have Li Tzu-sung attend the meeting, and that 
if the report was found to be true, there should be a public 
statement to clarify the matter. It was also decided that 
secondly a report be submitted to Beijing for record-keeping 
purposes so as to prevent the difficulty in giving an account in 
case "independence" should really happen. 
  Chen Bojian immediately went back to the newspaper to gather 
the meeting, and drafted a "statement." Li Tzu-sung had 
different views on the "statement." Chen Bojian thus gathered an 
enlarged emergency meeting of the newspaper's committee, and had 
the "statement" passed. Li Tzu-sung refused to attend the 
meeting, and issued a written announcement, dismissing Chen 
Bojian from the post of deputy president on the ground of Chen 
Bojian's overstepping his authority by unlawfully gathering the 
enlarged emergency meeting of the newspaper's committee (it had 
been President Li Tzu-sung who had issued the letter of 
appointment as deputy president to Chen Bojian). 
  It was after 8:00 in the evening. Zhang Junsheng asked that 
the CPC Work Committee convene an emergency meeting to hear 
reports on developments at WEN WEI PO. He was of the view that 
Li Tzu-sung's sudden dismissal of Chen Bojian had proved the 
information on Friends of WEN WEI PO to be correct, and that if 
no countermeasures were taken, then WEN WEI PO might be "taken 
away." 
  During the discussion it was proposed that WEN WEI PO's 
board 
of directors and committee be reorganized and that Li Tzu-sung 
be relieved of all his duties. The other people involved would 
also be dealt with properly. But WEN WEI PO was a united front 
newspaper. Furthermore such a method would not be in accord with 
the legal procedures in Hong Kong. For a time no appropriate 
methods could be formulated. On the other hand, there was the 
worry that if the matter was not disposed of, Li Tzu-sung might 
take further actions to change WEN WEI PO the next day, thereby 
resulting in an irreparable situation. 
  I agreed to taking resolute measures, but did not approve of 
relieving Li of all his duties. Li Tzu-sung had been our party's 
old friend. He did not initiate the Friends of WEN WEI PO 
activities. But things had developed to such an extent that the 
problem could not be resolved without removing him from his post 
as president. But some room should be left. I proposed that he 
retain his post as chairman of the board of directors of WEN WEI 
PO, and continue to enjoy all the benefits (political and 
economic). Everyone expressed agreement. 
  We went on to discuss several other issues, including the 
issue of how to announce the removal of Li Tzu-sung from his 
post as president. It was argued that the phrase, "discontinue 
employment," was comparatively mild; everyone agreed on it. 
  The next issue was how to transfer the WEN WEI PO shares to 
agents appointed by the XINHUA SHE. As one-third of the Hong 
Kong WEN WEI PO shares were still owned by the Shanghai WEN WEI 
PO, it was necessary to contact the CPC Shanghai Municipal 
Committee, asking them to support transferring the shares here. 
Some were nominally owned by the former editor-in-chief Chin 
Yao-ju. Chin Yao-ju had now left. Those shares should also be 
transferred so as to ensure the shareholding on the part of the 
Hong Kong Branch of XINHUA SHE. 
  As Chin Yao-ju had participated in Friends of WEN WEI PO 
activities, it was proposed that Chin Yao-ju be removed from his 
post as director on the board of directors. I was not in favor 
of pursuing those implicated. Besides, in order to remove a 
director, it would be necessary to hold a meeting of the board 
of directors. XINHUA SHE could not act on its own with regard to 
this matter. Thus the proposal on punishing Chin Yao-ju was not 
accepted. 
  It was proposed that Beijing's approval be sought. I 
understood that it was late into the night and that there should 
no further delay, and reasoned that if a report was submitted to 
Beijing, they might say that the CPC Work Committee was being 
"soft" and ask for more severe punishment. Therefore I said that 
we could not wait and that it would be all right if we should 
submit a report for record-keeping purposes. 
  In the end the meeting decided that Zhang Junsheng go to WEN 
WEI PO that night and announce the decision on behalf of XINHUA 
SHE, and that the next morning I go to Li Tzu-sung's home to 
talk to Li himself. 
  The next morning, I, while feeling guilty, went to Li 
Tzu-sung's home to "talk" to him. What could I say to this 
patriotic, righteous old man? At that time I could only ask for 
his understanding and advise him to take care of his own health. 
I suggested that he take a rest and do such things as visiting 
the hinterland. I indicated my willingness to make all the 
arrangements for him. I said sincerely: "Mr. Li, you are still a 
friend of the CPC." (At that time I was still the representative 
of the Communist Party of China in Hong Kong.) 
  I felt guilty with regard to Li Tzu-sung. Especially, when I 
learned later the facts about the Friends of WEN WEI PO 
activities and realized that the report had been untrue, I 
became even more sorry. Now I would like to use the space here 
to say sorry to Mr. Li! (Installment No. 125) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20451 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar015___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  8 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs 126-128 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0148A Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 7-9 Sep 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0148A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installments No. 126-128 of the serialized memoirs of Xu </F>
Jiatun: "Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
<H5>  [7 Sep 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] The Incident of the All Hong Kong Alliance in 
Support of the Chinese Patriotic Prodemocracy Movement 
[AHKASCPPM] (Part One of Two): The Idea That Antisubversion 
Clauses Be Added to the Draft Basic Law Was Adopted; The Request 
That the British Government Outlaw AHKASCPPM Was Rejected 
  In early July, Ji Pengfei [1213 7720 7378] specially 
gathered 
and presided over a meeting to discuss the situation in Hong 
Kong after the 4 June Incident. The meeting mainly discussed the 
issue of the All Hong Kong Alliance in Support of the Chinese 
Patriotic Prodemocracy Movement [AHKASCPPM]. 
  The backbone of AHKASCPPM was made up by radical democrats 
in 
Hong Kong, and AHKASCPPM was led by Szeto Wah and Martin Lee. 
They had seized the opportunity provided by the activities of 
people of all sectors in Hong Kong in support of the patriotic 
student movement at Tiananmen, and had established AHKASCPPM, 
which had achieved unprecedented development. This was a united 
front-type organization which was mainly based on center-right 
forces, while including also people of the left, the center, and 
the right. The leadership of the organization was in the hands 
of radical democrats. At that time AHKASCPPM incorporated almost 
all the democracy- and autonomy-seeking organizations of various 
tendencies in Hong Kong as well as many of those centrist 
associations which had been rather politically apathetic before 
or even some leftist organizations. During the 4 June Incident, 
they had adopted exceptionally radical strategies in fighting 
Beijing, shouting the slogans, "down with Deng, Li, and Yang" 
and "down with fascism"; they had declared that they would not 
recognize the legitimacy of the "Li Peng regime," and had vowed 
not to have any contact with the "Li Peng regime." 
  At the meeting Beijing argued that this was an organization 
attempting to subvert the Chinese Government and a tool used by 
some Western countries and local anti-Communist forces in their 
joint effort to turn Hong Kong into an anti-Communist base, and 
demanded that Britain "outlaw" it. Ji Pengfei agreed to the view 
expressed by Li Hou [2621 0683] that "we should take up the 
matter of the British Government's tolerating AHKASCPPM with the 
British Government and demand that the British Government 
nullify the registration of AHKASCPPM and outlaw AHKASCPPM." 
  The CPC Hong Kong and Macao Work Committee's view was 
somewhat different. According to our intelligence units, we 
argued at the meeting, there really are a small number of people 
in AHKASCPPM who are using this organization in carrying out 
activities of fighting the Chinese Government, and among those 
few people there are representatives of foreign and outside 
forces who are attempting to turn Hong Kong into an open or 
semiopen anti-Communist subversive base; but as for the broad 
masses who participated in activities and shouted radical 
slogans because of their indignation, we should adopt a policy 
of dividing and winning over people--winning over the majority 
and isolating and striking at a small minority. We are in favor 
of having the British outlaw AHKASCPPM in accordance with the 
law of Hong Kong. The law of Britain prohibits activities to 
subvert the British sovereign. With regard to openly calling for 
the subversion of the Chinese Government and shouting the 
slogan, down with the Chinese Government, we may take up the 
matter with the British Government, but we estimate that the 
chance of Britain's accommodating us is not great; therefore it 
is still necessary to mainly rely on our own work in the future. 
  As for some people's attempt to turn Hong Kong into an 
anti-Communist base, we believe that such a situation has 
existed all along and that the only difference is that some 
people want to change from operating secretly as in the past 
into operating openly or semiopenly by exploiting the current 
movement. The intelligence units have discovered in a 
preliminary manner that in fleeing the country some of those who 
participated in the democracy movement in the hinterland have 
depended on the help from AHKASCPPM which has not only provided 
money but has also specially assigned people to do the job. Some 
of those who have fled the country first stayed at the home of 
that "specially assigned person," and then got foreign visas and 
left Hong Kong. Those few people are the main targets of 
struggle. 
  The meeting did not further discuss the analysis made by the 
CPC Work Committee. The conclusion was that it would be 
necessary to take up the matter with the British Government in 
an effort "to outlaw AHKASCPPM," and that it was also necessary 
to work on others so as to gradually weaken or even eliminate 
the organization, thereby eliminating the tool used by some 
forces in their effort to use Hong Kong as a base for subverting 
the Chinese Government. 
  The meeting also listened to Li Hou's speech on the 
resumption of the activities of drafting the Basic Law. In view 
of Hong Kong's performance during the 4 June Incident, Li Hou 
suggested that clauses on deterring subversive activities and 
imposing marshal law in time of emergency should be added to the 
draft Basic Law. As no participant expressed any disagreement, 
the suggestion was also passed. 
  After the meeting the Foreign Ministry and the Hong Kong 
Branch of the XINHUA NEWS AGENCY took up the matter of outlawing 
AHKASCPPM with the British Foreign Ministry and the British Hong 
Kong government, respectively. We also carried out supporting 
media actions in Hong Kong. The British Government rejected 
China's demand on the ground that AHKASCPPM was registered in 
Hong Kong and was not in violation of the law of Hong Kong. In 
addition we also persuaded some leftist and centrist 
organizations which had joined AHKASCPPM to leave AHKASCPPM. 
Some centrist organizations left AHKASCPPM for their own 
reasons. But all this only "weakened" AHKASCPPM slightly. 
  On 21 July RENMIN RIBAO published an article by Ai Zhong, 
entitled "No Attempts to Disrupt the One Country, Two Systems' 
Arrangement Is Allowed." We had had no prior knowledge about it, 
and felt surprised. After some inquiry we learned that the 
article had been drafted by the Hong Kong and Macao Affairs 
Office. Hong Kong society reacted strongly to the article. I 
felt that the article were flawed in two aspects. First, it 
revealed the internal analysis that a small number of people 
were attempting to turn Hong Kong into an open or semiopen 
anti-Communist base, and the language of the article would lead 
people to think that all those people in Hong Kong who had 
participated in the activities supporting the student's 
patriotic movement were trying to turn Hong Kong into an 
anti-Communist base, thereby striking at a very large number of 
people and creating many enemies. The article not only failed to 
square with the facts but was also very unwise in a tactical 
sense. 
  Second, it almost openly named the names of Martin Lee and 
Szeto Wah. I felt that the article constituted openly treating 
those two persons as "enemies," and that nevertheless the 
article would not only fail to isolate those two persons but 
also increase their name recognition in the political arena and 
their political capital. On the other hand the article would 
create a situation where there would be no way of making contact 
with those two persons in the future and where work could not be 
carried out. We had already known the stands of those two 
persons. In dealing with them who would be our adversaries in 
future political struggles, we should conduct both struggle and 
cooperation. After the 4 June Incident they misread the 
situation in China and adopted a radical strategy. Now struggle 
with them was the dominant aspect of the matter. But openly 
naming names in this way now would in fact leave no room and was 
thus a radical move which was unwise in a tactical sense. 
  I thought that it was necessary first of all to clarify the 
first issue and to make explanation to Hong Kong society so as 
to moderate the strong reactions against the RENMIN RIBAO 
article, through making a distinction between the majority and a 
small minority and making clear that the "anti-Communist base" 
had nothing to do with the majority. I immediately arranged for 
others to write an article expounding this view in a focused 
manner. After it was written I sent it to Beijing, hoping that 
it would be published in RENMIN RIBAO. However, later Li Hou 
told us that approval was only given to publishing it in the 
magazine LIAOWANG. Surely the basic stand of this article was in 
support of that RENMIN RIBAO article and therefore its impact 
was not large. 
  After the 4 June Incident I made direct and indirect contact 
with Szeto Wah and Martin Lee privately. The purpose then was to 
preserve some room for restoring cooperation in the future. But 
Beijing did not know the activity. They would not have given 
approval, but would probably have tried to stop the activity; 
and if they would not criticize the activity immediately, they 
would probably have kept "a record" afterward. 
  The policy and strategy of the Communist Party of China and 
the Chinese Government of trying to get AHKASCPPM "outlawed" and 
"eliminated" were wrong and would not work. This wrong strategy 
not only will not work before 1997 but is also very unlikely to 
work after 1997. If they at that time adopt tough "outlawing" 
measures, not only will the Communist Party of China and the 
Chinese Government continue to pay a political price, but the 
government of the special administrative region will also be put 
in a very difficult position, resulting in damages to Hong Kong 
people's confidence in the government of the special 
administrative region. The wise approach would be to show 
"tolerance," trying to win over the majority and gradually 
changing their attitude toward China. With the continuous reform 
and opening up on the mainland itself and with the increasing 
closeness in the relations between Hong Kong and the hinterland 
as 1997 is drawing near, it is entirely possible that such a 
policy and strategy will work. 
  I participated in the formulating of the erroneous policy 
and 
strategy and approved of the policy and strategy; therefore I 
was responsible in this respect. (Installment No. 126) 
<H5>  [8 Sep 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] Sino-British Relations at a Low Ebb -- One 
"Incident" After Another (Part One of Four): A Preview of the 
Exciting Stories in This Segment: 
  The happening of one "incident" after another described in 
this segment refers to: David Wilson invited me to have 
"afternoon tea" twice; we had face-to-face talks at the 
governor's residence on the "4 June turmoil," the "issue of 
outlawing AHKASCPPM," "the right of abode in Britain," and the 
so-called "Xu Haining incident" and "Yang Yang incident." 
  On Two Occasions David Wilson Took the Initiative in 
Inviting Me To Have "Afternoon Tea" at the Governor's Residence. 
  After the 4 June Incident China's relations with the entire 
Western world deteriorated, and the relations between China and 
Britain also deteriorated. Clashes between China and Britain 
occurred continually, and the relations between China and 
Britain ebbed, thereby ending the short period of cooperation 
which had existed after the signing of the Sino-British Joint 
Declaration. 
  Britain and the entire Western world together adopted a 
tough 
policy of imposing sanctions on China. Britain suspended 
diplomatic contact with China and also unilaterally suspended 
the meeting of the Sino-British Joint Liaison Group. All 
negotiations between China and Britain on the question of Hong 
Kong came to an almost complete halt. The British Government 
adopted the strategy of supporting the patriotic mass movement 
in society. In this way it could not only make a good impression 
on people at large but also make China's image even worse and 
weaken people's confidence in China. On the other hand they also 
worried that the development of the patriotic mass movement 
would affect public safety in Hong Kong, resulting in a loss of 
control which could cause China to take up the matter with them 
and intervene. After the 4 June Incident their way of handling 
workers' strikes, shopkeepers' strikes, and students' strikes 
across the city contained contradictory elements but was wise. 
  The British Hong Kong government took actions to facilitate 
people's patriotic activities, such as allowing the masses to 
hold rallies at the racecourse, an unprecedented move. On the 
other hand they also enhanced protection for the Hong Kong 
Branch of the XINHUA NEWS AGENCY and Chinese-owned institutions. 
At that time there were constant mass activities such as 
marches, petitioning, round-the-clock sit-ins, hunger strikes, 
and demonstrations in front of the Hong Kong Branch of the 
XINHUA NEWS AGENCY BUILDING. The walls opposite the Hong Kong 
Branch of the XINHUA NEWS AGENCY were completely covered with 
posters and cartoons. There were many onlookers. The situation 
was tense. In addition to increasing police patrol, the British 
Hong Kong government also had several dozen additional police 
personnel posted at the Hong Kong Branch of the XINHUA NEWS 
AGENCY all the time. We vacated the first floor of the building 
to give them a place to stay. They set up such things telephones 
and monitoring television devices, applying rather elaborate 
security measures. In the past, during the Kowloon riots, there 
had been attacks on China's institutions in Hong Kong. At that 
time the British Hong Kong government had not taken preventive 
measures beforehand. This time they took the initiative, and 
solicited advice from us beforehand. Only after securing our 
consent did they do those things as described. They treated 
Chinese-owned banks and newspapers and other institutions 
belonging to China in the same way. 
  After the 4 June Incident the CPC Work Committee also made 
preparations for dealing with the most serious situation. We 
divided the CPC Work Committee's responsible persons into two 
groups. One group stayed at the Hong Kong Branch of the XINHUA 
NEWS AGENCY Building, ready to deal with any serious situation; 
the other group retreated to the Stanley guest-house, getting 
prepared to continue necessary activities in case the Hong Kong 
Branch of the XINHUA NEWS AGENCY should be unable to make 
contact with the outside world. I decided to stay in the Hong 
Kong Branch of the XINHUA NEWS AGENCY BUILDING, and Zheng Hua 
and Qiao Zongzhun went to Stanley. 
  Before the 4 June Incident, once David Wilson, governor of 
Hong Kong, by his own initiative, invited me to have "afternoon 
tea" at the governor's residence. After the foreign affairs 
department secured approval from the Foreign Ministry, I went 
there. David Wilson asked me about my opinion of what had 
happened in Beijing. Could I tell him my personnel opinion? I 
used the diplomatic approach in a unique way: "Your Excellency, 
I have been instructed to inform you that the activities at 
Tiananmen in Beijing are an instance of turmoil." David Wilson 
expressed his understanding. 
  When discussing local activities in Hong Kong society in 
support of the student movement in Beijing, David Wilson told me 
that according to the statistics of the police department of the 
British Hong Kong government, approximately 500,000 people 
participated in the 21 April march, which had been claimed to be 
a million-man march. They had devoted all their resources to 
making sure that no accidents would happen during the march. He 
also told me that they would do everything possible to safeguard 
the security of China's institutions in Hong Kong, and he 
expressed his appreciation of the cooperation given by the Hong 
Kong Branch of the XINHUA NEWS AGENCY in this regard. I also 
expressed my appreciation of the measures taken by the British 
Hong Kong government to safeguard the security of China's 
institutions in Hong Kong. 
  After the formal talk with David Wilson, I chatted casually 
with him as he walked out of the front room to see me out. He 
said that it was very difficult to handle things under the 
current circumstances, thereby demonstrating that he felt that 
he was in a difficult position. I immediately said in a 
sympathetic manner: "I understand." He was moved by my words and 
said: "You assumed heavy responsibilities when being the leader 
of a big province. You are experienced and know what may happen 
under such circumstances." I replied in a sympathetic manner: "I 
understand your difficulties. We are similar to each other." 
David Wilson spoke standard putonghua. We talked to 
each other directly in putonghua. (Installment No.127) 
<H5>  [9 Sep 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] One "Incident" After Another (Part Two of 
Four): The Issue of the Right of Abode in Britain Caused 
Disputes Between China and Britain; There Was a Strong Statement 
Accusing Britain of Violating the Joint Declaration 
  My second meeting with David Wilson was similar to the first 
in that this time David Wilson again invited me to have 
"afternoon tea" by his own initiative. The relations between 
China and Britain was then already rather tense. At that time, 
in accordance with Beijing's instruction, the foreign affairs 
department of the Hong Kong Branch of the XINHUA NEWS AGENCY was 
negotiating with the political counsel of the Hong Kong 
government on the issue of outlawing AHKASCPPM. Our side 
demanded that the British Hong Kong government nullify the 
registration of AHKASCPPM. The British side said that the 
registration had been handled according to the law of Hong Kong. 
We then argued that according to the law of Hong Kong an 
organization would not be allowed to try to subvert the British 
sovereign, and that therefore the registration of AHKASCPPM 
should still be nullified. The British side retorted: that 
according to the law of Hong Kong AHKASCPPM should be allowed to 
exist and operate. Either side was willing to make concessions, 
resulting in a stalemate. However, when I met with David Wilson, 
neither of us touched upon this issue. What he was concerned 
with seemed to be the situation of the top leadership in 
Beijing. I could not satisfy his desire, and, like friends, we 
chatted for a while. 
  I talked to David Wilson about the issue of "the right of 
abode in Britain" raised by some people in Hong Kong. This issue 
had first been raised by the manager of a conglomerate in Hong 
Kong in the name of an organization. The point of departure was 
that after the 4 June Incident too many of Hong Kong's elites 
had emigrated, thereby affecting the functioning of Hong Kong 
enterprises. This was true. As too large a portion of the 
managerial personnel of the business world had emigrated, those 
who had not emigrated were also unsettled, and were planning to 
emigrate, resulting in a serious brain drain. In Hong Kong 
society there was a widespread feeling of a lack of enterprise 
management personnel. High salaries were used to retain the 
management personnel planning to emigrate. There were two salary 
increases in one year, or even three increases in some cases. 
Under such circumstances some people put forward the idea of 
"the right of abode in Britain," the idea that the right of 
abode in Britain should be given now while those granted the 
right would not emigrate to Britain right away, that after 1997 
they would not necessarily emigrate if China's policies should 
be enlightened and if Hong Kong should remain in the same 
condition as before, and that they would emigrate if they should 
consider the situation to be bad. People in Hong Kong said that 
under the current immigration procedures, there was a need to 
stay in an "immigration prison." That is, they could return to 
Hong Kong only after they had lived in the foreign country and 
had acquired residence status there. "The right of abode in 
Britain" could eliminate the need to stay in the "immigration 
prison." As a result there would be no adverse effects on their 
service at enterprises. They publicized this idea in newspapers, 
and carried out activities privately, applying pressure on the 
British Government and demanding that the British Government 
grant this right. It seemed that the British Government had 
adopted this idea and was using it for resolving the issue of 
civil servants in the British Hong Kong government, in an effort 
to change their mood characterized by a lack of confidence and a 
desire to emigrate. 
  I told David Wilson my personal opinion as Beijing had not 
yet given any instructions on this issue. With regard to the 
issue of "the right of abode in Britain," I said to David 
Wilson, my personal opinion is that the putting forward of this 
idea is understandable, but that some problems will be difficult 
to resolve, and may lead to serious consequences. If "the right 
of abode in Britain" is applied to civil servants, then there 
will be great difficulties in the continued functioning of the 
government of the special administrative region after 1997. For 
with the departure of a large part of those civil servants 
granted "the right of abode in Britain" who have no confidence 
in the future special administrative region, there will be a 
lack of knowledgeable people in the government of the special 
administrative region. If the situation in Hong Kong is good at 
that time and if most of the civil servants have confidence, 
decide not to emigrate while still having the right of abode in 
Britain, and stay here to serve the government of the special 
administrative region, then will they be loyal to the British 
sovereign or to the government of the special administrative 
region? They will experience such conflicts both psychologically 
and in real life. I hope you will consider the issue carefully. 
In this way, I in fact described in advance the position which 
China would find it difficult to accept, despite the fact that 
at that time I did not know Beijing's attitude. Because I spoke 
in a discussion tone, David Wilson just nodded and did not 
indicate his attitude after listening to me. 
  Shortly afterward, at the Hong Kong and Macao work 
conference 
gathered by Ji Pengfei, Zhou Nan [0719 0589] presented the 
written protest concerning "the right of abode in Britain" that 
the Foreign Ministry intended to deliver to the British Foreign 
Ministry, and asked the participants to discuss it. The draft 
raised the importance of the issue to the level of violating and 
damaging the Sino-British Joint Declaration, and stated that the 
British Government would be held responsible. 
  I suggested that such wording might be too strong. According 
to my information, I argued, the issue was not raised by Britain 
but has been "taken up" by Britain which has then expanded the 
issue to encompass the civil servants; at least such has been 
the case on the surface. Many upper- and middle-strata people in 
Hong Kong are in favor of Britain's adopting this policy and 
hope that Britain will adopt this policy. It is necessary to 
reconsider whether to raise the importance of the issue to the 
level of violating the Sino-British Joint Declaration. If we are 
being too harsh, those people's mood will be affected; as a 
result the work of winning those people over will be adversely 
affected. If there is to be a written public protest, might it 
not be advisable to make the wording milder and not to raise the 
importance of the issue to such a level? Ji Pengfei approved of 
my view, and immediately asked Zhou Nan to make some changes. 
Nevertheless the protest which was made public later still 
exhibited a harsh attitude, effectively accusing the other side 
of violating the Sino-British Joint Declaration. (Installment 
No. 128) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20452 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar016___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-016 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs on Xu Haining Incident </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0149A Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 10 Sep 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0149A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installment No 129 of the serialized memoirs of Xu Jiatun: </F>
"Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
  [Text] 1. Continuous Incidents (Part Three of Four) 
-- The Xu Haining Incident 
  A number of incidents between China and Britain also 
occurred 
at the time, one being the Xu Haining [1776 3189 1337] incident, 
and another the Yang Yang [2799 3152] affair. 
  As stated above, Xu Haining played a frequent role in Hong 
Kong's public activities during the 4 June period, holding up a 
banner with the words "NEW CHINA NEWS AGENCY Branch" at the 
million-person demonstration rally on 21 April 1989, as well as 
giving a speech in his capacity as an employee of a NEW CHINA 
NEWS AGENCY [NCNA] branch at a race track mass rally, which was 
reported widely in the media, making him for a time the man of 
the hour in Hong Kong. After these incidents occurred, while I 
kept Zheng Hua [6774 5478] [deputy director of the Hong Kong 
Office of the NCNA] from investigating them, Xu Haining was very 
nervous about them, so left the Hong Kong Office of the NCNA and 
went into hiding. As we were concerned that he might flee 
abroad, we sent someone to find him. The one who found him 
reported that he was staying at a friend's home, being somewhat 
panic-stricken and distraught. While our messenger told him 
that he would have no problems if he returned to the NCNA, he 
did not believe this and was not ready to return. But before 
long, he returned on his own, after which not only did we not 
reproach him, but, in an attempt to calm him down, I even sent 
the leader of the concerned department to console him. 
  But after a few days, he again ran away on the sly. We very 
quickly heard that he had been taken to London by the British 
Hong Kong government. We immediately reported this to Beijing, 
which immediately told us to negotiate with the British Hong 
Kong government for Xu Haining's return. But as the British 
Hong Kong government claimed to have no knowledge of him, the 
matter was "suspended" (shelved). 
  At the time, a concerned NCNA branch department discovered 
that many employees of Chinese agencies were lined up at certain 
foreign consulates to apply for emigration. And certain other 
employees of Chinese agencies were saying privately that they 
would not be transferred back to China and, if they were, they 
certainly would not go, being ready when necessary to go abroad. 
As we were already somewhat prepared psychologically for this, 
having guessed that Hong Kong's Chinese agencies might lose some 
people, we did not treat the the Xu Haining matter as a crucial 
one, so that we took it up with the British Hong Kong government 
only to make them think twice. 
  Before long, the Chinese Embassy in London telegraphed the 
Ministry of Foreign Affairs and the Hong Kong and Macao Working 
Committee that Xu Haining had fled on his own to the Chinese 
Embassy in Britain, and was asking to be returned home. Xu 
Haining claimed that it was the British Hong government that had 
sent someone to escort him to London, after which he was settled 
by a refugee agency, which gave him 70 pounds sterling a day. 
While there was also someone to accompany him on a tour of 
London for the first few days, no one paid him any attention 
later, leaving him feeling helpless, so that he fled to the 
embassy to ask to be returned home. So the embassy telegraphed 
the Ministry of Foreign Affairs and the Hong Kong and Macao 
Working Committee for instructions on how to handle the matter. 
  After exchanging views with the State Council Hong Kong and 
Macao Affairs Office and the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, we 
telegraphed our embassy in London that we wanted Xu Haining 
returned to China. But the embassy then telegraphed us that Xu 
Haining had fled again, and could not be found. It turned out 
that the British had learned of Xu Haining's contacts with the 
Chinese Embassy, so had moved him elsewhere. 
  A few days later, Xu Haining again ran to our embassy, which 
retained him this time, negotiating with the British Government 
for his return home, and buying him a plane ticket. But the 
British Government asked to send someone to talk with Xu 
Haining, which request was refused by the Chinese Embassy, which 
agreed only to allow the British to send someone to question him 
at the airport in the company of [Chinese] Embassy personnel. 
It was learned that the British asked Xu Haining only if 
returning home was his own wish, to which he replied that it 
was. Which was how he left Britain and was returned to China. 
  Beijing's view was that the Hong Kong and Macao Working 
Committee should handle the matter. So we decided to let him 
return first to Guangzhou to recuperate at our Guangzhou #8 
Office Guest House, where we assigned someone to give him some 
work to do to calm him down. But as the Hong Kong media was 
looking for him everywhere, and Xu Haining was from Hangzhou, we 
contacted the Zhejiang Provincial Party Committee, sent him to 
Hangzhou, and asked Zhejiang Province to arrange for a place to 
let him recuperate. We considered Xu Haining in his state no 
longer suitable for return to work in Hong Kong, so asked the 
Zhejiang Provincial Party Committee to let him stay in Zhejiang 
and to find other work for him. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20453 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar016___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-016 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs on Yang Yang Affair </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0149B Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 11 Sep 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0149B </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installment No 130 of the serialized memoirs of Xu Jiatun: </F>
"Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs] 
  [Text] 1. Continuous Incidents (Part Four of Four) -- 
The Yang Yang Affair 
  [Text] The Yang Yang affair also occurred during the same 
period. Yang Yang was a Beijing swimmer who had overstayed a 
tour of Hong Kong and not returned, and who publicly claimed 
that he feared persecution if he returned to China, so was 
asking for political aslyum. While I at first throught that he 
was the Jiangsu badminton player of the same name, I later heard 
that he was a Beijing athlete, so sent someone to find out and 
make inquiries in Beijing, finding that Yang Yang would 
certainly not be persecuted, but simply did not want to go home. 
Our investigation showed that while the British Hong Kong 
government had not yet made contact with Yang Yang at the time, 
a Taiwanese party had, and the Taiwanese authorities had 
expressed a willingness to take him in. As we were quite 
concerned that he might go to Taiwan, we sent someone to work 
with him, in hopes that he would return to China. Ji Shaoxiang 
[4764 4801 4382], our NCNA branch's Foreign Affairs Department 
director, reported directly to us that the British Hong Kong 
government had said that as long as we issued a statement to 
guarantee that Yang Yang would not be persecuted after he 
returned to mainland China, they would send Yang Yang, who they 
had in custody, back to China according to the practice for 
dealing with those who overstay visits. 
  I replied that this was possible and, after obtaining 
Beijing's consent, issued the statement, the gist of which was 
that mainland residents left behind in Hong Kong around the time 
of the 4 June incident, regardless of whether they had taken 
part in any political activities, would without exception not be 
investigated after they returned to the mainland. 
  But after the statement was issued, the U.S. consulate 
general still gave Yang Yang a visa allowing him to go to the 
U.S. When the Ministry of Foreign Affairs learned of this, it 
immediately took it up with the British Hong Kong government, 
which claimed that the person had already left, so was 
"powerless" in the matter. How could we continue in the future 
to work with such an untrustworthy British Hong Kong approach? 
And when Ji Shaoxiang took it up with a [British Hong Kong] 
political advisor, he was offered only regrets. 
  So Beijing's Hong Kong and Macao Affairs Office, Ministry of 
Foreign Affairs, and NCNA consulted on how to curb the British 
Hong Kong government's untrustworthy approach, demanding a test 
of strength with Britain. As every day brought mainlanders 
fleeing illegally to Hong Kong, and both China and Britain had 
agreed that those seized by the Hong Kong government's border 
guards would be repatriated immediately on the same day they 
were caught, we decided that unless we obtained a better promise 
from Britain on this matter, we would refuse to accept the 
repatriatees. When British Hong Kong missed the point of our 
negotiations, we began to refuse to accept repatriatees on our 
border, which brought a very strong response in Hong Kong 
society. As I considered at the time that allowing this to 
drag on for long would be adverse to winning over public 
support, I asked Pao Yu-kang [0545 3768 0474] to go and see the 
Hong Kong governor, to tell him that the hard line being taken 
by Beijing was Deng Xiaoping's idea, not a decision taken by 
subordinates. I also asked Pao Yu-kang to tell the Hong Kong 
governor that to resolve the Yang Yang incident, we were only 
asking the Hong Kong government to promise again that such 
incidents would not occur again in the future. Meanwhile, Ji 
Shaoxiang also made the same request to political advisors. 
  But after Pao Yu-kang had disclosed this news to the Hong 
Kong government, there was no response. So I specially sought 
out Chia Tao-li [0857 6670 3810], asking him to use his 
influence to once again convey this information to the British 
Hong Kong government. A day later, Chia Tao-li told me that "as 
to the matter that you asked me to take care of, I have done it, 
and now we have to wait for the response." Sure enough, a Hong 
Kong government political advisor gave Ji Shaoxiang a verbal 
promise, after which we felt that the affair was over. When 
someone in the media asked about it, we announced the British 
Hong Kong promise. But then the political advisor denied it, 
forcing a clarification. Finally, the Hong Kong government 
published on the front page of the 26 October 1989 edition of 
NAN-HUA TSAO-PAO [SOUTHERN CHINA MORNING NEWS] their promise, 
stating that the Hong Kong government would not allow Hong Kong 
to be used as a base for activities designed to overthrow the 
PRC, ...... [LIEN HO PAO ellipsis], and that the Hong Kong 
government would continue to carefully consider matters and 
interests of concern to Hong Kong's special conditions and the 
Chinese Government. 
  On 23 October 1989, after the Hong Kong government's private 
verbal promise, we stopped refusing to accept repatriatees. 
Throughout the whole affair, Guangdong Province was very 
supportive, with Guangdong's border guards acting in very fine 
coordination. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20454 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar016___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-016 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs on Stationing of Troops </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0149C Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 12 Sep 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0149C </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installment No 131 of the serialized memoirs of Xu Jiatun: </F>
Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs] 
  [Text] 2. Another Controversy Over the Stationing of 
Troops -- Ch'u Heng's Statement on Picking Up the Pieces' Sets 
Off a Chinese Counterattack Over the Stationing of a Special 
British Military Reconnaissance Unit at the T'ien-Ma Naval Base 
  The deterioration in Sino-British relations was also 
glaringly evident in the hard-line and offensive approach taken 
by Britain in the drafting of the Basic Law, causing further 
tension in bilateral relations. 
  On 14 August 1989, Ch'u Heng [1448 3801], a standing officer 
of the British Hong Kong Government, made a statement entitled, 
"Picking Up the Pieces," saying that as the 4 June incident had 
been a blow to Hongkongers' confidence, he would like 
Hongkongers to study the matter of the stationing of Chinese 
troops after 1997, as well as the clause in the Basic Law draft 
on any declaration that the SAR had entered a state of 
emergency, going on to propose that he hoped that the Chinese 
authorities would delay publication of the Basic Law. 
  Some Hongkongers had already been concerned about the 
stationing of Chinese troops in Hong Kong. During the 
negotiations over the Sino-British Joint Declaration, Deng 
Xiaoping had criticized Geng Biao's [5105 7374] [former NPC 
Standing Committee vice chairman and NPC Foreign Affairs 
Committee chairman] statement that troops would not be stationed 
in Hong Kong as nonsense, touching off repercussions. As 
Beijing's use of troops on 4 June to crush a patriotic student 
movement was an even greater shock to Hongkongers, Ch'u Heng's 
drawing attention to this matter again was an obvious political 
attempt. 
  Ch'u Heng's statement on "picking up the pieces" in an 
attack 
on China was obviously not his personal doing. After we had 
studied it and, in line with the spirit set by Beijing, we 
decided to respond, as well as reporting to Beijing for the 
record. 
  So on 18 August 1989, we reviewed Ch'u Heng's statement in 
our capacity as an NCNA branch as "brazen interference in the 
drafting of the Basic Law," as well as issuing a special 
statement in the Hong Kong WEN WEI PO, pointing out that Ch'u 
Heng's action violated elementary diplomatic common sense. 
Beijing also responded the next day, with a Foreign Ministry 
spokesman stating that the drafting and formulation of the Basic 
Law was Chinese business that would brook no interference, as 
well as emphasizing that "the recent brazen and flagrant 
criticism and gross interference in the drafting of the Basic 
Law by certain British officials, such as standing officers of 
the British Hong Kong Government, was a violation of the 
Sino-British Joint Declaration provisions, and that the absurd 
position that China must not station troops in Hong Kong" had 
raised the matter to a British violation of the Sino-British 
Joint Declaration. 
  The stationing of troops was a hotly-debated issue in the 
drafting of the Basic Law. The unresolved controversy also 
involved matters of Hong Kong's T'ien-Ma Naval Base, and the 
three British military headquarters in Hong Kong which, at the 
time, Britain seemed to still find it inconvenient to mention 
openly. 
  The British military was stationed in Hong Kong at the time 
at over 20 sites, spread throughout the New Territories, 
Kowloon, and Hong Kong island. According to the plan submitted 
by Britain to China, when the British military withdrew in 1997, 
it would turn over one part of these 20-plus military camps to 
China, mainly the military bases in the border zones, such as 
the New Territories, and another part to the SAR Government for 
use by departments, such as disciplinary troops (police), with 
an additional part in the Central District being converted to 
commercial use, with this part including sites, such as the 
T'ien-Ma Naval Base and the Wotalaotao Barracks. 
  The T'ien-Ma Naval Base was the general headquarters of the 
British Navy, army, and air forces stationed in Hong Kong. We 
understood that the T'ien-Ma Naval Base not only was the British 
military's general headquarters, but also had a special 
department, with many modern reconnaissance tools and equipment 
possibly concentrated there. It was rumored that the British 
Government had thought about converting it after 1997 to a 
general consulate, and was droppping hints as feelers, about 
which China also dropped some hints that it would not endorse. 
It was also rumored that Britain was planning to demolish the 
T'ien-Ma Naval Station. But it was later rumored that the 
naval base would be moved to a small island, with its original 
site filled in for commercial use. (Britain has now unilaterally 
moved the naval base to Ang-ch'uan Chou, as well as unilaterally 
publicizing that it will turn over the three military 
headquarters at the T'ien-Ma Naval Base to China in 1997.) 
  The Chinese military affairs sector had set up a special 
small group composed mostly of its Headquarters General Staff 
which, based on British-provided data and with the approval and 
cooperation of the British Hong Kong Government, had gone to 
Hong Kong for an on-site inspection. While the Hong Kong and 
Macao Working Committee had also discussed this, basically 
agreeing with Britain's plans, some parties had also dissented, 
holding mainly that the change to other [commercial] use should 
be decided by China after 1997. As to whether the Central 
District's military site should be converted to a commercial 
zone, there was also a difference of opinion within China, with 
the military affairs sector being completely receptive, while 
the Hong Kong and Macao Affairs Office and the Ministry of 
Foreign Affairs were unwilling to completely accept the decision 
being made entirely by the military affairs sector... As their 
exchange of views came to no conclusion, it was hard to take up 
the matter in detail with Britain. 
  While Li Hou had asked me in Ji Pengfei's presence to help 
them respond to Yang Shangkun, asking Yang Shangkun to support 
their view, I retired before I had a chance to take this up with 
Yang Shangkun. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20455 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar016___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-016 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs on Pace of Direct Elections </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0149D Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 13 Sep 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0149D </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installment No 132 of the serialized memoirs of Xu Jiatun: </F>
"Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
  [Text] 3. A Sharpening Political-System Controversy 
(Part One of Two) -- Hongkongers From All Walks of Life Call for 
a Faster Pace of Direct Elections, With Cha Liang-yung's 
Mainstream Plan' Being Criticized as Conservative"] 
  Once Beijing declared martial law, the drafting of and 
consultation on the Basic Law essentially stalled. A trip to 
Hong Kong by the Chinese Drafting Committee delegation, which 
had been originally scheduled for 22 May 1989, was temporarily 
postponed due to the sharp change in the Beijing political 
situation, and Ji Pengfei also cancelled a visit to Hong Kong. 
Some Hong Kong figures publicly announced that they were 
quitting their jobs on the Basic Law drafting and advisory 
committees, with the Seventh Plenary Session of the Advisory 
Committee, which had originally been scheduled for 3 June, also 
declared postponed due to the situation in both Beijing and Hong 
Kong. 
  The sound of gunfire in Beijing on 4 June left Hongkongers 
feeling even more in the same sort of danger. Would Hong Kong 
be able to preserve its capitalist system for 50 years unchanged 
after 1997? Would China make good on its promises to practice 
one country, two systems, and to allow Hong Kong to be ruled by 
Hongkongers? And would there still be any democracy or 
freedom? Hongkongers questioned all of this. So with a mind 
to obtain more safeguards for after 1997, Hongkongers made new 
demands concerning the substance of the Basic Law, particularly 
the political system's democratic processes, thus sharpening the 
controversy over the political-system plans. 
  The radical democracy-faction forces expanded 
unprecedentedly 
due to the 4 June incident, also exploiting the widespread 
acceptance among Hongkongers of "using democracy to resist and 
restrict communism," and calling for the Basic Law to be 
renegotiated and redebated, with some even shouting the slogan: 
"Down With the Basic Law altogether." 
  The political-system plans put forth by all social strata 
and 
factions, including the moderates (and even some left factions), 
all called for a faster pace of democracy, or direct elections. 
  Before describing the calls and new positions and plans put 
forth by all sides to speed up the pace of democracy, it is 
necessary to return to certain conditions of the "mainstream" 
plan that resulted from soliciting advice on the drafting of the 
Basic Law. This is because almost all of the later plans for 
speeding up the pace [of democracy] were directed at this 
"conservative" plan. 
  Returning to 1989, the consultations on the drafting of the 
Basic Law resulted in a "dual-Cha plan," which was the product 
of and based on the "mainstream" plan of Drafting Committee 
member Cha Liang-yung [2686 5328 6978]. 
  At the end of 1988, prior to a meeting of the Drafting 
Committees' Special Political-System Group in Guangzhou, I was 
resting one Sunday in November at the Beiling Residence in 
Shenzhen, when Cha Liang-yung, one of the conveners of the 
Drafting Committee's Special Group, sought me out. I invited 
him to the Beiling Residence, asking him in passing to taste the 
Huaiyang food of our famous cook who had recently arrived from 
Yangzhou. 
  After we met, Cha Liang-yung briefed me on his 
political-system plans, such as for the Chief Executive to be 
produced through a general election group form, and for the 
Legislative Council [LEGCO] members to be produced through a 
proportional distribution of general elections and other forms. 
His most important position was to begin "examining" the full 
implementation of general elections for Chief Executive and 
LEGCO members for the Fourth [executive and legislative] 
Session, i.e, for 15 years after 1997, with certain procedures 
(such as majority approval by LEGCO or voting by the whole 
people) being used to determine whether to fully practice 
general elections for LEGCO members and the Chief Executive. 
  While I certainly did not object to choice through general 
election and proportional production of legislators, I held that 
"examining" this for the Fourth Session was a little too early, 
suggesting that it might be pushed back a session or two. I 
considered at the time that as it was hard to guess how the 
situation might develop, with the pace of democracy unable to be 
completely determined by man-made means, the "legislative" 
timetable ought to give a little more attention to the 
"security" factor. If conditions ripened sooner, the 
"legislation" could be amended, with the "examination" also 
occurring earlier. 
  He explained to me that if conditions were not yet ripe for 
general elections by the Fourth Session, an "examination" of 
them might not be approved. 
  As we had exchanged views, and future variables were 
numerous, we did not continue the discussion. 
  At the meeting of the Special Political-System Group in 
Guangzhou, Cha Liang-yung presented this plan that he had 
proposed. It was said that he had had another plan, for 
extending the general elections to 30 years after 1997, which 
had been leaked too soon and had run into opposition, so had 
been changed to the current one, for an "examination" of general 
elections 15 years in advance. 
  I only half-trusted this version. What I believed was that 
my view had influenced him, so that after our meeting, he had 
revised his original plan. But what I distrusted was that my 
suggestion had been to postpone the matter for one or two 
sessions, or 5 to 10 years, not 15 years. The "examination" of 
general elections for the Fifth Session of LEGCO members and the 
Fourth Session of the Chief Executive was Cha's original stand 
in our discussion. 
  But regardless of those facts, Cha Liang-yung's subsequent 
statement under pressure by reporters in the midst of 
ever-sharpening debate, that "Xu Jiatun is more conservative 
than me," was certainly the truth. In our exchange of views, 
mine were certainly more "conservative" than his. 
  Cha Liang-yung's plan was revised slightly at the meeting of 
the Special Group in Guangzhou, being called the "mainstream 
plan," with much discussion among all parties, and the major 
criticism being that it was too "conservative." 
  At the time, as Ji Pengfei had not called a meeting in 
advance to consolidate the Party's views, I did not know whether 
Li Hou and Lu Ping had a "bottom line" when they hosted the 
meeting of the Special Group. And my exchange of views with Cha 
Liang-yung was also just my own idea, as many other plans were 
also in existence at the time. So I held that it was a little 
early to describe Cha Liang-yung's plan as "mainstream." 
  So when I later asked Mao Junnian [3029 6874 1628] [deputy 
director of the Hong Kong Office of the NCNA], who had attended 
the meeting, why Cha's plan was called the "mainstream" one, he 
replied that "this was the majority view of the group." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20456 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar016___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-016 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs on Two Ch'a Plan </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0150A Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 14 Sep 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0150A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installment No 133 of the serialized memoirs of Xu Jiatun: </F>
"Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
  [Text] 3. Sharpening Political System Controversies 
(Part Two of Two) -- The Drafting Committee Passes the Two Ch'a 
[Ch'a Chi-ming and Cha Liang-yung] Plan, for Which Lu Ping and 
Li Hou Claim Not To Have Cast Supporting Votes 
  Two months later, the [Basic Law] Drafting Committee met in 
full session at the Huayuan Hotel in Guangzhou, with its theme 
being to examine and vote on all drafts of the Special Group, in 
preparation for the Second Advisory Draft of the Basic Law. It 
was decided at this meeting that, in addition to voting one by 
one on the terms proposed by the Special Group, the Drafting 
Committee would first obtain the stipulated number of joint 
signatures, and then might set forth additional draft 
resolutions beyond the Special Group's drafts. 
  Prior to this meeting, I had suggested to Ji Pengfei the 
possibility of holding a meeting of the Drafting Committee's 
party members, to reach a party consensus. Ji Pengfei had 
barely heard my suggestion when he told Li Hou and Lu Ping to 
individually "notify" the Drafting Committee's party members. 
  The balloting showed an unexpected result, in that Cha 
Chi-min's [2686 3444 3046] motion was passed. Cha Chi-min's plan 
added four terms to Cha Liang-yung's plan for "examining" 
procedures for general elections by the whole people for the 
Fourth Session of the Chief Executive and the Fifth Session of 
LEGCO. These four terms were: 1) it must be approved by the 
majority of the legislators; 2) it must be endorsed by the Chief 
Executive; 3) it must be approved by the NPC; 4) it must be 
endorsed by a vote of over 30 percent of qualified voters. 
  While Cha Chi-min's motion had certainly not aroused 
attention in advance, it was close in thinking to that of 
certain Drafting Committee members on the mainland and in the 
Hong Kong superstructure at the time, so that its passage was 
not unexpected. But when the public controversy over Cha 
Liang-yung's plan arose, with many holding it to be too 
"conservative," the two "Cha" plans were combined, turning out 
to be even more "conservative," which was certainly not expected 
by the Chinese leadership. 
  After the Cha plan was passed, Lu Ping told Li Chu-ming 
[2621 
2629 6900] that he had not guessed that Cha Chi-min's revised 
plan could win the two-thirds support, and that he had not voted 
in support of it. Li Hou also told reporters that he had 
abstained from voting. 
  At this plenary session of the drafting committee, certain 
proposals of the special group were not approved, such as the 
motion on the SAR Government's fiscal policy, which did not win 
a two-thirds vote of the committee members in attendance, so was 
returned to the special group for redeliberation, and the 
proposals by committee members, such as T'an Yao-tsung [6223 
5069 1350], on labor welfare, which were also not passed. 
  It was guessed that the fiscal policy motion failed because 
it was voted against not only by several Hong Kong Drafting 
Committee members with close connections to the British Hong 
Kong government, but also by mainland committee members. The 
original plan of this draft had shown concern that the British 
Hong Kong government, in its 12 years of rule before its 
withdrawal, might change its past fiscal policy, by changing its 
tax rates and overreaching itself to build more public 
facilities, which would add more profitable 
construction-contract opportunities for British firms, while 
putting a heavier burden on Hongkongers. While the Basic Law 
could not interfere in fiscal policy during the British Hong 
Kong administration's tenure, it could still have a political 
impact to restrict it somewhat. 
  As to this provision, not only had the British Government 
called for its revision more than once through diplomatic means, 
but certain drafting committee members from Hong Kong with close 
connections to the British Hong Kong government had also 
repeatedly proposed amendments to it in special group meetings. 
Certain mainland drafting committee members also dissented 
with it, their main concern being that it would tie the future 
SAR government's "hands," keeping them from acting in line with 
future realities. So while its failure was unexpected, it was 
also understandable. 
  But the failure to pass of the labor welfare motion was very 
hard to understand. As the Hong Kong Drafting Committee 
members were weighted toward industrial and business circles, 
their votes against it were understandable. But as the 
mainland drafting committee members were mostly Communist Party 
members, their voting not in favor of it, but rather against it 
or abstaining, was unexpected. 
  The substance of this motion was the right of Hong Kong 
workers to strike, as well as matters such as collective 
bargaining between labor and capital, and the establishment of a 
central accumulation fund. As the PRC Constitution did not have 
a provision on strikes, some advocated that Hong Kong should not 
either. But I supported the "left faction" labor union view, 
advocating that the Basic Law should list the right of Hong Kong 
workers to strike. 
  Prior to this plenary session of the drafting committee, I 
had discussed the matter with Ji Pengfei, noting that Hong Kong 
was a capitalist world where strikes were a very important 
weapon in struggles between labor and capital. While strikes 
are a method of last resort that should not be applied lightly, 
we should not deprive workers of this important right. 
  Collective bargainaing is also very important, as it is the 
only way to enable workers to rely on their united strength to 
obtain successful terms in negotiations with capital. Moreover, 
as most Hong Kong workers were not organized, with "left," 
"center," and "right" labor unions decentralizing working class 
unity, collective bargaining laws and regulations as grounds for 
negotiating with capital could relatively increase 
organizational might. Of course, in resolving labor-capital 
disputes, it is also necessary to adhere to the principle of 
[protecting] the rights of both labor and capital, by not 
overdoing things. 
  As Hong Kong's labor welfare was insubstantial, with no 
retirement safeguards, the central accumulation fund was a 
legitimate demand for resolving the matter, so that we should 
have supported it in principle. While a central accumulation 
fund would certainly be hard to implement, it could be 
accomplished through flexible means. Unless the Basic Law 
included this principle, it would be impossible to safeguard 
workers' elementary rights, with the decreased worker support 
for the Basic Law being unfavorable to Hong Kong's social 
stability and prosperity. While Ji Pengfei had endorsed all of 
this at the time, the motion still was not approved. 
  After this meeting, Ji Pengfei called a meeting of the 
party's directors, deputy directors, secretaries, and deputy 
secretaries to discuss the meeting, where all were essentially 
satisfied with the outcome of the balloting, as most of the 
motions that should have passed did, while the ones that we 
hoped would not basically did not. While Cha Chi-min's bill was 
unexpected, it was certainly not the final plan, so could still 
be amended through certain procedures. As to the fiscal 
policy, Li Hou and others took the initiative to suggest 
striving to amend certain words, and then asking for another 
vote. As to the labor welfare proposal, I asked Ji Pengfei, Li 
Hou and others to work on persuading mainland committee members 
to support it in future voting, especially emphasizing that "the 
Basic Law must not disappoint Hong Kong workers," which Ji 
Pengfei agreed to. 
  But after the 4 June incident, at the final Plenary Session 
of the Drafting Committee, when the Basic Law draft was voted 
on, the item on "collective bargaining" was still not adopted. 
As I had already been declared retired and transferred back to 
the mainland at the time, I was no longer taking part in the 
internal meetings on Hong Kong and Macao hosted by the Hong Kong 
and Macao Affairs Office, so had no way of knowing really why 
this item was not adopted. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20457 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar016___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-016 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMICS </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liu Guoguang on Effects of Macroeconomic Control </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0245A Beijing ZHONGGUO JINGJI TIZHI GAIGE [CHINA'S 
ECONOMIC STRUCTURE REFORM] in Chinese 23 Nov 93 pp 17-19 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0245A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO JINGJI TIZHI GAIGE [CHINA'S 
ECONOMIC STRUCTURE REFORM] </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Qin Shaoxiang (4440 1421 4161): "The Old </F>
Structure Cannot Drive the `High Speed Vehicle' -- Noted 
Economist Professor Liu Guoguang Discusses Reform and 
Development"] 
  [Text] To solve the problem of deep conflicts in 
China's current economic life, we must perfect and strengthen 
macroeconomic regulation and control and carry out comprehensive 
in depth reforms. In a society with rapid economic growth and 
tight economic relationships, we must enhance the strength of 
reform. We must not cease development to work on reform. Without 
effective macroeconomic regulation and control, there will not 
be a mature market economy. 
  Since the latter half of last year, the Chinese economy has 
exhibited the "three high" phenomena -- a high economic growth 
rate, high investment growth rate, and high commodity price 
increase rate. In light of the conflicts and problems occuring 
in China's economic life, the central government assessed the 
situation and made some timely policy decisions on macroeconomic 
regulation and control. How are the prospects and effectiveness 
of the strengthened macroeconomic regulations and controls? How 
should the current and future conflicts and problems in China's 
economic life be resolved? With these questions in mind, this 
reporter visited famous economist and National People's Congress 
Member Professor Liu Guoguang in October. 
<H3>  The Prospects for Macroeconomic Regulation and Control Look 
Good; Inflation Warrants Alarm </H3>
  Liu Guoguang believes that the series of macroeconomic 
regulations and controls adopted by the central government to 
resolve previously existing and newly occuring problems in 
China's economic life will soon show results. The excessively 
high production rate fell for three straight months in July, 
August, and September. In September, it fell to 19.1 percent. 
The market peaks are tending towards stabilization, the finance 
situation has improved, and the rate of funding available for 
major construction has increased from 19 percent at the end of 
June to 70 percent. There have been no "IOUs" issued for the 
purchase of farm products, personal savings have increased 
again, the revenue growth rate has risen, and exports have 
grown. These achievements have gradually alleviated some 
people's anxieties. A growing number of people have come to 
understand that macroeconomic regulation and control is not 
overall retrenchment but the reality of structural readjustment. 
  This set of macroeconomic regulations and controls has been 
called a "soft attack." It mainly uses economic methods to scale 
back in a planned way the excessive investment which overloaded 
the national ability, as well as to rectify the chaotic finance 
order, suppress serious inflation, and resolve the conflicts and 
problems of the process of rapid economic growth. It does this 
while avoiding the great economic losses of applying "emergency 
brakes." Liu Guoguang feels that the establishment of a 
socialist market economy requires effective macroeconomic 
regulation and control. Becoming a market economy does not mean 
a completely free, laissez-faire approach. Without effective 
macroeconomic regulation and control, there cannot be a mature 
market economy. He said that even in a normal market economy, 
the government has to intervene in markets which have 
deficiencies. This is even more true for China during a period 
of structural transition, when some unpredictable problems will 
undoubtedly occur. It appears that there are many vacuums during 
this process of transition, and these would not exist during the 
original accumulation phase in the early development of market 
economies. At that time, the problems of a planned economy 
making a transition to a market economy did not exist. If a 
laissez-faire approach were used now, allowing the market to 
function spontaneously, the problems would be even more severe. 
Liu Guoguang said the main purpose of macroeconomic regulation 
and control is to use economic methods to solve the conflicts 
and problems in the process of rapid economic growth and thus 
create an atmosphere conducive to reform. 
  Many people still have doubts about whether macroeconomic 
regulation and control will work and whether the "soft attack" 
will succeed. Liu Guoguang's view on the prospects for 
macroeconomic regulation and control is that the first 
possibility is that the various measures of macroeconomic 
regulation and control will work quickly and be manipulated with 
an appropriate degree of tightness and suitable timing. Thus, 
the economy would be able to maintain a certain vitality and 
appropriate growth rate but also avoid the serious consequences 
of exacerbated inflation. In this way, the annual GNP growth 
rate for this year would reach 13 to 13.5 percent and next 
year's GNP growth rate would fall to about 10 percent. Inflation 
would be kept below two figures. The second possibility is that 
fear of excessively rapid commodity price increases will cause 
continued retrenchment, resulting in economic shrinkage and the 
prevention of economic restructuring. This would make it 
impossible to implement several major reform measures due to a 
restrictive environment. The third possibility is that excessive 
relaxation in confused reaction to the finance shortfall will 
result in the premature abandonment of macroeconomic regulations 
and controls which were just begining to be effective and thus 
cause even more severe economic overheating and inflation. Liu 
Guoguang emphasized that the latter two scenarios must be 
avoided. He said this set of macroeconomic regulation and 
control measures can achieve the first scenario predicted 
because the problems were recognized early and the measures 
adopted were effective and timely. In looking at the current 
situation, however, the progress on inflation may regress due to 
the need to maintain a certain economic growth rate in support 
of production. 
  Liu Guoguang predicts that if there are no sudden 
developments, there will not be a repeat of 1988's panic buying 
sprees, but the danger of inflation cannot be ignored. He said 
that the retail price index last year rose 5.4 percent but in 35 
large and middle-sized cities it rose 10.9 percent. The increase 
in currency circulation this year pushed prices higher. The June 
retail price index in 35 large and middle-sized cities rose more 
than 20 percent. The accumulated inflationary pressure over the 
past few years has begun to take effect. Experience proves that 
when measures are not taken to curtail inflation over two 
digits, the inflation will be exacerbated. When it is over 10 
percent, all groups in society will take steps to protect 
themselves. Macroeconomic regulation and control is an art. If 
it is done well, there is a certain pace and relatively stable 
inflation. He said that as long as the real income growth rate 
of fixed income earners is greater than the rate of inflation, 
and actual savings interests rates are appropriate, it will 
guarantee that labor accumulation will not be reduced to naught 
after inflation. Under these conditions, he would not oppose the 
use of mild inflation to stimulate economic growth. Negative 
interest rates, however, must not be used to support the 
development of inefficient industries. 
  Liu Guoguang emphasized that during the structural 
transition 
period, effective macroeconomic regulation and control can 
create an environment conducive to reform. But care must be 
taken that the macroeconomic regulation and control uses reform 
methods and economic techniques as much as possible. 
Administrative techniques should not be used to intervene in 
problems which can be solved with market mechanisms or indirect 
control techniques. Practice has proven that the old structure 
cannot carry out sustained rapid economic development and cannot 
resolve the conflicts and problems which arise amidst rapid 
movement. We must learn how to strengthen the potency of reform 
in an environment with rapid economic development and tightly 
stretched economic relationships. We cannot halt development in 
order to carry out reform. 
<H3>  Macroeconomic Regulation and Control Continues to Move 
Forward; Strengthened Reform Is the Basic Approach </H3>
  Liu Guoguang feels that the current progress made by 
macroeconomic regulation and control still falls short of the 
expectations of society and of the central government, 
particularly in areas such as guaranteeing agricultural 
production, raising peasant income, guaranteeing working capital 
for efficient large and middle-sized enterprises, and 
centralized funding guarantees for major basic construction 
projects. These areas still need much work. In essence, one can 
say that these conflicts and problems have arisen because the 
defects of the old system have not yet been completely overcome 
and the new system is still not completely formed. Therefore, 
the way to resolve these conflicts and problems is to strengthen 
reform and establish a socialist market economy structure. 
  He said that the market has moved towards reform during the 
last ten years or so and, as we enter the 90's, the reforms have 
changed in nature so that the task of reform is now to carry out 
a comprehensive and basic transformation of the entire economic 
structure to establish a socialist market economy structure. 
Reform must be extensive in all areas of economic life at both 
the macroeconomic and microeconomic levels. Therefore, to 
resolve the deep underlying conflicts and problems in China's 
current economic life and to perfect macroeconomic regulation 
and control, we must not delay in pursuing a finance structure, 
a tax revenue structure, a foreign trade and foreign currency 
structure, an investment structure, a social guarantee system, a 
public functionary system and other important reforms. 
  He said the main thrust of the finance structure reform is 
to 
strengthen the regulation and control function of the central 
bank and to make the People's Bank of China into a true central 
bank. A polcy-making bank must be established to carry out the 
separation of policy finance and commercial finance, and 
specialized banks should become true commercial banks. The 
direction of the tax revenue structure reform is to promote a 
divided tax system to rationalize the relative distribution 
between the central government and local governments and reform 
the distribution of profits between the state and state-owned 
enterprises. The reform of the investment structure is to divide 
construction projects into competitive commercial projects, 
basic production projects and public service projects and also 
to redetermine funding sources and change funding methods. It 
should also promote a responsibility system for project managers 
and reform the initiation and assessment procedures for 
projects. The thrust of reform in foreign trade is to adopt 
various measures to conform to GATT standards. 
  Liu Guoguang emphasized that reform is a complicated piece 
of 
systems engineering, and the reforms listed above cannot be 
accomplished overnight. The attainment of many of the reform 
goals is not a simple process. The specific implementation of 
many reforms still requires much detailed research and the 
identification of specific measures. The most difficult and the 
most important aspects of establishing a new structure and 
carrying out various reforms are the reform of state-owned 
enterprises and the transformation of operation mechanisms. It 
will be a long process. Enterprise reform still needs to go 
through pilot project testing and gradual implementation. We 
cannot promote a corporate system and implement a modern 
enterprise system all at once. There are also many problems in 
the process of corporatizing which will require research to 
solve. Finally, Liu called for the immediate implementation of 
the "Corporation Law" which stipulates the standards for 
corporate norms and corporate behavior, to allow the reform of 
state-owned enterprises to continue to progress. This will 
provide an underlying foundation for the establishment of a 
socialist market economic structure. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20458 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar016___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-016 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMICS </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   PBOC Vice President on Anticorruption Campaign </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0250A Beijing ZHONGGUO JINRONG [CHINA FINANCE] in 
Chinese No 11, 1 Nov 93 pp 4-6 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0250A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO JINRONG [CHINA FINANCE] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhou Zhengqing (0719 2973 1987), vice president </F>
of People's Bank of China: "PBOC Must Lead AntiCorruption 
Campaign"] 
  [Text] A nationwide campaign is currently under way to 
combat corruption and promote honesty in the party and 
government in accordance with the policy of the CPC Central 
Committee. The People's Bank of China [PBOC] should be a leader 
in this campaign. 
  Let us assess the current contingent of PBOC cadres and 
workers honestly. It should be affirmed that most are good. A 
majority of party members and cadres are incorrupt and 
law-abiding. Two years after we started "educating, 
housecleaning, and rectifying" the ranks of PBOC employees and 
other activities aimed at preventing swindling and theft and 
ensuring the security of bank funds, in particular, the majority 
of PBOC cadres have received training and their caliber has 
definitely improved. The number of economic cases in the PBOC 
system has also shown a downward trend. The anti-corruption 
drive and the campaign to improve the party style have been 
intensified. However, we must also be clear-headed enough to see 
that some forms of corruption have their own specific social and 
historical origins that are longstanding and hidden. As society 
and the economy develop and evolve, moreover, many new problems 
arise. Thus we cannot expect too much from the earlier round of 
education, housecleaning, and rectification at the PBOC. Instead 
we must realize that the task of combating corruption in the 
PBOC system remains an arduous one. Corruption in all its 
manifestations exists to various degrees throughout the system, 
from the headquarters to the branches, with some problems 
remaining very serious. For one thing, although the number of 
economic cases overall has dropped, the trend is up for major 
and serious cases. Second, to further their own special 
interests, small collectives and individuals do not follow the 
rules or observe discipline. Using the power in their hands and 
the convenience afforded them by their jobs, a minority of 
cadres and workers speculate in real estate, stocks, foreign 
exchange, and scarce materials with state credit funds. A tiny 
handful of workers in PBOC-operated economic entities pervert 
justice for a bribe as a means of lining their pockets. Third, 
unhealthy trends are still gaining momentum in the industry. 
Using the power in their hands, some units and individuals 
continue to wine and dine lavishly, demand payments, impose fees 
indiscriminately, and raise interest rates covertly. Fourth, 
ostentation, conspicuous consumption, and pleasure-seeking are 
all the range. Weak, disorganized, and riddled with 
bureaucratism, the leading groups of some units treat corruption 
and other unhealthy trends within their jurisdictions with 
indifference. Mismanagement and lax discipline give bad elements 
many loopholes to exploit. 
  It should be seen that corruption in the PBOC has a major 
impact on and constitutes a danger to the banking system. For 
starters, it undermines the leadership of the central bank and 
weakens its macroeconomic regulatory and control function. 
Corruption is bound to interfere with the exercise by the 
central bank of its macroeconomic regulatory and control 
function and its execution of the nation's monetary policy from 
an overall perspective. Second, it has encouraged the rise of 
unhealthy trends in the banking system. The PBOC is the core of 
the banking system; every word it utters, every move it makes, 
sets an example in the system. If the upper beam is not 
straight, the lower ones will go aslant. If there is corruption 
in the PBOC, how can it patrol the banking system and prevent 
the spreading of unhealthy trends? Furthermore, corruption in 
the PBOC system directly hinders banking reform and the 
deepening of the open policy. Finally, and most serious, 
corruption in the PBOC has highly adverse social effects, 
severely damaging the bank's reputation and trustworthiness and 
affecting the healthy development of the bank's normal business 
activities. For these reasons, leaders at all levels in the PBOC 
must fully appreciate the serious consequences of corruption and 
become even more conscientious about combating corruption. They 
must develop a greater sense of urgency and be resolved to fight 
corruption in all its forms unwaveringly. 
  The anti-corruption campaign is a major event in the drive 
to 
intensify party construction and consolidate the regime. 
Implicit in the four cardinal principles, it is a basic 
guarantee of the successful execution of reform and the open 
policy as well as economic development, an objective requirement 
of the development of a socialist market economy, and an 
essential condition for implementing the party's basic line 
across the board and furthering the current favorable situation. 
Allowing corruption of all forms to spread unchecked is a sure 
way to ruin our party, our people's regime, and our great 
socialist modernization enterprise. Banking is a pivotal link of 
the national economy. Banks are a special industry which deals 
in the commodity of money. The central bank both discharges the 
essential responsibility of regulating and controlling the 
macroeconomy and is the leader and manager of the banking 
system. Thus the PBOC must be a role model in the 
anti-corruption campaign in at least three ways. First, it must 
take a firm stand against corruption. There is absolutely no 
room for a wait-and-see attitude. Second, it must swiftly take 
measures to combat corruption. The emphasis should be on 
practical results and there must be no foot-dragging. Third, 
corruption cases must be handled seriously and strictly. We must 
never tolerate and accommodate ourselves to it. 
  1. Concentrate Our Energies and Focus On the Priorities. Go 
All Out To Produce Notable Successes in the Near Future. 
  For the moment the PBOC must concentrate its energies on 
doing a good job in bringing corrupt elements to justice and 
steadfastly overcoming all sorts of corrupt phenomena, including 
the reversal of unhealthy trends. It should strive to achieve 
the following in the near future. First, leading cadres above 
the departmental level in the PBOC system must demonstrate 
marked progress in honesty and self-discipline. Second, major 
cases must be investigated without delay and swindling 
activities prevented and reduced effectively. Third, a few 
simple rules must be made to be observed by everybody. The idea 
is to largely check the unhealthy tendencies of making loans in 
violation of the rules, raising interest rates without 
authorization, breaking banking rules and regulations, and 
failing to enforce the orders. Ideological and political 
education for the rank-and-file party members and cadres must be 
intensified to create a corruption-resistant climate without 
delay. 
  First of all, step up the supervision and inspection of the 
efforts by leading cadres at all levels to resist corruption and 
patrol themselves. People's Bank cadres above the departmental 
level must carry out in earnest the CPC Central Committee's 
"five regulations" on how cadres in party and government organs 
above the departmental level must achieve honesty and practice 
self-discipline. They should patrol themselves and discipline 
themselves in accordance with the "five regulations" in light of 
the reality of work in the banking industry. 
  Second, it must concentrate its resources on tackling major 
cases and firmly punish the corrupt. The PBOC must make the 
investigation of major cases the cornerstone of its 
anti-corruption campaign and strictly punish corrupt elements. 
It must double its attention to information provided by the 
masses in personal visits or letters, encouraging and cherishing 
their enthusiasm. It must closely analyze and study all 
complaints brought forward by the public and follow up on all 
the clues and leads, investigating and verifying them 
thoroughly. Letters and telephone calls that inform on leading 
cadres must be reported to the authorities above accurately. 
Nobody shall conceal or suppress letters and other materials 
from the masses containing accusations against leading cadres. 
In checking out the accusations, we must take a 
seek-truth-from-facts attitude. Right must be distinguished from 
wrong through investigations. Where the law has clearly been 
broken and discipline breached, the offender must be handled in 
strict accordance with the appropriate regulations. Not for a 
moment can we be soft-hearted, relent, and tolerate corruption. 
Things that are out of step with reality must be promptly 
clarified. 
  Third, the rules must be enforced resolutely and unhealthy 
trends must be corrected in earnest. The management of lending 
must be tightened and every effort made to prevent new lending 
in violation of the law. Where loans have been made illegally, 
more must be done to sort out the mess. The loans must be repaid 
and handled on a case-by-case basis in accordance with the 10 
regulations laid down by the bank's headquarters. Interest rate 
management regulations must be enforced strictly. Unauthorized 
and covert increases in interest rates must be investigated and 
stopped. All regulations pertaining to the collection of fees 
and charges must be implemented strictly. Nobody shall increase 
without authorization the rates at which fees are collected or 
collect fees other than those which have been authorized. Links 
with institute-operated economic entities must be severed 
without delay and funds previously given to such entities should 
be recalled. A determined effort must be made to correct all 
kinds of unhealthy trends in the industry in light of the 
reality in the branches. People who demand payments must be 
severely criticized and handled. Appropriate rules and 
regulations as well as organizational discipline should also be 
drawn up. Democratic practices for party members and leading 
cadres must be steadfastly adhered to, as must the "two opens 
and one supervision" system so that the bank develop good habits 
and establish sound discipline. 
  Fourth, ideological and political education must be 
intensified. For the majority of party members and cadres in the 
PBOC system, the anti-corruption campaign is essentially a 
question of learning, of education. Ideological and political 
education takes care of the root causes of the problem as well 
as its symptoms and is as such a big part of comprehensive 
treatment. In the anti-corruption campaign, party organs at all 
levels must always intensify ideological and political education 
for the vast number of party members and cadres, treating this 
as the core of the campaign. The anti-corruption campaign must 
go hand in hand with the drive to improve the quality of the 
contingent of workers. A serious in-depth studying campaign 
should be organized for all party members and cadres so that 
they will resist money worship, hedonism, and 
ultra-individualism on their own initiative and develop the 
right philosophy of life. 
  2. Master the Principles of the Anti-Corruption Campaign and 
Know Its Policy Limits. Ensure Its Healthy Development. 
  The anti-corruption campaign covers a wide area and is 
closely related to policies. Party organs at all levels must 
adhere to the principle of seeking truth from facts, correctly 
distinguish between and handle the two kinds of contradictions, 
and enforce the policies strictly. Their attitude must be firm, 
their work solid, solving problems in earnest to meet the 
requirements of the CPC Central Committee and ensuring a healthy 
and orderly course for this campaign. They must take pains to 
abide by the following principles in the anti-corruption 
campaign: 
  A. Revolving closely around the core of banking work today, 
integrate the anti-corruption campaign organically with the 
rectification of financial order and the strengthening of 
financial discipline in accordance with the spirit of the 
instructions of the CPC Central Committee and State Council 
regarding financial work. Correctly handle the relations between 
the campaign against corruption and the deepening of reform. 
Never waver from the central task of economic construction. The 
anti-corruption campaign must firmly adhere to the party's basic 
line, revolve around the core task of economic construction 
closely, and contribute to the deepening of reform. 
  B. Concentrate on anti-corruption work targeting leading 
organs and leading cadres. The headquarters and provincial 
branches must position themselves at the forefront of the 
anti-corruption drive. Headquarters organs should concentrate on 
leading groups at the two levels of bank and department while 
provincial branches should focus on leading groups at the bank 
and office. Only by zeroing in on leading groups can we get the 
anti-corruption campaign fully off the ground and truly create a 
good party style, good banking practices, and an atmosphere 
where people are encouraged to be honest and law-abiding. 
Leading cadres must do more than just tackling their own units; 
they must clean up the entire PBOC system. They must strive to 
meet the demand of the CPC Central Committee that leading cadres 
be honest and law-abiding. Only when they become honest 
themselves will they gain a voice and be able to seize the 
initiative in the anti-corruption campaign. Leading cadres must 
think of the big picture and stop being Mr. Nice Guy. They must 
summon up the courage to take responsibility and lead the 
rank-and-file cadres as well as the masses in combating 
corruption. 
  C. Do not turn the anti-corruption campaign into a mass 
movement or give everybody a passing grade. 
  Leading cadres must examine and correct themselves based on 
the CPC Central Committee's "five regulations" on honesty and 
self-discipline. Supervision by the masses must be beefed up 
significantly. The public reporting system must be further 
improved. Discipline inspection organs should investigate issues 
raised in complaints from the public in accordance with the law. 
  D. Handle cases in strict accordance with the law. 
Discipline 
inspection organs must get to the bottom of cases where the law 
has been broken, basing themselves on facts and using the law as 
their criterion. Cases in which the criminal code has been 
violated should be turned over to judicial organs for 
investigation. People who obstruct the investigation of a case 
seriously should be firmly dealt with. Corruption and other 
negative phenomena have so far been dealt with in an excessively 
lenient and half-hearted manner. That must now come to an end. 
People who should be dismissed or criticized should be handled 
accordingly. In cases where the conduct of an individual should 
be reported or circulated, that should also be done. Problems 
resulting from omissions and errors in day-to-day work and 
management must not be categorically regarded as corruption. Be 
careful to cherish the enthusiasm for reform and the creative 
spirit. Protect comrades who make mistakes as they experiment 
with reform. Help them review the experience and draw lessons 
therefrom and encourage them to continue to push ahead. In the 
course of financial reform, new issues will crop up of which we 
do not have a clear understanding right away. Deal with them 
cautiously. Don't make rash decisions. 
  E. Even as we combat corruption unwaveringly, we must give 
wide publicity to the positive. Even as we crack down hard on 
all manner of corruption and punish corrupt elements, we must 
publicize and commend loud and clear and in a variety of ways 
advanced models who are honest and law-abiding and have the 
courage to take on corruption. Spotlight the new spirit of 
arduous struggle and of giving. Launch activities to study Jao 
Yulu [3542 5940 4389], Lei Feng [7191 6912], and the "two Lans" 
in depth. Further raise the ideological tone of the vast number 
of cadres and workers and enhance their ability to withstand 
corruption and change on their own initiative. 
  3. Strengthen the Leadership of the Anti-Corruption Campaign 
  The struggle against corruption is a complex and arduous 
mission. Party organs of the PBOC at all levels must move 
vigorously to step up leadership effectively, with people from 
top to bottom working together to produce practical results and 
ensure that the CPC Central Committee's plans are carried 
through. 
  A. Comrades in charge of party organs at all levels in the 
PBOC must assume full responsibility for leading the 
anti-corruption campaign. Get involved personally. Play a 
personal role in planning. Stick to the policy of "grappling 
with two hands, both aggressively." Tackle the anti-corruption 
campaign and the promotion of honesty in the party as the top 
priority for the moment and make an earnest effort to pull it 
off. Leading groups at all levels should make plans for and 
organize the implementation of the anti-corruption campaign 
within their own jurisdiction. Major problems that appear in the 
campaign must be reported promptly and handled properly. 
  B. Establish a responsibility system at each level, with one 
level supervising the next. The masses must be fully mobilized 
to combat corruption under the leadership of party organs at all 
levels. Each level should be held accountable to the one above 
and help the one below. The headquarters should step up guidance 
and inspection of the branches. When a branch, unit, department, 
or office experiences serious problems, the departments at the 
higher level should send people there to help sort out the mess. 
In short, the anti-corruption campaign calls for real work. In 
some places of the bank system, work is half-hearted, unhealthy 
tendencies are well entrenched, corruption is rampant, and 
serious cases occur frequently with little effort being made to 
investigate them. As far as these places are concerned, apart 
from dealing with the personnel who have broken the law, the 
leaders concerned should also be held accountable. 
  C. Establish sound and coherent rules and regulations and 
perfect the mechanism for supervision and restraint. To 
eliminate corruption, we must create effective preventive and 
restraint mechanisms and a work system that are well suited to 
the socialist market economy. The anti-corruption campaign must 
be written into law. Identify those areas and linkages that are 
particularly vulnerable to corruption, taking into account the 
reality in banking work and the fact that thus far policies, 
laws, and regulations have failed to keep pace, and diligently 
formulate a host of rules and regulations in order to eliminate 
the soil on which corruption depends for its survival. 
  D. Strengthen and support the work of discipline inspection 
and supervision departments and party organs. Make the most of 
full-time organs. Party organs at all levels must hear reports 
from discipline inspection and supervision departments and party 
committees. Firmly support them in discharging their 
responsibilities in accordance with the party constitution and 
the law. Assign them tasks, give them ideas, and help them solve 
practical problems encountered in their work. Equip them with 
adequate resources to handle the cases based on the needs of 
their actual work and speed up the investigations. 
  Even as we combat corruption, we must commit ourselves to 
developing a contingent of workers for the banking industry and 
strengthening the organization of leading groups at all levels 
as well as developing their ideology and practices. Make a 
mighty effort to do a good job here by taking a range of 
measures of proven effectiveness. 
  The anti-corruption campaign is a long-term arduous task to 
be tackled as a piece of systems engineering. By combating 
corruption, we should raise the political caliber of the 
contingent of PBOC workers to e new level and advance banking 
work further. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20459 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar016___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-016 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMICS </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Stock Market Trend `Grim', Outlook `Unpredictable' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0312A Beijing JINRONG SHIBAO in Chinese 25 Jan 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0312A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINRONG SHIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Dai Jingming (2071 2417 2494): "General Trend of </F>
the Chinese Stock Market and Its Crucial Problems"] 
  [Text] When bringing up the subject of the general trend, 
insiders at the stock market are bound to regretfully state: The 
general trend is grim and the outlook unpredictable. In summary, 
the situation manifests itself in the following three ways: 
  1. Although the market has rapidly expanded, trading has, 
conversely, declined. From 1992 to 1993, the number of new 
companies and the aggregate market value of the Shenzhen and 
Shanghai markets have steeply increased from 71 companies and 
somewhat over 20 billion yuan to 182 companies and 352.1 billion 
yuan. The general rule is that an expanding market will of 
course result in an expanding trade volume, but here in this 
case the facts run counter to what one would have wished for. 
Since the Chinese stock market turned bearish in July of last 
year, trade volume and trade value have declined day after day. 
There had indeed been times when the daily trading volume was 
around 1 billion, but trading volume at the current stock market 
is now completely different. 
  2. People show are low-spirited, and speculative activities 
overshadow investments. For quite a while now, the stock market 
has been in a turbulent, restless state, with many shareholders 
having "thrown good money after bad," a fact which has had a 
strong dampening influence on investment enthusiasm. It rather 
increased speculative inclinations, so that purely speculative 
trading, eagerly getting in on upward moves and abandoning items 
with declining tendencies, artificially creating sudden spurts 
in the market, giving forth fictitious notions, all such 
activities have become common occurrences. 
  3. It will still take quite some time to bring order into 
the 
disorderly state of share prices. Looking at the actual 
conditions in the stock market we see that there is no orderly 
way in which the first-, second-, and third-line share prices 
change, quite a few third-line share prices are higher than the 
second-line share prices, or even higher than the first-line 
share prices. A major reason for this is that the entire process 
of adjusting price positions is beset with much that is 
unrelated to the law of value, such as the procurement 
mentality, and regionalism, with the result that prices for some 
mediocre shares are high above those of quality shares. Faced 
with so grim an general trend, anyone in the role of an investor 
will of course be concerned and entertain fears, and it also 
stands to reason that agencies charged with the supervision and 
administration of securities trading, no matter at what level, 
should be extremely vigilant. Society generally believes that 
China, being a socialist country, where there is government 
support, and regulation and control by the state, cannot 
possibly meet with a calamity on the stock exchange. Anyone who 
will still stubbornly cling to this outdated idea, disregarding 
the many concealed danger spots that do exist in the operational 
processes of the stock market, is certainly very much wrong. 
  Where, then, are the problems in this grim overall state of 
affairs? In my opinion, the fundamental problem that presently 
impedes the steady development of the stock market is the 
incongruous state of the supply-demand relation and the 
imbalance between supply and demand. This contradiction will 
still be the major factor that will impede stock market 
development in China, also throughout 1994. 
  At present, the supply-demand contradiction manifests itself 
mainly as an excess of supply over demand. Let us first look at 
the supply side: The aggregate market value of the two markets 
of Shanghai and Shenzhen is now 352.1 billion yuan. Let us, 
furthermore, make an initial calculation: In 1994, it is planned 
to introduce to the market 5.5 billion yuan of new share 
offerings. Add to this the bonus shares [song pei gu 6623 6792 
5140], state-owned shares, and shares owned by judicial persons, 
that will come on the market and be transferred, and also some 
shares for which transfer had not been completed in 1993; thus, 
the total amount will not be less than 10 billion yuan of 
shares. Converting at the rate of 10 yuan market value per 
share, we can then estimate that the total capital brought into 
the market will be over 100 billion yuan. These figures clearly 
demonstrate how large the supply will be, and how rapid a growth 
will occur. However, quite a number of specialists and scholars, 
who are engaged in studies of the stock market, make light of 
the increase in supplies and the subsequent pressure on the 
market. Commonly, the following three different theses are 
expressed in this connection: According to the first thesis, the 
absolute volume increase, as between 1993 and 1994, a mere 500 
million, did not at all amount to very much, and besides, the 
infusion into the market has occurred evenly and in a 
well-distributed way. Market operations could easily foresee 
developments, so that this could not possibly have generated a 
shock of any severity. If analyzed from the angle of the total 
volume, of deposit volume, and of increase volume, this point 
can be further explained. As far as the single share offerings 
introduced into the market and the total market value are 
concerned, net increases in 1993, as compared with 1992, had 
been 1.5-times and 16.5-times, respectively, and in 1994, as 
compared with 1993, again 1-time and 0.3-times. It shows that 
the impact on the market in 1994 was much weaker than in 1992. 
The second thesis argues that the expansion has not only had a 
one-way, but rather a two-way effect. With the issue of new 
shares in the market, it was not only the supplies that 
increased, but they also brought along capital, which in turn 
initiated demand. The third thesis argues that there exists a 
huge demand potential which can easily cope with the pressure 
generated by the expansion. According to statistics, total 
savings deposits by the entire population amount to 1.5 trillion 
yuan, while the total amount brought into the stock market was 
only 100 million yuan, which accounts for not even 6.7 percent. 
This thesis argues that capital follows market conditions. Once 
the market situation is favorable, capital sources will open up 
widely. 
  Let us now examine the situation from the demand angle. 
Without too many qualitative analyses, here only three 
calculations: First, if we distribute the total 100 billion 
accretion of new shares among 16 million shareholding citizens 
(China now has 8 million shareholding citizens), each of them 
would have to invest another 6,250 yuan, while not withdrawing 
original investments, which would amount to having to buy 300 
"development shares" [4099 1455 5140 4384] (computed at 21 yuan 
per share). Second, what portion of the 1.5 trillion aggregate 
deposits represents peasant deposits and what portion represents 
deposits by urban resident? According to investigation and 
analysis, not quite 0.5 percent of the urban residents' deposits 
could be truly available for investment in the stock market. 
That means at most 7.5 billion yuan could be made available from 
the said capital fund, which would make up only 7.5 percent 
within the new stock accretion. Third, new offerings of shares 
during the second semester of 1993 expanded at an average 
monthly rate of 7.4 percent, while the influx of capital into 
the market increased at the rate of only 3.5 percent, thus 
leaving a disparity of 3.9 percent. Some particular shares even 
showed a reverse movement, such as the "development A shares." 
The total share capital expanded from the 140 million yuan of 
1992 to 270 million yuan in 1993, thus supplies increased 93 
percent. However, only not quite 40 percent of the 1992 amount 
came in in 1993 as the capital of "development A shares," demand 
having thus declined by somewhat over 60 percent. In 1994, which 
is supposed to be the "Bond Buying Year" and the "Fund Building 
Year," the divergent flow of capital will no doubt receive much 
attention. In view of the present trend, our prognosis is: On 
the one hand, supply will expand at an accelerated pace, and, on 
the other hand, demand will, conversely, decline, and this will 
further aggravate the conflict between supply and demand. The 
shortage of capital funds in the stock market will increasingly 
constitute a bottleneck that will hamper the development of the 
stock market. 
  What is the remedy? The radical cure would be to return 
again to the real demand of the market, to effect a 
well-balanced adjustment of the current plans for the issue and 
market offering of shares, so as to have demand determine 
supply, and to truly establish a plan for the issuing and market 
offering of shares on the foundation of actual demand in the 
stock market. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20460 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar016___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-016 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMICS </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Treasury Bond `Image' Seen Needing Improvement </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0311A Beijing JINRONG SHIBAO in Chinese 26 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0311A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINRONG SHIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Cai Xianshi (5591 0341 1395), Sichuan Province </F>
Branch of the People's Bank of China: "Some Thoughts on How To 
Stimulate Treasury Bond Sales"] 
  [Text] As the curtain has gently descended on our 1993 
activities of issuing treasury bonds, and as we earnestly recall 
the events of that memorable year, we cannot evade the thought 
that the image of the treasury bond urgently needs to be 
rehabilitated and improved. 
  1. Treasury Bonds Too Must Be Marketable and Adapted To 
Demand 
  Any new product that enters the market will have to stand 
the 
test of the market. If its sales are sluggish, the first check 
should concern itself with the product itself, for instance, 
whether consumers find price, quality, style, or after-sale 
services acceptable or not, how well the world is aware of the 
product, whether it has been sufficiently publicized, whether it 
has made an impression on the minds of the people, and how the 
product ranks in its competition with similar products. If there 
is nothing questionable in these respects, the product is bound 
to find favor in the eyes of the consumers. The accuracy of this 
principle has indeed been well revealed in the course of 
marketing treasury bonds since 1981. 
  In its present era of sustained economic development, China 
is faced with an extremely serious contradiction in the supply 
and demand of capital funds for its entire economic operations. 
Raising capital for its construction projects, through an 
appropriate amount of borrowing, in order to stimulate the 
economy toward sustained and solid development has, therefore, 
become a matter of major significance. This year the task of 
placing treasury bonds will be further enhanced beyond the 
foundation laid in 1993. Faced with this grim challenge, we must 
free ourselves from old ideas, update our concepts, and we must 
also, while consciously and firmly resolved to develop the 
socialist market economy, become highly proficient in matters of 
placing government bonds, so that the sale of government bonds 
will proceed more actively and more effectively in the new year. 
  Issuing government bonds amounts to fiduciary borrowing by 
the state and the government from the people, and establishing 
with the subscribers to such bonds, on a voluntary and mutually 
beneficial basis and on certain conditions, a relationship of 
creditor and debtor. Buying government bonds and paying taxes 
are two completely different concepts. Characteristic of the 
former is its voluntary and remunerative nature, while the 
latter is compulsory and without remuneration. If these two 
concepts are confused and become mixed up, actual work will end 
up in devious aberrations. The voluntary character is therefore 
an unshakeable principle in government bond subscriptions. In 
marketing the bonds, it is not sufficient to have the masses 
regard buying government bonds as doing one's bounden duty or 
merely as a patriotic act, they must rather fully understand and 
recognize it as a profit-motivated investment alternative. As 
the socialist market economy is developing further and as the 
people are becoming ever more knowledgeable about financial 
matters, this alternative of acquiring government bonds is 
becoming a more rational alternative. Under the past system of 
the unitary planned economy, financial assets of China's 
citizens showed up only as savings deposits, while now, the 
investment tendency is toward shares and high-yield bonds 
(government bonds essentially occupy an insignificant place in 
the vast majority of households). There is here actually an 
imbalance in the structure of financial assets of households. 
During 1993, in spite of a large-scale political mobilization 
and of raising interest rates twice, the issuing of government 
bonds still did not proceed satisfactorily, and this is a matter 
that deserves serious thought. Ample consideration to the 
economic capability of the masses to take up bonds and to the 
psychological threshold of the masses must be precondition 
before we zealously strive to create the macroclimate that is 
needed for the successful placing of government bonds. History 
has proven that the effective way of propagandizing government 
bonds is not to merely stress the financial advantages for the 
government or the financial advantages for the investors. The 
correct way is, on the one hand, an intensified mobilization of 
political thought, and, on the other hand, continuous arousal of 
investment fervor among the masses. This is the only way to 
gradually nurture a healthy investment attitude. It should not 
be a matter of the government wanting me to buy government 
bonds, but rather that it is I who needs to buy government bonds. 
  2. Serious Efforts To Improve Operations, Perfecting 
the Image of Government Bonds 
  To ensure timely fulfillment of this year's task of placing 
government bonds, it is in my opinion necessary to do a good job 
in the following respects: 
  A. Governments at all levels must foster an overall point of 
view and a long-term point of view, to doubly cherish the 
reputation of government bonds. Intensified political propaganda 
must be incisive and meticulous, must be fastidious about 
method, while the sentiments of the investors must also be fully 
respected. Oversimplification and overeagerness for quick 
results are short-sighted and will in the end impair the 
investment enthusiasm of the masses, will be psychologically 
counterproductive, and will fester like an incurable disease. If 
repeated efforts still fail to achieve fulfillment of the task 
of placing government bonds, the deficiency must be made up in 
some other way, based on a comprehensive improvement of the 
investment climate. 
  B. Reaffirming the principle of the priority of government 
bonds. Higher government agencies must delegate to lower fiscal 
and financial departments the authority to impose punitive 
restraints against capital-raising activities that violate the 
principle of the priority of government bonds. Against 
obstinately self-willed units, the government should take a 
clear-cut stand in exposing them through the news media, and if 
necessary even freeze the funds these units may have raised, and 
hold them until the requirements of the government bond sales 
have been met. 
  C. We must exert great efforts in opening up a secondary 
market for government bonds. In a certain sense, the secondary 
market for government bonds is also a kind of post-sale 
servicing of this financial commodity. The more lively the 
secondary market gets, the more outstanding the performance of 
the post-sale service, and the higher the reputation of 
government bonds. For this purpose, we must effect a 
comprehensive regulation of the financial order, then exert a 
major effort in initiating a secondary market for government 
bonds, and accomplish a benign cycle of interdependence and 
mutual support between the secondary and the primary market. For 
the purpose of protecting the legitimate interests of the 
investors, the government should intervene, as necessary, with 
the intermediary organs dealing in government bonds, prescribing 
the minimum rate to be paid by purchasers of government bonds 
and demand that listings be subject to supervision by the 
general public. 
  D. Rational determination of the interest rate of government 
bonds. In China this determination must consider the 
attractiveness of bonds for investors, and consideration must be 
given at the same time to the costs of raising capital and the 
capability of public finance to repay capital and pay interests. 
In Western countries, the general level of interest rates of 
government bonds is not at all high (in some countries it is 
somewhat lower than the interest for savings deposits of the 
same quality), but they are made attractive by exempting 
interest income from such bonds from taxation. Investors can 
therefore still expect good profits from the purchase of 
government bonds. However, since China's tax system is not yet 
in perfect condition, the treasury bonds, though by themselves 
quite attractive, are now making a poor showing. Starting out 
from the Chinese realities, it would be appropriate to set 
interest rates for treasury bonds two or three percentage points 
higher than the interest rates for savings deposits of the same 
quality. 
  E. Adjusting the irrational denominational structure of 
treasury bond. The irrational denominational structure of the 
treasury bonds is also a major impediment to the sale of these 
bonds. An investigation has shown that the general situation of 
Chinese households that are presently capable of buying 
government bonds is such that most are of middling financial 
capability, with few at the extreme ends. We must therefore 
start out from this fact in determining the denominational 
structure of treasury bonds. A scientific determination of this 
structure would not only benefit their marketing but also reduce 
printing expenses. It has been computed that printing bonds in 
the three denominations of 50, 100, and 1,000 yuan would meet 
the needs of investors in the various income brackets, and 
printing should best be at the rate of 20, 70, and 10 percent, 
respectively. 
  3. Issuing Bonds at a Premium Might Be Tried 
  The issue of government bonds has by now been resumed for 13 
years, since 1981. Issues have always been at face value, with 
repayment of principal and payment of interests on maturity. 
Investors have become somewhat tired of the same old appearance 
of the bond issues, which for a long time have lost the 
stimulating attractiveness of something new. To create a new 
image for government bonds and arouse new buying fervor among 
investors, it might be tried to issue government bonds at a 
premium. The advantages would be: 
  A. Enhanced incentive to buy government bonds. From the 
psychological viewpoint of the investor, rather than gaining a 
portion of interests by means of a large amount of initial 
investment, it might appear a better way to invest only a part 
of the capital and at due date receive a fixed sum. Laying out a 
fraction and having it grow to a large sum is generally the 
psychology of persons intent on saving. If a 3-year government 
bond pays 14 percent interest, a 1,000-yuan bond will have grown 
to 1,420 yuan, principal and interest, at maturity. If the bond, 
on the other hand, would have been issued at a premium, the bond 
of 1,000-yuan face value could have been bought for about 705 
yuan (getting back to the capital amount according to the 
formula: capital and interest = capital + capital x interest 
rate x time. To overcome the trouble that odd fen amounts would 
present at the time of issuing the bonds, it should be 
permissible to make appropriate adjustments and round off 
capital figures as much as possible to whole yuan numbers, 
within the limits of the interest rate). At maturity the bond 
would be redeemed at face value. Even though the same amount 
would in the end be gained whether issued at face value or 
issued at a premium, there is a big psychological difference as 
far as the investors are concerned, and this new style of the 
financial commodity may act as an increased inducement for 
investors. 
  B. It is beneficial for medium-term and long-term investing, 
it will also prevent indiscriminate large-scale dumping. An 
investor who has bought government bonds at a premium will 
thereby have decided on obtaining his profit at maturity. In 
general, an investor will not abandon his profits halfway. This 
kind of stability will greatly contribute to an increased trust 
in and reputation of government bonds. 
  C. Simplification of procedures, facilitating cashing in by 
the general public. Cashing-in of government bonds has always 
been troublesome for public finance and banking departments. 
Most of the general public have also often resented the much too 
cumbersome procedures of filling out forms for payment, for 
interest calculations, and for make-up funds [pei kuan 6792 
2949]. If bonds were now issued at premium, payment procedures 
would be extremely simple. The teller would only have to check 
whether the government bond is genuine and whether it has 
matured, and would then cash it at face value. The bond would be 
redeemed in exchange for cash. This heightened efficiency of 
cashing-in would eliminate lining up in long lines at the 
counter. It would really create favorable conditions for the 
next round of bond issues. 
  D. Simplification of accounting procedure, improving 
accounting quality. When issuing treasury bonds at premium, 
cashing-in of bonds would not involve computing capital and 
interest, it would merely require verifying the year, the bond, 
and the amount, and this would significantly reduce calculations 
by the teller and be beneficial in helping to avoid accounting 
mistakes. 
  E. It would create favorable conditions for the flexible 
adjustment of time limits for government bond issues. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20461 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar016___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-016 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMICS </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Gross Industrial Output Value in January </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  HK0103124394 Beijing CEI Database in English 1 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK0103124394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CEI Database </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Beijing (CEIS) -- Following is a list showing 
China's total industrial output value in January 1994, released 
by the State Statistical Bureau: 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                  |                  |                  |(in 100 million y-| 
|                  |                  |                  |uan)              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                  |1/94              |1/93              |chg over 1/93(pc) | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Total             |2903.3            |2179.1            |33.2              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Including:        |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Light ind.        |1403.1            |1019.8            |37.6              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Heavy ind.        |1500.3            |1159.3            |29.4              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|State firms       |1453.5            |1275.6            |13.9              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Collectively owne-|1054.7            |708.1             |48.9              | 
|d ones            |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Others            |395.1             |195.4             |102.2             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Note: The industrial output value is measured in 1990s constant yuan.      | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20462 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar016___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-016 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMICS </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Output of Mechano-Electronic Products in January </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  HK0103124594 Beijing CEI Database in English 1 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK0103124594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CEI Database </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Beijing (CEIS) -- Following is a list of the output 
of China's major mechano-electronic products in January 1994, 
released by the State Statistical Bureau: 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Item              |Unit              |1/94              |1/93              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Power equipment   |10,000kw          |83.73             |28.67             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|AC motor          |10,000kw          |428.79            |405.06            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Industrial boiler |ton               |4135.80           |3877.00           | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Machine tool      |10,000set         |1.49              |1.68              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Including:        |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|NC machine tool   |set               |856               |785               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|precision machine |set               |107               |119               | 
|tool              |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Large machine tool|set               |395               |381               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Automobile        |10,000            |10.66             |9.16              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Including:        |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Bus               |10,000            |0.60              |0.71              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Car               |10,000            |2.15              |1.41              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Truck             |10,000            |4.87              |4.08              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Motorbike         |10,000            |26.11             |39.63             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tractor (20hp/abo-|10,000            |0.27              |0.42              | 
|ve)               |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Small tractor     |10,000            |8.03              |7.05              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Locomotive        |set               |89                |67                | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Including:        |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Diesel            |set               |59                |40                | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Steam             |set               |1                 |2                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Electric          |set               |29                |25                | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Passenger coach   |set               |165               |97                | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Freight wagon     |set               |3704              |2002              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Internal combusti-|10,000kw          |829.81            |731.90            | 
|on engine         |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Fishing ship      |-                 |-                 |3                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|civil steel ship  |10,000ton         |16.46             |18.53             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Computer          |set               |4                 |27                | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Micro-computer    |set               |5530              |4099              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Color crt         |10,000            |96.01             |40.35             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Program-controlle-|10,000set         |67.72             |26.68             | 
|d switchboard     |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20463 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar016___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-016 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMICS </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Output of Main Chemical Products in January </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  HK0103124494 Beijing CEI Database in English 1 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK0103124494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CEI Database </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Beijing (CEIS) -- Following is a list of the output 
of main chemical products in January 1994, released by the State 
Statistical Bureau: 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Item              |Unit              |1/94              |1/93              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Chemical fiber    |10,000t           |19.11             |16.25             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Sulphuric acid    |10,000t           |16.17             |13.58             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Dense nitric acid |10,000t           |3.78              |3.50              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Soda ash          |10,000t           |48.02             |38.24             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Caustic soda      |10,000t           |32.73             |26.84             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ethylene          |10,000t           |19.43             |17.80             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Calcium chloride  |10,000t           |18.29             |17.95             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Pure benzene      |10,000t           |7.71              |6.97              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Synthetic ammonia |10,000t           |161.33            |165.81            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Chemical fertiliz-|10,000t           |158.12            |142.49            | 
|er                |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|(Nitrogen)        |10,000t           |126.75            |114.09            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|(Phosphorous)     |10,000t           |30.03             |26.07             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|(Potash)          |10,000t           |1.40              |0.87              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Chemical pesticide|10,000t           |1.63              |1.52              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Paint             |10,000t           |7.05              |6.86              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Dyestuff          |10,000t           |1.52              |0.96              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Chinese patent me-|10,000t           |2.17              |1.59              | 
|dicines           |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tyre              |10,000pc          |515.45            |411.22            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Synthetic rubber  |10,000t           |4.24              |3.37              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Film              |10,000m           |882               |1412              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|(Color film)      |10,000m           |882               |1412              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Plastics          |10,000t           |29.46             |24.67             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Notes: t - ton, pc - piece, m - meter                                      | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20464 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar016___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-016 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMICS </F>
<F P=101> SMALL-SCALE ENTERPRISES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Jilin Sets Goal for Private Economy in 1994 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0303L Changchun JILIN RIBAO in Chinese 28 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0303L </F>
<F P=104>  Changchun JILIN RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] In 1994, individual and private enterprises in 
Jilin Province will total 700,000, and employ 1 million people. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20465 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar016___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-016 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMICS </F>
<F P=101> FOREIGN TRADE, INVESTMENT </F>
<H3> <TI>   Trade Journal Views Overseas Enterprises </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0293A Beijing GUOJI SHANGBAO in Chinese 22 Jan 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0293A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUOJI SHANGBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wang Xiaochuan (3769 0879 1557): "Raising </F>
China's Overseas Enterprises Management Standards To Meet 
International Competition." The author is affiliated with 
MOFERT's Personnel Department] 
  [Text] China has approved the setting up of more than 4,000 
overseas enterprises since reform and opening up. Total Chinese 
investments have reached approximately $5 billion. These 
enterprises are scattered in more than 100 countries and 
regions, and they handle energy, industry, and services and 
other businesses. A decade of practice proved that their 
existence and development played a positive role in the 
development of China's national economy, mainly in spurring on 
China's export trade, and in particular, they played an 
irreplaceable role in circumventing the host countries' trade 
barriers. They also played a role in developing overseas 
resources to supplement our country's inadequate resources. Such 
overseas resources include financial and technological 
resources. But objectively speaking, from the point of the 
overseas enterprises' foreign investments and transnational 
operations, we have only taken the first steps, and compared to 
international standards, we still have a long way to go. In 
order to narrow the gap as soon as possible and upgrade our 
overseas enterprises, we must take into consideration the needs 
of the transnational operations and focus on our own 
inadequacies and make improvements and adjustments. This article 
addresses the existing problems and offers some countermeasures. 
<H5>  I. Inadequacies in China's Overseas Enterprises Today </H5>
  1. There is a lack of thorough knowledge of the global 
characteristics of the 1990's, and our entry strategy needs 
adjustments: 
  To understand this problem, we must first look at the 
characteristics of today's global transnational operations. 
Everybody knows that global transnational operations which have 
undergone nearly 50 years of development have completed their 
preliminary phase and are entering an intensive development 
phase characterized by the following: 
  A. Transnational operations are getting bigger. 
  According to statistics compiled by the United Nation's 
Transnational Companies Center, in 1993, transnational companies 
were operating more overseas enterprises, but more striking is 
that their total overseas investments have topped $2 trillion, 
increasing some 20-odd folds compared to the 1970s. This change 
has in turn changed the world's economic pattern: Today, 
one-third of the world export of goods and services are 
transacted between the parent companies and their subsidiaries. 
For example, in the United States, transnational companies' 
annual trade and overseas profits are worth around $100 billion. 
By conservative estimates, their internal transactions accounted 
for more than 60 percent of that country's total export of 
manufactured goods in 1992. They also created nearly 5 million 
jobs. 
  B. Expansion forces the transnational companies to go beyond 
regional boundaries to engage in fierce competition. 
  For geographic, national, and historical reasons, besides 
investing in each other in the traditional sense, transnational 
companies have reached some kind of tacit understanding in the 
underdeveloped nations and regions based on their regional 
strategies: For example, Asia is dominated by Japan; the United 
States basically has a monopoly in Latin America; central 
Europe, Eastern Europe, and parts of Africa naturally fall 
within the European Community's domain. But increasing evidence 
shows that due to differences and imbalance in economic strength 
and technological standards, and for various political reasons, 
their spheres of influence are constantly under siege. The 
transnational companies are becoming global companies. 
  C. Intense competition has prompted the transnational 
companies to change their management strategies. 
  To adapt to the needs of expansion and regional strategies, 
transnational companies have modified their traditional 
single-operation strategy to a multiple- or compound-operation 
strategy. Instead of a bunch of individual nation-based 
subsidiaries set up only to serve their respective countries, we 
now see many subsidiaries that are integrated organizations with 
organically linked functions that cover the entire spectrum, 
from production to sales, with development, research, and sales 
promotion tasks in between. Their main characteristic is to give 
full play to the existing scientific and technological measures, 
production capacity, and development capability, and the basis 
of their strategy is to focus on cost and profit. Integration at 
this point in time has profound implications. These enterprises 
may appear to be coordinating trade and fund circulation, but in 
fact they are coordinating commodities and labor and other 
productive activities. 
  What about our own situation? Our overseas enterprises have 
always believed that China has only just begun its transnational 
operations, and so long as we get out and fight our way through, 
so long as we find a place for ourselves, we should be happy and 
satisfied. Moreover, since China is still a developing nation, 
our transnational operations can only do business in a small way 
and cannot set high standards, and that belief has translated 
into management strategies and tactics that only allow us to 
make war in the peripheries. We have never seriously studied the 
characteristics of contemporary transnational operations and 
have never taken the initiative to adapt. 
  2. There is a very low degree of integration in management: 
  The above shortcoming is reflected in operations with a low 
degree of integration. Up to now, the absolute majority of 
China's overseas enterprises have only tackled jobs that were 
there and work they could handle. Their production management 
programs and plans and transnational strategies and tactics are 
instructions handed down to them. They cannot shape the 
companies' behaviors or management activities. Many overseas 
enterprises are practically "fly-by-night" outfits and 
"individual peasant households." Their actual operation, 
business scope, and product mix often have little or nothing to 
do with the core business of their parent companies back home. 
Clearly, this condition does not foster the organic integration 
of domestic and foreign key factors of production, and it also 
makes it difficult to achieve the goal of integrating the 
management goals of the parent companies and their overseas 
companies. Of course, we should understand that some enterprises 
may be profitable in the short-run, but in essence, they still 
do not comply with the objective needs and the intrinsic laws of 
internationalized commodities production, and therefore they 
cannot be considered transnational operations or overseas 
enterprises in the true sense. 
  3. The organizational structure is still like that of an 
elementary business cooperative: 
  Except for the oil refineries in the United States and 
aluminum plants in Australia and some other large projects, 
China's overseas enterprises generally operate in small scale; 
the degree of concentration is fairly low. The average 
investment per enterprise is less than $13 million, compared to 
an average of $45 million for the developing nations and $60 
million for the developed countries. Obviously there is a wide 
gap. Ultimately, transnational operation is a contest of 
financial and comprehensive strength. Without a certain 
enterprise scale and financial basis, we are doomed to be weak 
from the start. Moreover, since the markets have already been 
captured by others, it makes it even harder for China's 
enterprises to get in. To complete the picture, these 
enterprises are operating with people of ordinary qualifications 
and a simple labor-mix and management mechanisms. People compare 
them to "mom and pop stores." It may not be exact, but it draws 
a vivid picture. 
  Under this system, there are some problems, such as 
loopholes 
in bookkeeping and lax management, which these enterprises 
cannot avoid or resolve by themselves. 
<H3>  II. Countermeasures: Several Suggestions on Raising Overseas 
Enterprises' Management Standards </H3>
  As mentioned above, Chinese enterprises' overseas 
investments 
were given impetus by the state in conjunction with its 
all-encompassing policy of opening up to the outside world to 
encourage the full utilization of international resources and 
international markets. The entire process had the distinct 
characteristic of being artificially stimulated, which was 
consistent with China's overall policy in the last decade or so 
to vigorously open up to the outside world. It is no small 
accomplishment for Chinese enterprises' transnational 
operations, which had to start out from scratch, to develop to 
today's scope in such a short time, but faced with the intense 
competition from other nations' transnational operations, we 
must focus on the above problems and quickly come up with some 
countermeasures to raise our management standards. In the 
near-term, I think Chinese enterprises' transnational operations 
should work hard in the following areas: 
  1. We need a proper understanding of the characteristics of 
the times and put our management ideas on a high point. 
  Earlier we have briefly talked about the characteristics of 
today's global transnational operations. Through that 
discussion, we have come to understand that a characteristic of 
the times is that transnational companies are the product of a 
combination of political and economic factors. So long as these 
factors do not change dramatically, this characteristic not only 
sums up the transnational operations at this early stage but can 
also be interpreted as a basic requirement and the norm of 
transnational operations for some time to come. This fact may be 
more important in the practical sense and more valuable from the 
economics point of view. Thus, in order to achieve our goals 
through the global transnational operations, understanding and 
grasping this characteristic, and even making it the basis of 
our operations, are especially important. It may be regarded as 
the premise and the basis of improving and raising the 
management standards of China's overseas enterprises. This is an 
issue of concept and is also an issue of management strategy. 
  2. We should promote the concentration and optimization of 
the existing overseas enterprises. 
  After we have resolved the issue of strategy, as a second 
step, we should begin to increase the concentration and optimize 
the existing overseas enterprises which are too small and too 
scattered. 
  The core enterprises should make a thorough analysis of how 
the transnational companies stake out their territories and how 
regional economic integration is shaping up, and on that basis, 
they should conduct a solid assessment of their existing 
overseas enterprises and formulate a brand new program which 
takes into account their own strength, the market forecasts, and 
the territories they intend to get into. They should strive to 
acquire the capability to directly confront the large 
transnational companies in specific territories and regions and 
compete in global transnational operations. 
  Whether we can formally take part in the global competition 
and whether we can acquire the capability to engage in direct 
confrontation will be critical to Chinese enterprises' 
transnational operations. To explain the importance more 
clearly, I will cite a thought-provoking example: 
  The sale of equity rights to a New Zealand steel mill in 
1989 
caught industry-wide attention. Chinese enterprises put in a 
great effort, but because our enterprises had always engaged in 
small business and for other reasons, the deal which had been 
very promising eventually fell through because the New Zealand 
side had no confidence in our overseas enterprises. Imagine, if 
it had been successful, the status of our overseas enterprises 
in the world iron and steel industry and business circles would 
have been greatly enhanced, and we would have gradually gained 
strength too. Thus, modern industrial management mandates large 
scale; without size, there can be no efficiency. 
  How can we increase enterprise concentration? Based on the 
successful experiences of global transnational operations and on 
what China's enterprises can handle, there are the following 
ways: One, within the confines of the same region, merge the 
small companies into one or two relatively large companies. Two, 
apply the shareholding system to link companies that are under 
the jurisdictions of different organs. Three, domestic financial 
organs should act as guarantors in international financing and 
capital expansion. Four, set up joint ventures with the host 
countries' enterprises or with enterprises of a third nation to 
increase size. As can be imagined, concentration is not 
something China's overseas enterprise operations can achieve in 
one leap. 
  3. We should implement international practices and general 
methods to improve the management of overseas enterprises. 
  Transnational management formats and practices that are 
widely accepted today have been developed by many countries and 
entrepreneurs based on the laws of international economy in 
combination with many years of practice and continuous summation 
of past management experiences. To those of us who developed 
transnational operations late, these practices and methods are a 
priceless treasure. They are important because they can 
eliminate detours and failures and are an organic integration of 
management theories and practices. We need not come up with our 
own proofs or experiments. They have minimized our opportunity 
cost, and we late-comers can apply or utilize these methods 
directly under appropriate conditions. Based on our own 
situation, we should consider adopting the following methods: 
  A. The heart of transnational management and administration 
is integration. 
  Theoretically speaking, integrated management is 
self-evident 
for all kinds of enterprises. Even if there are different 
formats and mechanisms of division of power, all enterprises 
must still be essentially integrated. Ordinarily, this would 
apply to enterprises in transnational operations as well. But in 
order to combine domestic and foreign key factors of production, 
these enterprises have developed a management format whose basic 
characteristic is to invest and operate overseas. This mandates 
the separation of overseas and domestic operating entities and 
that the entities be relatively independent. No doubt such 
separation makes the operations of the parent companies at home 
and the overseas enterprises abroad more convenient and 
serviceable. But there is no denying that such a relationship 
also hides the potential for variances in management. In 
particular, enticed by easy and immediate profit, enterprises 
are prone to develop strategies and goals that are contrary to 
the core companies.' If the core companies fail to discover them 
or succumb to this kind of profit, the overseas enterprises may 
eventually become "resident-alien enterprises" and be completely 
independent from their parent companies. 
  Looking at the transnational operations of enterprises of 
all 
nations, they all have strategic considerations, and what they 
focus on is to help the core enterprises utilize foreign 
resources and further expand their territories and spheres of 
influence. But China's transnational operations are launched not 
only for the above reason but also because economic 
constructions at home need money too. We can imagine the huge 
strategic importance. Under the circumstances, whether from the 
economics point of view or for geographic reasons, we should not 
allow our overseas enterprises to act alone and become 
independent. Instead, we should modify them and turn them into 
transnational management groups with the domestic core 
enterprises at their hub. The operations of all overseas 
enterprises should be put into the production and management 
chain of the core enterprises and turn them into an organic part 
of the group, such as the spare part and component producing 
department, the assembly department, and the group's sales 
department and so on, and each should also have its appropriate 
structural functions. 
  B. The road to transnational operation is localization. 
  Overseas enterprises operate in the host countries and are 
in 
an environment often more complicated than that at home. Many 
economic laws and human factors play a role, and in order to 
fulfill their responsibilities and run their transnational 
operation successfully, these enterprises must first acknowledge 
that they belong to their host countries in form and are legal 
entities operating in the socio-economic and legal environments 
of the countries where they are located. In other words, they 
must make localization the starting point and the only avenue. 
  The meaning of localization is two-pronged. First, it means 
hiring local workers; second, it means adopting local enterprise 
management practices. 
  The hiring of local works involves not just ordinary staff 
but also middle management and a few upper management personnel, 
and it also involves some special employees, such as lawyers, 
certified accountants, auditors and other professionals. We must 
interpret the use and development of foreign resources in the 
broad sense to include the use of human resources. There are 
many advantages to this, and at the least, we gain some training 
time. 
  Adopting local management methods involves many areas. I 
think the most important is that we should directly adopt local 
or internationally accepted financial management systems, 
accounting methods, *and auditing procedure, and so far as 
systems are concerned, we can have partnerships, a shareholding 
system, boards of directors, and boards of supervisors and so 
on. Our existing overseas enterprises have adopted these 
sporadically with fairly good results, and of course those that 
have adopted them systematically have even better results. Thus 
we must be determined to adopt this set of internationally 
accepted methods to replace some of the unruly practices and 
behaviors of some overseas enterprises. 
  Only when we begin to localize the operations can we 
formally 
get on the host countries' economic tracks. This is important 
not only because we are accepting the host countries' 
supervision and management in form, but the real essence is that 
this is the way to legally get the host countries' permissions 
to utilize their resources and reap the profit. This is the 
premise and the basis of transnational operations, and it is 
also the lifeline to improving transnational management. 
  People often believe, in a superficial and simplistic way, 
that accepting the host countries' regulations and management 
practices will make things more complicated for ourselves and 
jeopardize our integrated management. But if we analyze this 
carefully, we will arrive at the opposite conclusion. For many 
years, our transnational management has been in a dilemma: We 
want to develop overseas enterprises but we also worry about 
losing control. We have tried to modify our existing management 
mechanisms as a way of adapting, but despite repeated efforts, 
we have not found a better way. If we modify our thinking and 
utilize the host countries' existing management mechanisms, we 
not only will satisfy their demands but can also utilize their 
management resources to remedy our own management deficiencies. 
That is good economics. 
  Raising the overseas enterprises' management standards is a 
micro issue as well as a macro issue. Enterprises engaging in 
transnational operations naturally should study the matter 
carefully, but the state too must provide the necessary external 
conditions, such as designing proper government functions, 
creating a legal environment, and formulating a long-term 
economic plan. 
  In short, this is a fairly large issue with broad 
ramifications. We are only making some suggestions here. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20466 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar016___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-016 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> MILITARY, PUBLIC SECURITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Major Automobile Smuggling Case Solved in Guangxi </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0142A Chongqing XINAN JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 10 Dec 93 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0142A </F>
<F P=104>  Chongqing XINAN JINGJI RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Hong Mei (4767 2734) titled: "Major </F>
Automobile Smuggling Case in Guangxi Solved"] 
  [Text] A major car smuggling case in Guangxi Province 
involving some 798 vehicles and smuggled case totalling in 
excess of 150 million yuan was recently solved. 
  Early in 1993, under an illegal plan hatched by a certain 
Hong Kong businessman surnamed Ning, the general manager of the 
Qinzhou City Goods and Materials Company, Pei Yuchun [5952 5940 
2504], the manager of the first corporate trade department 
subordinate to the Qinzhou branch of the People's Bank of China, 
Chen Zuheng [7115 4371 0077], the manager of the Beihai City 
Industrial Supply and Marketing Corporation, Luo Peng [5012 
7720], and the manager of the Liuzhou City Foreign Economic 
Trade Corporation's Chemical Branch Corporation, Zeng Biao [2582 
1753], in order to provide individuals and their own units with 
exorbitant profits, and using relevant stipulations under which 
China allows commodity trade to be carried out with a number of 
countries, adopted a falsely signed commodity contract, and 
bogus reporting of a production site as a method to avoid 
customs inspections, and without restraint engaged in automobile 
smuggling criminal activity. Without authorization, they used 
the name of the Liuzhou Foreign Economic and Trade Corporation, 
and plotted to sign false barter contracts for 1389.98 tons of 
zinc ingots and 294 tons of zinc oxide, respectively, in 
exchange for importing 686 and 112 "Modern" brand small 
automobiles. They falsely reported the vehicles' original place 
of production, keeping clear of the state import export 
licensing administration, and obtained a customs signed and 
issued "import export commodity tax free certificate." This 
resulted in the clinching of a deal for 798 smuggled automobiles 
which passed the border with no trouble. In order to defray the 
costs of the transaction, the Qinzhou Commodities Corporation 
Head Office and the Beihai Industrial Supply and Marketing 
Corporation actively raised money, and entrusted Chen Zuheng 
before the case was discovered to collect in succession eight 
sums of money totalling more than $11.2 million and deliver them 
to Ning's Yisheng Corporation in Hong Kong. 
  After the case was discovered, they also mutually colluded, 
and continued to falsely create automobile original 
manufacturing site documentary materials, and provide false 
information on nature of their trading, to conceal their 
smuggling. 
  The "798" smuggled automobiles case caused the country 
tremendous economic loss. In November of 1993, the Guangxi 
District Discipline Committee and the Supervisory Office 
conducted a rigorous investigation of the entire case. The four 
people involved, including Pei Yuchun et al., have been expelled 
from the party and administrative disciplinary measures have 
been taken against them. Because of their violations of the law, 
the case has been handed over to judicial organs for 
investigation. Others bearing major responsibility have also 
been punished through expulsion from their posts in the party, 
placement on probation within the party, and some have been 
relieved of their administrative positions. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20467 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar016___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-016 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> MILITARY, PUBLIC SECURITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tibet Cracks Down on Smuggling </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0142B Lhasa XIZANG RIBAO in Chinese 14 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0142B </F>
<F P=104>  Lhasa XIZANG RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article titled: "Lhasa Area Cracks Down on </F>
Smuggling"] 
  [Text] Since August of last year, in various 
areas throughout the entire country, various departments, in 
accordance with the plans of the Party Central and State 
Council, have taken joint action, together grasped joint 
management, in focusing on launching anti-smuggling joint action 
and special projects for combatting smuggling. Last year, 
between August and October, various coastal provinces, cities, 
and autonomous regions ferreted out 2984 smuggling cases, 
amounting to more than 900 yuan in value. Up to this point, sea 
and land-based pernicious smuggling activity had already been 
controlled to some degree, and China's open environment to the 
West and internal economic order were gradually being purified 
and strengthened. 
  In a manner similar to the gratifying situation occurring 
all 
over the country with attacks on smuggling activity, Tibet's 
work in attacking smuggling has also achieved a phased success: 
First, a leading organ for attacking smuggling on a regional 
basis has been established, and in conducting special purpose 
attacks on smuggling, full play is being given to the core 
effect; second, a case involving a group using border passes to 
smuggle reactionary and obscene propaganda material, gold, 
cultural relics, rare wild animal skins, fur, and bones has been 
cracked, and the activity of a criminal group smuggling 
internally and outside the border has been controlled; third, 
market management has been strengthened, and groups smuggling 
goods such as automobiles have been investigated and controlled; 
fourth, inspections have been launched concerning enforcement of 
the law, and the establishment of anti-contraband teams has been 
strengthened; fifth, anti-smuggling education has been launched, 
and combined with Tibet's practical dissemination of "Customs 
Laws." 
  However, we must note that anti-smuggling in Tibet is still 
a 
long-term and arduous task. In particular, because a portion of 
enterprise units participate in smuggling activity, there exists 
in the society a mistaken sense that smuggling will lead to 
riches, and the implementation details for Tibet carrying out 
national anti-smuggling legal statutes have not been fully 
perfected. Because the work awaits gradual strengthening, 
Tibet's struggle with anti-smuggling work also faces a very 
arduous task. 
  We should note that attacking smuggling in reality is a 
serious political struggle between vast numbers of cadres and 
the broad masses, and an extremely small number of smugglers. 
The corrosive effect of rampant smuggling on staff and worker 
teams, the effect of the credit situation, and attacks on the 
normal management mechanisms are all substantial. In Tibet, the 
state has provided preferential policies for foreign trade, and 
any smuggling activity in fact infringes on the interests of the 
autonomous region; any illegal profit seeking activity, 
objectively speaking, is a forceful blow against normal 
lawabiding management and against our establishment of a 
socialist market economy. Attacking smuggling is not only a 
requirement for us to put in order and rectify the social and 
economic environment, and safeguard national interests, but is 
also a requirement for our safeguarding of the basic interests 
of the broad masses and striving for Tibet's long-term sustained 
development. 
  Properly handling the anti-smuggling struggle requires 
reliance on responsibility being taken by party and government 
leadership at all levels, and at the same time requires the 
mobilization of the masses, and reliance on the masses, to 
jointly construct a steel great wall in the anti-smuggling 
struggle. Only in this manner will it be possible to create a 
healthy and stable environment for Tibet's reform and opening 
and economic development. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20468 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar016___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-016 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL </F>
<F P=101> NORTHWEST REGION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Role of Anti-Japanese Volunteers in Xinjiang </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0124A Urumqi XIYU YANJIU [THE WESTERN REGIONS STUDIES] 
in Chinese No 4, 15 Dec 93 pp 21-28 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0124A </F>
<F P=104>  Urumqi XIYU YANJIU [THE WESTERN REGIONS STUDIES] 
in Chinese No 4, 15 Dec 93 pp 21-28 </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105>Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yu Rongchun (0060 3310 2504) of Xinjiang Academy </F>
of Social Sciences, and responsible editor Qi Qingshun (7871 
3237 7311): "Political Role Played by Anti-Japanese Volunteer 
Army in Xinjiang"] 
  [Text] This year marked the 60th anniversary of the entry 
of the anti-Japanese northeast volunteer army (hereafter 
abbreviated as the northeast volunteer army or volunteer army) 
into Xinjiang. To commemorate the event, this article examines 
some of the issues relating to the northeast volunteer army in 
Xinjiang. 
  1. Entry Of Northeast Volunteer Army Into Xinjiang: How It 
Happened 
  After the 18 September incident, the Nanjing government 
adopted a "zero resistance" policy and ordered Chinese troops in 
the northeast to retreat to behind Shanhaiguan. It was not long 
before our beloved motherland between Bai Shan and Heilongjiang 
fell into the hands of Japanese imperialism. Disregarding Chiang 
Kai-shek's [Jiang Jieshi] strict order and unafraid of 
sacrifice, the masses in the northeast and some patriotic 
officers and men in the northeast volunteer army were determined 
to resist the aggression of Japanese bandits. At one point 
volunteer forces across the land numbered in the hundreds of 
thousands, even as many as one million, hitting the Japanese 
imperialists hard. However, the anti-Japanese units each fought 
on their own and received no tangible aid from the Nanjing 
government. By the winter of 1992, therefore, some had been 
annihilated by the enemy. Others, reeling from heavy losses and 
short on arms and food, found themselves in dire straits. 
Subsequently, a small number of volunteers joined the allied 
forces fighting Japan under the leadership of the CPC and firmly 
continued the war of resistance in the northeast under the most 
difficult conditions. Some volunteers overcame the enemy's 
successive lines of blockade and made their way to the Great 
Wall where they continued to defy the Japanese. Volunteer forces 
under Su Bingwen [5685 3521 2429] (a former Hulun Buir garrison 
commander and a former Hai-man railway protection commander who 
subsequently became commander-in-chief of the northeast people's 
save-the-nation army) and Ma Zhanshan [7456 0594 1472] (formerly 
Heilongjiang garrison commander, later acting chairman of 
Heilongjiang Province and concurrently deputy commander of 
northeast frontier forces stationed in Heilongjiang), which were 
the backbone of the volunteer army, ran out of ammunition and 
food supplies and retreated into Soviet territory on 4 December 
1932. (Footnote 1: There have always been conflicting claims 
that Su Bingwen and others retreated into the Soviet Union on 3, 
4, 5, or 7 December 1932. A telegram sent by Zheng Runcheng 
[6774 3387 1004] and Su Guo [5685 0948] to Chairman Lin Sen 
[2651 2773], Commander-in-Chief Chiang Kai-shek, and Deputy 
Commander-in-Chief Zhang Xueliang [1728 1331 5328] of the 
Nanjing government on 9 April 1933 read, "Having finally run out 
of ammunition and with no aid in sight, we retreated into Soviet 
territory in the evening on 4 December in Year 21, enduring 
humiliation in order to survive." We can conclude that "4" was 
the right date. The telegram is now stored in the archives of 
the autonomous region.) The units under Li Du [2621 2629] 
(formerly Yilan garrison commander and subsequently Jilin 
self-defense army commander in chief) retreated into Soviet 
territory near Hulin in January 1933. 
  After retreating into Soviet territory, the northeast 
volunteer army immediately turned over its weapons and equipment 
to the Soviet authorities in accordance with international 
practice. Following negotiations between the Nanjing government 
and the Soviet Union, the latter agreed to let the northeast 
volunteer army cross Siberia and enter Chinese territory at the 
Tacheng border checkpoint. It would then be handed over to the 
Xinjiang government. 
  After working out this deal with the Soviet authorities, the 
Nanjing government immediately sent a telegram to the Xinjiang 
provincial government ordering it to prepare to take over the 
volunteer forces. Jin Shuren [6855 2885 0088], then chairman of 
Xinjiang provincial government and superintendent of border 
defense, appointed Lu Xiaozu [7627 2400 4371], a former 
secretary general of the provincial government, as Tacheng 
administrative director and named two attaches, Sun Guohua [1327 
0948 5478] (an assistant director at the meteorological 
observatory) and Han Xun [7281 8113], a former county chief. On 
3 January 1933 they were despatched to Tacheng to take charge of 
the hand-over of the northeast volunteer army. The Nanjing 
government also ordered Guang Lu [1639 4389], its consul in 
Zaisang in the Soviet Union, to take part in this operation by 
facilitating contacts with the Soviet authorities. Concerned 
that the northeast volunteer army would be hard to control, Jin 
Shuren only took over the rank-and-file officers and men while 
keeping senior officers out of Xinjiang. As a result, 
high-ranking officers like Su Bingwen, Ma Zhanshan, and Wu Delin 
[0702 1795 2651] (commander of the 2d Infantry Regiment under Su 
Bingwen) had no choice but to leave their forces and return to 
China by boat via Europe. Instead, Zheng Runcheng, commander of 
the 9th Brigade of the 2d Infantry Regiment, became acting 
regimental commander and led the forces into Xinjiang along with 
Su Guo, chief of staff of the 2d Infantry Regiment. 
  On 14 February 1933, the northeast volunteer army left its 
camp at Tuomusike [phonetic] and boarded a train on the 
Trans-Siberian Railway. It got off at the Ayagusi [phonetic] 
station and headed for Tacheng on foot. In the evening on 25 
February, the first batch of northeast volunteers entered 
Tacheng under the command of Zhao Zhuxun [6392 2885 8113] to the 
warm welcome of the local people of all nationalities. 
  They were followed by a steady stream of other volunteers 
entering Xinjiang through the Tacheng checkpoint. They stayed at 
Tacheng briefly for rest and reorganization before moving in 
groups onto Urumqi and other sites where troops were stationed. 
The first batch led by Zheng Runcheng arrived in Urumqi on 27 
March. (Footnote 2: According to the telegram sent by Lu Xiaozu, 
Tacheng administrative director, to Jin Shuren on 26 February 
1933, "The first batch of 500 men arrived at Tacheng in the 
evening on 25th." Most of the more recent accounts suggest that 
the first batch of northeast volunteers entered Xinjiang in the 
latter half of March 1933, a discrepancy probably caused by 
confusing the time they arrived in Urumqi with the time they 
entered Xinjiang.) Reception points had been set up along the 
way between Tacheng and Urumqi to provide lodging and food for 
the volunteers. Some locals even prepared sumptuous meals for 
the soldiers on their own initiative. People of all 
nationalities welcomed the volunteers most warmly. Many shops 
put up posters offering special treatments for them. Both 
officers and men were deeply moved. 
  How many northeast volunteers entered Xinjiang from the 
Soviet Union? Widely divergent figures were given by a host of 
historical accounts. Most put the number at more than 30,000, a 
report submitted on 17 August 1945 to Wu Zhongxin [0702 1813 
0207], then chairman of the provincial government, by the social 
department of Xinjiang Province said, "Anti-Japanese northeast 
volunteer forces retreated into Xinjiang on order from the 
central government in Years 22 and 23 of the Republic. A count 
conducted at the time yielded more than 20,000 people, including 
officers, men, and their families." On 4 December 1945, a 
telegram from the finance department of Xinjiang provincial 
government to the Executive Yuan of the KMT regime read, 
"Anti-Japanese northeast forces entered Xinjiang between Year 22 
and Year 23 of the Republic after taking a roundabout route on 
order from the central government. At the time we counted over 
20,000 officers, men, and their families." While these two 
documents were less than detailed, they were reliable since they 
were based on some kind of "count." Documents currently in the 
archives of the autonomous region give the sizes of the five 
batches of northeast volunteers in the regiment under Zheng 
Runcheng's command who entered Xinjiang as follows: 500, 476, 
532, 449, and 457, for a total of 2,414. These numbers should be 
quite accurate. Unfortunately, we have no way of determining how 
many people were in the other units of the northeast army which 
also entered Xinjiang. But one thing is sure, namely that 
suggestions that 30,000 and 40,000 northeast volunteers entered 
Xinjiang are less than reliable. 
  As the anti-Japanese northeast volunteer army headed for 
Xinjiang by way of the Soviet Union, their plan was to return to 
the front to fight the Japanese. But the Nanjing government then 
sent a telegram to the Xinjiang provincial government ordering 
it to "settle the northeast volunteers where they are." Because 
the telegram was not made public for a long time, the volunteers 
at the time and even a number of researchers after the 
revolution thought that Sheng Shicai [4141 0013 2088] did not 
allow them to enter Shanhaiguan, a perception that was not in 
line with historical facts. 
  The route mapped out by the Nanjing government for the 
re-entry into China of the volunteer army indicated that the 
Nanjing government never wanted the volunteers to return to the 
front of the war of resistance against Japan. For the northeast 
volunteers who had retreated to the Soviet Union, the shortest 
and most convenient way to return to the interior would be to go 
by ship from Vladivostok, which was how the one thousand plus 
injured volunteers and their families who had retreated into the 
Soviet Union with Su Bingwen found their way back to China. To 
cross Siberia and come home by boat via Europe covered a vast 
distance and was time-consuming, but at least the land and 
shipping routes were clear. In comparison, the most inconvenient 
route was to re-enter China through Xinjiang. Tacheng and Gansu 
are separated by the Gobi Desert stretching thousands of li. 
Crossing the sparsely populated desert on foot posed enormous 
difficulties. The Nanjing government picked this route precisely 
because it wanted the volunteers to settle down in Xinjiang so 
that they would not "make any more trouble." 
  In July 1933 the Nanjing government despatched Wang Ziyao 
[3769 1311 5069], aide-de-camp to Li Du, formerly 
commander-in-chief of the Jilin self-defense army, to Urumqi by 
air and issued an order under which all northeast volunteers, 
officers and men, who had entered Xinjiang would be reorganized 
as Xinjiang units. With that the hopes of the northeast 
volunteers that they would return to the anti-Japanese front 
were completely dashed. 
  2. Major Activities of Northeast Volunteers in Xinjiang 
  While they were in Xinjiang, the northeast volunteers took 
part in many local political and military activities, notably 
the following: 
  a. Participated in fighting to defend Urumqi. 
  The entry of the northeast volunteer army into Xinjiang 
coincided with the siege of Urumqi by the forces of Ma Shiming 
[7456 0013 2494], who was under the command of Ma Zhongying 
[7456 0112 5391], a Gansu warlord. The provincial forces under 
Jin Shuren received "absolutely no training in peacetime and are 
utterly useless in battle. Martial discipline have broken down 
and bad habits are deeply entrenched. The troops are an uneven 
mix, some old, some strong. They are dressed in rags, so the 
people of Xinjiang call them a `beggar army.'" These forces were 
simply incapable of putting up any resistance to the advancing 
Ma Zhongying forces. The fall of Urumqi appeared imminent. After 
the northeast volunteers entered Tacheng, Jin Shuren pasted 
notices all over town announcing that the Nanjing government had 
"sent 15,000 crack troops to Xinjiang by way of Russia equipped 
with big runs, tanks, and airplanes" in order to calm the 
people. At the same time, he sent an emergency telegram to Lu 
Xiaozu ordering the northeast army to rush to the province to 
save the day. The northeast volunteers arrived in Urumqi, 
reluctant to participate in the civil war. So the various 
leaders sent a letter to Ma Shiming tactfully asking him to 
agree to stop fighting. (Footnote 3: A History of the 
Development of the Western Regions by China, by Ceng Wenwu 
[258 0795 0710], p 604) Figuring that Urumqi was about to fall 
any minute, the Ma Shiming forces ignored the diplomatic 
gesture, giving the volunteer army no choice but to join the 
battle in defense of the city. The northeast volunteers in Zheng 
Runcheng's brigade were well-trained regular troops. In no time 
they defeated the Ma Shiming forces and forced them to raise the 
siege. 
  b. Participated in Xinjiang's 12 April coup d'etat. 
  On 12 April 1933, Chen Zhong [7115 0022], Tao Mingyue [7118 
2494 2887], and Li Xiaotian [2621 4562 1131], known as the 
"three young Turks" of Xinjiang, staged a coup d'etat, largely 
relying upon the "converted army" headed by Bapinggute [1572 
1627 0657 3676] and the northeast volunteer army under the 
command of Zheng Runcheng. 
  In the early afternoon on 12 April, the "converted army" 
launched a surprise attack on the provincial government of 
Xinjiang. Jin Shuren fled. In the evening on the same day the 
provincial army unleashed an all-out counteroffensive. 
Outnumbered, the "converted army" was ready to evacuate Urumqi 
with the soldiers' families. At this critical juncture the 
northeast volunteers joined the fighting and instantly turned 
the military tide. Seeing that the situation was beyond salvage, 
Jin Shuren fled to Changji on 14 April and published an open 
telegram in Tacheng on 24 April announcing his decision to give 
up power. 
  At a meeting of the provisional maintenance committee in the 
evening on the day of the coup, Liu Wenlong [0491 2429 7893], 
director of the department of education, was elected chairman of 
the provisional provincial government. A decision was made to 
abolish the supervised office system and set up a provisional 
military committee headed by Zheng Runcheng, one of the generals 
of the northeast volunteer army. Zheng Runcheng was still with 
the volunteer army outside the city and did not attend the 
meeting. When informed of this decision by someone despatched by 
the organizers of the meeting, Zheng Runcheng said that the 
northeast army was only passing through Xinjiang on its way to 
fight the Japanese and had no interest in involving itself in 
Xinjiang politics. Only after repeatedly turning down the 
position did he agree to be the chairman temporarily. When the 
provisional maintenance committee next met on 14 April, however, 
Bapinggute, leader of the converted army, proposed that the 
governor system be retained and that Sheng Shicai be the new 
governor. Zheng Runcheng, the only person in a position to 
oppose the proposal, felt that it was beyond his power to sort 
out the mess in Xinjiang, on the one hand, and still harbored 
some unrealistic dreams about Sheng Shicai, a fellow provincial 
(Sheng Shicai was from Liaoning), on the other. The lack of 
strong opposition from Zheng Runcheng enabled Sheng Shicai to 
successfully ascend the throne of governor. 
  c. Helped Sheng Shicai destroy miscellaneous political 
enemies. 
  In the summer of 1933, Ma Zhongying again marched into 
Xinjiang from Gansu with his troops. After capturing Hami and 
three other towns (Mulei, Jitai, and Fuyuan), he was practically 
knocking on the door of Fukang, barely 60 kilometers from the 
provincial capital of Urumqi. Sheng Shicai put himself at the 
head of the northeast volunteers and the converted army under 
the command of Zheng Runcheng and Bapinggute, respectively, and 
arrived at Fukang to meet the approaching enemy head on. In 
mid-June, fierce fighting broke out between the two armies at 
Zineiquan 40 kilometers to the east of Fukang. At the beginning 
the Ma Zhongying forces had the edge and Sheng Shicai was almost 
taken prisoner. Fortunately, valiant fighting by the northeast 
volunteers and the converted army turned the situation around. 
In July the same year, with Ma Zhongying closing in on Urumqi 
from the south, the northeast volunteers led by divisional 
commander Liu Wankui [0491 8001 7608] again took on the enemy. 
Liu Wankui was seriously wounded in the battle of Shuixigou and 
died. The office of the governor of Xinjiang organized a solemn 
memorial service for Liu Wankui and promoted him to lieutenant 
general in the army posthumously . 
  To attack Urumqi jointly with Ma Zhongying, Zhang Peiyuan 
[1728 1014 0337], who headed the unit in Ili responsible for 
putting soldiers to work to develop wasteland and concurrently 
commander of the 8th Division of Xinjiang, sent Yang Zhengzhong 
[2799 2973 0022], a regimental commander, to advance to the east 
in the winter of 1933. He promptly captured Jinghe and Wusu and 
was closing in on Suilai (now Manasi). Liu Bin [0491 2430], 
chairman of the joint chiefs of staff at the governor's office 
and a general in the northeast volunteer army, led troops to 
take on the enemy. He wiped out Yang Zhengzhong at one fell 
swoop at Sandahezi, thus ending the vulnerability of the 
province to enemy attack from both front and rear. 
  With the siege of Urumqi broken, the northeast army along 
with the converted army and other troops from the province again 
headed south in March 1934 in pursuit of Ma Zhongying. Meanwhile 
Liu Bin crossed Tianshan from Ili and directly made for the key 
town of Akesu in southern Xinjiang. After capturing Akesu in 
late March 1934, Liu Bin linked up with the main forces and 
continued their southerly push. By then Ma Zhongying's forces 
were in utter disarray and he fled to the Soviet Union on 14 
July. Deputy divisional commander Ma Hushan [7456 5706 1472], 
who was married to Ma Zhongying's older sister, took over the 
remnants of his forces and retreated to Hetian where he pledged 
allegiance to the provincial government. Only then was Sheng 
Shicai able to consolidate his rule over the whole province. 
  3. Sheng Shicai Broke Up, Massacred Northeast Volunteers in 
Xinjiang 
  In the summer of 1934, his military campaign against Ma 
Zhongying largely over, Sheng Shicai set up the "Xinjiang army 
reorganization committee" as part of the governor's office. 
Under the guidance of Soviet advisers, the committee proceeded 
to reorganize all the armed forces in the province. As a result 
of this exercise, the northeast volunteer army was disbanded as 
a separate unit, its officers and men being incorporated into 
newly organized military units and stationed all over the 
province under the watchful eye of Sheng Shicai himself. The 
training unit stationed in Urumqi consisted mostly of northeast 
volunteers who had entered Xinjiang but was headed by Wang 
Hongzao [3076 7703 5679], an in-law of Sheng Shicai's. Northeast 
volunteers also made up a majority of the officers and men in 
the unit in Ili responsible for wasteland development and at Ili 
garrison headquarters as well. Yet the officer in charge of the 
wasteland development unit and commander of the Ili garrison 
headquarters was Qiu Zongjun [6726 1350 3182], Sheng Shicai's 
father-in-law. A number of senior and middle-ranking officers in 
the northeast volunteer army who had received formal military 
education were stripped of military power and sent to military 
schools as instructors. 
  After regaining control over Xinjiang in 1944, the KMT 
carried out yet another round of reorganization in the northeast 
volunteer army in Xinjiang, redistributing them among the 2d 
Cavalry Division, the 12th Cavalry Division, the 1st Division, 
and the 128th Division. Divisional commanders and some 
regimental commanders were appointed separately by KMT military 
authorities. Most former members of the northeast volunteer 
army, both officers and men, found themselves excluded. 
  After the victory of the war of resistance against Japan, 
the 
KMT regime sent 1,500 volunteer officers and men and their 
families back to their native villages. Because of 
transportation breakdowns and poor organization, some personnel 
ended up wandering about destitute in places like Lanzhou and 
Xian, while others returned to a northeast plagued by fighting, 
could not find any means of livelihood there, and were forced to 
return to Xinjiang. 
  Although the northeast volunteer army did much to bring 
about 
and consolidate the regime of Sheng Shicai after it entered 
Xinjiang, many of its officers and men were massacred brutally 
by him. There are varying accounts of many of the issues 
involved. Here we will look at some of them. 
  In the past, a number of people have written that the 
northeast volunteer army "fled on the eve" of a battle with Ma 
Zhongying at Dabancheng and secretly corresponded with the 
enemy. This, it was said, left Sheng Shicai no choice but to 
have some northeast volunteers arrested and killed. But was this 
really what happened? 
  According to trial records at the time, Sheng Shicai had 
Zheng Runcheng, Su Guo, Yang Yaojun [2799 5069 6874], Ying 
Zhanbin [2019 0594 2430], Xu Guoguang [1776 0948 0342], and Li 
Zhi [2621 1807] arrested in the evening on 20 November 1933. The 
next day Yan Lian [7346 1670] (formerly commander of the 20th 
Regiment of the Jilin save-the-nation army and leader of the 
corps of bodyguards of the provincial government at the time) 
was arrested, so were Gao Lingyun [7559 0407 0061], chief of 
staff of the 4th Brigade of the Jilin save-the-nation army, and 
Wang Xiaozhi [3769 1321 0037], a former commander of the 673d 
Regiment of the 26th Division of the Jilin self-defense army 
and, after coming to Xinjiang, chief of staff of the Ili unit in 
charge of putting soldiers to work to open up wasteland, on 9 
May 1934. The charges cooked up by Sheng Shicai against them 
were: Plotting to overthrow the existing regime and murder the 
governor. According to Sheng Shicai, this was the elaborate plot 
they had hatched: Externally, Ma Zhongying and Zhang Peiyuan 
were to attack Urumqi simultaneously from two sides and, 
internally, the northeast army and the converted army were to 
join forces and stage an uprising, with the bodyguards of the 
governor's mansion led by Yan Lian trying to assassinate Sheng 
Shicai. Liu Wenlong [0491 2429 7893] was allegedly the 
mastermind of this plot, yet Sheng Shicai did not have him 
arrested, merely putting him under house arrest. (Footnote 4: 
See archives of the autonomous region, under Police Chapter 
1-2-103) 
  Let us now go back to the defeat at Dabancheng and try to 
set 
the record straight and pinpoint responsibility. After their 
arrest, leaders of the northeast volunteer army, including Zheng 
Runcheng, were "unanimous in their emphasis on Sheng Shicai's 
errors as a commander, noting that he issued the wrong orders. 
Not for a second did they admit that they deserted or were 
engaged in conspiratorial activities." (Footnote 5: "Seven 
Decades of Turmoil in Xinjiang," by Zhang Dajun [1728 1129 
6511], p 3349) Their assertions were consistent with what Jin 
Guozhen [6855 0948 3791] remembered. Jin Guozhen, who took part 
in the fighting as deputy commander of the 1st Cavalry Regiment 
of the mixed brigade under Sheng Shicai's direct command, said, 
"The day after the assault on Dabancheng, just as we were making 
headway, we suddenly received an order to withdraw. Taking 
advantage of the opportunity, over 100 mounted troops from the 
forces of Ma Zhongying came in hot pursuit of us. Their frontal 
attack on the provincial forces sent the latter into total 
disarray. However, when Ma Zhongying's troops saw that the 
cavalry units of the province were retreating on both flanks, 
they assumed, wrongly, that they had fallen into an ambush and 
immediately fled to their base. After retreating a dozen li, Jin 
Guozhen ran into Sheng Shicai who there and then personally 
ordered the 1st Cavalry Regiment to take in the skirmishers and 
await order to return to Urumqi. Only a little over 100 mounted 
troops charged head on toward us and, wrongly believing that 
they had fallen into an ambush, soon withdrew in panic. For 
these reasons, they could not possibly have inflicted extensive 
losses on the provincial forces." (Only four soldiers from the 
1st Cavalry Regiment were killed in this battle.) Judging from 
the fact that Sheng Shicai calmly and unhurriedly ordered the 
1st Cavalry Regiment to take in the skirmishers and return to 
Urumqi, not only did Sheng Shicai realize that his forces did 
not suffer heavy casualties but he also calculated that Ma 
Zhongying was not about to launch a major offensive. In the same 
article of recollections, Jin Guozhen also touched upon the real 
reason why the battle of Dabancheng was lost. Ma Zhongying had 
written a confidential letter to each of the four generals of 
the northeast volunteer army--Zheng Runcheng, Guo Yingkui [6753 
2019 1145], Ying Zhanbin [2019 0594 2430], and Yang Yaojun, but 
the messenger was captured by Sheng Shicai's forces. Sheng 
Shicai got suspicious after reading the letters and immediately 
ordered a withdrawal. According to Sheng Shicai's aide-de-camp, 
Zhao Jianfeng [6392 0494 6912], this was the gist of the 
letters: You are all heroes of the war of resisting the Japanese 
and saving the nation. To preserve your reputation, you should 
return to the interior and continue to fight the Japanese, 
instead of getting involved in local wars in Xinjiang. Since 
these four confidential letters were never delivered into the 
hands of Zheng Runcheng and other leaders of the northeast 
volunteer army, we have no way of determining what their 
attitude to them would have been. Perhaps this was a ploy by Ma 
Zhongying to drive a wedge between Sheng Shicai and the 
northeast volunteers. Perhaps this was precisely the pretext 
Sheng Shicai had prayed for. (Footnote 6: "The True Story of the 
Several Battles I Took Part In," by Jin Guozhen, in "Selected 
Readings in Xinjiang Literature and History," Volume 14, 
Xinjiang Renmin Chubanshe, 1983) 
  What then made Sheng Shicai murder the leaders of the 
northeast volunteer army so brutally? To establish separatist 
rule in Xinjiang, Sheng Shicai must first gain control over the 
armed forces in the province. There were three armies in 
Xinjiang at the time: the provincial army, the northeast 
volunteer army, and the converted army. The converted army 
consisted mostly of veteran soldiers who had taken part in World 
War I and were opposed to the October Revolution. They had a 
wealth of combat experience but there were not too many of them, 
just 2,000 or so. The provincial army was large in size but 
corrupt, with absolutely no combat capability. Moreover, it was 
scattered throughout north and south Xinjiang. Then there was 
the northeast volunteer army. Not only did it have a formidable 
combat capability, but it also outnumbered the other two armies. 
To subjugate Xinjiang, Sheng Shicai must first control the 
northeast volunteer army. To control the northeast volunteer 
army, he must get rid of its leaders. 
  Sheng Shicai might make use of the leaders of the northeast 
army but there always came a point when he had to have them 
killed. As soon as he entered Ili, Liu Bin, a former commander 
of the 5th Army of the northeast people save-the-nation army, 
was appointed Ili garrison headquarters commander by Sheng 
Shicai. After leading troops into south Xinjiang, he was named 
Kashi garrison headquarters commander by Sheng Shicai in June 
1934. In Xinjiang, Ili and Kashi are the most important 
strategic points after Urumqi. In 1937 Sheng Shicai stripped Liu 
Bin of all his military positions and put him in charge of gold 
mines. Soon afterwards he accused him of "plotting a rebellion" 
and had him murdered along with Ha Yuliang [0761 3768 5328] 
(acting chief of staff at the headquarters of the Jilin 
self-defense army) and Niu Yuting [6873 3768 1656], (deputy 
commander of the regiment of officers of the 2d Brigade under 
the northeast people save-the-nation army). Jiang Youfen [5592 
2589 5358], who succeeded Liu Bin as commander of Kashi garrison 
headquarters, was subsequently killed as well. 
  When the northeast volunteer army entered Xinjiang, it 
included a company of military recruits made up of young 
students. Upon the completion of training in August 1933, the 
trainees were distributed among the units and were quickly 
promoted to positions at the brigade and battalion levels, 
becoming the backbone of the Xinjiang armed forces. And the 
prime targets of Sheng Shicai's assassination squads. Of the 97 
people in the company of military trainees who actually entered 
Xinjiang, 44 were massacred by Sheng Shicai. (Footnote 7: 
From Bai Shan and Heilongjiang to the Foot of 
Tianshan, by Gu Menglin [6253 1125 2651], see 
Selected Readings in Urumqi Literature and History, 
Volume 5, Xinjiang Qingnian Chubanshe, 1983) Cui Rongchang [1508 
2837 2490], a platoon leader in the company of recruits, held a 
number of positions after entering Xinjiang, including leader of 
the military officers' school and commander of Kashi garrison 
headquarters. In March 1941 he was arrested by Sheng Shicai for 
involvement in the "conspiratorial clique" case. By October the 
same year as many as 124 people had been arrested in connection 
with the Cui Rongchang case, most of them young military 
officers from the northeast volunteer army. (Footnote 8: 
"Statistical Table on Convicts in the Cui Rongchang Case," 
Xinjiang Provincial Public Security Management Department, 18 
October 1941) After their arrest, some were executed in secret, 
while others died from a variety of cruel tortures. There were 
few survivors. 
  There has never been a formal count of the number of 
officers 
and men from the northeast volunteer army killed by Sheng 
Shicai. Most of the figures now available are exaggerations. For 
instance, Zhang Fengyi [1728 7685 0308], a northeast volunteer 
army leader who entered Xinjiang in the latter period, said, 
"After the northeast volunteer army entered Xinjiang, only 5,000 
men were killed in fighting with Ma Zhongying or did from 
diseases or old age. In contrast, over 10,000 of them were 
arrested and massacred by Sheng Shicai in the past decade." 
(Footnote 9: "The Experiences of the Northeast Anti-Japanese 
Army In the Decade After It Entered Xinjiang," by Zhang Fengyi, 
in Selected Readings in Urumqi Literature and 
History, Volume 23, Xinjiang Renmin Chubanshe, 1991) After 
Sheng Shicai was transferred to Chongqing as minister of 
agriculture and forestry in 1944, the chief justice of the local 
court in Urumqi, Liu E [0491 6948], and others made the 
following charge before the special tribunal sent to Xinjiang by 
the military commission of the KMT specifically to sort out 
long-standing criminal cases: "The most tragic case involved the 
20,000 people and more in the northeast army... For over 10 
years they were brutally murdered until they were almost 
completely wiped out. A mere 10 officers or so and fewer than 
1,000 old and weak soldiers survived." (Footnote 10: Seven 
Decades of Turmoil in Xinjiang, pp 6035-6036) Let us 
analyze this matter. 
  After the reorganization of 1934, Xinjiang's armed forces 
were reduced to 12,000 people. Of the 18 units above the 
regimental level, the three garrison commands of Hami, Ashan 
(now Aletai), and Yan Qi, the 9th Cavalry Regiment, the 7th 
Infantry Division, and other units were all composed either 
mainly or entirely of minority officers and men. The 6th Cavalry 
Regiment, on the other hand, resulted from the reorganization of 
the converted army. Only in nine units did northeast volunteers 
who had entered Xinjiang make up a majority. Based on these 
data, officers and men from the northeast volunteer army who had 
entered Xinjiang should make up about half or so of the 
reorganized Xinjiang armed forces, that is, about 6,000 people. 
  After entering Xinjiang, many of the volunteers switched to 
other fields one after another. In the 1930's and 1940's, you 
could find a former northeast volunteer in just about every 
organization, institution, or enterprise in Xinjiang. Of the 97 
people in the third squadron of the company of military 
trainees, 60 people were assigned to various military units 
while 37 switched to other sectors: banks, transportation, and 
posts and telecommunications. If over 38 percent of the people 
in the military training company, the cradle of the leadership 
of the armed forces, switched to other fields, the job-change 
rate among other officers and men could not have been lower. 
Using this percentage as a base, the number of northeast 
volunteers who left the forces for other occupations must have 
been at least 8,000. Also, of the 60 military trainees who 
remained in the military after the military training company was 
abolished, 39, or 65 percent, were massacred by Sheng Shicai. In 
contrast, of the 37 who switched to local work, five people, or 
13.5 percent, died in the hands of Sheng Shicai. This shows that 
one's chances of being murdered by Sheng Shicai wee far smaller 
if one switched to local work than if one stayed in the 
military. Moreover, there were other volunteers who for a 
variety of reasons voluntarily left the units in the thousands 
in search of other means of livelihood. 
  According to these calculations, of the northeast volunteers 
who entered Xinjiang, about 5,000 were killed on the battlefield 
or died because of illness. About 5,000 remained in the units 
and close to 10,000 changed jobs or branched out on their own. 
At most 2,000 to 3,000 were murdered by Sheng Shicai. Needless 
to say, these computations were not accurate, but we can say 
with certainty they are closer to facts that the assertions that 
Sheng Shicai murdered over 10,000 volunteers or that he 
practically wiped out 20,000 volunteers. As far as the northeast 
volunteers were concerned, the bottom line for Sheng Shicai was 
to control and make use of them, not eliminate them. 
Specifically, his overriding policy toward high-ranking officers 
was to kill them off; some he made use of for a time but in the 
end even these generals were murdered. In the case of 
middle-ranking officers, his principal policy was to divide and 
exploit, supplemented by murder, in order to ensure control. As 
for low-ranking officers and the rank-and-file, his main 
objective was exploitation. If all 20,000 northeast volunteers 
were wiped out, what else could he depend on to continue his 
rule in Xinjiang? 
  The main reason Sheng Shicai was able to exploit and divide 
the northeast volunteer army who entered Xinjiang was the 
absence of a strong leadership core. The northeast army entered 
Xinjiang without its high-ranking leaders like Su Bingwen, Ma 
Zhanshan, and Li Du, in other words, its most prestigious 
leaders. Zheng Runcheng and others were not in a position to 
hold together the entire army. Zheng Runcheng was commander of 
the 9th Regiment of the 2d Infantry Brigade in the northeast 
people save-the-nation army and later served as acting brigade 
commander. At the time the army entered Xinjiang, he was both 
regiment commander and brigade commander. The northeast 
volunteer army which entered Xinjiang had a surfeit of military 
officers at the army, division, and regiment levels. (In the 
Jilin self-defense army and save-the-nation army, for instance, 
Xing Zhanqing [0438 0594 3237] was divisional commander; Yang 
Yaojun, zhonglu commander-in-chief; Ha Yuliang, headquarters 
chief of staff; Yang Bingsen [0761 3768 5328], artillery 
commander; and Liu Wankui [0491 8001 7608], Guo Yingkui, Ying 
Zhanbin, Dan Chunlin [0830 2504 7207], Li Zhi [2621 1807], Xu 
Guoguang [1776 0948 0342], and Yu Deyi [0060 1795 0001], brigade 
commanders. Why did Su Bingwen and others put Zheng Runcheng 
instead of somebody else in charge of the army? Mainly because 
the 2d Infantry Brigade used to be the northeast army's regular 
forces with a strong capability which still boasted two fairly 
intact regiments consisting of 2,500 officers and men even as it 
was withdrawing from the northeast. As for other generals, some 
did not make their way into the Soviet Union until later and 
therefore could not have joined the greater part of the forces 
as they retreated into Xinjiang, while others had become 
commanders without a following. (One example was Liu Bin [0491 
2430], commander of the 5th Army of the northeast 
save-the-nation army.) Zheng Runcheng was not qualified to 
command the entire army in terms of experience, prestige, or 
ability. That he was made chairman of the provisional military 
committee after the 12 April coup shows that all quarters in 
Xinjiang had high hopes in the northeast volunteer army. But it 
turned out that Zheng Runcheng did not live up to the important 
job and was quickly stripped of his military power by Sheng 
Shicai. 
  The volunteer army was ridden with factions, each having 
nothing to do with the others, even back when it was in the 
northeast. This was a major reason why it lost the war of 
resistance against the Japanese. Although it was nominally under 
the unified command of Zheng Runcheng after entering Xinjiang, 
in reality it was its same old factious self. For instance, Li 
Du put divisional commander Xing Zhanqing in charge of the Jilin 
self-defense army. Because the army was stationed at two places 
in Xinjiang, namely Ili and Urumqi, which made centralized 
command difficult, Xing Zhanqing (stationed at Ili) decided that 
Yang Yaojun should be responsible for the volunteers from Jilin 
now stationed at Urumqi. Needless to say, this undermined the 
unified command of Zheng Runcheng. Subsequently Sheng Shicai 
dared to have Zheng Runcheng and others arrested and murdered 
precisely because he perceived, correctly this particular 
weakness on the part of the army of volunteers and had gone to 
great lengths to divide and rule beforehand. After Zheng 
Runcheng and other leaders of the northeast volunteer army were 
arrested, Sheng Shicai immediately promoted a number of 
middle-ranking officers in the same army, thereby readily 
consolidating his grip on the northeast army of volunteers. 
  Moreover, there was a host of officers, motivated by 
self-interests, who threw in their lot with Sheng Shicai and 
turned around to sell out and murder their former 
comrades-in-arms. This is another reason why the northeast army 
disintegrated. Typical of these officers were Li Pulin [2621 
3302 7207] and Li Yingqi [2621 5391 1142]. An adopted son of Li 
Du, commander-in-chief of the Jilin self-defense army, Li Pulin 
was named to important jobs such as chairmanship of the secret 
tribunal by Sheng Shicai because of his diligence in providing 
the latter with inside intelligence about the northeast 
volunteer army. He had a hand in a majority of the several 
"plotting to rebel" cases fabricated by Sheng Shicai and fled 
with the latter to Taiwan on the eve of liberation. A former 
major and aide-de-camp in the northeast people save-the-nation 
army, Li Yingqi zealously offered to serve Sheng Shicai and was 
quickly promoted to such positions as section chief in the 
office of the aide-de-camp in the governor's office and head of 
the office of political instruction. After his appointment as 
director of the provincial public security management department 
in 1933, he proceeded to have many people murdered in accordance 
with Sheng Shicai's wishes. For instance, he took part in 
cooking up the Cui Rongchang case, whose primary goal was to 
murder young military officers in the northeast army of 
volunteers. He also carried out Sheng Shicai's plot to kill Chen 
Tanqiu [7115 3389 4428] and Mao Zemin [3029 3419 3046]. After 
the liberation, Li Yingqi was arrested and executed by a firing 
squad. 
  4. Some Northeast Volunteers Contributed to Economic 
Construction and Democratic Revolution in Xinjiang 
  As a result of the reorganization of 1934, many officers and 
men from the northeast army of volunteers were demobilized and 
assigned to all kinds of positions. At the time such people 
could be found in countless organizations, enterprises, and 
educational and cultural institutions all over Xinjiang. Because 
they were fairly well-educated, many became the leaders and 
backbone of their units. Zhang Mingpan [1728 7686 3879], for 
instance, who headed the aide-de-camp's office of the northeast 
save-the-nation army, led demobilized officers and men in an 
arduous enterprise on the sands of Gobi Desert, building oil 
refineries and turning out kerosene, gasoline, and lubricating 
oil. Or take Wang Qixun [3769 7871 8113], a battalion commander 
in the northeast volunteer army. After leaving the military, he 
became chairman of the engineering commission in charge of 
putting up several of the most well-known buildings in Urumqi at 
the time. In his book, Xinjiang: The Inside Story, Xu 
Lingfeng [1776 7227 7685] described the west building of the 
governor's mansion, one of the commission's works, as the "best 
equipped conference hall in the rear in China" and called the 
"big bank" the "greatest piece of architecture" in Urumqi. In 
the mid-1930's, many northeast volunteers took part in building 
the 1,400-kilometer Ili-Urumqi Xingxing gap highway. Completed 
and opened to traffic in early July 1937, it became one of the 
key arteries of transportation in the world during the war of 
resistance against Japan and played a critical role in aiding 
the war effort. Most of the instructors at the Xinjiang military 
officers academy were members of the northeast volunteer army 
who had entered Xinjiang, while many of the political 
instructors were members of the CPC and CPSU. A good number of 
the officers and men at the CPC-led recruiting camp were 
graduates of the academy and went on to become the backbone of 
the drive to modernize the Chinese military. 
  Whether they stayed in the military or were demobilized and 
assigned to the localities, many former members of the northeast 
volunteer army were staunchly patriotic and steadfastly 
progressive and participated in the democratic revolution in and 
peaceful liberation of Xinjiang. 
  Zhang Fengyi [1728 7685 0308], a former middle-ranking 
officer in the northeast army, became actively involved in the 
war of resistance against Japan in the northeast after the 
September 18 incident. Once in Xinjiang, he held a succession of 
jobs, including brigade commander, regiment commander, and Kashi 
garrison commander. After the victory of the war of resistance 
against Japan, he became a lieutenant general at the northwest 
field headquarters. On the eve of liberation, he was the 
province's deputy commander of public security. (Provincial 
chairman Bao Erhan [0545 1422 3352] was concurrently commander 
of public security.) To go with the way events were unfolding, 
General Tao Zhiyue [7118 1492 1471], then commander in chief at 
provincial garrison headquarters, was preparing to stage an 
uprising. Yet he had few troops under his direct control. Both 
Ma Chengxiang [7456 0701 4382], commander of the 5th Cavalry 
Army, and Ye Cheng [0673 2052], commander of the 78th Division, 
were resolutely anti-communist and firmly opposed to rising up 
in rebellion. Accordingly, the five regiments with close ties to 
and under the control of General Zhang Fengyi (which essentially 
were part of the former northeast volunteer army) became the 
forces Tao Zhiyue and Bao Erhan relied on as they made 
preparations for an uprising. After the liberation, Zhang Fengyi 
was chief of staff for the Xinjiang military region and deputy 
director of the autonomous region's department of heavy 
industry, among other things, making fresh contributions to 
Xinjiang's military and economic construction. Luo Zhi [5012 
1807], a native of Guangdong, went to the northeast as a child. 
After the September 18 incident, he joined the anti-Japanese 
volunteer army. In 1938 he graduated from Xinjiang College and 
became deeply involved in democratic revolutionary activities 
and was one of the top leaders of the underground organization 
"Combat Society." In August 1948 Luo Zhi and four three-region 
revolutionary leaders, including Ahemaitijiang [7093 0678 6314 
2251 3068] and Yisihakebaike [0122 2448 0761 0344 0130 0344] 
were killed in a plane crash en route to Beijing by way of the 
Soviet Union to take part in a CPPCC meeting. Zhao Jianfeng 
served as an aide-de-camp to Sheng Shicai for a while and 
enjoyed the latter's confidence. Later he became increasingly 
progressive and did many good deeds for the people of Xinjiang, 
constantly on the move on behalf of the peaceful liberation of 
Xinjiang. After liberation, he held a string of positions, 
including deputy director of the office of the Xinjiang 
provincial people's government. 
  After the peaceful liberation of Xinjiang in September 1949, 
some former northeast volunteers and officers still in the units 
were reassigned to the PLA while others transferred into the 
Xinjiang production and construction corps to defend the border 
and help build up Xinjiang. People of all nationalities will 
forever cherish the memory of former officers and men from the 
northeast army who contributed to the economic construction and 
democratic revolution of Xinjiang. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20469 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar016___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-016 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Prospects, Disappointments of Taiwan Traders </TI></H3>
<H4>   Trade Relationship Changes </H4>
<F P=102> 94CE0279A Taipei TIEN-HSIA [COMMONWEALTH] in Chinese No 12, 
1 Dec 93 pp 21-31 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0279A </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei TIEN-HSIA [COMMONWEALTH] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article: "New Triangular Relationship--Deterioration of </F>
Taiwan Firms Two Sides of the Strait Advantage"] 
  [Text] New Triangular Relationship Emerges 
In Shanghai, Acer's Neon Sign Adds Luster to the Night on the 
City's Most Crowded Thoroughfare, Nanjing Road. Near Beijing 
Airport, Lienhua Electronics--China's largest integrated circuit 
plant--shares honors with arriving and departing tourists. 
  During 1992, the 200 percent growth of the Taiwan 
information 
business' investment in the mainland far surpassed its 
investment in other areas. But investment in Taiwan itself was 
less than 20 percent. 
  No longer is the investment in traditional industries like 
shoes, umbrellas, and brief cases. Even scientific and technical 
industries on which Taiwan pins its future hopes have rapidly 
become infected with the mainland craze. Relations between the 
two sides of the strait have entered a new stage of change from 
the quantitative to the qualitative. 
  Separate interests of the scalene triangle made up of Taiwan 
firms, Taiwan, and the mainland differ. 
  Is Taiwan firms opening up of the opposite shore more 
quickly 
and more deeply just an expansion of Taiwan businesses operating 
territory or might it put pressure on Taiwan's living space? 
  At a time when the whole world is advancing along the road 
of 
regional economic integration, in the long-range picture that 
Taiwan economic decision makers portray for getting enterprises 
to put down firm roots and home and develop and grow elsewhere, 
science and technology industries are to receive the baton and 
drive ahead in replacing old industries with new ones. 
  They are completely confident about Taiwan's scientific and 
technical industries for good reason. Taiwan's information and 
electronics industries have truly won a share in the global 
division of labor system. Major information firms in Europe and 
the Americas have recently been scrambling to improve their ties 
with Taiwan manufacturers. This has made Taiwan a world class 
manufacturing site. Its fixed mount scanners, personal computer 
mainframes, and its monitoring devices rank first in the world. 
  Through the transformation of time and space, the real and 
the bogus may be turned upside down all of a sudden. Were they 
to fly less that a hour's flight distant from Taiwan to Shenzhen 
and look at the blending and transformation of the scientific 
and technical industries of both side of the Strait, they would 
certainly revise with extreme vigilance the strong convictions 
they formerly held. 
  It is ten past noon, and the narrow Shanchuan Lane in the 
Shenzhen Special Economic Zone [SEZ] is bustling. Women 
employees on lunch break are shampooing their hair beside Lutian 
Street. In the bamboo fence-decorated restaurant, Teng Hung-lin, 
who hails from Taitung, and who is wearing a pair of black 
jeans, high top athletic shoes, and a white T-shirt, is eating 
some spicy Sichuan dandan noodles. He is talking about the 
monthly output of 200,000 computer mainframes: "My output is now 
more than everyone's." Laughingly, he said, "On lunar new year's 
eve, we gave a party for 50 tables full of guests." 
  It is hard to believe that this factory could be so 
extraordinarily brave. By comparison with most Taiwan 
air-conditioned plants, the plant that this Taiwan trader has 
leased in Shenzhen looks for all the world like an old flour 
mill. The only thing in the plant's original color cement wall 
office that makes one think about modern science and technology 
is the newest NEC script writer color computer. "Our people run 
back and forth to Taiwan frequently. It is very convenient," 
Teng says. 
  "I was the one who got this plant going," Teng Hung-lin 
acknowledges. The successful experiences that Taiwan's 
information electronics industry worked out over a period of 
many years have been moved lock, stock, and barrel to the 
mainland. They have been combined here with the mainland's 
copious manpower to produce newer competition. 
  Taiwan firms have a lock on the source of computer chip 
components. They control things coming and going. Typically, 
Teng Hung-lin has also invested in a Taiwan chip designing 
company. The computer chip sockets that Taiwan entrepreneurs 
have recently produced, Teng Hung-lin is also developing in his 
own building in Shenzhen. "I can save two New Taiwan dollars on 
each one," he says shaking the part he is holding in his hand. 
In order to meet quality requirements for precision production, 
Taiwan firms have brought in NT$2 million robots that accurately 
bond small parts to the surface of circuit boards. Teng Hung-lin 
even managed to save this NT$2 million investment by simply 
training manual operators, using manpower to counter machines. 
"Now I depend on those six pair of hands," he said happily. 
  In the western suburbs of Shanghai, just a one-hour flight 
north of Shenzhen, is what Chou Cheng-jung forecast in 1959 like 
Teng Hung-lin. Although one out of every two monitors in the 
world were made in Taiwan in 1992, "by the end of 1992, Taiwan 
will be unable to make any monochrome computer monitors." Chou 
Cheng-jung, who was in charge of Taiwan Ch'uan-nao Electronics' 
European market, has now shifted his base to Shanghai where he 
is cooperating with the Shanghai Electron Tube Plant in turning 
out monitors. 
  People travel back and forth in a steady stream from south 
and north in the mainland, exploring avenues for Taiwan's 
information electronics industry. Not only have power supply 
devices, monitors, and mainframes gradually become production 
staples, but a computer software industry, which Taiwan has long 
wanted to develop vigorously but which has not been successful 
in Taiwan, is now beginning to be developed on the mainland by 
the Taiwan information industry using factory-like quantity 
production methods. Even cooperation on high definition 
television (HDTV), which is still in the developmental state, is 
being discussed between Taiwan and the mainland. 
<H5>  Transfers Abroad Too Rapid! </H5>
  Zhou Muchang [0719 1970 2490], director of the Chinese 
mainland's Ministry of Electronics Computer Research Center, 
said with a smile:"Between 70 and 80 percent of Taiwan's more 
than 400 important information concerns are cooperating with the 
mainland." 
  This tide has greatly reversed the direction of flow of 
Taiwan capital and technology. Southeast Asia has been the 
region in which the information electronics industry has 
invested heavily. During the previous two or three years, Taiwan 
had been the largest foreign investor in ASEAN countries such as 
Malaysia and Thailand, and its investment in electronics-related 
industries there was most dazzling. During the past year, 
however, the overall amount of Taiwan's investment in southeast 
Asia has fallen off sharply. Statistics from the information 
electronics industry alone provide a strong indication of this. 
The Southeast Asia fever that flourished for a time has given 
way to a mainland China fever. 
  "This is really a cause for concern. The shift abroad is 
really too fast," said Li Ta-wei [2621 1129 5898] of the 
Statistical Commission's Market Information Center, who is 
responsible for keeping track of Taiwan entrepreneurs' 
investment abroad. Pointing at the figures, he said, "In 
Southeast Asia, it is only a little more than 20 percent of 
normal growth, but on the mainland, it has been a growth of 
several hundred percent." 
  Even though the mainland is currently unable to compete with 
Taiwan on relatively high quality products, and although most 
Taiwan entrepreneurs predict that Taiwan still has a three to 
five year lead, the mainland's information electronics industry 
has recently shown itself to be on the rise. During the first 
half of 1993 alone, mainland information industry exports 
increased 200 percent over the same period during the previous 
year. The personal computer internal sales market for the year 
also caught up with Taiwan's average 350,000 units. 
  The China mainland general manager of the American 
Hewlett-Packard Computer Corporation, Cheng Tianzong [4453 1131 
4912], reminded that when looking at a competitor, "you must not 
always look at his shortcomings; you should look at the way in 
which he is changing." 
<H5>  Entry Into an Entirely New Stage </H5>
  When traditional industries such as shoe, umbrella, and 
Christmas decoration industries went ashore on the other side of 
the Strait one after another, Taiwan said complacently: This is 
an elimination of industries that is inevitable as the economy 
escalates. Scientific and technical industries will receive the 
baton and carrying on the task of pulling up the industrial 
level. Today, however, even scientific and technical industries 
can hardly escape catching the mainland craze. This is fully 
demonstrated by economic and trade relations between the two 
sides of the Strait entering an entirely new phase of change 
from quantity and the spurring of qualitative change. 
  The speed and the number of scientific and technical 
industries that have surged into the mainland has increased 
tremendously. This is bound to hurt Taiwan. Once the factories 
that Taiwan firms rushed to build go into operation, will the 
large number of scientific and technical enterprises that have a 
blood relationship with Taiwan and whose mainland personnel are 
well-versed in production skills expand the operating area of 
Taiwan enterprises, or will they turn around and put pressure on 
Taiwan's living space? 
  Zhang Jichun [1728 1807 5028], who is in charge of economic 
relations and trade in Shanghai's Taiwan Office, and who studied 
biochemistry at the Chinese Academy of Sciences, showed that 
chemistry remains his basic profession when he said, "What is 
going on is a chemical compounding reaction between both sides 
of the Strait." 
  Once a chemical reaction occurs, an entirely new material 
results. A return to the original state is impossible. Once 
economic relations and trade between both sides of the Strait 
have been largely meshed, a new stage will come into being. When 
they were in Taiwan, each increase in production that Taiwan 
firms made was a contribution to the country. The interests of 
the government and enterprises were identical. That time has 
passed never to return. 
  Henceforth, economic and trade relations across the Taiwan 
Strait will no longer be in a straight line between two sides, 
but a scalene triangle among Taiwan, the mainland, and Taiwan 
firms, each one of which will use different means to attain its 
own interests. Taiwan firms must strive to make their own 
businesses prosper; Taiwan must maintain its own security and 
open new room for maneuver; and the mainland will be intent on 
acquiring Taiwan's economic resources and experience while 
simultaneously moderately extending sovereignty over Taiwan. 
  In the new triangular relationship, the three parties will 
explore and experiment in an effort to find ideal long-term and 
near-term relations. 
  Looked at solely in terms of the development of scientific 
and technical industries, Taiwan and the mainland really need 
each other. 
  The mainland needs Taiwan because scientists and technicians 
on the mainland, which is able to launch artificial satellites 
and nuclear bombs, are truly unfamiliar with large scale 
microcomputer production and sales. Zhou Muchang, the minister 
of Electronics Industry admitted that despite having spent a 
large amount of money on computer technology to build 21 
production lines, the Chinese Communists were never able to 
establish an internationally competitive industrial base. 
"Taiwan's success is distinctive. China needs to study it, but 
complete imitation is not possible, because times have changed." 
Zhou Muchang did not try to hide the Chinese Communists hope of 
using Taiwan to guide and build its personal computer industry: 
"Technology is changing too rapidly today. We need time to 
develop, and the best way is to cooperate with firms abroad like 
Taiwan's." 
  However, Taiwan's scientific and technical enterprises must 
also narrow the distance with the mainland. 
<H5>  A Copious Manpower and Technology Market </H5>
  Hsu Hsiang-sheng [1775 3276 3932], the person responsible 
for 
Acer on the mainland who went to Beijing to set up a base in 
April 1993, affirmed in his office that no one dared 
underestimate the market potential of the mainland. "If Acer is 
to become a world class computer firm, it will have to come to 
the mainland." An ordinary single occupancy room on the eleventh 
floor of Beijing's Olympic Building is both Hsu Hsiang-sheng's 
office and bedroom. 
  An even more important pressure driving Taiwan entrepreneurs 
toward the mainland is unremitting and more varied competition 
at home and abroad. 
  Some of the scientific and technical entrepreneurs arriving 
in the mainland receive a respect that operators of industries 
in Taiwan are not accorded. Yingyeda [phonetic], which produces 
computers and script writer computers has long worked to no 
avail to recruit personnel in Taiwan to meet its professional 
needs. "We spent more than NT$2 million a month on newspaper 
ads, but we received no more than 10 letters in reply," 
assistant general manager Lai Chen-hsing [6351 2182 5281] 
reflected. 
  Finally, Yingyeda decided to set up a site in Shanghai where 
it could make use of the manpower supply network that Shanghai's 
58 institutions of higher education had set up. Lai Chen-hsing 
also remembered having spent a little more than NT$60 to join 
the Shanghai Talent Recruitment Association and finding 25 
people at one time. Today, Yingyeda is using more than 200 
technical personnel in Shanghai, each one of which has a 
computer to write computer, telephone, and electronic dictionary 
software just like the software factories in Japan. 
  When Yingyeda built its plant, the chairman of the board, 
Yeh 
Kuo-hui [0673 0948 6540] personally planned the plant site. He 
went to Shanghai at least three times monthly to superintend. In 
addition, since Shanghai listed construction of the Yingyeda 
plant as a key construction project, it was given full local 
support in the same way as the subway and the Yangpu Bridge. A 
seven story factory building was completed within 11 months. 
  The concrete gains of Taiwan firms from the use of the 
mainland may be easily quantified, but the effect on Taiwan as a 
whole is difficult to estimate. 
  Li Ta-wei of the Statistical Council warns: "The mainland's 
finest production technology is now in the hands of Taiwan 
firms." Under guidance and direction from Taiwan firms, the 
mainland's information electronics industry climate is bound to 
improve over time. He said, "Taiwan depends on an industrial 
network. If it moves out of Taiwan, Taiwan's advantage will not 
last for long." 
  Drawn by Taiwan firms, this network is gradually moving into 
the mainland. Not only has production of all computer components 
such as power supplies and keyboard been moved to the mainland, 
but Taiwan's parts importing and supply firms have also began 
vigorous development of the mainland market. The mainland's 
first goal is to hold fast to Taiwan firms that land there. Now 
that Philipps and China Kinescope have decided to set up plants 
on the mainland, the impetus of the mainland's computer monitor 
industry has recently become greater and greater. 
<H5>  Complete Transplant of Industrial System </H5>
  Some firms have adopted the methods of Japan's Toyota 
Automobile Corporation, completely moving to the mainland 
upstream and downstream firms. Gyokusei Computer, which owes its 
rise to mainframe production, has begun to build a complete 
system in Shenzhen, Guangdong Province. Not only is Gyokusei's 
mainframe plant in Shenzhen, but it is also producing keyboards 
and computer cases there. Gyokusei has also moved to the 
mainland, where it is planning to set up another base, the 
surface bonding equipment for even the script writer computers 
that it is making an all out effort to put into production in 
Taiwan. Remembering when Gyokusei had nearly 1,000 employees in 
Taiwan a year ago, one observer said, "Gyokusei used to be one 
of the world's first three mainframe plants, but today it has 
fewer than 300 people remaining in Taiwan." 
  Not only has Taiwan changed the industrial environment for 
supporting the mainland, but western nations, which formerly 
strictly controlled the export of technology to the mainland, 
have become increasingly liberal recently. In addition, Hong 
Kong and Chinese firms supply each others needs. The channels 
through which the mainland obtains components are becoming wider 
and wider. Saige [phonetic] Electronics Equipment Plaza is a 
virtual reproduction of Taipei's Kuanghua Market. One 
businessman said descriptively, "Once a foreign chip is 
marketed, Saige has it a week afterward." A Taiwan computer 
mainframe plant official who set up a factory in Guangdong 
admitted frankly, " I go through Hong Kong to buy parts. I do 
not have to have anything to do with Taiwan." 
<H5>  Island Taiwan's Challenge </H5>
  The biggest sticking point for Taiwan in the current Taiwan 
trader construction of a network that bridges the Taiwan Strait 
is how to make a distinction that does not hurt Taiwan firms 
while still protecting Taiwan. 
  In early November, Minister of Economic Affairs, Chiang 
Ping-k'un [3068 0014 0981], held a breakfast discussion with 
Taiwan industrialists. On the advice of industrial concerns, 
Chiang Ping-k'un agreed to change the way of listing mainland 
investment projects from those that are government-approved to 
those that are not government-approved. After discussion within 
the government, although the Ministry of Economic Affairs 
countermanded this order, the Deputy Minister of Economic 
Affairs, Yang Shih-chien [2799 0013 4873], agreed that the 
government would gradually decontrol the importation of mainland 
semi-manufactures. 
  This government announcement meant that in the long contest 
for economic dominance, the mainland seemed to have pushed 
another step forward. It was only two weeks before the 
controversy that Liu Zhentao [0491 7201 3447], director of the 
Economic Bureau of the China mainland-Taiwan Office emphasized 
that getting Taiwan to decontrol the importation of mainland 
semi-manufactures was an economic and trade breakthrough that 
the Chinese Communists were currently striving to obtain. He 
acknowledged frankly that this was a Chinese Communist riposte 
to the "retain roots in Taiwan" that Taiwan shouts to the skies. 
"I feel that "retain roots in Taiwan" is a Taiwan ploy against 
the mainland," Liu Zhentao said. No matter whether retain roots 
in Taiwan is really a ploy, or whether it is just a slogan, 
Taiwan firms were successful in getting the importation of 
mainland semi-manufactures decontrolled. 
  At a time when the whole work is calling for regional 
economies, the most difficult challenge to island Taiwan may be 
how to be a good regional partner, and how to be able genuinely 
to protect its own supreme national interests while being in the 
regional maelstrom. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20470 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar016___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-016 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Prospects, Disappointments of Taiwan Traders </TI></H3>
<H4>   `Tough' Counterparts on Mainland </H4>
<F P=102> 94CE0279B Taipei TIEN-HSIA [COMMONWEALTH] in Chinese No 12, 
1 Dec 93 p 32, 34 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0279B </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei TIEN-HSIA [COMMONWEALTH] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Ch'en Hsiu-hsien (7115 0208 6343): "Red Guard </F>
Sells Taiwan Computers"] 
  [Text] He is combative after the test of a decade of the 
Cultural Revolution. 
  He has gone from cooperation to a split with Acer. 
  He is typical of the astute and tough partners and 
adversaries that Taiwan firms have encountered on the mainland. 
  When thinking about the red guards who went through the 
severe test of 10 years of turmoil on the China mainland, one 
conjures up an image of burly men possessed of indomitable 
spirit and a booming voice. 
  On first sight, Li Feng [7812 6912] turned out to be of 
slight build and extraordinarily quite, particularly so in the 
noisy lobby of a hotel in Shenzhen. 
  It was impossible to know that as soon as he opened his 
mouth, this impression would be completely reversed. He was 
really a very incisive person! 
  "If it hadn't been for my advertising, Acer would never have 
sold anything (in China)." He spoke like a machine gun, and not 
just rapidly but forcefully as well. "You must use strong words 
in advertising to Chinese. Acer's ads were not strong enough." 
He held back nothing when he talked. "Acer is too gentle. Stan 
Shih and the others are all too nice." 
  "Computer ads in China are not for customers to read; they 
are written for the bosses who do not understand computers who 
may happen to read them." He began to give pointers. "There is 
no use talking all the time about Acer's history or concepts. No 
one wants to read that." Waving his hands, he said, "My ads said 
that Acer is best in six ways. What their own ads did not say, I 
said for them." 
  Standing there, he was really complex. In the eyes of people 
in Shenzhen, Li Feng is a mystery. For Acer Computer, which 
longs to open up the China mainland market, Li Feng was a strong 
partner deserving of respect, but today he is a difficult to 
control local bully. To other Taiwan and overseas information 
entrepreneurs who want to open the mainland door, Li Feng 
provides a key on which they pin their hopes. 
  Li Feng is a 39 year-old Hunanese. "No one knows where he 
sprang from." In talking about his background, one Shenzhen 
entrepreneur shook his head and said, "My friend who plays cards 
with him has never seen him lose." 
  Another person who sells computers on the mainland seems to 
have heard a lot about Li Feng, but still really not enough. He 
said that Li Feng is the name on his name card, but his identity 
cards bears the name Zhai Lifeng [5049 7812 6912]. However, 
"this identity card was also bought, so just what his real name 
is, I have no way of knowing." In making the rounds of Shenzhen, 
Li Feng draws a lot of attention. His car is an imported Lincoln 
Continental. Sometimes he drives it himself rather than use a 
chauffeur. 
  A year ago, Li Feng, who had been operating in Shenzhen for 
seven years, established the Liji Corporation, which specialized 
in the sale of Acer computers. Li Feng was very candid in saying 
why he had taken the name Liji for his corporation. "It was to 
cooperate with Acer." Within one year, he found 25 salesmen on 
the China mainland, and he claimed to have spent a total of 
$200,000 on advertising. 
  In order to help Liji expand the mainland market rapidly, 
Acer provided all possible help. 
  For this reason, all the computers in the Liji office were 
provided by Acer, and Acer helped set up all the office's E-mail 
networks. Liji's financial and management systems were all set 
up with the help of Acer. One person well versed on the inside 
story could not help saying that "Their (Liji's) whole 
enterprise is a duplicate of Acer." 
  In 1992, Acer unexpectedly learned that Liji had privately 
sold copies of Acer computers. After contacting a Hong Kong 
lawyer unsuccessfully, Acer decided to sever relations with 
Liji. An Acer mainland market official said, "On anything having 
to do with the intangible asset of a trademark, Acer's principle 
is very clear: absolutely no compromise." In April 1993, Acer 
formally established a branch corporation on the mainland. 
<H5>  Makes Own Way in the World Using Taiwan Connections </H5>
  While I was talking with Li Feng in the coffee shop of a 
Shenzhen hotel, his cellular telephone suddenly rang. After 
hanging up the telephone, Li Feng said that Acer had sent a fax 
demanding that Liji immediately settle outstanding debts. 
Hardening his voice, he responded, "Acer says it will not sell 
machines to me. Who cares? I can buy them from Hong Kong, Japan, 
or the United States." 
  No matter how matters develop between Liji and Acer, Li Feng 
has decided to continue to use Taiwan computer contacts to make 
his own way in the world. "Now I am cooperating with Taiwan," Li 
Feng said. All the products that Liji needs in order to have a 
brand of its own -- mainframes, monitors, chassis, or script 
computers, etc -- will be provided by Taiwan concerns. In order 
to sell low cost computers for home use, he went to the Beijing 
branch of the American Yingdaier [phonetic] Company, which he 
told that he wanted 1 million 80386 computer chips each month. 
  From his contacts with Taiwan entrepreneurs, Li Feng is 
quick 
to apply what he learns. After hearing of the Taiwan computer 
industry's business problems in recent years, he said with a 
laugh, "I only sell. I don't manufacture. Manufacturing is too 
tough." 
  Because Li Ming's car had been sent to the airport to meet 
an 
official from the Ministry of Electronics in Beijing, he walked 
back to his office. Asked as he walked along the streets of 
Shenzhen whether Shenzhen was a so-called risk taker's paradise, 
he nodded agreement. To succeed in Shenzhen takes three things: 
"First is outside assistance. This is the facade. Second is 
contacts. This is the real strength. Third is assistants. 
Because of the many opportunities, it is impossible to get 
around to all of them." 
  "How will your Taiwan overcome our mainland? Forty years 
ago, 
the Kuomintang lost out to the Communist Party," he said as he 
walked along. "Nowadays, there is no talk about politics; just 
about making money. The likes of Acer do not love money. I 
really have trouble understanding it." Except for the mainland, 
this is a world that operates using laws and concepts. In the 
mainland, by contrast, a fist is sometimes more useful than a 
lawyer. 
  Li Feng is just the kind of astute and tough partner and 
adversary that a typical Taiwan trader meets on the mainland. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20471 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar016___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-016 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Prospects, Disappointments of Taiwan Traders </TI></H3>
<H4>   Interests `Fit Together Nicely' </H4>
<F P=102> 94CE0279C Taipei TIEN-HSIA [COMMONWEALTH] in Chinese No 12, 
1 Dec 93 pp 37-38, 41-42, and 49-51 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0279C </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei TIEN-HSIA [COMMONWEALTH] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese and 49-51 </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Chuang Su-yu (5445 4790 3768): "Taiwan Firms </F>
Shape a New Mainland. Increasing Joys and Temptations 
  [Text] Deng Xiaoping's policy of "without reform and 
opening to the outside world, China will come to a dead end" is 
being implemented by Taiwan firms. In 1992, the China mainland's 
imports and exports totaled more than $1.6 trillion. The value 
of its exports surpassed that of Taiwan for the first time, 3 
percent of it coming from Taiwan firms. The longing of Taiwan 
firms for growth fits together nicely with the mainland's battle 
to escape from poverty. 
  Like it or not, the travel to the mainland of Taiwanese to 
work is an unstoppable trend. For the next generation, daddy 
will not only no longer return home for supper, he will spend 
the whole year on the mainland. 
  Suffering Taiwan cadres are leading young and industrious 
mainland workers. They are using their accumulated management 
experience and the newest plant equipment to give a new 
performance of Taiwan's barehanded rise of 20 years ago on the 
opposite shore. 
  The time is autumn 1993. The place is the China mainland. 
The 
main performers are a group of Taiwan traders who are building 
factories anew on the China mainland. In this vast land that 
requires risk taking to overcome difficulties, and that has been 
described as the great west, the longing of Taiwan traders for 
growth nicely coincides with the mainland battle to shed poverty. 
  By comparison with the stagnation in Taiwan, several 
locations on the coast of mainland China are filled with a 
strong will to grow, and foreign visitors arrive in an endless 
flow. Every day Shanghai's Hilton Hotel is overbooked by 80 or 
90 guests. An Min [1344 3046], the director of the Taiwan, Hong 
Kong, and Macao Office of the Ministry of Foreign Trade and 
Economic Cooperation [MOFTEC] says extremely ambitiously: 
"China's economy must mesh with the world's." (On the China 
mainland, Taiwan traders may meet many patriotic, strongly 
ambitious, and outstanding officials like An Min.) An Min notes 
with pleasure that China's imports and exports during 1992 
totaled $1.6 trillion for tenth place in the world, suddenly 
surpassing Taiwan by more than $10 billion. (During 1992, the 
value of exports exceeded that of Taiwan for the first time.) 
  An Min said that in 1992 Taiwan firms contributed 3 percent 
of the China mainland's total imports and exports. A Hong Kong 
scholar believes it was more than that. 
  The succession of performances of Taiwan firms in pursuit of 
growth on the mainland have directly or indirectly hastened the 
rapid growth of the China mainland economy. 
  The rapid increase in Taiwan firms' investment in the 
mainland has had an impact on Taiwan's industry that has spread 
as well from manufacturing to the financial and advertising 
businesses... 
  At 9 o'clock at night, in a brightly lighted factory five 
hours away from Shenzhen by car -- the Chongde Shoe Factory 
located in the Lianhuashan Industrial Zone of Dongguan in 
Guangdong Province (a joint venture of Taiwan's Chunt'ai Shoe 
Factory and a Japanese Shoe Factory) -- 800 female workers' 
hands and feet are busy machine-sewing shoes. No one speaks. The 
only sound is the cicada-like chirping of the sewing machines. 
Looking at the factory, which sparkles like crystal, the 
factory's new general manager Lin Wu-luan, soliloquizes: "They 
laugh saying I am crazy because I want them to increase their 
output 20 percent. Work that can be completed in 8 hours, they 
want to take 10 hours to do." He and four other cadres from 
Taiwan live in the factory area. They make the factory their 
home, and they take turns on patrol. (Suffering cadres and 
hardworking female employees: Isn't this a portrait of Taiwan 20 
years ago?) 
  Scene 2: The Sorrows and Joys of Pioneers 
  At Kunshan City, a two-hour automobile trip from Shanghai, 
fields of yellow-flowered rape and winding ditches appear 
everywhere. This is a fine river and lake region south of the 
Chang Jiang. This tract of rape is awaiting the arrival of a 
foreign trader to develop it for a factory site. Fuch'ang 
Textiles, Liuho Machinery, Nanhsin Electronics, and Amalgamated 
Enterprises from Taiwan have all established plants here. 
  The 42 year-old Cheng Pao-t'ang from Jumbo Industries in 
Taiwan is in charge of nine cadres who are in process of 
building a factory that will produce 1.5 million bicycles per 
year (to reach in a single action a scale that took 21 years in 
Taiwan). 
  Today is Sunday. It is also the national anniversary of the 
Republic of China. Very early in the morning, Cheng Pao-t'ang 
listens to a radio broadcast from Taiwan, but the signal is 
jammed. But work is more important than anything else, so the 
holiday-less Cheng went on patrol at the plant site very early 
to solve problems as they occurred. At 5:30 every morning, he 
climbs to the top of a hill alone. At 7:30, he goes to work, and 
at 10:00 or 11:00 o'clock at night, he is on plant patrol. 
  Because of the press of work, Cheng Pao-t'ang does not think 
of his aged parents or his three growing daughters back in 
Tachia Town in Taiwan. He says, "We started from scratch here. 
It is a mission and a challenge." Nevertheless, looking out into 
the twilight outside the office window, he cannot help but 
frequently wipe away tears from behind his spectacles because he 
is unable to look after his parents and daughters. Returning to 
the dormitory, he eats dinner with 10 cadres sent from Taiwan. 
In order to welcome the guests, he has specially bought Dazha 
crabs from Yangcheng Lake in Kunshan for dinner. One of the 
group, a 30-some year old cadre remembers the famous remark of 
chairman of the board Liu Chin-piao: "Males have to be ruthless 
to succeed." The homesickness of the group is assuaged only by 
this sentence of the boss. 
  The leftover contestants apartments in Beijing's Olympic 
Village have now become high quality apartments leased to 
foreign firms. 
  The 10 cadres in Beijing live a collective bachelor life 
here. "The general managers of a Chongqing plant and a Chengdu 
plant, which are under construction, also live here. They go to 
work and come back from work together, and after eating the 
evening meal, their sole common topic is the amounts completed. 
  Around 8 o'clock on this night, general manager Chang 
Sheng-chi receives a telephone call from Tianjin for the 
purchase of some instant noodles. Since they began to go into 
production at the beginning of the year, one after another of 
the wholesalers in north China have lined up, cash in hand, to 
buy them. They have come from Tianjin, Jinan, and even as far 
away as Harbin. "The figures are what keep the five of us 
going," says Chang Sheng-chi, who comes from Tainan, but who 
already speaks with a Beijing accent after living in Beijing for 
a year. 
  Scene 3. Exploring the North 
  It takes about two hours to go from Beijing to Tianjin via 
the newly opened express highway. 
  The port of Tanggu in the Tanggu district of Tianjin on 
Bohai 
Bay is a coal exporting port. The smell of coal is everywhere, 
and yellow saline soil is everywhere too, just waiting for 
someone to reclaim it. 
  A Taiwan trader in Tanggu claims to have inside information 
that direct flights will begin between Tianjin and Taipei in May 
1994. The Tianjin Municipal Government has already drawn up 
beautiful long-range plans for the yellow soil that include a 
financial zone, an industrial zone, and economic relations and 
trade zone. 
  The Tianjin Huana International Vacation Village Company is 
developing a golf course in the planned financial district. All 
around is yellow mud. It is difficult to envision this areas as 
a bustling financial services area, and it is also very 
difficult to envision a golf course in a financial services 
area. A Taiwan trader in Tianjin said incredulously, "Tianjin 
freezes in winter. How can grass be grown?" Pointing to a barren 
tract beside him, The Huana general manager, Lin T'ien-chueh, 
who comes from Taiwan, said happily, "We open next year. Pretty 
soon, three regiments of people's armed police, 3,000 men in 
each regiment, will be working three shifts a day on this 
construction site. Within a short time, the dust will be flying 
as huge forces battle night and day like tanks in a decisive 
battle." The most dangerous places are the safest places and 
vice versa. The more chaotic a place, the easier to see 
opportunities for discussions. 
  On the mainland, some Taiwan firms like Huana dare to take 
risks to overcome difficulties. They are taking the route of 
armed forces and people's armed police. Lin T'ien-chueh has 
asked the director of the Chinese Communist Hainan Island 
Office, Li Da-xiao to take charge of the work. His units are 
also a part of the Chinese Communist military's benefit 
protection group. Li Da-xiao says in an aside: "Taiwan is part 
of China. When Taiwan compatriots come here to work, they are 
returning to the motherland to engage in construction. They are 
developing strength for the motherland." 
<H5>  Starting Life Over Again </H5>
  Lin I-liang, the Tianjin general manager of Unity, which is 
located not far distant, who came to Tianjin just half a year 
ago, saw his life go from simplicity to complexity. Formerly, 
his life centered around Tainan County and Tainan City. His life 
was extremely simple. All he had to do was tend to his work, and 
all was well. 
  Now, he has to make sure that mainland staff and workers do 
not smoke or spit in the plant, and he has to remove refuse from 
the plant area to turn it into a garden with a wayside pavilion. 
(Unity in Tianjin is a joint venture with the old flour mill 
owned by the Tianjin Sugar Refinery.) Lin I-liang hopes to turn 
into magic the mess that exists in the plant area's 
refuse-filled out of the way corners. 
  When he was a manager in Tainan, he often spent his spare 
time drinking tea and chewing the rag with several good friends. 
Now, on his day off, he plays golf with ranking Tianjin cadres 
to talk about matters. "They really treat me very well. We are 
on very close terms," says Lin I-liang from whose mouth Taiwan 
dialect formerly issued, but from which the tongue-twisting 
Beijing dialect now comes. 
  At dusk, Lin I-liang carries back to his hotel for the 
evening meal some cold food that the plant cook made for lunch. 
"When I went to work for Unity at age 26, I gave my all for the 
job. Now that I have to give my all on the mainland at age 50, 
it's really strenuous." He sighed saying, "Since I signed on to 
this ship, I have to figure out a way to make it run." 
  Like it or not, people traveling from Taiwan to the mainland 
to work is an irresistible trend. For the next generation, daddy 
will no longer just not come home for dinner, but he will spend 
the whole year on the mainland. The understanding of the next 
generation that is educated in Taiwan will begin to be confused. 
The textbooks may call the Chinese Communists communist bandits, 
but daddy will have gone to do business with the communist 
bandits. 
  Actually, economics knows no national boundaries. Nor can 
firms who seek continuous growth easily put their country ahead 
of profits. The amount of Taiwan firms' investment in the 
mainland during 1992 was second only to their investment in Hong 
Kong and Macao. It was greater than their investment in either 
the United States or Japan. 
  An Min says that as of now, Taiwan firms have formally 
invested in a nominal 12,000 different projects on the mainland 
totaling nearly $11 billion. If the unofficial projects are 
added in (investment by Taiwan firms registered under foreign 
firm names), the number is 20,000. 
  The statement of a Beijing official has the typical Chinese 
great nation haughty tone. He said, "Forty years ago Taiwan 
carried away a lot of gold from China. It is only right that it 
should return to the motherland to make a contribution now." As 
he continued to speak, he happily revealed a secret. He recently 
signed contacts with two big Taiwan firms. 
<H5>  The Ever-Increasing Investment Craze </H5>
  The speed and intensity of Taiwan firms investment in the 
mainland is like the spread of lotuses on the Kaohsiung River. 
Overnight the lotuses choke the river creating a peril. 
  Zhang Zhiqun, director of the Taiwan Affairs Office in the 
Shanghai Municipal People's Government pointed out that since 
Deng Xiaoping's travels in south China during 1992, Taiwan 
firms' investment in Shanghai has increased enormously. During 
1992 alone their investment was greater than the total for the 
previous 10 years, and investment during the first half of 1993 
has been greater than for all of 1992. 
  The scale of investment is also becoming greater and 
greater. 
An Min, who remembers figures very clearly, said that not only 
has the level of technology risen, but the average per project 
investment has also increased from $900,000 prior to 1991 to $1 
million today. When Taiwan firms invest in the mainland, they 
bring the quintessence of concentrated experiences to the 
mainland. The scale of their plants is absolutely several times 
what it is in Taiwan, and the equipment is also new and better. 
  Take the Yuyuan Shoe Company, a mainland joint venture of 
Taiwan's P'ao-cheng Shoe Company and a Hong Kong firm, which set 
up the Yuyuan Shoe Factory in Dongguan before the June 4th 
incident of 1989. The plant area, which is located on a river, 
occupies an entire street and has 20,000 staff members and 
workers. It is more imposing than Taiwan's nearly 10,000 
employee China Steel Plant. What was "Taiwan's best" a decade 
ago, has moved here. Pao-cheng's plant at Zhongshan in Guangdong 
is even larger with 50,000 staff members and workers. Its Zhuhai 
plant has 5,000 staff members and workers. Yuyuan Shoe 
Enterprises is now listed on the Hong Kong stock market. 
  Within just two years, Unity Enterprises has also set up 
seven bases on the mainland. A cadre in a mainland general 
merchandise and textiles group explained why investment in the 
mainland is becoming greater and greater and deeper and deeper: 
"In the beginning, investors were fearful. After the situation 
became somewhat clearer, investment became greater and greater," 
she said. 
  We know when the enemy does not know. The mainland 
authorities know all about Taiwan firms' investments. Taiwan's 
Straits Exchange Foundation made 100 speeches during the first 
half of 1993 in which it called upon firms to augment the 
registration of Taiwan firms' investment in the mainland, but no 
more than 12,000 projects were registered. 
  At the end of October, Taiwan's Ministry of Economic Affairs 
announced the astounding results of a survey. Citing the results 
of a Ministry of Economic Affairs "survey report of the 
operating intentions of manufacturing industries," for 5,000 
manufacturing firms, it said that during the past three years 64 
percent of the domestic concerns that invested had invested in 
mainland China. 
  According to central bank statistics, during the past four 
years, more than $10 billion has flowed out of Taiwan to the 
mainland, but only slightly more than $6 billion has flowed from 
the mainland to Taiwan. This is an adverse balance of more than 
$5 billion. 
  The frequency of Taiwan firms' economic relations and trade 
between the two sides of the Taiwan Straits has tightly bound 
Taiwan's and the mainland's economic contacts into a destiny 
community. Hong Kong Chinese University researcher, Chien 
I-yuan, has found that Taiwan showed a $9.48 billion favorable 
balance of trade for 1992. Its favorable balance of trade with 
Hong Kong amounted to $13.6 billion. Without its favorable 
balance of trade with Hong Kong, Taiwan would show an 
unfavorable balance of $4.1 billion. 
  Unless one goes to China, it is difficult to understand why 
Taiwan firms want to go so far from home to invest in the 
mainland. What one sees on the mainland is everyone focusing on 
money. There is a general determination to battle their way out 
of poverty. From north to south, everywhere large tracts of land 
beckon. Any time of the day one can see crowded, impoverished 
masses telling people they need work. 
  A mainland survey shows 20 million staff members and 
workers, 
and their families, have a monthly income of only 50 yuan (about 
NT$200). They live in poverty. 
  Many state-owned enterprises cannot continue operation. 
Every 
unit must think of ways to create income in order to sustain 
itself. Some state-owned units have also allowed people to leave 
their posts (leave their jobs temporarily) to get a fresh start. 
One Shanghai intellectual said that a Shanghai textile mill has 
cut half of its staff and workers. Even research units like the 
Shanghai Social Sciences Institute have let go one fourth of 
their staff members and workers. 
  Boundless land and unlimited manpower is what Taiwan does 
not 
have, and these are also powerful attractions for Taiwan traders 
to invest in the mainland. 
  Following the travels of Deng Xiaoping in south China in 
1992, the China mainland clearly announced that reform and 
opening to the outside world would continue unchanged for 100 
years. This more powerfully attracted Taiwan traders to go to 
the mainland. At the same time, Taiwan was endlessly quarreling 
over political rights issues; no clear-cut and concrete economic 
policy was in sight; and no fresh political climate or quality 
of life was provided. 
  Roaming Mainland China north and south in a strong search 
for 
growth opportunities has taken deep root in the minds of Taiwan 
traders. While Taiwan was marking time in place, many Taiwan 
traders regarded opening up new territory on the mainland as an 
experience and a challenge. 
<H5>  Risk Taker's Paradise </H5>
  The China mainland is also a risk taker's paradise. People 
can come here to try out new brands. Unity, whose "Chef Kang's" 
Instant Noodles have the greatest brand name recognition on the 
mainland, does not produce instant noodles in Taiwan. On Taiwan, 
Unity is a food giant, but on the mainland everyone can begin to 
compete from a zero starting point. 
  On the matter of profits and losses, a conclusion is very 
difficult. In some cases, losses have mounted, but others say 
they recovered their principle within three years. In most 
cases, however, more and more investment and more and more 
expansion is required. Some firms have expanded southward. An 
example is "Chef Kang," which started out in Tianjin and Jinan, 
and which is now looking for a plant site in Guangdong. Some 
have expanded from the seacoast inland. An example is Chun-t'ai 
Shoe Industries, which expanded from Dongguan and Qingdao to 
Chengdu. Unity Enterprises has cast its net everywhere, east and 
west, north and south. 
  Just as enterprises must grow, people must also have a sense 
of accomplishment. "Taiwan has a lot more brilliant people than 
the mainland, but I can realize my dream here," said Lin 
T'ien-chueh, a Taiwan trader in Tianjin from Taiwan's Lien-t'ai 
Gongguan. "A person always hopes to leave behind something that 
will not be easily forgotten." Lin T'ien-chueh's feelings are 
typical of Taiwan traders. 
  Taiwan traders appeals to Taiwan traders is another reason 
for the snowballing increase in the number of Taiwan traders 
investing in the mainland. At the present time, Tianjin has 
1,200 Taiwan firms. Lin T'ien-chueh has steadily acquainted 
Taiwan traders with investment in Tianjin. Lin T'ien-chueh said 
that Ch'eng-chou Electronics, T'ien-sheng Ying-chia Radio 
Telephone, Jou-Ch'ing Facial Tissue, and T'ai-chung Precision 
Machines all have Tianjin investment plans. 
  Investment also has a mass psychology aspect: "A large group 
of Taiwan traders, Japanese, and Koreans are aboard an airplane. 
If the Taiwan traders do not come, the mainland will develop 
without them," said Ch'en Te-hsing, chairman of the board of 
Fuch'ang Textiles, which is well-known for the production of 
high quality ready-made clothing, as he sits in Shanghai's old 
Mianjiang Hotel eating Dazha crabs while listening to Strauss 
piano music. This also explains why Taiwan traders are flocking 
to the mainland. 
  Ch'en Te-hsing, who was introduced by a professional 
colleague who invested in Fuzhou early, recently began a 
cooperative venture with the Shanghai Jinshan Petrochemical 
Plant for the production of ready made clothing. He went into 
business with it because his professional colleague's 
cooperation with it had been happy. 
  If a business does not move ahead it moves backward. 
Businessmen find marking time in place very difficult to bear. 
The deputy manager of Unity Enterprises in Beijing, Lin Fang-i, 
said that "Business must continue to go on. They should not come 
here because they cannot succeed elsewhere. They must come to 
make their business grow." Standing at the Unity Industries 
plant, which is beginning to rise on the salt lands, the place 
seems familiar to him. it is because the heads of the Tainan 
group come from the saline lands of Beimen Village in Tainan 
County. 
<H5>  The Hope of Setting Up Shop </H5>
  The lure of the mainland market of 1.2 billion people is 
hard 
to resist. Furthermore, although mainland per capita income is 
low, 980 million people on the mainland have annual incomes of 
$7,000 or more. "I would be happy doing business with just 50 
million people," one Taiwan trader said. 
  "The interesting thing about the mainland is that one cannot 
look at it in terms of Taiwan's experience. All the finest 
things in the world occur here," said Sung T'ieh-ming, the 
chairman of the board of Taiwan Aomei and of China Aomei. What 
he means by the Taiwan experience is step-by-step development. 
On the mainland, the gap between the poor and the rich is wide, 
the land is vast, the population is large, and it is both 
extremely poor and extremely rich all at the same time. 
  The mainland's internal and external sales market holds 
boundless charm, but management problems are numerous. 
  If one went to the mainland in 1989 (before the 4 June 
Incident), and then went back four years later, even though the 
mainland's basic problems (population, and education) still 
remained, the speed with which several locations in coastal 
areas are prospering would astound one. The Shanghai subway, 
which was started later than Taipei's, had trains running on a 
section in less than a year. 
  One can see everywhere on the China mainland the expression 
of Deng Xiaoping's statement that "without reform and opening to 
the outside world, China faces a dead end." 
  This clear-cut policy is being put into effect by Taiwan 
traders. 
  One can see Taiwan products everywhere on the mainland. 
Above 
Beijing railroad station, Wei-ch'uan Food Products' large yellow 
balloons frequently sway in the air. On signs at bus stops along 
straight and long eastern Changan Avenue, Unity Instant Noodles 
also proclaim their good taste. Beside the airport, a Lien-hua 
Electronics Corporation sign, which declares itself to be 
China's Largest Integrated Circuit Plant shares its glory with 
tourists coming and going. On Shanghai's most crowded street, 
Nanjing Road East, Acer Computer's neon sign adds brilliance to 
the night scene. 
  Until relations between both sides of the straight are 
clarified, propelled by profit, Taiwan firms will dare to go the 
limit. Many people question whether firms interests are the same 
as the country's interests. Many worries are cropping up... 
<H5>  Do Firms Have No Motherland? </H5>
  "If things go on this way, Taiwan will be hollowed out," 
said 
Wu T'u, the manager of the Hong Kong branch of South China Bank 
with extreme concern. Like other Taiwan banks, South China Bank 
went to Hong Kong to handle the letters of hypothedation of 
Taiwan firms that went to the mainland. The Hong Kong branch, 
which opened for business only in September, brought in 1,300 
customers within a month. Wu T'u has grounds for being worried. 
  He said that in Shenzhen alone there are more than 1,000 
Taiwan firms, and nearly 1,000 in Dongguan. "A small area has so 
many Taiwan firms, and China is so big..." Hong Kong Chinese 
University researcher Chien I-yuan conducted an analysis in 
terms of economic theory that shows how Taiwan's economy may be 
sucked dry. 
  Chien I-yuan said that national income is the mark of 
economic strength, and that national income is the sum total of 
consumption, civilian investment, government expenditures and 
exports minus imports. The reduced investment in Taiwan may 
produce a domino effect. If employment opportunities decrease 
and consumption decreases along with it, and if government 
revenues decrease, and if their is an outflow of capital, in 
particular, public finance will become increasingly distressed. 
"Unless Taiwan reinvigorates its economy, Taiwan will really be 
sucked dry, and the economy will be done for." Looking at the 
Wanchai sea front in Hong Kong, Chien I-yuan could not help 
sighing, "Should Wang Yung-ch'ing [3769 3057 1987] go to the 
mainland, Taiwan will be really dry." 
  Many Taiwan firms are not that pessimistic. They feel that 
the money will return to Taiwan. The roots remain in Taiwan. 
  A Hong Kong financier does not feel this way. His analysis 
is 
that the China mainland is formidable. So many Taiwan firms go 
to the mainland, a small number of them failing. But how will 
the steady expansion and the deepening investment of Taiwan 
firms in the mainland turn? The mainland began by providing 
concessions in coastal areas to attract foreign firms, and now 
it is providing concessions inland. Taiwan firms cannot stand 
such deadly temptation. "Taiwan firms themselves know very well 
what they should do, but they do not do it. If they return to 
Taiwan, they cannot survive," this financier pointed out. 
  Chien I-yuan's analysis is that Taiwan firms entered the 
China mainland because they were "attracted from the outside and 
pushed from the inside." By attracted from the outside he means 
the Chinese mainland's large land area, cheap labor, and policy 
of openness. By pushed from the inside he means Taiwan's 
insufficient land and manpower, an inefficient administrative 
system, and deterioration of the social order. One after 
another, Taiwan firms took the course of seeking a second youth 
on the mainland. The taking away of capital has already resulted 
in a capital shortage in Taiwan, which delays the upgrading of 
Taiwan's industry. 
<H5>  Domino Effect </H5>
  One can already see some evidence of the impact on Taiwan of 
the departure of Taiwan firms. 
  Without manufacturing industries, there can be no service 
businesses. 
  One Taiwan financier pointed out that with the departure of 
Taiwan firms, finance and banking shrivels more and more. 
  Formerly, finance and banking grew at a 2 to 3 percent rate. 
With the departure of Taiwan firms today and the increase in new 
banks, local banks find it increasingly difficult to operate. 
Consequently, they have begun to pressure the government. Banks 
want to enter the stock market. 
  The departure of Taiwan firms has also produced a marked 
slump in the advertising business. A person from Associated 
Advertising said that in order to invest in the mainland, it is 
very easy for Taiwan firms to cut their Taiwan advertising 
budgets, because by cutting their advertising budget by NT$30 
million, they can invest in a plant on the mainland. 
  When Taiwan firms invest in the mainland, human talent is 
also replaced. One Taiwan trader noted that in the future when 
local mainlanders are able to take over in Taiwan firms' 
mainland plants, Taiwan cadres will be replaced. This will mean 
a substitution of human talent. 
  More frightening is the clash between businessmen's 
interests 
and the national interest. 
  Chang Jung-fang [1728 2837 0023] of the China Economics 
Institute pointed out that Taiwan's present mainland economic 
relations and trade policy is the public policy about which 
there has been the most controversy and the least consensus for 
the past more than 40 years. 
  Both sides of the Straits conceal the benefit from their 
frequent economic and trade contacts. 
  However, because of the Chinese Communist's strong political 
goals whereby administration is legalized rule of men, not only 
is Taiwan's political sovereignty threatened, but economically 
though "Taiwan traders may benefit for a short time, they will 
not necessarily benefit over a long period," said one observer. 
  Chang Jung-Fang noted that under the one-country two-systems 
policy goal, the Chinese Communists are actively employing 
economic and trade methods, and the intensification of economic 
and trade relations between the two sides of the Straits to 
attain the goal of unification. Once Taiwan's economic chip and 
advantage continues to erode, Taiwan's security coefficient will 
inevitably decline. 
<H5>  Who Bears Responsibility? </H5>
  In a report, Chang Jung-Fang said that a Chinese Communist 
internal document said explicitly that "our trade with Taiwan is 
for the purpose of promoting economic contacts between the 
mainland and Taiwan to unite industrial and commercial circles 
in Taiwan to create conditions for the unification of the 
motherland." This report pointed out that the Chinese 
Communist's present method is to hope to combine with Taiwan 
traders, to use the people to pressure officials, and to use 
businessmen to encircle the government, and to use Taiwan 
businessmen's expectations that the three opens [the opening of 
postal, trade, and navigational ties between Taiwan and Mainland 
China] will lower costs as a motivation for forcing Taiwan to 
accept a one China principle. This is tantamount to businessmen 
transferring external costs to the backs of 20 million people in 
order to benefit themselves (when costs occur for which they 
themselves are not required to bear responsibility). 
  In reality, Chinese Communist activities inside Taiwan have 
not relaxed with advances in relations between the two sides of 
the Straits. They have only changed from an effort to take the 
island in one big gulp to nibbling away. The China mainland has 
never abandoned Taiwan. In Beijing An Min said, today there is 
no talk of force against Taiwan, but overall one may say that we 
are duty-bound to defend the territory of the country! Some 
people believe optimistically that Taiwan traders may spread 
Taiwan's experiences on the mainland, or use economic strength 
to transform the mainland peacefully. 
  The fact is that the longer Taiwan traders stay there, the 
more uneasy they become. In a society that depends on the rule 
of men, commerce has no guarantees. Taiwan traders who have just 
arrived on the mainland, particularly in north China, feel that 
high ranking characters are very friendly and are on very good 
terms with them. However, the longer they stay in the south, the 
more disappointed they become. In Guangdong Province, for 
example, although they sign agreements to lease plant buildings 
for 10 years, they are forced to move in less than four. In 
addition, after several years, the price of land for which an 
agreement has been signed may be raised and more rent collected. 
PLA units may drive vehicles into the plant at any time before 
the New Year to ask for goods free of charge. When a Taiwan 
trader is killed on the mainland, the Chinese Communists "may 
brazenly refuse to provide particulars of the case," one Taiwan 
trader complained. 
  Even though Taiwan traders in various places have tried to 
organize Taiwan trader associations, the Chinese Communist's 
Taiwan office either wanted to take part, or refused approval. 
One Taiwan trader said the Taiwan Office "only approved lateral, 
but not vertical ties" among Taiwan traders in all 
jurisdictions. People who have had no contacts with the 
Communists find it difficult to understand the experiences that 
the Chinese Communists have accumulated during the past half 
century, or the number of stages in united front work. One high 
ranking official in united front work directed against Taiwan 
said that the Chinese Communist's united front tactic throughout 
has been, first, to make friends to win confidence, and then do 
"work." 
<H5>  No Distinction Between Politics and Economics </H5>
  A Japanese commentator who visited a finance and economics 
official in Taiwan said that Taiwan has always maintained the 
inseparability of politics and economics, but as the Chinese 
Communist economy has begun to become strong in recent years, 
its political attitude has begun to harden. It began with the 
nuclear testing in Xinjiang... Actually, Chinese Communist 
officials plan to dovetail economically with the world, but they 
do not want to dovetail ideologically with the world. 
  In Beijing during October, signs about bringing the Olympic 
Games were still up, and the express highway from the airport to 
downtown Beijing, which was completed more than a year ago, was 
built to obtain the right to sponsor the Olympic Games in 2000. 
Finally, when the opportunity was lost because of the human 
rights issue, people in Beijing were infuriated. An Min said 
angrily, "Today's world is not a fair world. The Olympic Games 
standards are the white man's standards." By comparison with the 
mainland, Taipei's ideological standards are closer to the world 
standards. 
  Every time they return to Taipei, many Taiwan traders feel 
much more relaxed as soon as they step from the airplane, 
because they can breathe a free atmosphere. If you stand back a 
little to look at Taiwan, you see that it has some valuable 
things: its atmosphere is becoming increasingly free; it better 
respects human rights; and it has greater freedom of the press. 
  One problem is that ever since the lifting of martial law, 
Taiwan has stagnated for a very long time. This applies to 
economic reform, to political clean-up, to National Assembly 
efficiency, and to the quality of life. 
  One Taiwan trader in Hong Kong suggested that the Taiwan 
government should wake up to the present state of affairs. It 
should talk less and do more. National Assembly efficiency, in 
particular, should be improved greatly... Taiwan needs more 
self-examination and action. 
  If it is to retain Taiwan firms, Taiwan has to provide an 
environment that permits the rapid growth of enterprises, 
particularly for the countless medium and small enterprises. It 
must permit the people to live reasonable and tranquil lives. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20472 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar016___94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-016 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Prospects, Disappointments of Taiwan Traders </TI></H3>
<H4>   Unexpected Problems, Hidden Costs </H4>
<F P=102> 94CE0279D Taipei TIEN-HSIA [COMMONWEALTH] in Chinese No 12, 
1 Dec 93 pp 52-53 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0279D </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei TIEN-HSIA [COMMONWEALTH] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhuang Su-yu (5445 4790 3768): "Three Big </F>
Problems Taiwan Traders Face on the Mainland: Public Order, 
Management, and Hidden Costs"] 
  [Text] The speed and intensity with which Taiwan 
traders have invested in the mainland has increased manifold, 
and the scale is also becoming greater and greater. What are the 
greatest operating difficulties faced by countless Taiwan 
traders speaking the same language and of the same race, but who 
have a different system than the mainland? 
<H5>  Public Order </H5>
  Every Taiwan trader on the mainland has his own story to 
tell. In addition to the opeating difficulties they face, their 
persons and their property are most frequently threatened. 
  When Taiwan traders, who dislike and try to avoid poor 
public 
order in Taiwan, leave home to go to the mainland, the public 
problems they face there are even worse. The China mainland has 
a two-track society. Not only is there a wide gap between the 
rich and the poor there, but the gap in the standard of living 
between the two sides of the Straits is even greater. 
Furthermore, some Taiwan traders spend too freely on the 
mainland. Their automobile and their clothing are too 
ostentatious, and their haughty behavior even more provokes 
scoundrels. 
  The farther south one goes in China, the worse public order 
becomes. In Baoan County, where Shenzhen is located, in 
particular, Taiwan traders' plants are frequently robbed or 
extorted by hooligans. On payday, workers are also frequently 
robbed. Many Taiwan traders like to keep anti-riot rifles, gas 
pistols, stun batons, and knives or daggers in their factories, 
beside their beds, or in their automobiles. Wu Sheng-shun, the 
director of the Shenzhen Taiwan Traders' Association, is now 
organizing a peace preservation team in Buji Town. Local foreign 
merchants have put up money to protect themselves. 
  An underworld has emerged on the mainland. On 2 October, a 
48 
man gang headed by the local underworld leader "Feizaiqiang" 
attacked and killed three Taiwan traders. One of the Taiwan 
traders was stabbed 19 times on the highway. These three 
traders were heads of the local "Treasure Island Amusement 
City." This atrocity resulted less than one week after the 
opening because the entrance fee was too expensive (2,500 yuan 
-- the equivalent of NT$9,000 -- for an hour of karaoke), and 
because of haughty behavior. 
  One local Taiwan trader said that the backers of Treasure 
Island Entertainment City were a group of Taiwan shoe firms. 
This Taiwan trader also said that "Feizaiqiang" had gone to 
Taiwan where he had been wined and dined by these shoe firms. 
Because these shoe firms were also his mainland karaoke 
partners, this Taiwan trader asked that Taiwan traders on the 
mainland stick to running good businesses, because the 
entertainment business inevitably became connected with the 
underworld and sex. "If this continues," he said, "it can only 
make relations between the two sides of the Straits more and 
more tense." 
  In order to protect themselves, some Taiwan traders have no 
choice but to improve their contacts with the military and the 
people's armed police. They forge links with mainland military 
and with intelligence and public order units. One observer asked 
with a sigh why one chooses such a hard way to make money. 
  One Taiwan trader said that on no account should one believe 
a mainland employee. They are really infuriating. They can only 
do one thing at a time, and they are fond of eating but averse 
to work. Do not put them in charge, and do not let them do any 
purchasing, because they are so incredibly poor they will cheat 
you blind. 
  After 40 years of separation, people's thinking, value 
concepts, and working spirit are very different on the two sides 
of the Straits. The attitude of the above Taiwan trader, for 
example, is the typical attitude of a Taiwan trader toward 
mainland employees. In adhering to China's distinctive brand of 
socialism, Deng Xiaoping stresses that without reform and 
opening to the outside world, China will face only a dead end. 
In accordance with this principle, large numbers of foreign 
traders have been brought into the country. However, an eating 
out of a large common pot psychology persists among employees 
who expect the same benefits no matter their performance. 
  From top to bottom, the Chinese Communists believe that 
Taiwan's success during the past 40 years is attributable to 
"Chiang Kai-shek's movement of large quantities of gold, so now 
Taiwan naturally should make a contribution to the motherland." 
Very few realize that Taiwan's success is due to making an 
all-out effort, hard work, and frugality. 
  A Taiwan trader in Kunshan, Suzhou said that he has spent a 
large amount of time explaining that Taiwan's success is 
attributable to hard work and frugality. A Taiwan trader in 
Shanghai said that mainland people are rather short-sighted. 
They are rather impetuous. They want to reach the heights in a 
single step. 
  Because of the difference in thinking, many Taiwan traders 
spend a lot of time on education and training. They generally 
feel that mainland vocational education, working spirit, and job 
education are inferior to Taiwan's. Consequently, they spend a 
great deal of time on education, training and transplanting the 
business culture of the parent corporation in Taiwan. Factories 
are filled with posters on the five C's (checking, cleanliness, 
collating, and consolidation). "The number of Taiwan cadres is 
small, so who will influence whom? Work here requires stamina 
and fortitude," said Ch'en Sen-yen, deputy manager of China 
Chieh-an-t'e [phonetic]. 
<H5>  Hidden Costs </H5>
  Land and manpower are the major elements attracting Taiwan 
trader investment. The problem is, they are not necessarily 
cheap. Behind the scenes lurk numerous hidden costs. 
  Some Taiwan traders describe these hidden costs as "a hidden 
man in the mirror" who may jump out at you at any time. 
  The mainland is essentially a country ruled by men rather 
than by laws; consequently, good relations with all sorts of 
administrative personnel and ranking cadres is very important. 
One Taiwan trader in north China said that he has spent a lot of 
time and money on public relations. One must have good public 
relations with high cadres, their families, and even their 
chauffeurs. The salty land where he was located had no telephone 
wires, but thanks to his good public relations efforts, 
telephone lines were connected. 
  Very many things on the mainland over which one has no 
control constitute an even greater hidden cost. A chauffeur in 
Beijing said that there are no standards for many things on the 
mainland. "Someone may say something may be done, so even if it 
may not be done, it may still be done; or he may say it may be 
done, so even if it may not be done, it may still be done." One 
Taiwan trader said that on the mainland many things cannot be 
done on time, and having a contract makes no difference. Also, 
"if someone says he has a contact who can get things done, he 
probably does not have a contact; if he says he has no contact, 
he probably does have a contact." Contracts signed with the 
Chinese Communist government are not necessarily valid. The 
farther south one goes in China, the earlier Taiwan traders 
invested there, and the earlier such problems surface. In 
October, for example, a Taiwan trader in Shenzhen was suddenly 
informed that his previously signed rental lease was invalid and 
that he would have to pay more rent. Great changes occur that 
one cannot predict. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20473 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar016___94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-016 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Prospects, Disappointments of Taiwan Traders </TI></H3>
<H4>   Complaints From One Trader </H4>
<F P=102> 94CE0279E Taipei TIEN-HSIA [COMMONWEALTH] in Chinese No 12, 
1 Dec 93 pp 54-55, 60 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0279E </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei TIEN-HSIA [COMMONWEALTH] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article: "A Taiwan Traders' Complaint: Is It Hard For a </F>
Person To Do Business Elsewhere?" 
  [Text] Everyone says the mainland is good: There is 
plenty of manpower, cheap land, and a vast market; it is a good 
place for Taiwan traders to continue to grow and make money. 
  Is this true? What do Taiwan traders who have invested in 
the 
mainland say? 
  Cheng Pao-t'ang [6774 1405 1016] (General Manager, China 
Giant) 
<H5>  This Is No Return Home </H5>
  It is very hard going here. Very hard going. People who 
haven't come to the mainland do not appreciate just how hard 
going it is here. Here, you cannot look at the mainland with a 
Taiwan outlook. Doing things here with a Taiwan point of view 
does not work. 
  But if you want to come here to complain, then don't come 
here. This is because the system that has existed on the 
mainland for the past 40 years has bred a large common pot 
mentality in which everyone expects the same benefits no matter 
his or her work. Different environments have bred different 
value concepts. One cannot say that theirs are wrong. Since they 
are people, and people's natures are different, there are no 
rights and wrongs about cultural matters. But standards should 
be improved. For example, people over here do not do things on 
time and they do not keep promises. They should be trained to do 
things on time and to keep promises, and they should may 
attention to sanitation. 
  Mainland employees follow instructions, but their thinking 
and outlook is different. You have to spend a lot of time 
explaining things to them. 
  I came here in August 1992, and we are still building a 
factory. I open my eyes at 5:30 every morning and climb to the 
top of a hill alone. At 7:00 o'clock I eat breakfast, and at 
7:30 I go to the office. I work until 7:00 p.m. Then I return to 
my dormitory to eat dinner. At 9:00 or 10:00 o'clock at night, I 
often return to the plant area on patrol. 
  Although I am only a junior middle school graduate, I have 
always believed that a person should have a desire to learn. 
After graduating, I worked in the underworld, and as a 
pharmacist in a clinic. I was 24 years old before I entered 
Jumbo where I worked as head of the model car manufacturing 
department, head of the warehouse receiving department, head of 
the issuing department, and head of the painting department. I 
also served as head of the on-site manufacturing section, in 
general affairs, and in procurement, and on up to the manager of 
the materials department. 
<H5>  Both a Challenge and a Mission </H5>
  When the company asked me to become the Giant general 
manager 
in China, I wrestled with the matter for several months, finally 
deciding to come. I did not want to let the board of directors 
down after the many years they had invested in me. It was also 
an opportunity for me to move upward in the company and to 
expand my horizons. So I came to the mainland to give my all. It 
became my second youth. 
  At first, in the quiet the night, I frequently wept thinking 
about my family. I felt very sad that my children were so small, 
but I could not be with them to help them grow up. I had three 
small children studying in middle school and primary school. It 
was the period of their schooling. When I was at home, they 
often asked me questions. Whenever they saw something, they 
asked about it. Now I was unable to perform my duty as head of 
the family. 
  My father lost a leg in an automobile accident, and my 
mother 
has diabetes. In order for me to come to the mainland, I asked 
by younger brother to resign from his job in Taipei and move 
back to Ta-chia to look after our two parents. 
  Coming here takes physical strength and stamina. One has to 
work hard. When I return to Taiwan for 10 days every 3 months, I 
am sure to help the children polish their bicycles. 
  I thought about sending the children over here for an 
education, but in Taiwan, the savior of the people is Chiang 
Kai-shek. On the mainland, it is Mao Zedong... I often explain 
to the children what daddy's thinking is, and why I want to go 
to the mainland. When I first came here, I was very happy at 
returning to Taiwan each time, but now it is agonizing to 
return, because there is so much to be looked after here. The 
employees here are ignorant about bicycles. They have to be 
looked after and taught. 
  I am very sad at heart at coming here, because coming here 
is 
no returning home, and because my tour of duty is open-ended. 
Coming here is a challenge and a mission. 
<H5>  Anonymous Taiwan Trader: Everything Is a Swindle </H5>
  When you operate a factory on the mainland, very many people 
collect money under very many guises. Someone may suddenly come 
to collect a cleaning fee. Never mind the reason given, if they 
want to collect it, they collect it. Here fees for public order 
are also levied by the head, and the Customs also frequently 
makes things difficult for Taiwan traders. They like to cause 
trouble for no reason at all, suddenly issuing fines of tens of 
thousands of yuan. During one Mid-autumn Festival, I spent 
15,000 yuan on dinner parties and gift giving. They often say 
that we are the most stingy, but since we are not engaged in 
smuggling, why should we give dinner parties? There are very 
many bogus joint ventures here that are actually sole 
proprietorships. When paying employees their salaries, you have 
to turn over Hong Kong dollars to the joint venture unit first; 
then, they pay the employees in renminbi, benefitting from the 
difference in the exchange rate. 
  Here, management is the biggest headache. The workers here 
stonewall each other and are fond of quarrelling. This is very 
hard to deal with. Communism rules here. Using democratic 
methods to operate is impossible. One has to use forceful means. 
During my first year, I used Taiwan's humane management methods, 
which failed miserably. The following year, I changed. I used 
dictatorial management. I changed to arbitrary management. 
  Here I found everything is a swindle. I have yet to meet a 
good person. There is no way to defend yourself against it. When 
we first set up the factory, they helped with everything, and I 
felt they were very good. But after two or three years, things 
are not the same. 
  When I was in Taiwan, I did not take medicine for three 
years, but since coming here, I take medicine every day, and 
every two or three days, I have to have a shot. 
  Criminals are beginning to appear here. Ranking cadres can 
also earn money easily. 
  One ranking cadre runs a gambling parlor. One has seven 
automobiles, two of them Rolls Royces. 
  Once I bought a generator. When it was delivered, I wanted 
to 
try it out to see whether it would generate electricity. But the 
other party would not let me try it out. I insisted. Several 
days later, he had a criminal come to kill me. I barricaded the 
door and had someone mediate before the matter was resolved. 
  [passage omitted] 
<H5>  Taiwan Trader Suicide Image </H5>
  Taiwan traders here must also engage in self-criticism. Some 
Taiwan traders are fond of indulging themselves. They go out 
karaoke singing; they go wenching; and they keep women. This 
causes bad feelings among the local people. Sooner or later, 
this will make for tense relations between the two sides of the 
Straits. 
  In addition, some Taiwan traders engage in cut-throat 
competition. They engage in price slashing with each other, and 
some factories do not train their own personnel. Instead, they 
try to hollow out each other. 
  Very many Taiwan traders who come here that do not make 
money 
in a year or two turn to smuggling. Well-behaved Taiwan traders 
are hurt by these Taiwan traders that have a bad image. Over 
here, one positively should not travel by bus. Two or three 
people may board a bus with knives to steal money. If you are a 
little slow in giving it to them, they may stab you. During the 
New Year when workers return home, robberies frequently occur. 
The place is simply lawless and godless, one swindle after 
another. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20474 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar017___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-017 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  16 September 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs on Political System Plans </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0150B,94CM0150C Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 15, 16 
Sep 93 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0150B,94CM0150C </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installments No. 134, 135 of the serialized memoirs of Xu </F>
Jiatun: "Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
<H5>  [15 Sep p 2] </H5>
  [Text] A Second Set of Sharpening Political-System 
Controversies (Part One of Two) -- The "Two-Council Consensus," 
"New 190," and "One Legislature in Two Bodies" Plans 
  Let us return again to the period after 4 June, to the 
sharpening political-system controversy. 
  The British Government on one hand took a hard-line stand 
with the Chinese Government, breaking off contacts between 
senior Chinese and British officials, as well as refusing to 
participate in the routine meetings of the Sino-British Joint 
Liaison Group. On the other, it promoted, along with other 
social forces with which it had ties, political-system plans, 
such as the "two-council consensus plan," attempting to speed up 
the pace of democracy, by putting pressure on the Chinese, while 
vying for public influence with the radical democracy faction, 
to limit its continued expansion. Teng Lien-ju [6772 5571 1172, 
then chief member of the Executive Council [EXCO], stated 
publicly that "whether the two councils [EXCO and LEGCO] could 
reach a consensus (on shaping plans), would be affected to a 
certain degree by the Beijing student movement of the time, as 
well as the actions taken by Hong Kong residents in support of 
it." 
  The radical democracy faction reproposed a new "190" plan, 
recommending that the legislature in 1991 should have one-half 
directly elected members, with all being directly elected by 
1995. And they maintained their original proposal that the Chief 
Executive be directly elected by the whole people in 1997. 
They claimed that if Hong Kong could not establish a 
democratic political system before 1997, it would be impossible 
to practice democracy afterwards. 
  Even those in the industrial and business world and the 
"middle-of-the-roaders," who had previously endorsed orderly and 
gradual political-system development, changed to endorsing a 
faster pace of democracy. 
  This situation sharpened the possibility that, as political 
parties of all strata had not yet formed and the radical 
democracy faction's forces were growing unprecedentedly, the 
future legislature might be slanted toward the middle and lower 
strata, or even toward the radical democracy faction. 
  At the time, Shao Shan-po [6730 0810 3134], deputy secretary 
general of the Advisory Committee, suggested a "one legislature 
in two bodies" plan, which Mao Junnian, deputy director of the 
Hong Kong Office of the NCNA, delivered to me, noting that this 
plan might be considered by the Working Committee. 
  This plan divided the legislature into two bodies, a 
"district electoral body," and a "functional electoral body." 
The "district electoral body" would use mixed elections, with 
more than one-half of its members for the first two sessions 
being directly elected, while the "functional electoral body" 
would have its members elected by all functional circles, 
similar to the Western upper and lower houses or two-body senate 
and house. 
  If a bill was passed by both bodies, there would naturally 
be 
no problem. But if a bill was not passed by the body with the 
directly elected legislators, but was passed by the other body, 
creating a legislative impasse, then it would be decided by the 
Chief Executive, or the two bodies would choose delegates to 
study amendments, in an attempt to get it passed by both bodies. 
And if this did not work, it could be decided by a two-thirds 
majority of the whole legislature. 
  Shao Shan-po's plan at the time was merely a general 
outline, 
with the details yet to be considered. So I took this plan to 
Beijing to be studied by the Hong Kong and Macao Working 
Committee chaired by Ji Pengfei, where all supported it, holding 
it to be a way out under the new situation since 4 June. But 
after I returned to Hong Kong, while we were just studying how 
to promote it and had not yet made specific plans, Lo Te-ch'eng 
[5012 1795 0015] suddenly publicized it. I was very surprised. 
How could Lo Te-ch'eng have known about this plan? And how 
could he have gotten hold of it? I investigated this carefully 
but to no avail. 
  Once Lo Te-ch'eng had presented the "one legislature in two 
bodies" plan, the political-system controversy sharpened 
immediately, with the various public forces that had been 
promoting their respective plans now all directing their 
spearheads at the "one legislature in two bodies," holding that 
it was supported by the Chinese, which Lo Te-ch'eng had 
asserted, and which was true. And certain coordination 
movements also went into action in an attempt to join forces in 
opposition to the "one legislature in two bodies." 
  As the "one legislature in two bodies" plan was not 
consistent with the them climate of public demand for a faster 
pace of democracy, we considered appropriately adapting to the 
public tide, while keeping the legislative body from becoming 
too slanted, to prevent an immediate sharp change in the SAR 
political situation after 1997. In light of the over-emotional 
public climate, in which it would be hard to keep this plan from 
being criticized once it was out, we had planned to release it 
step by step, to reduce the resistance to it. But who would 
have guessed that Lo Te-ch'eng would rush it out ahead of us. 
Lo Te-ch'eng's public image was not too good at the time, as 
he had publicly stated his opposition to a faster pace of 
democracy due to the 4 June incident, which had aroused an even 
stronger public outcry. So the "one legislature in two bodies" 
plan being put out by him made him a target "of attack" for a 
time. 
<H5>  [16 Sep p 2] </H5>
  [Text] A Second Set of Sharpening Political-System 
Controversies (Part Two of Two) -- The "One Legislature in Two 
Bodies" and "4:4:2" Plans Become Points of Controversy; the 
Chinese Side Recommends the "New Comprehensive Plan"; Results 
Unclear 
  Before long, figures from industrial and business circles, 
such as Lo K'ang-jui [5012 1660 3843], and 
middle-of-the-roaders, such as Ch'eng Chieh-nan [4453 0094 
0589], also put forth a new balanced "4:4:2" plan, for the Hong 
Kong SAR's first legislative-body members to be 40 percent 
directly elected, 40 percent from functional groups, and 20 
percent through general elections. They emphasized that this 
plan was coordinated by Hongkongers, being one that all could 
accept. 
  Lo K'ang-jui and Lo Te-ch'eng were originally both members 
of 
the 89-person Industrial and Business Advisory Committee, but 
were now each putting forth respective plans, which were 
publicly called the "elder Lo" and "younger Lo" plans, 
coexisting around the time of the "dual-Cha" plan, with the 
"elder Lo" and "younger Lo" plans being originally two parts of 
a confederation that were now diametrically opposed to each 
other. 
  But the radical democracy faction held that these plans made 
too many concessions, so continued to stick to its new "190" 
plan. 
  By this time, we had received the news that the British Hong 
Kong Government was also supporting the "4:4:2" plan, with other 
sources claiming that this plan had come from the British Hong 
Kong Government. We considered this second possibility unlikely, 
with the greater likelihood being that British Hong Kong had 
"received" and then supported it. The British Hong Kong 
Government had probably considered the "two-council consensus" 
plan to have too much of a British flavor, with very little 
possibility of being accepted by the Chinese, so had tried to 
have this [4:4:2] plan accepted by the Chinese through a 
so-called three-faction coordination--of the industrial and 
business world, the democracy faction, and the 
middle-of-the-roaders. When [then Hong Kong Governor] Wilson 
later clearly "recommended" the "4:4:2" plan to the Chinese, 
this confirmed our guess. 
  Through contacts with certain senior British businessmen, we 
indirectly confirmed this information, as they bluntly 
"suggested" that they hoped that the Chinese would accept Lo 
K'ang-jui's plan. 
  Many of my colleagues at the Hong Kong Office of the NCNA 
knew Lo K'ang-jui, mostly having a good impression of him. It 
was said that Lo K'ang-jui had built on the $100,000 HK that he 
had received from his father, doing very well in business, as 
well as taking unique political stands and views, being a rare 
talent, about which I had the same impression. 
  In order to sell his "4:4:2" plan, Lo K'ang-jui asked for a 
special meeting with me. While I listened to his briefing, 
saying that we would consider his views, I also explained that I 
really did not agree much with his stand, whereupon he shook 
my hand in parting with a disappointed expresson on his face. 
  And when middle-of-the-roaders Chang Chia-min [1728 1367 
2404] and Ch'eng Chieh-nan also asked to see me to brief me on 
the "4:4:2" plan, I gave them the same response as I had to Lo 
K'ang-jui. 
  In the debate over the many plans, public opinion sharpened, 
focused mainly in areas, such as the "4:4:2," "one legislature 
in two bodies," and "new 109" plans, with the "one legislature 
in two bodies" and "4:4:2" plans becoming the points at issue. 
At this time, some of the members of the 89-person Advisory 
Committee from industrial and commercial circles proposed 
synthesizing the two plans into a "new comprehensive plan," by 
dividing the composition of LEGCO members into three 
groups--functional, directly elected, and generally elected; and 
changing the two bodies in the "one legislature in two bodies" 
plan to a counting of votes by category. This was taken to 
Beijing by Advisory Committee Deputy Director Kuo Chih-ch'uan 
[6753 1807 2938], who introduced it to the Hong Kong and Macao 
Affairs Office, winning real support. After they returned to 
Hong Kong, they publicly recommended it to the public. 
  A working meeting on Hong Kong and Macao chaired by Ji 
Pengfei discussed the matter of the political-system plans, with 
all endorsing Li Hou's proposal to take the "new comprehensive 
plan" as the base, and to synthesize it with the views of all 
parties, in order to draw up a plan to be voted on at the last 
meeting of the Drafting Committee. As to the number of 
directly-elected legislative seats, while the British had 
proposed 24 for 1995 and 20 for 1991, this meeting set the 
"bottom line" at 20 for 1995 and 18 for 1991. This was the 
basis on which we had to not only work with the Hong Kong 
public, but also consult with the British. 
  In order to coordinate the setting forth of the "new 
comprehensive plan," I gave a speech at a meeting of the Hong 
Kong Preparatory Committee on the occasion of the 1989 National 
Day [1 October], calling on all parties to cooperate 
harmoniously, naturally hoping not only to ease the 
political-system controversy, but also to alleviate somewhat the 
antagonistic mindset of Hongkongers toward China after the 4 
June incident. I originally guessed that this would have a 
limited impact, and that the debate over the political-system 
plans would not stop. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20475 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar017___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-017 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  17 September 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs on Passing Basic Law Draft </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0151A Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 17 Sep 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0151A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installment No 136 of the serialized memoirs of Xu Jiatun: </F>
"Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
  [Text] The Passing of the Basic Law Draft (Part One of Two) 
-- In the Voting on the Political-System Plan, Ji Pengfei Asks 
Me To Work With Figures, Such as Huo Ying-tung; as the Draft 
Still Needs Chinese and British Agreement To Be Finalized, the 
Drafting Committee Is Mocked for Being a Rubber-Stamp Body 
  On 13 February 1990, the last full meeting of the Basic Law 
Drafting Committee was held in the west wing of the Great Hall 
of the People in Beijing. This convention's major mission was 
to vote on the Basic Law draft proposals one by one, and then to 
submit the approved draft for deliberation and approval by the 
Third Session of the Seventh NPC. While this was the final 
working procedure in the drafting of the Basic Law that had 
taken four years and eight months, it seemed that most of the 
committee members in attendance were more somber than elated. 
  By this time, I had already retired, being succeeded by Zhou 
Nan [0719 0589] [former Vice Minister of Foreign Affairs] as 
Director of the Hong Kong Office of the NCNA and as Secretary of 
the Hong Kong and Macao Working Committee. Thus I was no longer 
either taking part in the meetings of the Hong Kong and Macao 
Affairs Office on Hong Kong and Macao work, or seeing documents 
pertaining to it. At the start of the meeting, I took the 
initiative to see Ji Pengfei, who told me that while the 
negotiations with Britain in the political-system area had not 
yet reached agreement, he guessed that there would be results 
prior to the balloting. Ji Pengfei asked me to, before the 
voting on the political-system plan, find and work with figures, 
such as Huo Ying-tung 7202 5391 2639], Li Chia-ch'eng [2621 0857 
6134] and Huang Li-sung [7806 7787 2646], in hopes that they 
would vote to endorse the convention's draft plan, so that the 
most controversial article on the counting of votes by group 
would be ensured of winning the necessary two-thirds votes for 
passage. I told Ji Pengfei that I would do all I could to "make 
a good last stand." 
  The Sino-British dispute was focused mainly on the number of 
directly elected seats to the 1991 legislature, with the British 
holding out for 20 seats, to be increased to 30 by 1995, on 
which they later retreated to 24; and the Chinese were sticking 
to 18 seats by 1995 (with legislative members not to exceed 60, 
and directly elected legislators not to exceed 30 percent). 
The second dispute between China and Britain was about after 
1997, on the timetable for direct elections of LEGCO members and 
the Chief Executive. Neither side would give in, with the 
British stating that if agreement was not reached, they would 
act unilaterally, and the Chinese saying that [plans] must be 
"dovetailed," or they would counterattack. Even matters that 
had been essentially resolved after the "storm over my notebook" 
became the focus of controversy again. 
  As far as I knew, this "dovetailing" originally referred to 
the political-system plan, as well as to scheduling 
arrangements. British plans and schedules before 1997 must be 
"dovetailed" with the plans of the SAR Government after 1997 as 
provided by the Basic Law. The Sino-British agreement process 
at the time involved discussion not only of legislative 
"dovetailing," but also of civil service "dovetailing" and the 
first Chief Executive. The British actually promised that the 
political-system plan and its implementation schedule would be 
"dovetailed" with the Basic Law. The Chinese also promised that 
the British Hong Kong government's civil servants, except for a 
few senior officials of foreign nationality, would be completely 
retained by the SAR Government after 1997; and both sides also 
exchanged views on matters, such as the first SAR Chief 
Executive, and on ways of "on-the-job training" to "become 
familiarized with the British Hong Kong government's conditions 
and operations" before 1997. While the British had proposed 
installing before 1997 a Hongkonger approved by China as deputy 
governor of Hong Kong who would serve as the Chief Executive 
after 1997, the Chinese held that it would be offensive for the 
first Chief Executive of the SAR to have been a British deputy 
governor, so refused to consider it. While both sides could 
not reach a specific concensus on certain promises, they 
unofficially came to a "tacit agreement" on the possibility of 
exchanging views. 
  By the eve of the balloting on the Basic Law draft, as I had 
already left my post, the only thing I knew about the substance 
of the Sino-British dispute over "dovetailing" was what Ji 
Pengfei told me, or the matter of the number of directly-elected 
legislative seats. Prior to this meeting, British Foreign 
Minister Hurd had visited Hong Kong and publicly promised that 
the development of Hong Kong's representative system of 
government would be dovetailed with the political system after 
1997, as well as stating that Britain would not unilaterally 
decide Hong Kong's political system, but would definitely 
consult with China, showing that both sides had resolved the 
dovetailing matter in principle. But the day before the 
meeting, Li Hou and Lu Ping stated publicly that the Basic Law 
draft on the political system [or system of government] had 
still not been finalized, and was still awaiting Sino-British 
consultation, which publicly disclosed that the Basic Law's 
political-system draft still needed a Sino-British agreement to 
be finalized. This led some Hong Kong media to mock the 
Drafting Committee as a rubber-stamp body. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20476 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar017___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-017 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  18 September 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs on Basic Law, Continued </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0151B Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 18 Sep 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0151B </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installment No 137 of the serialized memoirs of Xu Jiatun: </F>
"Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
  [Text] The Passing of the Basic Law (Part Two of Two) -- 
Liao Yao-chu Proposes Three Amendments, With Seven Dissenting 
Votes Being Influenced by Li Chia-ch'eng 
  On the morning of the 14th [February 1990], Ji Pengfei 
cheerfully told me that Britain had notified the [PRC] Foreign 
Ministry that it had agreed to the [Hong Kong] legislature 
having 18 directly-elected seats for 1991, and 20 by 1995. 
Whereupon Liao Yao-chu [1675 3852 3796] immediately submitted 
to the convention three amendments in writing on the draft's 
"mainstream plan," i.e., he submitted the following three 
amendments to the plan to be voted on at the convention: 1) 
That the number of directly-elected legislative seats for 1995 
be increased from 18 to 20. 2) That the counting of votes by 
group be limited to motions and amendments to motions made by 
legislators. 3) That the proportion of legislative members not 
of Chinese ancestry be raised from 15 to 20 percent. Zhou Nan 
immediately expressed support for this in a statement at a group 
meeting. I thought that these three amendments "suggested" by 
Liao Yao-chu had probably been agreed on by both the Chinese and 
British, and sure enough, the draft was amended essentially 
according to Liao Yao-chu's suggestions. 
  But the job of "persuasion" that Ji Pengfei had handed over 
to me was very unsuccessful. 
  Li Chia-ch'eng took a negative approach to the counting of 
votes by group. I discussed it with him three times, with Li 
Chia-ch'eng persistently opposing it the first time, saying that 
it could be considered the second time, but then saying again 
that he could not endorse it the third time. Several of the 
Hong Kong members of the Drafting Committee behaved in 
accordance with Li Chia-ch'eng's approach, regularly 
exchanging views with him during the course of the convention. 
So unless we won over Li Chia-ch'eng's support, the negative 
votes would not be limited to his alone. When I reported Li 
Chia-ch'eng's attitude to Ji Pengfei, Ji finally sought out Li 
Hou. But it was considered that even if the counting of votes by 
group was voted against by those, such as Li Chia-ch'eng, it 
might still win the necessary two-thirds majority for approval, 
so that a few less votes would be no obstacle. 
  While Huo Ying-tung also dissented with the counting of 
votes 
by group, he did agree to support it after an exchange of views. 
But he suggested to me that Article 142 of the Basic Law draft, 
on "the Hong Kong SAR Government setting its own sports policy, 
with private sports groups being allowed to continue according 
to law to exist and develop," might have the "private sports 
groups" part preceded by the two words previously existing,' in 
order to emphatically safeguard the rights and interests of Hong 
Kong's previously existing private sports groups. Huo Tung-ying 
said that while he had suggested this view repeatedly, it had 
not been paid attention to, about which he was very displeased. 
So I reported this to Ji Pengfei, suggesting that he consider 
Huo's view. Li Hou and Lu Ping were present at the time, and Li 
Hou disagreed, holding that the existing words already had this 
meaning. I said that: "This is simply a matter of words, 
certainly not an issue involving principles, as it involves 
simply the addition of the two words previously existing.' But 
to Huo Ying-tung, it is not just a matter of words. As Huo 
Ying-tung has said that this is not just his view alone, I 
wonder if such a matter involving no principles might not 
satisfy them?" 
  But my suggestion was not accepted. As the particular 
responsibility for the drafting of the Basic Law belonged to Li 
Hou and Lu Ping, and Ji Pengfei did not take a clear stand 
either, Li Hou and the others still dealt with the matter 
according to their own view. Their inability to deal flexibly 
with even purely technical matters made it impossible for me to 
meet with Huo Ying-tung again to give him a response. 
  I also exchanged views with several other Hong Kong members 
of the Drafting Committee, discovering that their views 
coincided roughly with Li Chia-ch'eng's. 
  When the draft proposals were voted on one by one at the 
convention on the 16th, the balloting results were that all were 
passed with majority votes. While the article on the counting 
of votes by group got seven dissenting votes, it still passed. 
And I guessed that these seven no votes were cast by Li 
Chia-ch'eng and the Hong Kong members of the Drafting Committee 
under his influence. 
  After the Basic Law draft was passed, Ji Pengfei feted the 
whole Drafting Committee at the Beijing Hotel Guest House, where 
those meeting with Ji Pengfei, Li Hou, Lu Ping, etc., were 
jubilant, toasting and singing, with the whole place aflutter, 
except for me, who was at a loss and distracted, so could not 
share in the jubilation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20477 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar017___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-017 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  19 September 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs on Leaving Country </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0151C Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 19 Sep 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0151C </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installment No 138 of the serialized memoirs of Xu Jiatun: </F>
"Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
  [Text] Around the Time of My Leaving China. From 
Hope to Disappointment (Part One of Four) -- Hongkongers Going 
North After 4 June Did Not Wish To See Li Peng, Who Unexpectedly 
Endorsed the Plans of the Hong Kong and Shanghai Banking Corp To 
Move Its Registration 
  After 4 June, it was hard for me to accept the way that 
Jiang 
Zemin and Li Peng dealt with a series of incidents concerning 
Hong Kong, so that my hopes for Jiang Zemin quickly turned to 
disappointment. 
  As stated above, to restore the confidence of Hongkongers, 
we 
organized visits by mid- and upper-level Hongkongers to Beijing. 
While most of those who we repeatedly invited could not refuse 
under the circumstances, they agreed to go to Beijing to see 
Jiang Zemin, but were unwilling to meet with Li Peng. After 
Jiang Zemin had met independently with several Hong Kong figures 
in Beijing, Li Peng expressed displeasure, so that Jiang Zemin 
was no longer willing to hold such independent meetings. So in 
order to break this impasse, we worked specially to win over 
some who were willing to meet with Li Peng, with Lo Te-ch'eng 
being the first after 4 June to publicly ask for a meeting with 
Li Peng. 
  In an attempt to resume as quickly as possible Hu 
Ying-hsiang's [5170 2019 3276] investment in the 
Shenzhen-to-Guangzhou expressway project, and to restore the 
confidence of Hongkongers, I worked on Hu Ying-hsiang, who said 
that he had long since had such hopes. When he mentioned that 
he was having certain coordination difficulties with Guangdong 
Province, I expressed a willingness to go to Guangzhou to 
expedite matters. So I went to Guangzhou, seeking out and 
consulting with Guangdong Governor Ye Xuanping, who consented to 
support [the project]. As Hu's investments in mainland power 
plants and expressways had been supported in the past by Zhao 
Ziyang but not by Li Peng, Hu Ying-hsiang immediately consented 
when I suggested that he go to Beijing to see Li Peng, as well 
as agreeing to have his visit reported in the press. As it 
seemed that Hu was willing to take advantage of the opportunity 
to improve his relations with Li Peng, I telegraphed Beijing, 
asking Li Peng to see him. After having sent two telegrams 
with no reply, I sent a third pressing for an answer. 
Whereupon Li Hou phoned me to say that Li Peng's secretary had 
told the Hong Kong and Macao Affairs Office that "the chief 
would not see Hu." When I asked why, he said that he did not 
know. This was hard for me to accept, that the premier of a 
large country would be so narrow-minded! How could I explain 
to Hu Ying-hsiang? I could only send someone to tell him 
insincerely that "Beijing has not yet responded." 
  After 4 June, Li Peng and Lu Ping met with Hong Kong and 
Shanghai Banking Corporation Board Chairman P'u Wei-shih [3184 
0251 1102], who expressed confidence in Hong Kong on one hand, 
while telling them on the other that the Hong Kong and 
Shanghai Banking Corporation was going to "reorganize," by 
moving its headquarters to London, and was exploring plans for 
the bank's pullout. 
  Li Peng, who possibly did not understand the situation, 
expressed his "appreciation" with absolutely no concern, while 
Lu Ping, who was familiar with the situation, surprisingly did 
not play the proper "advisory" role either, or make any attempt 
to "remedy" the situation. Thus, P'u Wei-shih won a great 
victory. On his return to Hong Kong, he immediately began to 
take the designated withdrawal actions, finally announcing that 
he had bought the British Midlands Bank, and was going to move 
his headquarters to London, to complete his so-called 
"reorganization" scheme. 
  The Hong Kong media pointed out that the Hong Kong and 
Shanghai Banking Corporation's leadership was "reorganizing" to 
preserve their interests in Hong Kong, so that they could 
continue their business activities in Hong Kong and on Mainland 
China, while avoiding the factors that might arise after 1997 in 
China or Hong Kong, which might "lose them their controlling" 
influence over the Hong Kong and Shanghai Banking Corporation's 
leadership authority. This comment hit the nail right on the 
head. 
  The Hong Kong and Shanghai Banking Corporation [HKSBC] 
charter provided that no shareholder could hold more than 1 
percent and, while Hong Kong shareholders owned 50-60 percent, 
the board members made their decision without regard for such 
percentages. While the board chairman should have been elected 
by the board members according to the articles of association, 
all insiders knew the real case. Of course, as to who actually 
"had the final say" behind the scenes on the elections of the 
board chairman and members, outsiders did not know. And while 
I had investigated this when I was in Hong Kong, I did not find 
out either. Before 1997, during the period of rule by the 
British Hong Kong administration, such a situation might 
continue, but not for long. But after 1997, might not Hong Kong 
shareholders ask for an amended charter, to elect a board of 
directors based on shareholder holdings, which board would then 
elect its chairman? In order to prevent this, P'u Wei-shih 
exploited the "reorganization" to make Britains the major 
shareholders, turning the HKSBC into a "subsidiary" company of 
the London HKSBC, for a permanent resolution. So the wisdom of 
the respective tactics employed by China and Britain was 
immediately clear. 
  In another test of strength between China and Britain, 
Britain also won, with the Chinese harming not only themselves, 
but even more so Pao Yu-kang. And I played a sad role in this 
battle too. 
  Zhao Ziyang had proposed establishing an air carrier company 
in Mainland China or Hong Kong, to stimulate China's civil 
airlines to import and assimilate outside experience. The 
"Hong Kong Dragon" air carrier company was created in Hong Kong 
based on this proposal, with the support of the State Council 
and the Hong Kong Office of the NCNA, and through cooperation 
between the Hong Kong and Macao International Investment 
Corporation and Ts'ao Kuang-piao [2580 0342 1753]. Right from 
the start, Ts'ao Kuang-piao bragged about the Chinese Government 
backing of his company, bringing it to the attention of the 
British airlines business and the British Hong Kong Government, 
which passed a new law restricting the establishment of new air 
carrier companies in Hong Kong, as well as stating that "Hong 
Kong Dragon" was not British-funded, so did not conform to Hong 
Kong laws and regulations, which long delayed its approval. So 
I got involved, asking Pao Yu-kang to become "Hong Kong 
Dragon's" first board chairman, by buying a majority share. 
Pao Yu-kang, together with Ts'ao Kuang-piao's son (of 
British citizenship), bought over 50 percent of the shares, 
turning "Hong Kong Dragon" into a mostly British-owned air 
carrier company, enabling its establishment to be approved. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20478 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar017___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-017 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  20 September 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs on Li Peng Refusal </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0152A Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 20 Sep 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0152A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installment No 139 of the serialized memoirs of Xujiatun: </F>
"Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs] 
  [Text] From Hopes to Disappointment (Part Two of 
Four) -- Li Peng Refuses To Heed My Report on the Sale of Hong 
Kong Dragon' Shares to Jung Chih-chien, Leaving Me To Repeatedly 
Explain the Pros and Cons and Pound the Table With Zou Jiahua 
  As "Hong Kong Dragon" did not obtain the support of the 
General Administration of Civil Aviation of China [CAAC] after 
it was established, making for an unsuccessful start of 
business, I went to Beijing several times, holding meetings with 
then Vice Premier Li Peng who was in charge of CAAC, to study 
the matter of supporting the start of mainland business by "Hong 
Kong Dragon." "Hong Kong Dragon" had been operating for several 
years at a loss. During this period, Kuo T'ai Airlines had 
contacted Pao Yu-kang, asking him to consider an exchange of 
shares, which would have actually made Kuo T'ai a holding 
company for "Hong Kong Dragon." When Pao Yu-kang solicited my 
advice, I found it hard to oppose this publicly, but suggested 
that he consider CAAC's response, whereupon Pao Yu-kang 
immediately stated that he would abandon his plans for an 
exchange of shares with Kuo T'ai. 
  Later, Jung Chih-chien [2837 2535 0256] of the Hong Kong 
Central Trust Company bought shares in Kuo T'ai, becoming its 
board chairman. While Jung Chih-chien had not notified the 
Hong Kong Office of the NCNA of this action in advance, I 
guessed that he had at least obtained Li Peng's approval and 
Wang Zhen's [then PRC Vice President] endorsement. This 
incident upset Pao Yu-kang considerably, with it being learned 
only after the event that Pao had at first considered an 
exchange of shares with Kuo T'ai, in which Kuo T'ai would have 
allowed Pao a seat on its board of directors as deputy chairman. 
  By 1990, "Hong Kong Dragon's" business had improved, with 
already some slight surpluses, so Pao Yu-kang turned over his 
post as board chairman to his son-in-law. But just as he was 
preparing to buy new aircraft and add new lines with great 
prospects, Pao Yu-kang suddenly sought me out, telling me that 
he was going to "offer" "Hong Kong Dragon" shares to Ts'ao 
Kuang-piao, who would in turn transfer them to Central Trust's 
Jung Chih-chien. As I had had absolutely no news of this in 
advance, I was surprised and asked why, only to learn that Jung 
Chih-chien had proposed the share offering on his own 
initiative. I could see that while Pao said that he did not 
mind, he was showing a very helpless manner, so that I asked him 
to wait until I had clarified the matter before discussing it 
further, to which Pao agreed. 
  By this time, Ts'ao Kuang-piao had also sought out Hong Kong 
and Macao International's board chairman, Chang Chien-hua [1728 
1696 5478], proposing that Hong Kong and Macao International 
"offer" all of its shares held in "Hong Kong Dragon" airlines to 
Central Trust's Jung Chih-chien, telling Chang that Pao Yu-kang 
had already agreed to "offer" Jung Chih-chien his shares. 
  Then Chang Chien-hua asked Ts'ao Kuang-piao: "What is your 
plan all about? Does the Hong Kong Office of the NCNA know 
about it? And has anyone in Beijing approved it?" 
  Afterwards, Chang Chien-hua told me that the purchasing plan 
had been endorsed by Yang Shangkun and approved by Li Peng. 
After the purchase, Jung would combine and transfer to Kuo T'ai 
the shares owned by Pao Yu-kang and the ones sold by Ts'ao 
Kuang-piao. And Central Trust would keep the shares sold by 
Hong Kong and Macao International, with Kuo T'ai becoming the 
majority shareholder. Business operations would also be 
"entrusted" to Kuo T'ai management, with the additional aircraft 
being leased by Kuo T'ai, which would stop flying and "offer" to 
"Hong Kong Dragon" its mainland routes to Beijing and Shanghai. 
  Such a complete plan would actually turn Hong Kong Dragon 
into a "subsidiary" company of Kuo T'ai, not only violating its 
original establishment intention, but also resolving the problem 
that Kuo T'ai was having trouble overcoming at the time: its 
almost failed dispute with CAAC over mainland and Hong Kong 
routes. At the least, Kuo T'ai would temporarily retain its 
navigation privileges. 
  So I notified Pao Yu-kang, asking him to temporarily not 
sell 
his shares to Jung Chih-chien. And I immediately flew to 
Beijing, asking for meetings with Yang Shangkun and Li Peng. 
When Yang Shangkun met with me, he said that he had only heard 
Jung Chih-chien's report, but "certainly did not understand the 
actual situation." 
  Li Peng would not see me, asking [State Councilor] Zou 
Jiahua 
[6760 1367 5478] to meet with me on his behalf. While Zou 
listened to my report and expressed understanding, he did not 
take a stand, saying that he would go to Yang and Li for 
instructions. The next day, Zou told me that Yang Shangkun had 
stuck to his statement that he had heard Jung Chih-chien's 
report but did not understand the actual situation, while Li 
Peng had said that he would not consider a change. So I asked 
them to reconsider, suggesting that Zou Jiahua look up certain 
figures familiar with Hong Kong's situation in this respect for 
a better understanding of the matter, to see if they had any 
objections to the State Council's decision. 
  By this time, Jung Chih-chien had also arrived in Beijing, 
which I guessed was related to my involvement in this matter. 
  I again asked for a direct hearing of my report by Li Peng, 
who still would not see me. On Zou Jiahua's third meeting with 
me, he stuck to his position unchanged, while I repeatedly 
explained the pros and cons. We had a heated arguement, with him 
pounding the table first, and then me pounding it back, calling 
him to account with the questions: "Are not party principles 
still important? And are we not going to show consideration for 
united front targets?" But we finally parted on bad terms. 
  On my return to Hong Kong, Pao Yu-kang, who probably already 
knew the situation (as to how he knew, I was unclear), invited 
me to dinner, which was our last meeting, where we discussed 
many emotional matters. When we met, he advised me that: "I 
have already sold the shares to Jung Chih-chien (which were sold 
in name to Ts'ao Kuang-piao, who then sold them to Jung). 
Thank you for your concern, but the matter is settled." After 
chatting a bit, he then told me that: "I have had only two 
failures in my whole life, one being my investment in the 
Standard Chartered Bank, and the other being Hong Kong Dragon!" 
What could I say? His investment in Hong Kong Dragon had been 
at my request, so that all I could say that I was truly sorry 
and offered my apologies to him. 
  When Chang Chien-hua went to request instructions, Ts'ao 
Kuang-piao told him that Pao Yu-kang had already sold his 
shares, and that Chang should also quickly sell his shares in 
Hong Kong and Macao International. When Chang asked me "whether 
he should also sell to him," I indignantly said that: "Ts'ao 
Kuang-piao does not have the say, so that in order to sell, they 
will have to get State Council documents." The next day, Jung 
Chih-chien asked to see me. While I knew that he would not come 
to see me without business, and that he was coming in reference 
to this matter, I saw him anyhow. But when he greeted me as 
uncle and told me his mission, I told him also that in order to 
get Hong Kong and Macao International's shares in Hong Kong 
Dragon, he would need State Council notification, which I would 
comply with. Sure enough, before long, State Council 
notification arrived, making it obvious how much Li Peng 
supported and "cherished" him. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20479 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar017___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-017 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  21 September 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs on Jiang Zemin Statements </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0152B Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 21 Sep 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0152B </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installment No 140 of the serialized memoirs of Xu Jiatun: </F>
"Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
  [Text] From Hopes to Disappointment (Part Three of 
Four) -- Jiang Zemin Makes Statements That Are Repugnant to 
Hongkongers, Saying That China Will Mind Its Business if Hong 
Kong Minds Its! As to the New Airport, Hong Kong Is Not the 
Host, as Beijing Is Going To Have To Pay the Bill 
  At the Fourth Plenary Session, Jiang Zemin officially became 
the general secretary [of the CPC Central Committee], whereupon 
he asked the Central General Office to tell the the General 
Office of the Hong Kong Office of the NCNA to report on the 
material sent by every daily paper to the Hong Kong press, as 
well as that in the mainland press on Hong Kong and mainland 
China. She Mengxiao [0152 1322 1321], deputy director and 
secretary general [of the Hong Kong Office of the NCNA], told me 
that he had already complied with this. While She Mengxiao and 
I both agreed that the general secretary's concern for reports 
from outside and for our work in Hong Kong was good for our work 
in Hong Kong, She told me that when Jiang Zemin had been 
Municipal Party Secretary in Shanghai, he had also asked for 
material on the Hong Kong and Macao Working Committee from a 
certain Xu [6079], who was a deputy director of the General 
Office of the Hong Kong Office of the NCNA, and which Xu had 
actually handled on his own without asking instructions from the 
secretary general. In fact, the Working Committee provided on 
its own initiative certain information and data in areas, such 
as Hong Kong and outside political, economic, and cultural 
matters, for reference by officials of mainland ministries, 
commissions, and provincial and municipal party Committees. And 
the Hong Kong Office of the NCNA specially published various 
"references" for this purpose. When Jiang Zemin was Minister of 
Electronics Industry, this Xu was a secretary to Vice Minister 
[of Electronics Industry] Cao Weilian [2580 4850 1670], and had 
later accompanied him as secretary when Cao Weilian came to the 
Hong Kong Office of the NCNA as deputy director, and then had 
been made deputy General Office director after Cao passed away. 
As to Jiang Zemin's use of such connections at the time to get 
material from the Working Committee, we were surprised. While 
such methods were out of line with the party's organizational 
principles, the matter was past and Jiang Zemin was now general 
secretary so that, after She Mengxiao reported it to me, we 
smiled wryly at each other, shook our heads, and said no more 
about it. Before long, the Central General Office again issued 
instructions to the Organization Department of the Hong Kong 
Office of the NCNA, with Zheng Hua [6774 5478] [deputy director 
of the Hong Kong Office of the NCNA] telling me and several 
other deputy directors at a meeting of the Working Committee 
that Jiang Zemin had nominated Xu by name for director of the 
General Office of the Hong Kong Office of the NCNA. This 
greatly surprised us all, with one deputy director sighing that 
"the general secretary is truly managing things in too great 
detail to be so concerned about a mere general office director!" 
While we all objected to this without being willing to take a 
stand, I acted as a peacemaker to "preserve" the general 
secretary's prestige, by telling Zheng Hua that "Liu Lin [0491 
2651] (the General Office director) had best resign and let Xu 
take his place." When Zhou Nan subsequently became the secretary 
of the Working Committee, he immediately designated Xu to be 
mostly in charge of sorting out the "material" about myself. 
When I later heard about this, I could only sigh. 
  On 11 July 1989, when Jiang Zemin said at a meeting with the 
Hong Kong members of the Basic Law Drafting Committee and some 
of the members of the Advisory Committee that "well water does 
not intrude into river water [or we'll mind our business if you 
mind yours]," which was taken unkindly in Hong Kong, someone 
called it "a witticism [or proverb] about the tense China-Hong 
Kong relations." We colleagues at the Hong Kong Office of the 
NCNA commented among ourselves that: "How could he have said 
this? This is likely to make people feel that they do not 
understand Hong Kong's situation." As over 98 percent of 
Hongkongers were Chinese, and Hong Kong was already facing a 
reversion [to Chinese sovereignty], how could he treat 
Hongkongers as outsiders, calling them "well water" standing 
outside of the "river water" of the Chinese? During the 4 June 
incident, the patriotic actions of Hongkongers could not be 
regarded as "well water" intruding into "river water" as, even 
if there was some intrusion, it was by a tiny minority. So how 
could he consign the majority of his Hong Kong compatriots to a 
hostile status? I guessed at the time that Jiang Zemin had 
probably done so after hearing Li Hou and Lu Ping's report, and 
accepting their inaccurate information and views. 
  But before long, there was another incident over Jiang 
Zemin's comments about the new airport. 
  The British Hong Kong government's plan to build a new 
airport was a huge construction plan, which grew into a major 
incident in Sino-British political relations. Ji Pengfei had 
once asked my view, to which I had replied that while British 
Hong Kong had planned in the 1970s to build a second airport at 
Ch'ihlachiao to replace the existing one, they had later shelved 
the plan when they learned that we were going to recover Hong 
Kong. 
  Then in 1986, when Hu Ying-hsiang and Li Chia-ch'eng had 
proposed a plan even bigger than British Hong Kong's for 
developing Tayu Mountain and the sea area west of Hong Kong 
Island, by building a second airport and expanding the port 
zone, it had died in embryo because the British Hong Kong 
government did not support it. So the current British Hong 
Kong's bringing up again of the so-called "rose garden" plan to 
win popular support before its pullout and leave some cherished 
memories for afterwards, as well as acting in the interests of 
British firms before its pullout, was more out of political than 
economic considerations, or at least equally weighted. 
  I said that in light of Hong Kong and even Mainland China's 
economic growth, building a new airport and expanding the 
seaside docks was necessary and, having done a preliminary 
estimation of the investment possibilities, had found no major 
problems. Based on British Hong Kong's past actions, there was 
not much possibility of a purely government investment, so that 
social funds would probably be used, to turn over some of the 
project through bidding to commercial operation, which was also 
the only way that British firms could benefit. Even with 
complete government investment and the completion of the project 
in eight years not at their announced HK$100 billion framework 
but doubled to HK$200 billion, the British Hong Kong 
government's recent years of budget surpluses and average growth 
rates meant that as long as continued prosperity was maintained, 
it would be possible to draw on an average of over HK$20 billion 
a year. But it was guessed that the British Hong Kong 
government would not act in this way. I told Ji Pengfei that I 
had instructed the Policy Studies Department of NCNA's Hong Kong 
Office to do a study, which I would send a report on to the 
center before long. 
  But several days later, Jiang Zemin suddenly took a stand on 
the building of the new airport in British Hong Kong at a 
meeting with a group of Hongkongers, saying that "you are not 
the host, as we are going to have to pay the bill," setting off 
another wave of negative feeling in Hong Kong public opinion. 
So I wondered: As they had already taken a stand and made a 
decision, why had Ji Pengfei not told me about it in advance? 
  At the time, I wondered if Jiang Zemin's statement about the 
"we" who would have to pay the bill referred to all Chinese 
including Hong Kong's Chinese residents, or to simply the 
mainland people or government? As the general secretary 
recently had painstakingly separated Mainland China's "river 
water" from Hong Kong's "well water," his current statement 
about "we" left one feeling that he meant only the mainland 
people or the Central Government. 
  This was also the general public response. If the "we" was 
interpreted in this way, and the building of the new airport 
created a future deficit, how would the the mainland people or 
the Central Government "have to pay the bill," as it would 
increase the burden on Hongkongers instead? It the general 
secretary was using this angle to warn the British Hong Kong 
government, he might have won the good opinion of Hongkongers. 
But it was still necessary to wait for the situation to be 
clarified: Would the British Hong Kong government take on the 
whole project, not using social funds, which might be going 
beyond its means to leave the SAR Government with a bundle of 
debts and an unfinished project? The situation was not clear 
at the time. So this talk of "paying the bill" was too soon, 
obviously growing out of a mistaken confidence in the words of 
his "advisors." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20480 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar017___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-017 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  22 September 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs on Jiang Zemin's Opposition </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0152C Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 22 Sep 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0152C </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installment No 141 of the serialized memoirs of Xu Jiatun: </F>
"Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
  [Text] From Hopes to Disappointment (Part Four of 
Four) -- Jiang Zemin Opposes the Suggestion for the Leasing of 
Hong Kong, With Lu Ping Actually Complaining About My Telegram 
  The subsequent continuous economic dispute was something 
that 
I had not guessed at the time would occur. At the time, I was 
working to organize visits north by Hongkongers, in an attempt 
to improve China-Hong Kong relations, give Hongkongers a better 
impression of the new Central leadership, and restore 
Hongkongers' confidence. So the general secretary's frequent 
statements on particular Hong Kong matters, which were out of 
line with Hong Kong's realities (at least not in line with them 
completely), and which left no room for maneuver, had 
deteriorated my image among Hongkongers to the point where I 
could hardly understand it and was in great pain. 
  After 4 June, certain prominent figures in the mid- and 
upper-levels of Hong Kong's Chinese-foreign financial 
consortiums acted out of a lack of confidence in the CPC and the 
Chinese Government to secretly brew up a so-called plan for the 
"leasing of Hong Kong" from the Chinese Government for a decade 
after 1997. This idea was actually a remake of Britain's plan 
to "exchange sovereignty for administrative authority" that had 
come up in the early Sino-British negotiations over the Hong 
Kong issue. It differed on the return of sovereignty over Hong 
Kong to China, with the idea of local Hong Kong financial 
consortiums being for Hongkongers to "lease" Hong Kong, for 
"rule of Hong Kong by Hongkongers," which would no longer be the 
"rule of Hong Kong by Hongkongers" as provided by the Basic Law, 
but would rather be the "rule of Hong Kong" by Hongkongers hired 
or chosen by financial consortiums that put up the money for the 
"leasing." The idea of certain foreign-invested financial 
consortiums was for them to put up the money to "hire" or choose 
certain people to "run Hong Kong." The second difference was 
that this administrative authority was "priceless" at the time, 
with some "offering" $100 million a year, and others $100 
million pounds sterling. 
  They streamed to see me to explore this. The Hongkonger 
financial consortiums acted mostly through their middle-aged 
delegates, not coming out directly themselves, which was at 
least my impression. For instance, when Mr. and Mrs. Su 
Hai-wen [5685 3189 2429] came to see me together to talk about 
the "leasing" matter, they had already openly published an 
article in the paper, proposing a plan to "lease" Hong Kong from 
the Chinese Government for a decade for $1 billion pounds 
sterling. As to this couple's "proposal" to me, I guessed that 
they had probably either been sent to me by Su Hai-wen's 
father-in-law Pao Yu-kang, or had obtained his endorsement. 
Certain figures from U.S. Japanese, and French business 
circles also came to see me on this matter, making similar 
"proposals." What differed here was that they were concerned 
that the people to be "hired" by Hong Kong Chinese financial 
consortiums to run Hong Kong would be Britains or of British 
ancestry. But when I asked them who they would favor "hiring," 
they would not say, and talked evasively. 
  But whether they were Chinese or foreigners, I told them 
that: 1) I would agree to report their requests to the Beijing 
authorities. 2) This is an extremely sensitive matter, with 
"very litle" possibility of being accepted by the Chinese 
Government. 3) They should not continue to spread this, 
particularly not discussing it further in the media or with the 
press. (I was concerned about the public aversion.) When Jiang 
Zemin became general secretary at the Fourth Plenary Session of 
the CPC Central Committee, he came to talk with me, whereupon I 
reported the situation to him. I saw that he was listening 
with great interest so, after my report, I asked him: Should I 
give him a report on it in writing? To which Jiang Zemin 
replied very frankly, "yes, send a telegram." I then asked him: 
"Should I also report it to Comrade Deng Xiaoping?" To which 
Jiang Zemin noded his head and said "alright." Which was how I 
returned to Hong Kong and sent a telegram to "the Central 
Standing Committee and Comrade Deng Xiaoping." 
  During the Fourth Plenary Session, I neither went to the 
Hong 
Kong and Macao Affairs Office, nor discussed this matter with 
them. Before long, the Hong Kong and Macao Affairs Office held a 
meeting to discuss its Hong Kong work. Before the meeting had 
started, Ji Pengfei bought up the telegram about this matter 
during a chat in his office, which Lu Ping criticized harshly as 
"the same old formula of turning traitor for personal gain!" 
When Zhou Nan responded in kind, Ji Pengfei had nothing to 
say. After the meeting, I happened to be walking along with Lu 
Ping, so told him that I had sent the telegram because after my 
oral report, Jiang Zemin had agreed that I should. 
  A few months later, Jiang Zemin again stated publicly in a 
meeting with certain Hong Kong figures that he opposed this 
idea. I was quite surprised, wondering why he had not responded 
for so long. As Hong Kong interest in this matter had slackened, 
why was the general secretary publicly responding to it again? 
But I later learned that Lu Ping had complained about it to 
the Central Committee, misreporting what I had said, by saying 
that I had sent the telegram because Jiang Zemin had endorsed 
the proposal. Which is why Jiang Zemin made this public 
clarification. 
  So agreeing that I should send the telegram was turned into 
an endorsement of the proposal per se, leading Jiang Zemin to 
readily believe Lu Ping's one-sided account without 
verification, and leaving me quite disappointed. 
  At the Fifth Plenary Session, Jiang Zemin gave a political 
report, and Li Peng also gave a so-called important speech. 
They raised high the flag of "improvement and rectification," 
in an attempt to obstruct reform and opening. Jiang Zemin's 
political report "targeted" a new thing that had appeared in the 
course of reform and opening--household operations, suggesting 
the need to ensure that the so-called illegally rich "lose their 
family fortunes." And township enterprises must be sharply cut 
back.. with the majority at a group meeting of the Central 
Advisory Commission taking a stand "in support of" the reports 
by the new general secretary and premier, while others took 
another stand, emphasizing the need to observe the law of value. 
When the group director asked me to speak, I merely reported 
on the situation in Hong Kong, without taking a positive stand. 
But as to the "new policy" on household operations, I said 
that since reform and opening, there had been only policy 
provisions but no legislation on how to distinguish legal from 
illegal, so suggested accelerated legislation. There was much 
private discussion among those in attendance at this meeting, 
with many holding that the formula favored by Jiang and Li was 
out of line with current realities, so it would be hard to 
implement. When someone asked my view, I responded that: "I 
guess that it will not do, with possibly both local and public 
resistance. But while it may cause many problems in local work, 
things will get back to normal after a while." 
  This series of words and deeds by Jiang Zemin and Li Peng 
left me more disappointed that I could say. I was worried 
about both Hong Kong and the CPC! 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20481 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar017___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-017 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  17 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs on Requesting Retirement </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0173A Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 23-26 Sep 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0173A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installments No 142, 143, 144, and 145 of the serialized </F>
memoirs of Xu Jiatun: "Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
<H5>  [23 Sep 93 p 3] </H5>
  [Text] Events Shortly Before and After I Left My 
Country. Taking the Initiative in Requesting My Retirement (Part 
One of Two) -- Disappointed at Jiang Zemin's Political Report, I 
Made Up My Mind To Retire; I Was Accused of Trying To Hang on to 
My Post Because I Had Suggested That the Replacement Be Effected 
After the Adoption of the Basic Law 
  With respect to the handling of Hong Kong affairs, Jiang 
Zemin and Li Peng would listen to the reports and analyses made 
by Li Hou [2621 0683] and Lu Ping [7627 1627] only, but would 
not see me or listen to my analyses, resulting in a growing gulf 
between them and me. I estimated that the problem between them 
and me was no longer the matter of differences on the 4 June 
incident. It was already very difficult, or even impossible, to 
change the situation. If I was to continue to work in Hong Kong 
but had to obediently follow the "blind command" from Beijing, 
proceeding on the basis of disregarding Hong Kong's realities, I 
just could not do the job. Jiang Zemin's Political Report to the 
Fifth Plenum made me even more disappointed. I made up my mind 
to retire, and wanted to find out if I would be able to secure a 
"safe landing." Seizing the opportunity of a break from Central 
Advisory Commission group discussions which Song Ping [1345 
1627] was also attending, I presented to him my formal request 
for retirement. Song Ping was very surprised and asked: "Why? 
The center is not considering the issue of your retirement." I 
replied: "I am already over 70. Too old. Too busy. Already feel 
mentally tired. Often feel exhausted. I do hope the center will 
give approval." All this was true. But I thought it better not 
to mention the main reason. At the same time I raised some 
demands: I planned to live in Shenzhen and do some investigation 
and research work as my ability would permit. On the one hand 
Song Ping said: "Now is not the time for you to retire. Don't 
think about this issue." On the other hand he also said: "For 
the time being the center cannot find a suitable person to 
succeed you." I recommended: "Ye Xuanping is suitable. He is 
from Guangdong and familiar with the situation in Hong Kong, and 
have had much contact with personalities in Hong Kong and 
Macao." Song Ping said: "This is a good idea, and may produce 
mostly good results." 
  Several days later, when the Fifth Plenum was still going 
on, 
Song Ping asked the Central Organization Department deputy head 
in charge of Hong Kong and Macao cadres to tell me not to think 
about the issue of retirement, informing me that the center had 
truly not considered the issue. Another message was that if 
there should be retirement in the future, then those few demands 
would not be a problem. 
  Around this time I also met Yang Shangkun. I asked him to 
transmit to the center my request for retirement. Yang Shangkun 
readily said: "No consideration for now. Continue to work for a 
while, and then we will see." I insisted that he transmit the 
request. He shook his head and did not approve of my making the 
request. 
  In order to make Beijing let me retire, I decided to make 
use 
of my public appearances in an effort to create an atmosphere so 
that the people of Hong Kong could also become psychologically 
prepared. On 11 December 1989, I was invited to the 
ribbon-cutting opening ceremony of the Dynasty Club owned by the 
tycoon Cheng Yu-tung. When interviewed by reporters, I took the 
initiative in telling them that I had submitted to the center my 
request for retirement. After Beijing learned the news, first, I 
received a telephone call from Yang Shangkun's secretary, who 
said that Yang Shangkun was somewhat unhappy and transmitted a 
message to me: "Don't mention the matter of retirement again." 
Then people in Beijing told me that Zhongnanhai had made a new 
decision on the personnel of the Hong Kong Branch of the Xinhua 
News Agency and that Zhou Nan [0719 0589] would come to Hong 
Kong to take over my job. 
  I was very happy, but upon learning this information the 
colleagues all faulted me for openly taking the initiative in 
talking about retirement, "thereby giving them an opportunity." 
  On 23 December the center sent a telegram, asking me to go 
to 
Beijing immediately. I knew that this trip was related to the 
matter of my retirement. I arrived in Beijing the next day. In 
the evening of the same day Li Peng, Song Ping, and the head of 
the Central Organization Department summoned me to Zhongnanhai. 
They came straight to the point. As soon as they sat down, they 
announced: "The center has decided that you retire and be 
succeeded by Zhou Nan. What do you think about the decision?" 
They did not say that I had taken the initiative in requesting 
my retirement but instead said, "The center has decided." I 
replied, smiling: "Thank the center for approving my request for 
retirement." I also suggested: "Zhou Nan may immediately come to 
Hong Kong to take over the job. It might be advisable to 
announce the decision after the National People's Congress [NPC] 
has adopted the Basic Law, so as to let the people of Hong Kong 
get psychologically prepared and have a peaceful New Year." They 
immediately said that this suggestion could be considered. But, 
later they considered this move made by me to be an attempt at 
"hanging on to my post," and decided to take further measures to 
make me leave Hong Kong promptly. (142) 
<H5>  [24 Sep 93 p 3] </H5>
  [Text] Events Shortly Before and After I Left My 
Country. Taking the Initiative in Requesting My Retirement (Part 
Two of Two) -- The Suggestion That I Be Transferred Back After 
the Adoption of the Basic Law Was Rejected; Zhou Nan's Xinhua 
News Agency Appointment Was Announced Without Being Considered 
by the NPC Standing Committee. 
  As the talking drew to a "close," I stood up to say goodbye. 
Suddenly Li Peng turned around and asked Song Ping: "Have the 
senior comrades been informed?" Song Ping said: "Comrade 
Xiannian knows this. The secretaries of the others are all 
present and will make their reports." I knew that persons such 
as Deng Xiaoping and Chen Yun would all have their secretaries 
participate in the meetings of the Standing Committee and the 
secretariat in order to keep informed of the details of the 
discussions at the meetings. Their question and answer showed 
that Li Xiannian already knew the decisions to dismiss me and 
appoint Zhou Nan (later I also learned that Zhou Nan had been 
recommended by Li Xiannian), and that the other senior comrades, 
perhaps referring to Deng Xiaoping and Chen Yun, might not have 
been informed beforehand. 
  The next morning I met Ji Pengfei [1213 7720 7378], who 
said, 
seeming to be trying to show his powerlessness with regard to 
the matter, that Song Ping merely told him at a public rally 
that Zhou Nan would take over my job, and did not solicit his 
opinion. Ji Pengfei also told me that he once said to Song Ping: 
"Zhou Nan has diplomatic experience, but the Hong Kong job is a 
comprehensive one." He also said to me: "They do not understand 
the situation. You have developed a new situation in Hong Kong 
and made great contributions." He was still indicating his 
powerlessness on this matter. I smiled and replied: "The reason 
was your excellent leadership. But while talking to me, Li Peng 
and the others did not say a single word about my six-year work 
in Hong Kong. I don't know their assessment." 
  In the afternoon Ji Pengfei asked someone to tell me that 
the 
center had decided to ask all the responsible persons of the CPC 
Hong Kong and Macao Work Committee (i.e., the several deputy 
directors of the Hong Kong Branch of the XINHUA NEWS AGENCY) to 
come to attend a meeting in Beijing. For Li Peng and the others 
were unhappy about my attitude expressed on the preceding 
evening, considering me to be trying "to hang on to my post" and 
intending to take measures. 
  On 25 December Jiang Zemin presided over the meeting; Li 
Peng 
was late for half a hour. Song Ping, Ji Pengfei, Li Hou, Lu 
Ping, and Zhou Nan attended the meeting; all the deputy 
directors of the Hong Kong Branch of the XINHUA NEWS AGENCY were 
also present. 
  Jiang Zemin started by announcing the center's decision that 
I retire and be transferred back, and that Zhou Nan take over 
the job. The suggestion, made by me and some deputy directors of 
the Hong Kong Branch of the XINHUA NEWS AGENCY, that I be 
transferred back to the hinterland after the adoption of the 
Basic Law had been rejected. It had been decided that a public 
announcement be made on 15 January 1990, and that Zhou Nan 
immediately go to Hong Kong to take over the job. In his speech 
Jiang Zemin responded to the remark I had made to Ji Pengfei, 
saying: "Comrade Xu Jiatun has done a great deal of work in Hong 
Kong, and has made achievements." Li Peng came very late, and 
made some harsh comments rejecting our suggestion regarding the 
takeover. 
  Ji Pengfei said nothing from the beginning to the end. 
  It was very abnormal, within the CPC, to hold such a meeting 
and use such an approach to announce the transfer or dismissal 
of a high-ranking cadre and for leaders to assume such an 
attitude toward the matter. In my lifetime I had been 
transferred from my jobs many times, but had never seen such a 
"solemn" situation. 
  According to usual practices, after the party made the 
decision on my dismissal and Zhou Nan's appointment, the State 
Council should raise the matter to the consideration of the NPC 
Standing Committee. The dismissal and appointment should be 
announced only after being approved by the NPC Standing 
Committee. However, unusually, Zhou Nan's assumption of his 
office in Hong Kong was announced in the news released by the 
XINHUA NEWS AGENCY in Beijing on 15 January 1990. The NPC 
Standing Committee did not even discuss the issue as a matter of 
formality. There has been no announcement by the NPC Standing 
Committee to this day. In trying to transfer me back to the 
hinterland, Jiang Zemin, Li Peng, and the others did not even 
bother to put up a facade. (143) 
<H5>  [25 Sep 93 p 4] </H5>
  [Text] Events Shortly Before and After I Left My 
Country. Leaving Hong Kong After Being Relieved of My Office 
(Part One of Two) -- I Retired as I Had Wished, But to My 
Surprise Jiang and Li Would Not Let the Matter Drop; Zhou Nan 
Did Not Say a Single Word About My Leaving Hong Kong at the 
Farewell Banquet. 
  After the 25 December meeting, I returned to Hong Kong right 
away, and immediately moved out of the Hong Kong Branch of 
XINHUA NEWS AGENCY Building, vacating the office. Colleagues 
advised me not to be in such a hurry and said that when being 
transferred back to the hinterland Li Chuwen and others all had 
left Hong Kong six months after the respective announcements, 
hoping that I would also stay in Hong Kong a bit longer after 
leaving office. I thanked them for their kindness, and 
immediately started packing, transporting my personal belongings 
to Shenzhen. It seemed to me that it had not been just for one 
or two days that Jiang and Li had wanted me to leave Hong Kong 
early. As I had fulfilled my wish to retire, leaving early could 
get me extricated from the dispute-infested place early. This 
was something my colleagues did not think about. But at the time 
I did not thought that Jiang and Li would not drop the matter, 
and that the "next chapter" was waiting for me. 
  I planned to go to Shantou on 9 February to participate in 
the opening ceremony of Shantou University built on the basis of 
the donation from Li Ka-shing, to come back to Hong Kong on the 
11th, and to leave Hong Kong for Beijing on the 12th to attend 
the last plenary session of the Basic Law Drafting Committee. I 
thought that the 12th would be the day when I would be 
officially relieved of my office and leave Hong Kong. 
  After learning that I would soon retire and leave Hong Kong, 
China's institutions in Hong Kong and people in society all 
came, suggesting the holding of farewell banquets for me. If I 
accept the suggestions, then not only would there not be enough 
time, but such events would also cause resentment on the part of 
some people in Beijing when the news spread. On the other hand, 
if I should accept some invitations, then I would be suspected 
of showing favor; therefore I politely declined all the 
invitations. The heads of some major Chinese-owned institutions 
in Hong Kong would not agree to that and insisted on "showing 
their sentiments" in some way. In the end they made a compromise 
proposal that a farewell dinner be held on the 50th floor of the 
Huarun Building one day before my leaving Hong Kong. I could not 
but accept the proposal. 
  Zhou Nan would arrive in Hong Kong on 5 February. I and the 
deputy directors decided to expand the Spring Tea Banquet so as 
to introduce the new director of the Hong Kong Branch of the 
Xinhua News Agency to the people of Hong Kong and to say goodbye 
to the people of Hong Kong. The general office estimated that 
the number of participants would be larger than in the previous 
National Day banquets held by the Hong Kong Branch of the XINHUA 
NEWS AGENCY. As the place we usually rented might not be able to 
accommodate 3,000 people, the main conference hall of the 
International Trade Conference Center, which could accommodate 
4,000-5,000 people, was rented. On the day of the banquet people 
of all circles in society came to the conference hall. In my 
speech, I especially introduced the new director Zhou Nan to 
people, wishing Zhou Nan "well," and said farewell to Hong Kong 
compatriots and Chinese and foreign friends, expressing my 
gratitude for the support given to the Hong Kong Branch of the 
Xinhua News Agency and to myself over the six years. Standing on 
the podium and facing the thousands of pairs of eyes in the 
hall, I had all kinds of thoughts, and did my best to control my 
strong emotions. After the toasting, I hurriedly retreated to 
the lounge. While still in Beijing Zhou Nan had sent a telegram 
to the general office of the Hong Kong Branch of the XINHUA NEWS 
AGENCY, asking it to prepare his response speech at the banquet. 
She Mengxiao, deputy director and secretary general, had 
personally drafted the speech for him. As Zhou Nan liked to cite 
ancient poems, he also had cited two lines of a Tang Dynasty 
poem for Zhou. The text had then been sent to Zhou Nan in 
Beijing by fax. But unexpectedly Zhou Nan did not use a single 
word from the text after coming to Hong Kong, and instead used a 
text that he said he had prepared himself. The speech in no 
place mentioned my name, Xu, and did not have a single word 
about Xu's leaving Hong Kong, totally ignoring the "newcomer 
welcoming" speech made by the host of the banquet, thereby 
astonishing the participants. 
  Seeing this abnormal occurrence, not only did colleagues in 
the branch ask me after the banquet, "What was going on?" but 
people in society also talked about the incident. Many people 
made phone calls to ask people to inquire of colleagues in the 
branch, asking: "Have you noticed it?" and "why?" 
  I felt that this could not have been Zhou Nan's own 
"creation," and that he would not have dared to behave in such 
an arrogant manner without being backed by "instructions." 
  Li Ka-shing had already invited me to the 9 February opening 
ceremony of Shantou University built on the basis of Li 
Ka-shing's donation. Although Zhou Nan had already assumed 
office in Hong Kong by that time, Li Ka-shing did not express 
any attitude. I specially suggested to Li that Zhou Nan be also 
invited; Li agreed and sent out an additional invitation. I and 
Zhou Nan planned to go to Shantou together and to come back to 
Hong Kong together. 
  Li Ka-shing's donations to projects in China were mainly 
concentrated on Shantou University. At the time his donations to 
Shantou University had already totalled HK$560 million, and in 
addition a foreign exchange fund had also be set up for the 
purpose of hiring foreign professors. He had said to me that he 
had planned to invest in the Shantou Power Plant, and that he 
would not take the power plant's future profits which could be 
used to cover Shantou University's operational expenses. In the 
process of establishing Shantou University, Li Ka-shing had had 
many differences with some personnel of Guangdong Province in 
charge of the matter. In some cases he raised the relevant 
matters to my attention, and I then took up the matters with the 
relevant supervisory agencies in Beijing and Guangdong, 
presenting my own opinions and expressing the hope that they 
would help resolve the problems and reduce Li's difficulties so 
that things could proceed as much as possible according to Li's 
ideas. (Installment No 144) 
<H5>  [26 Sep 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] Events Shortly Before and After I Left My 
Country. Leaving Hong Kong After Being Relieved of My Office 
(Part Two of Two) -- I Was Very Disappointed at the Fact That 
Only Li Tieying [2621 6993 2503] Had Been Sent To Attend the 
Opening Ceremony of Shantou University; The Center Asked Me Not 
To Turn Over the Responsibility for Taiwan Work; Zhou Nan Was 
Rather Unhappy About It. 
  Li Ka-shing was not only involved in matters of funds but 
also in matters of the school's size, capital construction, and 
teaching material. He had asked Chuang Shih Ping, former 
chairman of the board of directors of Nanyang Bank to serve as 
an advisor of Shantou University and also asked Huang Lisung, 
former chancellor of the University of Hong Kong to serve as an 
advisor. Usually there were seven or eight people from Li's 
company among those in charge of the construction of Shantou 
University. He had even sent his own secretary to provide help. 
All this showed the importance Li gave to Shantou University. He 
once told me: "I have devoted a great of deal of my energy to 
making Shantou University a prestigious university." 
  Accompanied by Chuang Shih Ping, I had specially visited 
Shantou University during its construction. I had seen that 
Shantou University's size and facilities as well as architecture 
had all been modernized, a rare phenomenon among universities in 
China. 
  I thought that as Li Ka-shing had devoted not only money and 
energy but also his "painstaking care" to the university because 
of his patriotism and love for his native place, he should be 
given support and encouragement. When Yue-kong Pao had built a 
university in Ningbo, the center had treated him with honor. Not 
only State Counselor Gu Mu [6253 3668] but also Wan Li, chairman 
of the NPC Standing Committee, attended the opening ceremony of 
Ningbo University. I had wanted to achieve some balance. Before 
the 4 June incident, I had suggested to responsible persons at 
the center that it would be advisable that one of the four 
persons, PRC President Yang Shangkun, General Secretary Zhao 
Ziyang, NPC Standing Committee Chairman Wan Li, and Premier Li 
Peng, attend the opening ceremony of Shantou University. They 
had all said that the suggestion would be considered. After the 
4 Juneh incident I again suggested that Jiang Zemin, the new 
general secretary, and Premier Li Peng attend the opening 
ceremony and go to Shenzhen after the ceremony to meet with 
people of various circles in Hong Kong. But in the end they only 
sent Li Tieying, the head of the State Education Commission, to 
attend the ceremony; I was very disappointed. 
  Li Ka-shing's wife died before the opening ceremony, and Li 
felt great sorrow. I specially visited him, and attended the 
memorial ceremony and funeral. Li told me that he was very sad 
because of his wife's death, and that his attending the opening 
ceremony would not be affected. I also told him that I would 
definitely attend the ceremony. He said: "I will have a 
specially chartered plane to take you there and then bring you 
back." I said: "You don't have to pay any attention to making me 
comfortable. It is better to be casual. Let us see who the 
center will send here (at the time we did not know that Li 
Tieying would come)." However, he still personally came to the 
airport to greet me, and arranged for me to stay in the 
"Presidential Suite" of the best hotel in Shantou City. 
  If only I would ask, Li would always consider making 
donations to the hinterland. His donations for the Asian Games 
in Beijing and the Cultural Foundation of Hong Kong had in each 
case totalled around HK$10 million. When I left Hong Kong, I 
only agreed to having a private farewell activity, but the 
activity was just a lunch together as the two of us often had 
had before. During the lunch he said to me emotionally: "If you 
were not a Communist, our friendship could be even deeper." He 
had already heard about my plan to live in Shenzhen and to do 
some research on Hong Kong, and therefore said: "I will often go 
to Shenzhen to see you. I can provide financial assistance if 
there should be any difficulties in research work." I was also 
very moved at the time, and expressed my appreciation, 
  After attending the opening ceremony of Shantou University 
on 
9 February, I returned to Hong Kong together with Zhou Nan the 
next day, planning to go to Beijing on the 12th to attend the 
final session of the Hong Kong Basic Law Drafting Committee and 
the meeting of the NPC Standing Committee. Before my departure I 
said farewell to colleagues in the branch and indicated that I 
would be leaving Hong Kong officially the next day. Upon 
learning the information, the British Hong Kong government 
solicited advice from the Hong Kong Branch of the Xinhua News 
Agency, offering to send people to see me off. Some comrades in 
the branch politely declined the offer because they did not want 
me to officially leave Hong Kong on that occasion. I expressed 
my appreciation of the colleagues' good intentions, but was 
still determined to officially leave Hong Kong on that occasion. 
However, unexpectedly, Yang Shangkun and Yang Side [2799 1835 
1795] told me face to face during a meeting in Beijing: that 
some important contacts in Taiwan with whom I had been 
responsible for communicating should not be turned over to Zhou 
Nan, and that I should continue to be responsible for the matter. 
  I immediately transmitted the message to Zhou Nan, who 
looked 
very unhappy after learning the message. He took the initiative 
in seeing Yang Side, and also requested a meeting with Yang 
Shangkun; but Yang Shangkun did not see him. 
  At the time Taiwan was faced with a presidential election, 
and the situation was rather tense. When I had returned to 
Shenzhen after attending meetings in Beijing, Yang Shangkun sent 
a telegram to the Hong Kong Branch of the XINHUA NEWS AGENCY, 
asking me to meet Yang Side to exchanges views on the situation 
in Taiwan and the work on Taiwan. I talked with Yang Side by 
having a long-distance call. He suggested that I go to Hong Kong 
so as to make it easier for me to have discussions with the 
relevant people on a timely basis. For this reason I went to 
Hong Kong three times. On each occasion I stayed at the Stanley 
guest-house for one night and left the next day. Each time She 
Mengxiao, deputy director and secretary general of the branch, 
came to see me, I asked him to report to Zhou Nan on my behalf 
and to give him my regards. 
  I did not think that my three official business trips to 
Hong 
Kong would cause unexpected storms. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20482 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar017___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-017 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  9 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> PROVINCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Sichuan Urban Residents Increase Income in 1993 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0303Q Chengdu SICHUAN RIBAO in Chinese 9 Feb 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0303Q </F>
<F P=104>  Chengdu SICHUAN RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] In 1993 per capita income of urban residents in 
Sichuan Province was 2173 yuan, an increase of 363 yuan, or 20 
percent over 1992. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-20483 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar017___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-017 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  17 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Heavy Taxation Causes Corruption, Discontent </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0254A Paris MINZHU ZHONGGUO [DEMOCRATIC CHINA] in 
Chinese No 18, Nov 93 pp 35-39 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0254A </F>
<F P=104>  Paris MINZHU ZHONGGUO [DEMOCRATIC CHINA] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yang Hui (5017 1920): "China's Taxation Black </F>
Box"--the writer Is a Mainland Chinese With a U.S. Doctorate in 
economics] 
  [Text] Editor's note: Of late, the authorities 
of Mainland China are taking a host of measures to rectify the 
financial order by readjusting their financial policy. This has 
attracted widespread attention. However, another bottleneck in 
China's economic reform, namely taxation and the reform of the 
tax system, has all along been overlooked by the media. Last 
August the World Bank published an evaluation report on China's 
current economy. In an unequivocal manner, it told the Mainland 
Chinese authorities that tax reform should be an urgent task in 
China's economic restructuring. In this context, we have 
arranged to publish the following special-topic article for our 
readers: [end of editor's note] 
  "The Kuomintang is known for its numerous taxes; the 
Communist Party is noted for its countless meetings." This was 
once an often-quoted saying. As time has passed by, however, 
this once-prevailing saying has taken on a new version: "The 
Communist Party has even more taxes than its meetings." This is 
really a dramatic change in the state of affairs. 
  If we pick up a newspaper or a magazine, we will see it is 
full of astonishing news: The taxation department in such and 
such a place was under attack, and its tax officials were beaten 
up. Farmers in Sichuan and Guizhou staged massive riots because 
of the unbearable taxes and other levies imposed by various 
levels of officials. In the past, streets were flooded with 
posters and signs reading "class struggle, once grasped, will 
work wonders." Now, this slogan has been replaced by "Resolutely 
Strike at Tax Evasion!" Despite this change, the relentless 
atmosphere remains the same. 
  Zhou Enlai served as premier for many years. While no 
comprehensive marriage law was worked out during his tenure, a 
tax law was enacted as early as 1950. It has been over a decade 
since the reform and open policy was put into force. However, no 
media law has been promulgated, nor is there a comprehensive law 
on banking. On the other hand, there are close to 30 tax laws of 
one kind or another. It goes without saying that all rulers in 
history used taxes to squeeze out the people's money. The 
Communist Party is no exception to this. 
  In the West, paying tax is known as paying "the price for 
civilization." If tax is collected and used in the proper way, 
it is, of course, helpful to the progress of society. Let us see 
if the Chinese Communist Party's tax laws and the revenue from 
taxes have served the purpose of promoting social progress; in 
other words, if the price paid by the people is worthwhile. This 
is a subject of great interest. 
<H5>  There are innumerable taxes, big and small. </H5>
  The current taxes in China are so numerous as to make the 
people confused. 
  The following is a case in point (the person's name is 
pseudo): 
  Hu You and his four friends set up a small neighborhood 
wholesale store in a medium-sized city in southern China. The 
store's business was to supply goods to individual small 
businessmen. After one year, they earned 150,000 yuan in gross 
profit, which was a pretty good return. Both Hu You and his 
employees were happy. They intended to use part of the profit to 
expand their business. Beyond their expectation, however, when 
the tax official came to assess the taxes, they found that they 
could not spare a single penny. Worse still, they even had to 
borrow money from the bank for next year's operations. The 
following is a summary of their accounts: 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Gross profit             |150,000                  |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Expenditures             |                         |Balance                  | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Business tax             |15,000                   |135,000                  | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Costs                    |30,000                   |105,000                  | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Wages                    |40,000                   |65,000 (net profit befor-| 
|                         |                         |e tax)                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Income tax (48%)         |31,200                   |33,800                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Urban construction tax   |2,184                    |31,616                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Energy tax               |3,380                    |28,236                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Education surtax         |150                      |28,086                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Bonus tax                |20,000                   |8,086                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Total                    |141,914                  |8,086                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |including 77,914 of taxes|                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  After seeing the tax official's calculation, Hu You and his 
employees were shocked. Only a few thousand yuan would be left 
after the tax payment. What is more, they had to pay the levies 
imposed by the local government. As a matter of fact, they had 
planned to satisfy the demands of the local government and 
neighborhood officials in the hope that they could do their 
business without impediment next year. Now that they found they 
had practically no money left in hand, their dismay can be 
imagined. 
  China's tax system is most complicated, overloaded with 
trivial details, and quite confusing. Not only are there 
numerous categories of taxes, but some of them overlap each 
other. As pointed out frankly in Contemporary China, 
a series of books with Deng Liqun as the editor-in-chief, the 
Chinese tax system is a "multi-level and multi-link compound tax 
system marked by a large variety of taxes collected on numerous 
occasions." Complicated and confusing as the system is, its 
purpose is quite clear: The more tax revenue, the better. And it 
doesn't matter whether or not the tax imposed is conducive to 
production and social progress. The following joke is 
representative of the Chinese people's view on the tax system. 
  A famous acrobatic troupe came to a place to give 
performances. In one of the performances, a Hercules-type 
performer squeezed a lemon dry with his hands. Then, he 
announced that the troupe would give a 100-yuan prize to anyone 
who could squeeze out one more drop of juice from the lemon. 
Encouraged by the handsome prize, several vigorous young guys 
mounted the stage one after another, but none of them could 
squeeze out a single drop of juice from the lemon no matter how 
hard they tried. At this time, everyone extolled the performer. 
Suddenly, an old man mounted the stage, his advanced age and 
thin physique drawing laughter from the audience. Acting slowing 
with full confidence, this old man, whose hands were wizened, 
squeezed out a spoonful of juice from the lemon. With his eyes 
glaring and voice trembling, the performer asked the old man: 
"What is your occupation?" "I work with the tax bureau," replied 
the old man unattentively. 
  If we look into the procedure that a product goes from the 
factory to the customer, we will see the layer upon layer of 
taxes that have to be paid and the overlapping of these taxes. 
Take steel products as an example. The factories and mines are 
required to pay a resource tax and a product tax. The wholesale 
dealer must pay a certain industrial and commercial tax. When 
the product reaches the retail store, a business tax has to be 
paid. If other taxes levied on these three tiers (such as those 
listed in the above table) are taken into account, certainly 
there is no profit to make from the product. 
  People cannot help but feel surprised at the large variety 
of taxes currently in effect. Now, there are nearly 30 different 
taxes in the industrial and commercial tax category. These, plus 
the customs duty, agricultural tax, and other special taxes give 
a total number of no less than 50. This is really a case most 
suitably described by the saying: If you don't calculate it, you 
won't know it; once you calculate it, you'll be shocked. 
  It should be noted that China replaced the profit-delivery 
system with the tax-payment system as late as 1983. The 
appearance of so many taxes in such a short period of time makes 
people surprised at the work efficiency of the Chinese bigwigs. 
Matter-of-factly, however, this high efficiency is 
understandable if we look into how the Communist Party has 
amassed money since it seized the reins of government. When the 
Communist Party took over Mainland China, the 
several-decade-long civil war had just ended and the country 
could hardly regain its breath. Then, the Chinese Communist 
regime blatantly joined the Korean War. Facing the requirements 
of supporting a big war machine on the one hand and 
consolidating the fledgling political power on the other, the 
Communist Party could do nothing but squeeze out as much as 
possible from the national product. Unlike all newborn feudal 
regimes in history which, as a rule, implemented a rest and 
recuperate policy, the Chinese Communist regime totally followed 
the example of the wartime communist economic policy pursued by 
the [former] Soviet Union. It put all revenues and expenditures 
under its control, exercised military-style financial and tax 
management, and proceeded step by step to eliminate practically 
all private industries and businesses. At that time, only two 
categories of industries and businesses were allowed to exist, 
namely, state-owned enterprises and collective enterprises. This 
way every penny earned by the enterprises could be put into the 
"State Treasury." In agriculture, it nationalized every piece of 
land so that it could impose a high agricultural tax with no 
loophole for tax evasion. During the years of Mao Zedong, the 
nation's revenue budget accounted for some 40 percent of the 
national income, the highest percentage being 45 percent. Given 
such a high accumulation rate, we can imagine that every penny 
saved by the people after meeting their subsistence was taken 
away by the Chinese Communist regime. This is why even the 
Chinese Communist regime itself later acknowledged that it "owed 
too much" to the people. After the start of the economic reform, 
the profit-delivery system could no longer meet the needs of a 
modern economy, and with the implementation of the tax system, 
the only way to get more revenue is to impose a large variety of 
taxes on the people. 
  As revealed by an article in JINGJI CANKAO BAO, a survey of 
183 state-owned enterprises shows that 81.6 percent of their 
1989 net income was turned over to the state in the form of tax 
payment and 10.2 percent was used to pay off loans, leaving only 
8.2 percent that could be retained by the enterprises. The tax 
burden on private enterprises owned by individuals was even 
heavier. Their tax payment accounted for more than 85 percent of 
the profits, and this did not include their individual earnings 
regulatory tax. 
<H5>  There are innumerable overt and covert taxes. </H5>
  The above-mentioned taxes are specified by law and are known 
as central government taxes. In fact, they are not the only 
taxes that taxpayers are required to pay. Besides central 
government taxes, there are local taxes and various kinds of 
levies not specified by law. 
  Now, in China, all levels of government can formulate 
quasi-tax policies to boost their revenues. For example, in 
addition to regular taxes, the central government is collecting 
construction funds for key energy and transportation projects, 
budget adjustment funds, and an education surcharge. Following 
the central government's steps, local governments are collecting 
three to five different kinds of funds--even as many as eight 
kinds of funds in some cases--plus a variety of fees. Examples 
of the funds collected are education funds, civil affairs funds, 
aid-to-the-poor funds, telecommunication development funds, 
family planning funds, and water and soil preservation funds. A 
real estate company in a county in Sichuan wanted to erect three 
buildings as a business project. The budget was 4 million yuan, 
but it was required to pay as many as eight kinds of fees, 
totaling 1.023 million yuan. These included the new area 
development fee, network construction fee, auxiliary urban 
construction fee, educational facility fee, garbage 
transportation fee, and construction management fee. 
  In a certain sense, fees collected from individuals by local 
governments and administrative organs at various levels are a 
form of tax revenue. For instance, many city governments in 
Guangdong Province have imposed a fee on new households moving 
into their respective cities with amounts ranging from 3,000 to 
10,000 yuan. For Shenzhen City, the fee is 10,000 yuan, and for 
Zhuhai and Guangzhou cities, it is 5,000 yuan. A county 
education bureau in Guangdong requires a payment of 7,000 yuan 
from each teacher who wants to change his or her job from 
teaching to other professions. In fact, there are fees of all 
descriptions. If you want to marry, you have to pay a marry 
registration fee of 80-300 yuan. If you want a government office 
to affix its seal on a document, you have to pay 10-20 yuan. If 
you have a new baby and want to include him or her in your 
household residence record, there is a fee of 300 yuan. Even in 
the case of distribution of the "relief grain subsidy," a 20 
percent handling fee has to be deducted from the subsidy. This 
really makes the people indignant. 
  The numerous levies are another form of tax. According to a 
newspaper report, a survey covering 523 private enterprises in 
Henan Province shows that they are required to pay more than 50 
kinds of levies and fees. This is 120 percent more than the 
taxes specified by law. A town in Guangdong's Shunde county is 
collecting as many as 38 kinds of levies from private 
enterprises. A survey conducted in a county in Jiangsu Province 
shows that 92 party and government organs and institutions were 
collecting money from the three county-owned factories. There 
were 52 different kinds of levies, totaling 820,000 yuan. 
  The heaviest levies are those imposed on farmers. Usually, 
there are very few industrial and commercial enterprises in the 
area administered by the grassroots rural government. So the 
only way to get an extra revenue is to impose more levies on 
farmers. Now, most local governments have imposed over a dozen 
kinds of levies on farmers. Since the agricultural tax and other 
levies imposed on farmers take away more than 50 percent of 
their income, farming has become a nonprofitable undertaking. 
For this reason, many farming families in Guangdong have left 
their land idle and moved to other places to do sideline work. 
Knowing this, we should not be surprised that farmers in 
Fengyang County, Anhui Province, have made the following remark: 
"Now, we are short of nothing but Chen Sheng and Wu Guang [Chen 
Sheng and Wu Guang were two farmers who led a revolt against the 
Qin Dynasty in Chinese history]. 
  At this point, we cannot help but admire the wisdom of 
Buddhism. Many Buddhist temples hang a couplet, one part of 
which reads: "Seeing that there is no definite law in this 
world, we know that all man-made laws are unlawful." 
<H5>  What is the result of heavy taxation? </H5>
  Everyone knows that China's current tax system is irrational 
and cannot meet the requirements of modern economic development. 
Can the numerous taxes bring a large tax revenue to the Chinese 
Government? In fact, the answer is negative. According to the 
China Statistic Yearbook for 1992, the 1991 revenue 
was 361 billion yuan (of which more than 80 percent is tax 
revenue), which accounted for only a little more than 18 percent 
of the GNP. Compared with the 31 percent registered in 1978 
before the replacement of the profit delivery system by the tax 
payment system, apparently this meant a big drop in the 
proportion of state revenue in the national economy. In 
developed countries, the state revenue averages 40 percent of 
the GNP. Sweden's state revenue even accounts for more than 60 
percent of the GNP. In China, which is a developing country, a 
drop in such percentage means that less funds are available for 
investment in expanding reproduction--an unfavorable situation 
for national economic development. 
  How can such heavy taxes yield only low revenue? According 
to 
the well-know Laffer Curve in the tax theory, a heavy tax burden 
has an adverse effect on production, and the result is a low tax 
revenue. In China, however, the situation is different. The only 
explanation for the low tax revenue is low efficiency in tax 
management--that is, a large amount of tax revenue has been lost. 
  In China, a lot of money is spent for tax management. Now, 
the country has an excessively large tax work contingent. There 
are as many as 600,000 tax workers. The money spent each year 
for their salaries, bonuses, and welfare benefits amounts to 4 
billion yuan, and the administrative expense is as high as 2.3 
billion yuan. The tax management expenses are equivalent to more 
than 2 percent of the net tax revenue. This percentage is more 
than twice as much as that in developed countries. Moreover, 
this does not include other related expenses and the cost of 
time consumed by enterprises in preparing tax reports. 
  The heavy tax burden has created lots of instances of tax 
evasion because enterprises would make no profit if they fully 
complied with the tax laws. According to statistics compiled by 
China's department concerned, the nation's loss of tax revenue 
is at least some 100 billion yuan per year, exceeding one-third 
of the annual net tax revenue. As for the extent of tax evasion, 
state-owned enterprises evade 50 percent of their tax liability, 
township enterprises 60 percent, self-employed workers and 
businessmen 80 percent, and individuals 95 percent. Enterprises 
have all kinds of strange tricks to evade taxes, two methods 
commonly in use being forging accounting records and 
fraudulently exaggerating costs. An enterprise in Shenzhen had 
an annual business volume of some 3 million yuan, but falsified 
its records to show 700,000 yuan in order to pay less tax. Some 
enterprises even submit fraudulent tax reports to show losses 
instead of profits. A private workshop in Henan's Shangqiu city 
did contract work for a military plant between 1986 and 1992. It 
committed tax evasion in the amount of some 1.6 million yuan by 
forging receipts and invoices and by issuing so-called "big head 
and small tail" invoices. There are lots and lots of cases like 
these, and what have been discovered are but a drop in the 
ocean. In addition, many officials have taken advantage of their 
positions or easy access to market information to engage in 
stock trade, particularly stocks issued for in-house 
shareholders. By buying and reselling such stocks, they can earn 
several dozen thousand yuan in profit, but they do not pay a 
single penny of income tax. 
  Of course, there must be a favorable environment for the 
existence of so many tax-evasion cases. Tax officials take 
bribes from tax evaders to line their pockets. Not only do they 
turn a blind eye to acts of tax evasion, but some of them even 
help taxpayers to unjustifiably reduce their tax liability or 
get a tax refund. In Guangdong, many grassroots tax cadres never 
have to pay by themselves when eating out. All that they need to 
do is to tell the restaurant to charge the account of such and 
such an enterprise. This is already an open secret. In a county 
town in Guangdong, a number of new storied houses have been 
built by private owners. Most of the owners are party and 
government cadres, of whom 20 percent are tax cadres. So the 
area is called a "villa of thieves" by the local people. A real 
estate company in Guangdong earned an annual profit of 3 million 
yuan and had to pay an income tax of 1.65 million yuan according 
to the tax law. In fact, it only paid 200,000 yuan to the 
government after spending nearly 100,000 yuan bribing the tax 
officials. In China where "the embezzlement trend at the end of 
the century" is becoming increasingly pronounced, no matter how 
many laws are enacted, they are but scraps of paper. The local 
governments and tax cadres can do whatever they like. For their 
own interests, they can formulate tax-reduction and exemption 
policies that are inconsistent with the tax laws. Some 
economists have sounded the alarm that with the tax laws and 
regulations badly marred by local governments and enterprises, 
China's tax system has practically collapsed. 
  The heavy tax burden has evoked strong resistance from the 
people. The past few years have seen a lot of instances where 
people revolted against heavy tax burden. Statistics compiled by 
the China State Administration of Taxation show that between 
1987 and 1991 there were 14,176 anti-tax revolts, including 
1,916 cases in which tax organs were stormed. The 1993 massive 
anti-violence action staged by farmers in Sichuan was a powerful 
reaction to the government's excessive taxes. According to 
statistics, more than 200 such collective and organized anti-tax 
activities were staged by farmers last year. The increasing 
number of smuggling cases may be perceived as activities derived 
from the anti-tax action. As revealed in a report submitted by 
the General Administration of Customs to the State Council in 
1991, each year the state lost about 30 billion yuan in customs 
duty and 8.5 billion yuan in industrial-and-commercial taxes as 
a result of the increased smuggling activities. 
  Another effect of the current tax system is the 
intensification of inequality in society. The layer upon layer 
of taxes have distorted the prices of commodities. Let us still 
take steel products as an example. When a product has reached 
the consumer, three layers of taxes have been paid. To make a 
profit, the enterprises must shift the tax burden to the 
consumer. Because of this, the price of the product reaching the 
consumer has been distorted again and again and increased by a 
big margin. Ultimately, the tax burden is not on the enterprises 
but on the people at large. On the other hand, those who get an 
extra income are not effectively taxed. This means that the 
current distribution of tax burden is in the nature of a 
regressive tax rate; in other words, the poor are required to 
shoulder a heavier tax burden, while the tax burden on the rich 
is lighter. An example is the above-mentioned stock traders who 
can earn several hundred thousand yuan but pay no income tax at 
all. Meanwhile, the government is indifferent to this phenomenon 
and is not playing an effective role in adjusting the income 
distribution. As a result, some people are taking advantage of 
their power to create more and more wealth or to earn an 
increasing amount of capital gains, while the income of the poor 
is becoming less and less. This has aggravated the unequal 
distribution of wealth and added to unfairness in society. 
  A conclusion derived from the above is that China's tax 
system is inefficient and unfair. 
<H3>  Who are the guests at the ball and feast financed with tax 
revenue? </H3>
  Who are to enjoy the cake of tax revenue? Who are the guests 
at the tax feast? 
  With the collapse of the myth of being a "great, glorious, 
and correct" party, there is a doubt about the way it uses the 
tax revenue. Modern Western economics represented by Niskanen 
has an incisive thesis on the waste of a nation's assets by the 
government acting as a monopoly power collective. Chinese 
economist Qian Jiaju has also made an estimate of the waste 
caused by China's planned economic system. According to his 
estimate, of the more-than-1.2-trillion-yuan fixed assets owned 
by the state, some 600 billion yuan worth of assets are left 
idle. As can be seen, the huge amount of fixed assets created by 
the all-people ownership system, though praised by hack 
economists, is actually a big waste. 
According to data published in the 1992 China Statistic 
Yearbook, the nation's main expenditures other than capital 
construction investment and education spending were as follows: 
The administrative expense accounted for 10 percent of the total 
spending. The price subsidy was also close to 10 percent of the 
total spending. Subsidies to loss-incurring enterprises was 
equivalent to 17 percent of the net tax revenue. 
  A report by the CPC Central Discipline Inspection Commission 
reveals that the nation's public funds spent each year for 
banquets and travels have exceeded 120 billion yuan. This is 
more than one-third of the net tax revenue. Quite obviously, a 
considerable amount of the tax revenue is used by public 
servants. At present, the number of "financial work" cadres is 
increasing by 1 million each year. On the average, each province 
now has some 70 departments and bureaus, and 30 percent of them 
are unnecessary. A prefecture or a city has about 50 party and 
government organs, of which 40 percent are unnecessary. A county 
has 45 organs, and actually 25 percent of them are not required. 
Each year the tax cadres use a large amount of the people's tax 
money for extravagant feasting and wining. Of course, they want 
to have more new taxes to collect. 
  Subsidies to loss-incurring state enterprises and to extra 
low prices account for one-third of the nation's expenditure 
budget. Money used in this way is an ineffective and wasteful 
spending. According to statistics, over 30 percent of the 
state-owned enterprises are suffering losses. The economic 
reform has been conducted for so many years, but the problem of 
loss-incurring enterprises has as yet to be tackled. So far the 
only thing that the government has done in this regard is using 
the people's tax money to fill the bottomless pit. 
  The greatest state expenditure is capital construction. 
Apart 
from the great waste of investments under the present system as 
pointed out by Qian Jiaju, another problem is that not all 
investments are in the interest of the people at large. As a 
matter of fact, investments are dictated by the result of power 
struggle. Sometimes, a large-scale investment project in a 
locality can only increase the revenue of the local government, 
create job opportunities for the local people, and spur the 
development of other undertakings in that particular locality. 
For example, the Three Gorges Project--a 
several-hundred-billion-yuan project under planning--will have 
no direct benefit to Guangdong, Guangxi, Inner Mongolia, and 
Xinjiang, and much less will it do any good to Hainan. But this 
investment project will use the money of the people throughout 
the country. As another example, if a national stock exchange 
center is established in Shanghai, the city will become a 
national financial center, and its service trade and other 
related industries will be stimulated. Here, of course, the 
greatest beneficiary will be Shanghai--a much greater tax 
revenue for its government and much more job opportunities for 
its people. But there will be no benefit at all for the remote 
provinces. If we understand this, we will see why all localities 
have a "thirst for investment." Now, the disbursement of state 
funds is not to ensure a balanced development across the 
country, but represents the result of trials of political power. 
According to someone's estimate, during the past years, 
investments in Beijing and Shanghai have accounted for about 40 
percent of the nation's total investments. Apparently, the 
political forces representing these two cities are very strong 
in the power trials at the central level. The Shanghai people 
often complain that during the past years a large part of their 
revenue has been taken away by the central government. Actually, 
however, the central government has made the largest amount of 
investment in Shanghai. The investment in the Baoshan Iron and 
Steel Complex is equal more or less to the several decades' 
investment that the central government made in a remote 
province. As another example, while recently the central 
government has requisitioned funds from the southern provinces 
to cope with the current financial crisis, Jiang Zemin and Zhu 
Rongji have privately made "an exception" in favor of Shanghai. 
This is a result of the trials of power. In contrast, the 
central government has required Guangdong Province to contribute 
an additional 4 billion yuan. Such a requirement is a kind of 
extortion in view of the fact that up to 1985 Guangdong's quota 
of contribution to the central government had been less than 8 
billion yuan a year. It is, therefore, quite clear that the 
chief guests at the tax feast are the bigwigs who can in no way 
stand for the interests of the people of the entire country. 
  From the above analysis, we can draw a conclusion: China's 
tax system is complicated and burdensome, inefficient and 
unfair. Moreover, a lot of tax revenue is wasted. Long ago, some 
Chinese economists noted that the tax system must be reformed. 
However, under the present circumstances where the price system 
has yet to be rationalized and the legal system is still 
unsound, tax reform cannot make any progress. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>
